Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital


Book taken from the pages of Marxists.org

------------------------------------------------------------------------



TRANSLATORS NOTE


 

THIS is an original translation not only of the main body of the work
but also of a number of quotations from foreign authors. Page references
thus usually indicate the original foreign sources.

In so far as possible, however, I have availed myself of existing
translations and have referred to the following standard works: Karl
Marx: CAPITAL, vol.i (transl. by Moore-Aveling, London, 1920); vol.ii
(transl. by E. Untermann, Chicago, 1907); vol.iii (transl. by E.
Untermann, Chicago, 1909) THE POVERTY OF PHILOSOPHY (translators name
not given, London, 1936).

Sismondis introduction to the second edition of NOUVEAUX PRINCIPES is
quoted from M. Mignets translation of selected passages by Sismondi,
entitled POLITICAL ECONOMY AND THE PHILOSOPHY OF GOVERNMENT, London,
1847. No English translation exists of Marxs THEORIEN ÜBER DEN MEHRWERT.
[The Marxists Internet Archive has now published the English translation
of this work.]

Unfortunately, not all the West European texts, and none of the Russian
except Engels correspondence with Nikolayon were accessible to me, and I
regret having been unable to trace some quotations and check up on
others. In such cases, the English version follows the German text and
will at least bring out the point the author wanted to make.

To save the reader grappling with unfamiliar concepts, I have converted
foreign currencies and measures into their English equivalents, at the
following rates:

20 _marks_ 25 _francs_ $5 £1 (gold standard);
1 _hectare_ (roughly) 2.5 acres;
I _kilometre_ ⁵/8 mile.

I am glad of this opportunity to express my gratitude to Dr. W. Stark
and Mrs. J. Robinson for the helpful criticism and appreciation with
which my work has met.

Agnes Schwarzschild

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 



A NOTE ON ROSA LUXEMBURG


 

Rosa Luxemburg was born on 5 March 1870, at Zamosc, a little town of
Russian Poland, not far from he city of Lublin. She came from a fairly
well-to-do family of Jewish merchants, and soon showed the two
outstanding traits which were to characterise all her life and work: a
high degree of intelligence, and a burning thirst for social justice
which led her, while still a schoolgirl, into the revolutionary camp.
Partly to escape the Russian police, partly to complete her education,
she went to Zurich and studied there the sciences of law and economics.
Her doctoral dissertation dealt with the industrial development of
Poland and showed up the vital integration of Polish industry with the
wider economic system of metropolitan Russia. It was a work not only of
considerable promise, but already of solid and substantial achievement.

Her doctorate won, Rosa Luxemburg looked around for a promising field of
work and decided to go to Germany, whose working-class movement seemed
destined to play a leading part in the future history of international
socialism. She settled there in 1896, and two years later contracted a
formal marriage with a German subject which secured her against the
danger of forcible deportation to Russia. Now, at that moment the German
Social-Democratic Party was in the throes of a serious crisis. In 1899,
Eduard Bernstein published his well-known work DIE VORAUSSETZUNGEN DES
SOZIALISMUS UND DIE AUFGABEN DER SOZIALDEMOKRATIE, which urged the party
to drop its revolutionary jargon and to work henceforth for tangible
social reforms within the given economic set-up, instead of trying to
bring about its final and forcible overthrow. This reformism or
revisionism seemed to Rosa Luxemburg a base as well as a foolish
doctrine, and she published in the same year a pamphlet SOZIALREFORM
ODER REVOLUTION? [English translation] which dealt with Bernsteins ideas
in no uncertain fashion. From this moment onward, she was and remained
one of the acknowledged leaders of the left wing within the German
working-class movement.

The events of the year 1905 gave Rosa Luxemburg a welcome opportunity to
demonstrate that revolution was to her more than a subject of purely
academic interest. As soon as the Russian masses began to move, she
hurried to Warsaw and threw herself into the fray. There followed a
short span of feverish activity, half a years imprisonment, and,
finally, a return journey to Berlin. The experiences of the Warsaw
rising are reflected in a book entitled MASSENSTREIK, PARTEI UND
GEWERKSCHAFTEN [English translation], which was published in 1906. It
recommends the general strike as the most effective weapon in the
struggle of the proletariat against the bourgeoisie.

The International Socialist Congress which met at Stuttgart in 1907
prepared and foreshadowed the sorry history of Rosa Luxemburgs later
life. On that occasion she drafted, together with Lenin, a resolution
which demanded that the workers of the world should make any future war
an opportunity for the destruction of the capitalist system. Unlike so
many others, she stuck to her resolution when, seven years later, the
time of testing came. The result was that she had to spend nearly the
whole of the first World War in jail, either under punishment or in,
protective custody. But imprisonment did not mean inactivity. In 1916,
there appeared in Switzerland her book DIE KRISE DER SOZIALDEMOKRATIE
[English translation], which assailed the leaders of the German labour
party for their patriotic attitude and called the masses to
revolutionary action. The foundation of the Spartacus League in 1917,
the germ cell out of which the Communist Party of Germany was soon to
develop, was vitally connected with the dissemination of Rosa Luxemburgs
aggressive sentiments.

The collapse of the _Kaiserreich_ on is November 1918, gave Rosa
Luxemburg her freedom and an undreamt-of range of opportunities. The two
months that followed must have been more crowded and more colourful than
all her previous life taken together. But the end of her career was
imminent. The fatal Spartacus week, an abortive rising of the Berlin
workers, led on 15 January 1919, to her arrest by a government composed
of former party comrades. During her removal to prison she was attacked
and severely beaten by soldiers belonging to the extreme right, a
treatment which she did not survive. Her body was recovered days later
from a canal.

A type not unlike Trotsky, Rosa Luxemburg had her tender and sentimental
side, which comes to the surface in her correspondence, especially in
the BRIEFE AUS DEM GEFÄNGNIS printed in 1922. As a thinker she showed
considerable honesty and independence of mind. THE ACCUMULATION OF
CAPITAL, first published in 1913, which is undoubtedly her finest
achievement, reveals her as that rarest of all rare phenomena a Marxist
critical of Karl Marx.

W. Stark

 

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 11.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section One The Problem of Reproduction



CHAPTER 1 THE OBJECT OF OUR INVESTIGATION


 

KARL MARX made a contribution of lasting service to the theory of
economics when he drew attention to the problem of the reproduction of
the entire social capital. It is significant that in the history of
economics we find only two attempts at an exact exposition of this
problem: one by Quesney, the father of the Physiocrats, at its very
inception; and in its final stage this attempt by Marx. In the interim,
the problem was ever with bourgeois economics. Yet bourgeois economists
have never been fully aware of this problem in its pure aspects,
detached from related and intersecting minor problems: they have never
been able to formulate it precisely, let alone solve it. Seeing that the
problem is of paramount importance, their attempts may all the same help
us to some understanding of the trend of scientific economics.

What is it precisely that constitutes this problem of the reproduction
of total capital? The literal meaning of the word reproduction is
repetition, renewal of the process of production. At first sight it may
be difficult to see in what respect the idea of reproduction differs
from that of repetition which we can all understand why such a new and
unfamiliar term should be required. But in the sort of repetition which
we shall consider, in the continual recurrence of the process of
production, there are certain distinctive features. First, the regular
repetition of reproduction is the general _sine qua non_ of regular
consumption which in its turn has been the precondition of human
civilisation in every one of its historical forms. The concept of
reproduction, viewed in this way, reflects an aspect of the history of
civilisation. Production can never be resumed, there can be no
reproduction, unless certain prerequisites such as tools, raw materials
and labour have been established during the preceding period of
production. However, at the most primitive level of mans civilisation,
at the initial stage of mans power over nature, this possibility to
re-engage in production depended more or less on chance. So long as
hunting and fishing were the main foundations of social existence,
frequent periods of general starvation interrupted the regular
repetition of production. Some primitive peoples recognised at a very
early stage that for reproduction as a regularly recurring process
certain measures were essential; these they incorporated into ceremonies
of a religious nature; and in this way they accepted such measures as
traditional social commitments. Thus, as the thorough researches of
Spencer and Gillen have taught us, the totem cult of the Australian
negroes is fundamentally nothing but certain measures taken by social
groups for the purpose of securing and preserving their animal and
vegetable foodstuffs; these precautions had been taken year by year
since time immemorial and thus they became fossilised into religious
ceremonials. Yet the circle of consumption and production which forms
the essence of reproduction became possible only with the invention of
tillage with the hoe, with the taming of domestic animals, and with
cattle-raising for the purpose of consumption. Reproduction is something
more than mere repetition in so far as it presupposes a certain level of
societys supremacy over nature, or, in economic terms, a certain
standard of labour productivity.

On the other hand, at all stages of social development, the process of
production is based on the continuation of two different, though closely
connected factors, the technical and social conditions on the precise
relationship between man and nature and that between men and men.
Reproduction depends to the same degree on both these conditions. We
have just seen how reproduction is bound up with the conditions of human
working techniques, how far it is indeed solely the result of a certain
level of labour productivity; but the social forms of production
prevailing in each case are no less decisive. In a primitive communist
agrarian community, reproduction as well as the whole plan of economic
life is determined by the community of all workers and their democratic
organs. The decision to re-engage in labour the organisation of labour
the provision of raw materials, tools, and man-power, as the essential
preliminaries of labour the arrangement of reproduction and the
determination of its volume are all results of a planned co-operation in
which everybody within the boundaries of the community takes his part.
In an economic system based on slave labour or _corvée_, reproduction is
enforced and regulated in all details by personal relations of
domination. Here the volume of reproduction is determined by the right
of disposal held by the ruling _élites_ over smaller or larger circles
of other peoples labour. In a society producing by capitalist methods,
reproduction assumes a peculiar form, as a mere glance at certain
striking phenomena will show us. In every other society known to
history, reproduction recurs in a regular sequence as far as its
preconditions, the existing means of production and labour power, make
this possible. As a rule, only external influences such as a devastating
war or a great pestilence, depopulating vast areas of former cultural
life, and consequently destroying masses of labour power and of
accumulated means of production, can result in a complete interruption
of reproduction or in its contraction to any considerable extent for
longer or shorter periods. A despotic organisation of the plan of
production may on occasion lead to similar phenomena. When in ancient
Egypt Pharaohs will chained thousands of fellaheen for decades to the
building of the pyramids; when in modern Egypt Ismail Pasha ordered
20,000 fellaheen to forced labour on the Suez Canal; or when, about two
hundred years before Christ, the Emperor Shi Hoang Ti, founder of the
Chin dynasty, allowed 400,000 people to perish of hunger and exhaustion
and thus sacrificed a whole generation to his purpose of consolidating
the Great Wall at China's northern frontier, the result was always that
vast stretches of arable land were left fallow and that regular economic
life was interrupted for long periods. In all these cases the causes of
these interruptions of reproduction obviously lay in the one-sided
determination of the plan of reproduction by those in power.

Societies which produce according to capitalist methods present a
different picture. We observe that in certain periods all the
ingredients of reproduction may be available, both labour and means of
production, and yet some vital needs of society for consumer goods may
be left unfulfilled. We find that in spite of these resources
reproduction may in part be completely suspended and in part curtailed.
Here it is no despotic interference with the economic plan that is
responsible for the difficulties in the process of production. Quite
apart from all technical conditions, reproduction here depends on purely
social considerations: only those goods are produced which can with
certainty he expected to sell, and not merely to sell, but to sell at
the customary profit. Thus profit becomes an end in itself, the decisive
factor which determines not only production but also reproduction. Not
only does it decide in each case what work is to be undertaken, how it
is to be carried out, and how the products are to be distributed; what
is more, profit decides, also, at the end of every working period,
whether the labour process is to be resumed, and, if so, to what extent
and in what direction it should be made to operate.⁽¹⁾

In capitalist society, therefore, the process of reproduction as a
whole, constitutes a peculiar and most complicated problem, in
consequence of these purely historical and social factors. There is, as
we shall see, an external characteristic which shows clearly this
specific historical peculiarity of the capitalist process of
reproduction. Comprising not only production but also circulation (the
process of exchange), it unites these two elements. Capitalist,
production is primarily production by innumerable private producers
without any planned regulation. The only social link between these
producers is the act of exchange. In taking account of social
requirements reproduction has no clue to go on other than the
experiences of the preceding labour period. These experiences, however,
remain the private experiences of individual producers and are not
integrated into a comprehensive and social form. Moreover, they do not
always refer positively and directly to the needs of society. They are
often rather indirect and negative, for it is only on the basis of price
fluctuations that they indicate whether the aggregate of produced
commodities falls short of the effective demand or exceeds it. Yet the
individual private producers make recurrent use of these experiences of
the preceding labour period when they re-engage in reproduction, so that
glut or shortage are bound to occur again in the following period.
Individual branches of production may develop independently, so that
there may be a surplus in one branch and a deficiency in another. But as
nearly all individual branches of production are interdependent
technically, glut or shortage in some of the larger branches of
production lead to the same phenomenon in most of the others. Thus the
general supply of products may alternate periodically between shortage
and surplus relative to the social demand.

Herein lies the peculiar character of reproduction in a capitalist
society, which differs from all other known forms of production. In the
first place, every branch of production develops independently within
certain limits, in a way that leads to periodical interruptions of
production of shorter or longer duration. Secondly, the individual
branches of reproduction show deviations from social requirements
amounting to all-round disparity and thus resulting in a general
interruption of reproduction. These features of capitalist reproduction
are quite characteristic. In all other economic systems, reproduction
runs its uninterrupted and regular course, apart from external
disturbance by violence. Capitalist reproduction, however, to quote
Sismondis well-known dictum, can only be represented as a continuous
sequence of individual spirals. Every such spiral starts with small
loops which become increasingly larger and eventually very large indeed.
Then they contract, and a new spiral starts again with small loops,
repeating the figure up to the point of interruption. This periodical
fluctuation between the largest volume of reproduction and its
contraction to partial suspension, this cycle of slump, boom, and
crisis, as it has been called, is the most striking peculiarity of
capitalist reproduction.

It is very important, however, to establish quite firmly and from the
very outset that this cyclical movement of boom, slump, and crisis, does
not represent the whole problem of capitalist reproduction, although it
is an essential element of it. Periodical cycles and crises are specific
phases of reproduction in a capitalist system of economy, but not the
whole of this process. In order to demonstrate the pure implications of
capitalist reproduction we must rather consider it quite apart from the
periodical cycles and crises. Strange as this may appear, the method is
quite rational; it is indeed the only method of inquiry that is
scientifically tenable. In order to demonstrate and to solve the problem
of pure value we must leave price fluctuations out of consideration. The
approach of vulgar economics always attempts to solve the problem of
value by reference to fluctuations in demand and supply. Classical
economists, from Adam Smith to Karl Marx, attack the problem in the
opposite way, pointing out that fluctuations in the mutual relation
between demand and supply can explain only disparities between price and
value, not value itself. In order to find the value of a commodity, we
must start by assuming that demand and supply are in a state of
equilibrium, that the price of a commodity and its value closely
correspond to one another. Thus the scientific problem of value begins
at the very point where the effect of demand and supply ceases to
operate.

In consequence of periodical cycles and crises capitalist reproduction
fluctuates as a rule around the level of the effective total demand of
society, sometimes rising above and sometimes falling below this level,
contracting occasionally even to the point of almost complete
interruption of reproduction. However, if we consider a longer period, a
whole cycle with its alternating phases of prosperity and depression, of
boom and slump, that is if we consider reproduction at its highest and
lowest volume, including the stage of suspension, we can set off boom
against slump and work out an average, a mean volume of reproduction for
the whole cycle. This average is not only a theoretical figment of
thought, it is also a real objective fact. For in spite of the sharp
rises and falls in the course of a cycle, in spite of crises, the needs
of society are always satisfied, more or less, reproduction continues on
its complicated course, and productive capacities develop progressively.
How can this take place, leaving cycles and crises out of consideration?
Here the real question begins. The attempt to solve the problem of
reproduction in terms of the periodical character of crises is
fundamentally a device of vulgar economics, just like the attempt to
solve the problem, of value in terms of fluctuations in demand and
supply. Nevertheless, we shall see in the course of our observations
that as soon as economic theory gets an inkling of the problem of
reproduction, as soon as it has at least started guessing at the
problem, it reveals a persistent tendency, suddenly to transform the
problem of reproduction into the problem of crises, thus barring its own
way to the solution of the question. When we speak of capitalist
reproduction in the following exposition, we shall always understand by
this term a mean volume of productivity which is an average taken over
the various phases of a cycle.

Now, the total of capitalist reproduction is created by an unlimited and
constantly changing number of private producers. They produce
independently of one another; apart from the observation of price
fluctuations there is no social control no social link exists between
the individual producers other than the exchange of commodities. The
question arises how these innumerable disconnected operations can lead
to the actual total of production. This general aspect of our problem
indeed strikes us immediately as one of prime importance. But if we put
it this way, we overlook the fact that such private producers are not
simply producers of commodities but are essentially capitalist
producers, that the total production of society is not simply production
for the sake of satisfying social requirements, and equally not merely
production of commodities, but essentially capitalist production.

Let us examine our problem anew in the light of this fact. A producer
who produces not only commodities but capital must above all create
surplus value. The capitalist producers final goal, his main incentive,
is the production of surplus value. The proceeds from the commodities he
has manufactured must not only recompense him for all his outlay, but in
addition they must yield him a value which does not correspond with any
expense on his part, and is pure gain. If we consider the process of
production from the point of view of the creation of surplus value, we
see that the capital advanced by the capitalist is divided into two
parts: the first part represents his expenses on means of production
such as premises, raw material, partly finished goods and machinery. The
second part is spent on wages. This holds good, even if the capitalist
producer does not know it himself, and in spite of the pious stuff about
fixed and circulating capital with which he may delude himself and the
world. Marx called this first part constant capital. Its value is not
changed by its utilisation in the labour process it is transferred _in
toto_ to the finished product. The second part Marx calls the variable
capital. This gives rise to an additional value, which materialises when
the results of unpaid labour are appropriated. The various components
which make up the value of every commodity produced by capitalist
methods may be expressed by the formula: _c_ + _v_ + _s_.In this formula
_c_ stands for the value of the constant capital laid out in inanimate
means of production and transferred to the commodity, _v_ stands for the
value of the variable capital advanced inform of wages, and _s_ stands
for the surplus value, the additional value of the unpaid part of wage
labour. Every type of goods shows these three components of value,
whether we consider an individual commodity or the aggregate of
commodities as a whole, whether we consider cotton textiles or ballet
performances, cast-iron tubes or liberal newspapers. Thus for the
capitalist producer the manufacture of commodities is not an end in
itself, it is only a means to the appropriation of surplus value. This
surplus value, however, can be of no use to the capitalist so long as it
remains hidden in the commodity form of the product. Once the commodity
has been produced, it must be realised, it must be converted into a form
of pure value; that is, into money. All capital expenses incorporated in
the commodity must shed their commodity-form and revert to the
capitalist as money to make this conversion possible so that he can
appropriate the surplus value in cash. The purpose of production is
fulfilled only when this conversion has been successful, only when the
aggregate of commodities has been sold according to its value. The
proceeds of this sale of commodities, the money that has been received
for them, contains the same components of value as the former aggregate
of commodities and can be expressed by the same formula _c_ + _v_ + _s_.
Part _c_ recompenses the capitalist for his advances on means of
production that have been used up, part _v_ recompenses him for his
advances on wages, and the last part, _s_, represents the expected
surplus, the capitalists clear profit in cash.⁽²⁾

This conversion of capital from its original form, from the starting
point of all capitalist production, into means of production, dead and
living, such as raw materials, instruments, and labour; its further
conversion into commodities by a living labour process; and its final
reconversion into money, a greater amount of money indeed than at the
initial stage this transformation of capital is, however, required for
more than the production and appropriation of surplus value. The aim and
incentive of capitalist production is not a surplus value pure and
simple, to be appropriated in any desired quantity, but a surplus value
ever growing into larger quantities, surplus value _ad infinitum_. But
to achieve this aim, the same magic means must be used over and over
again, the means of capitalist production the ever repeated
appropriation of the proceeds of unpaid wage labour in the process of
commodity manufacture, and the subsequent realisation of the commodities
so produced.

Thus quite a new incentive is given to constantly renewed production, to
the process of reproduction as a regular phenomenon in capitalist
society, an incentive unknown to any other system of production. In
every other economic system known to history, reproduction is determined
by the unceasing need of society for consumer goods, whether they are
the needs of all the workers determined in a democratic manner as in an
agrarian and communist market community, or the despotically determined
needs of an antagonistic class society, as in an economy of slave
labour, or _corvée_ and the like. But in a capitalist system of
production, it is not consideration of social needs which actuates the
individual private producer who alone matters in this connection. His
production is determined entirely by the effective demand, and even this
is to him a mere means for the realisation of surplus value which for
him is indispensable. Appropriation of surplus value is his real
incentive, and production of consumer goods for the satisfaction of the
effective demand is only a detour when we look to the real motive, that
of appropriation of surplus value, although for the individual
capitalist it is also a rule of necessity. This motive, to appropriate
surplus value, also urges him to re-engage in reproduction over and over
again. It is the production of surplus value which turns reproduction of
social necessities into a _perpetuum mobile_. Reproduction, for its
part, can obviously be only resumed when the products of the previous
period, the commodities, have been realised; that is, converted into
money; for capital in the form of money, in the form of pure value, must
always be the starting point of reproduction in a capitalist system. The
first condition of reproduction for the capitalist producer is thus seen
to be a successful realisation of the commodities produced during the
preceding period of production.

Now we come to a second important point. Under a system of private
economy, it is the individual producer who determines the volume of
reproduction at his discretion. His main incentive is appropriation of
surplus value, indeed an appropriation increasing as rapidly as
possible. An accelerated appropriation of surplus value, however,
necessitates an increased production of capital to generate this surplus
value. Here a large-scale enterprise enjoys advantages over a small one
in every respect. In fine, the capitalist method of production furnishes
not only a permanent incentive to reproduction in general, but also a
motive for its expansion, for reproduction on an ever larger scale.

Nor is that all. Capitalist methods of production do more than awaken in
the capitalist this thirst for surplus value whereby he is impelled to
ceaseless expansion of reproduction. Expansion becomes in truth a
coercive law, an economic condition of existence for the individual
capitalist. Under the rule of competition, cheapness of commodities is
the most important weapon of the individual capitalist in his struggle
for a place in the market. Now all methods of reducing the cost of
commodity production permanently amount in the end to an expansion of
production; excepting those only which aim at a specific increase of the
rate of surplus value by measures such as wage cutting or lengthening
the hours of work. As for these latter devices, they are as such likely
to encounter many obstacles. In this respect, a large enterprise
invariably enjoys advantages of every kind over a small or medium
concern. They may range from a saving in premises or instruments, in the
application of more efficient means of production, in extensive
replacement of manual labour by machinery, down to a speedy exploitation
of a favourable turn of the market so as to acquire raw materials
cheaply. Within very wide limits, these advantages increase in direct
proportion to the expansion of the enterprise. Thus, as soon as a few
capitalist enterprises have been enlarged, competition itself forces all
others to expand likewise. Expansion becomes a condition of existence. A
growing tendency towards reproduction at a progressively increasing
scale thus, ensues, which spreads automatically like a tidal wave over
ever larger surfaces of reproduction.

Expanding reproduction is not a new discovery of capital. On the
contrary, it had been the rule since time immemorial in every form of
society that displayed economic and cultural progress. It is true, of
course, that simple reproduction as a mere continuous repetition of the
process of production on the same scale as before can be observed over
long periods of social history. In the ancient agrarian and communist
village communities, for instance, increase in population did not lead
to a gradual expansion of production, but rather to the new generation
being expelled and the subsequent founding of equally small and
self-sufficient colonies. The old small handicraft units of India and
China provide similar instances of a traditional repetition of
production in the same forms and on the same scale, handed down from
generation to generation. But simple reproduction is in all these cases
the source and unmistakable sign of a general economic and cultural
stagnation. No important forward step in production, no memorial of
civilisation, such as the great waterworks of the East, the pyramids of
Egypt, the military roads of Rome, the Arts and Sciences of Greece, or
the development of craftsmanship and towns in the Middle Ages would have
been possible without expanding reproduction; for the basis and also the
social incentive for a decisive advancement of civilisation lies solely
in the gradual expansion of production beyond immediate requirements,
and in a continual growth of the population itself as well as of its
demands.

Exchange in particular, which brought about a class society, and its
historical development into the capitalist form of economy, would have
been unthinkable without expanding reproduction. In a capitalist
society, moreover, expanding reproduction acquires certain
characteristics. As we have already mentioned, it becomes right away a
coercive law to the individual capitalist. Capitalist methods of
production do not exclude simple or even retrogressive reproduction;
indeed, this is responsible for the periodical phenomenon of crises
following phases, likewise periodical, of overstrained expansion of
reproduction in times of boom. But ignoring periodical fluctuations, the
general trend of reproduction is ever towards expansion. For the
individual capitalist, failure to keep abreast of this expansion means
quitting the competitive struggle, economic death.

Moreover, there are certain other aspects to be considered. The concept
of expanding reproduction applies only to the quantity of products, to
the aggregate of manufactured objects. So long as production rests
solely or mainly upon a natural economy, consumption determines the
extent and character of the individual labour process, as well as that
of reproduction in general, as an end in itself: this applies to the
agrarian and communist village communities of India, to the Roman
_villa_ with its economy of slave labour, and to the medieval feudal
farm based on _corvée_. But the picture is different in a capitalist
economic system. Capitalist production is not production for the purpose
of consumption, it is production for the purpose of creating value. The
whole process of production as well as of reproduction is ruled by value
relationships. Capitalist production is not the production of consumer
goods, nor is it merely the production of commodities: it is
pre-eminently the production of surplus value. Expanding reproduction,
from a capitalist point of view, is expanding production of surplus
value, though it takes place in the forms of commodity production and is
thus in the last instance the production of consumer goods. Changes in
the productivity of labour during the course of reproduction cause
continual discrepancies between these two aspects. If productivity
increases, the same amount of capital and surplus value may represent a
progressively larger amount of consumer goods. Expanding production,
understood as the creation of a greater amount of surplus value, need
not therefore necessarily imply expanding reproduction in the capitalist
meaning of the term. Conversely, capital may, within limits, yield a
greater surplus value in consequence of a higher degree of exploitation
such as is brought about by wage-cutting and the like, without actually
producing a greater amount of goods. But in both cases the surplus value
has a twofold aspect: it is a quantity of value as well as an aggregate
of material products, and from a capitalist point of view, its elements
in both instances are thus the same.

As a rule, an increased production of surplus value results from an
increase of capital brought about by addition of part of the
appropriated surplus value to the original capital, no matter whether
this capitalist surplus value is used for the expansion of an old
enterprise or for founding a new one, an independent offshoot.
Capitalist expanding reproduction thus acquires the specific
characteristics of an increase in capital by means of a progressive
capitalisation of surplus value, or, as Marx has put it, by the
accumulation of capital.

The general formula for enlarged reproduction under the rule of capital
thus runs as follows: (_c_ + _v_ + _s_/_x_ + _s'_. Here _s_/_x_ stands
for the capitalised part of the surplus value appropriated in an earlier
period of production; _s'_ stands for the new surplus value created by
the increased capital. Part of this new surplus value is capitalised
again, and expanding reproduction is thus, from the capitalist point of
view, a constantly flowing process of alternate appropriation and
capitalisation of surplus value.

So far, however, we have only arrived at a general and abstract formula
for reproduction. Let us now consider more closely the concrete
conditions which are necessary to apply this formula.

The surplus value which has been appropriated, after it has successfully
cast off its commodity-form in the market, appears as a given amount of
money. This money-form is the form of its absolute value, the beginning
of its career as capital. But as it is impossible to create surplus
value with money, it cannot, in this form, advance beyond the threshold
of its career. Capital must assume commodity-form, so that the
particular portion of it which is earmarked for accumulation can be
capitalised. For only in this form can it become productive capital;
that is, capital begetting new surplus value. Therefore, like the
original capital, it must again be divided into two parts; a constant
part, comprising the inanimate means of production, and a variable part,
the wages. Only then will our formula _c_ + _v_ + _s_ apply to it in the
same way as it applied to the old capital.

But the good intent of the capitalist to accumulate, his thrift and
abstinence which make him use the greater part of his surplus value for
production instead of squandering it on personal luxuries, is not
sufficient for this purpose. On the contrary, it is essential that he
should find on the commodity market the concrete forms which he intends
to give his new surplus value. In the first place, he must secure the
material means of production such as raw materials, machines etc
required for the branch of production he has chosen and planned, so that
the particular part of the surplus value which correspond to his
constant capital may assume a productive form. Secondly, the other,
variable part of his surplus value must also be convertible, and two
essentials are necessary for this conversion: of first importance, the
labour market must offer a sufficient quantity of additional labour, and
secondly, as the workers cannot live on money alone, the commodity
market, too, must offer an additional amount of provisions, which the
workers newly to be employed may exchange against the variable part of
the surplus value they will get from the capitalist.

All these prerequisites found, the capitalist can set his capitalised
surplus value to work and make it, as operating capital, beget new
surplus value. But still his task is not completely done. Both the new
capital and the surplus value produced still exist for the time being in
the shape of an additional quantity of some commodity or other. In this
form the new capital is but advanced, and the new surplus value created
by it is still in a form in which it is of no use to the capitalist. The
new capital as well as the surplus value which it has created must cast
off their commodity-form, re-assume the form of pure value, and thus
revert to the capitalist as money. Unless this process is successfully
concluded, the new capital and surplus value will be wholly or partly
lost, the capitalisation of surplus value will have miscarried, and
there will have been no accumulation. It is absolutely essential to the
accumulation of capital that a sufficient quantity of commodities
created by the new capital should win a place for itself on the market
and be realised.

Thus we see that expanding reproduction as accumulation of capital in a
capitalist system is bound up with a whole series of special conditions.
Let us look at these more closely. The first condition is that
production should create surplus value, for surplus value is the
elementary form in which alone increased production is possible under
capitalist conditions The entire process of production must abide by
this condition when determining the relations between capitalist and
worker in the production of commodities. Once this first condition is
given, the second is that surplus value must be realised, converted into
the form of money, so that it can be appropriated for the purposes of
expanding reproduction. This second condition thus leads us to the
commodity market. Here, the hazards of exchange decide the further fate
of the surplus value, and thus the future of reproduction. The third
condition is as follows: provided that part of the realised surplus
value has been added to capital for the purpose of accumulation, this
new capital must first assume its productive form of labour and
inanimate means of production. Moreover, that part of it which had been
exchanged for labour must be converted into provisions for the workers.
Thus we are led again to the markets of labour and commodities. If all
these requirements have been met and enlarged reproduction of
commodities has taken place, a fourth condition must be added: the
additional quantity of commodities representing the new capital plus
surplus value will have to be realised, that is, reconverted into money.
Only if this conversion has been successful, can it be said that
expanding capitalist reproduction has actually taken place. This last
condition leads us back to the commodity market.

Thus capitalist production and reproduction imply a constant shifting
between the place of production and the commodity market, a shuttle
movement from the private office and the factory where unauthorised
persons are strictly excluded, where the sovereign will of the
individual capitalist is the highest law, to the commodity market where
nobody sets up any laws and where neither will nor reason assert
themselves. But it is this very licence and anarchy of the commodity
market which brings home to the individual capitalist that he is
dependent upon society, upon the entirety of its producing and consuming
members. The individual capitalist may need additional means of
production, additional labour and provisions for these workers in order
to expand reproduction, but whether he can get what he needs depends
upon factors and events beyond his control, materialising, as it were,
behind his back. In order to realise his increased aggregate of
products, the individual capitalist requires a larger market for his
goods, but he has no control whatever over the actual increase of demand
in general, or of the particular demand for his special kind of good.

The conditions we have enumerated here, which all give expression to the
inherent contradiction between consumption and private production and
their social interconnection, are nothing new, and it is not only at the
stage of reproduction that they become apparent. These conditions
express the general contradiction inherent in capitalist production.
They involve, however, particular difficulties as regards the process of
reproduction for the following reasons. With regard to reproduction,
especially expanding reproduction, the capitalist method of production
not only reveals its general fundamental character but, what is more, it
shows, in the various periods of production, a definite rhythm within a
continuous progression the characteristic interplay of individual wills.
From this point of view, we must inquire in a general way how it is
possible for every individual capitalist to find on the market the means
of production and the labour he requires for the purpose of realising
the commodities he has produced, although there exists no social control
whatever, no plan to harmonize production and demand. This question may
be answered by saying that the capitalists greed for surplus value,
enhanced by competition, and the automatic effects of capitalist
exploitation, lead to the production of every kind of commodity,
including means of production, and also that a growing class of
proletarianised workers becomes generally available for the purposes of
capital. On the other hand, the lack of a plan in this respect shows
itself in the fact that the balance between demand and supply in all
spheres can be achieved only by continuous deviations, by hourly
fluctuations of prices, and by periodical crises and changes of the
market situation.

From the point of view of reproduction the question is a different one.
How is it possible that the unplanned supply in the market for labour
and means of production, and the unplanned and incalculable changes in
demand nevertheless provide adequate quantities and qualities of means
of production, labour and opportunities for selling which the individual
capitalist needs in order to make a sale? How can it be assured that
every one of these factors increases in the right proportion? Let us put
the problem more precisely. According to our well-known formula, let the
composition of the individual capitalists production be expressed by the
proportion 40_c_ + 10_v_ + 10_s_. His constant capital is consequently
four times as much as his variable capital, and the rate of exploitation
is 100 per cent. The aggregate of commodities is thus represented by a
value of 60. Let us now assume that the capitalist is in a position to
capitalise and to add to the old capital of this given composition half
of his surplus value. In this case, the formula
44_c_ + 11_v_ + 11_s_ = 66 would apply to the next period of production.

Let us assume now that the capitalist can continue the annual
capitalisation of half his surplus value for a number of years. For this
purpose it is not sufficient that means of production, labour and
markets in general should be forthcoming, but he must find these factors
in a proportion that is strictly in keeping with his progress in
accumulation.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾ If production be capitalistic in form, so, too, will be
reproduction. (CAPITAL, Vol.1, p.578)

⁽²⁾ Surplus value in our exposition is identical with profit. This is
true for production as a whole, which alone is of account in our further
observations. For the time being, we shall not deal with the further
division of surplus value into its component parts: profit of
enterprise, interest, and rent, as this subdivision is immaterial to the
problem of reproduction.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 12.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section One The Problem of Reproduction



CHAPTER 2 QUESNAYS AND ADAM SMITHS ANALYSES OF THE PROCESS OF REPRODUCTION


 

So far we have taken account only of the individual capitalist in our
survey of reproduction; he is its typical representative, its agent, for
reproduction is indeed brought about entirely by individual capitalist
enterprises. This approach has already shown us that the problem
involves difficulties enough. Yet these difficulties increase to an
extraordinary degree and become even more complicated, when we turn our
attention from the individual capitalist to the totality of capitalists.

A superficial glance suffices to show that capitalist reproduction as a
social whole must not be regarded simply as a mechanical summation of
all the separate processes of individual capitalist reproduction. We
have seen, for instance, that one of the fundamental conditions for
enlarged reproduction by an individual capitalist is a corresponding
increase of his opportunities to sell on the commodity market. But the
individual capitalist may not always expand because of an absolute
increase in the absorptive capacity of the market, but also as a result
of the competitive struggle, at the cost of other individual
capitalists. Thus one capitalist may win what another or many others who
have been shouldered from the market must write off as a loss. This
process will enable one capitalist to increase his reproduction by the
amount that it compels others by losses to restrict their own. One
capitalist will be able to engage in enlarged reproduction because
others cannot even achieve simple reproduction. In the same way, one
capitalist may enlarge his reproduction by using labour power and means
of production which anothers bankruptcy, that is his partial or complete
retirement from reproduction, has set free.

These commonplaces prove that reproduction of the social capital as a
whole is not the same as the reproduction of the individual capitalist
raised to the _n_th degree. They show that the reproductive activities
of individual capitalists ceaselessly cut across one another and to a
greater or smaller degree may cancel each other out.

Therefore we must clarify our concept of reproduction of capital as a
whole, before we examine the laws and mechanisms of capitalist total
reproduction. We must raise the question whether it is even possible to
deduce anything like total reproduction from the disorderly jumble of
individual capitals in constant motion, changing from moment to moment
according to uncontrollable and incalculable laws, partly running a
parallel course, and partly intersecting and cancelling each other out.
Can one actually talk of total social capital of society as an entity,
and if so, what is the real meaning of this concept? That is the first
question a scientific examination of the laws of reproduction has to
consider. At the dawn of economic theory and bourgeois economics,
Quesnay, the father of the Physiocrats, approached the problem with
classical fearlessness and simplicity and took it for granted that total
capital exists as a real and active entity. In his famous TABLEAU
ÉCONOMIQUE, so intricate that no one before Marx could understand it,
Quesnay demonstrated the phases of the reproduction of aggregate capital
with a few figures, at the same time taking into account that it must
also be considered from the aspect of commodity exchange, that is as a
process of circulation.⁽¹⁾

Society as Quesnay sees it consists of three classes: the productive
class of agriculturists; the sterile class containing all those who are
active outside the sphere of agriculture industry, commerce, and the
liberal professions; and lastly the class of landowners, including the
Sovereign and the collectors of tithes. The national aggregate product
materialises in the hands of the productive class as an aggregate of
provisions and raw materials to the value of some 5,000 million livres.
Of this sum, 2,000 millions represent the annual working capital of
agriculture, 1,000 millions represent the annual wear and tear of fixed
capital, and 2,000 millions are the net revenue accruing to the
landowners. Apart from this total produce, the agriculturists, here
conceived quite in capitalist terms as tenant farmers, have 2,000
million livres cash in hand. Circulation now takes place in such a way
that the tenant class pay the landowners 2,000 millions cash as rent (as
the cost of the previous period of production). For this money the
landowning class buy provisions from the tenants for 1,000 millions and
industrial products from the sterile class for the remaining 1,000
millions. The tenants in their turn buy industrial products for the
1,000 millions handed back to them, whereupon the sterile class buy
agricultural products for the 2,000 millions they have in hand: for
1,000 millions raw materials etc., to replace their annual working
capital, and provisions for the remaining 1,000 millions. Thus the money
has in the end returned to its starting point, the tenant class; the
product is distributed among all classes so that consumption is ensured
for everyone; at the same time the means of production of the sterile as
well as of the productive class have been renewed and the landowning
class has received its revenue. The prerequisites of reproduction are
all present, the conditions of circulation have all been fulfilled, and
reproduction can start again on its regular course.⁽²⁾

We shall see later in the course of our investigation that this
exposition, though showing flashes of genius, remains deficient and
primitive. In any case, we must stress here that Quesnay, on the
threshold of scientific economics, had not the slightest doubt as to the
possibility of demonstrating total social capital and its reproduction.
Adam Smith, on the other hand, while giving a more profound analysis of
the relations of capital, laid out what seems like a maze when compared
with the clear and sweeping outlines of the Physiocrat conception. By
his wrong analysis of prices, Smith upset the whole foundation of the
scientific demonstration of the capitalist process as a whole. This
wrong analysis of prices ruled bourgeois economics for a long time; it
is the theory which maintains that, although the value of a commodity
represents the amount of labour spent in its production, yet the price
consists of three elements only: the wage of labour, the profit of
capital, and the rent.

As this obviously must also apply to the aggregate of commodities, the
national product, we are faced with the startling discovery that,
although the value of the aggregate of commodities manufactured by
capitalist methods represents all paid wages together with the profits
of capital and the rents, that is the aggregate surplus value, and
consequently can replace these, there is no component of value which
corresponds to the constant capital used in production. According to
Smith, _v_ + _s_ is the formula expressing the value of the capitalist
product as a whole. Demonstrating his view with the example of corn,
Smith says as follows:

These three parts (wages, profit, and rent) seem either immediately or
ultimately to make up the whole price of corn. A fourth part, it may
perhaps be thought, is necessary for replacing the stock of the farmer,
or for compensating the wear and tear of his labouring cattle, and other
instruments of husbandry. But it must be considered that the price of
any instrument of husbandry, such as a labouring horse, is itself made
up of the same three parts: the rent of the land upon which he is
reared, the labour of tending and rearing him, and the profits of the
farmer who advances both the rent of this land and the wages of this
labour. Though the price of the corn, therefore, may pay the price as
well as the maintenance of the horse, the whole price still resolves
itself either immediately or ultimately into the same three parts of
rent, of labour and profit.⁽³⁾

Sending us in this manner from pillar to post, as Marx has put it, Smith
again and again resolved constant capital into _v_ + _s_. However, he
had occasional doubts and from time to time relapsed into the contrary
opinion. He says in the second book:

It has been shown in the first Book, that the price of the greater part
of commodities resolves itself into three parts, of which one pays the
wages of the labour, another the profits of the stock, and a third the
rent of the land which had been employed in producing and bringing them
to market ... Since this is the case ... with regard to every particular
commodity, taken separately; it must be so with regard to all the
commodities which compose the whole annual produce of the land and
labour of every country, taken complexly. The whole price or
exchangeable value of that annual produce must resolve itself into the
same three parts, and be parcelled out among the different inhabitants
of the country, either as the wages of their labour, the profits of
their stock, or the rent of their land.⁽⁴⁾

Here Smith hesitates and immediately below, explains; But though the
whole value of the annual produce of the land and labour of every
country is thus divided among and constitutes a revenue to its different
inhabitants, yet as in the rent of a private estate we distinguish
between the gross rent and the neat rent, so may we likewise in the
revenue of all the inhabitants of a great country.

The gross rent of a private estate comprehends whatever is paid by the
farmer; the neat rent, what remains free to the landlord after deducting
the expense of management, of repairs, and all other necessary charges;
or what without hurting his estate, he can afford to place in his stock
reserved for immediate consumption, or to spend upon his table,
equipage, the ornaments of his house and furniture, his private
enjoyments and amusements. His real wealth is in proportion, not to his
gross, but to his net rent.

The gross revenue of all the inhabitants of a great country comprehends
the whole annual produce of their land and labour; the neat revenue,
what remains free to them, after deducting the expense of maintaining,
first their fixed, and, secondly, their circulating capital, or what,
without encroaching upon their capital, they can place in their stock
reserved for immediate consumption, or spend upon their subsistence,
conveniences, and amusements. Their real wealth too is in proportion,
not to their gross, but to their neat revenue.⁽⁵⁾

Here Smith introduces a portion of value which corresponds to constant
capital, only to eliminate it the very next moment by resolving it into
wages, profits, and rents. And in the end, the matter rests with this
explanation:

As the machines and instruments of trade, etc which compose the fixed
capital either of an individual or of a society, make no part either of
the gross or the neat revenue of either, so money, by means of which the
whole revenue of the society is regularly distributed among all its
different members, makes itself no part of that revenue.⁽⁶⁾

Constant capital, the fixed capital of Adam Smith, is thus put on the
same level as money and does not enter into the total produce of
society, its gross revenue. It does not exist within this total product
as an element of value.

You cannot get blood out of a stone, and so circulation, the mutual
exchange of the total product constituted in this manner, can only lead
to realisation of the wages (_v_) and of the surplus value (_s_).
However, as it cannot by any means replace the constant capital,
continued reproduction evidently must become impossible. Smith indeed
knew quite well, and did not dream of denying, that every individual
capitalist requires constant capital in addition to his wages fund, his
variable capital, in order to run his enterprise. Yet the above analysis
of commodity prices, when it comes to take note of capitalist production
as a whole, allows constant capital to disappear without a trace in a
puzzling way. Thus the problem of the reproduction of capital is
completely muddled up. It is plain that if the most elementary premise
of the problem, the demonstration of social capital as a whole, were on
the rocks, the whole analysis was bound to fail. Ricardo, Say, Sismondi
and others took up this erroneous theory of Adam Smith, and they all
stumbled in their observations on the problem of reproduction over this
most elementary difficulty: the demonstration of social capital.

Another difficulty is mixed up with the foregoing from the very outset
of scientific analysis. What is the nature of the total capital of a
society? As regards the individual producer, the position is clear: his
capital consists of the expenses of his enterprise. Assuming capitalist
methods of production, the value of his product yields him a surplus
over and above his expenses, that surplus value which does not replace
his capital but constitute his net income, which he can consume
completely without encroaching upon his capital and which is thus his
fund of consumption. It is true that the capitalist may save part of
this net income, not consuming it himself but adding it to his capital.
But that is another matter, a new step, the formation of a new capital
which again must be replaced by subsequent reproduction and must again
yield him a surplus. In any case, the capital of an individual always
consists of what he requires for production, together with his advances
on the running of his enterprise, and his income is what he himself
actually consumes or may consume, his fund of consumption. If we ask a
capitalist: What are the wages you pay your workers? his answer will be:
They are obviously part of my working capital. But if we ask: What are
these wages for the workers who have received them? it is impossible
that he should describe them as capital, for wages received are not
capital for the workers but income, their fund of consumption.

Let us now take another example. A manufacturer of machinery produces
machines in his factory. The annual output is a certain number of
machines. In its value, however, this annual output contains the capital
advanced by the manufacturer as well as the net income that has been
earned. Part of the manufactured machines thus represent income for the
manufacturer and are destined to realise this income in the process of
circulation and exchange. But the person who buys these machines from
the manufacturer does not buy them as income but in order to use them as
a means of production; for him they are capital.

These examples make it seem plausible that an object which is capital
for one person may be income for another and _vice versa_. How can it be
possible under these circumstances to construct anything in the nature
of a total capital of society? Indeed almost every scientific economist
up to the time of Marx concluded that there is no social capital.⁽⁷⁾
Smith was still doubtful, undecided, vacillating about this question; so
was Ricardo. But already Say declared categorically:

It is in this way that the _total_ value of products is distributed
amongst the members of the community; I say, the _total_ value because
such part of the whole value produced, as does not go to one of the
consuming producers, is received by the rest. The clothier buys wool of
the farmer, pays his workmen in every department, and sells the cloth,
the result of their united exertion, at a price that reimburses all his
advances, and affords himself a profit. He never reckons as profit, or
as the revenue of his own industry, anything more than the _net_
surplus, after deducting all charges and outgoings; but those outgoings
are merely an advance of their respective revenues to the previous
producers, which are refunded by the _gross_ value of the cloth. The
price paid to the farmer for his wool is the compound of the several
revenues of the cultivator, the shepherd and the landlord. Although the
farmer reckons as _net_ produce only the surplus remaining after payment
of his landlord and his servants in husbandry, yet to them these
payments are items of revenue rent to the one and wages to the other to
the one, the revenue of the land, to the other, the revenue of his
industry. The aggregate of all these is defrayed out of the value of the
cloth, the whole of which forms the revenue of some one or other, and is
entirely absorbed in that way. Whence it appears that the term _net_
produce applies only to the individual revenue of each separate producer
or adventurer in industry, but that the aggregate of individual revenue,
the total revenue of the community, is equal to the _gross_ produce of
its land, capital and industry, which entirely subverts the system of
the economists of the last century, who considered nothing but the net
produce of the land as farming revenue, and therefore concluded, that
this net produce was all that the community had to consume; instead of
closing with the obvious inference, that the whole of what had been
created, may also be consumed by mankind.⁽⁸⁾

Say proves his theory in his own peculiar fashion. Whereas Adam Smith
tried to give a proof by referring each private capital unit to its
place of production in order to resolve it into a mere product of
labour, but conceived of every product of labour in strictly capitalist
terms as a sum of paid and unpaid labour, as _v_ + _s_, and thus came to
resolve the total product of society into _v_ + _s_; Say, of course, is
cocksure enough to correct these classical errors by inflating them into
common vulgarities. His argument is based upon the fact that the
entrepreneur at every stage of production pays other people, the
representatives of previous stages of production, for the means of
production which are capital for him, and that these people in their
turn put part of this payment into their own pockets as their income and
partly use it to recoup themselves for expenses advanced in order to
provide yet another set of people with an income. Say converts Adam
Smiths endless chain of labour processes into an equally unending chain
of mutual advances on income and their repayment from the proceeds of
sales. The worker appears here as the absolute equal of the
entrepreneur. He has his income advanced in the form of wages, paying
for it in turn by the labour he performs. Thus the final value of the
aggregate social product appears as the sum of a large number of
advanced incomes and is spent in the process of exchange on repayment of
all these advances. It is characteristic of Says superficiality that he
illustrates the social connections of capitalist reproduction by the
example of watch manufacture a branch of production which at that time
and partly even to-day is pure manufacture where every worker is also an
entrepreneur on a small scale and the process of production of surplus
value is masked by a series of successive acts of exchange typical of
simple commodity production.

Thus Say gives an extremely crude expression to the confusion
inaugurated by Adam Smith. The aggregate of annual social produce can be
completely resolved as regards its value into a sequence of various
incomes. Therefore it is completely consumed every year. It remains an
enigma how production can be taken up again without capital and means of
production, and capitalist reproduction appears to be an insoluble
problem.

If we compare the varying approaches to the problem from the time of the
Physiocrats to that of Adam Smith, we cannot fail to recognise partial
progress as well as partial regression. The main characteristic of the
economic conception of the Physiocrats was their assumption that
agriculture alone creates a surplus, that is surplus value, and that
agricultural labour is the only kind of labour which is productive in
the capitalist sense of the term. Consequently we see in the TABLEAU
ÉCONOMIQUE that the unproductive class of industrial workers creates
value only to the extent of the same 2,000 million livres which it
consumes as raw materials and foodstuffs. Consequently, too, in the
process of exchange, the total of manufactured products is divided into
two parts, one of which goes to the tenant class and the other to the
landowning class, while the manufacturing class does not consume its own
products. Thus in the value of its commodities, the manufacturing class
reproduces, strictly speaking, only that circulating capital which has
been consumed, and no income is created for the class of entrepreneurs.
The only income of society that comes into circulation in excess of all
capital advances, is created in agriculture and is consumed by the
landowning class in the form of rents; while even the tenant class do no
more than replace their capital: to wit, 1,000 million livres interest
from the fixed capital and 2,000 million circulating capital, two-thirds
being raw materials and foodstuffs, and one-third industrial products.
Further it is striking that it is in agriculture alone that Quesnay
assumes the existence of fixed capital which he calls _avances
primitives_ as distinct from _avances annuelles_. Industry, as he sees
it, apparently works without any fixed capital, only with circulating
capital turned over each year, and consequently does not create in its
annual output of commodities any element of value for making good the
wear and tear of fixed capital (such as premises, tools, and so on).⁽⁹⁾

In contrast with this obvious defect, the English classical school shows
a decisive advance above all in proclaiming every kind of labour as
productive, thus revealing the creation of surplus value in manufacture
as well as in agriculture. We say: the English classical school, because
on this point Adam Smith himself occasionally relapses quietly into the
Physiocrat point of view. It is only Ricardo who develops the theory of
the value of labour as highly and logically as it could advance within
the limits of the bourgeois approach. The consequence is that we must
assume all capital investment to produce annual surplus value, in the
manufacturing part of social production as a whole no less than in
agriculture.⁽¹⁰⁾

On the other hand, the discovery of the productive, value-creating
property of every kind of labour, alike in agriculture and in
manufacture, suggested to Smith that agricultural labour, too, must
produce, apart from the rent for the landowning class, a surplus for the
tenant class over and above the total of their capital expenses. Thus,
in addition to the replacement of capital, an annual income of the
tenant class comes into being. ⁽¹¹⁾

Lastly, by a systematic elaboration of the concepts of _avances
primitives_ and _avances annuelles_ introduced by Quesnay, which he
calls fixed and circulating capital, Smith has made clear, among other
things, that the manufacturing side of social production requires a
fixed as well as a circulating capital. Thus he was well on the way to
restoring to order the concepts of capital and revenue of society, and
to describing them in precise terms. The following exposition represents
the highest level of clarity which he achieved in this respect:

Though the whole annual produce of the land and labour of every country
is, no doubt, ultimately destined for supplying the consumption of its
inhabitants and for procuring a revenue to them, yet when it first comes
either from the ground or from the hands of the productive labourer, it
naturally divides itself into two parts. One of them, and frequently the
largest, is, in the first place, destined for replacing a capital, or
for renewing the provisions, materials, and finished work, which had
been withdrawn from a capital; the other for constituting a revenue
either to the owner of this capital, as the profit of his stock, or to
some other person; as the rent of his land.⁽¹²⁾

The gross revenue of all the inhabitants of a great country comprehends
the whole annual produce of their land and labour; the neat revenue,
what remains free to them after deducting the expense of maintaining,
first, their fixed, and secondly, their circulating capital; or what,
without encroaching upon their capital, they can place in their stock
reserved for immediate consumption, or spend upon their subsistence,
conveniences, and amusements. Their real wealth too is in proportion,
not to their gross, but to their neat revenue.⁽¹³⁾

The concepts of total capital and income appear here in a more
comprehensive and stricter form than in the TABLEAU ÉCONOMIQUE. The
one-sided connection of social income with agriculture is severed and
social income becomes a broader concept; and a broader concept of
capital in its two forms, fixed and circulating capital, is made the
basis of social production as a whole. Instead of the misleading
differentiation of production into two departments, agriculture and
industry, other categories of real importance are here brought to the
fore: the distinction between capital and income and the distinction,
further, between fixed and circulating capital.

Now Smith proceeds to a further analysis of the mutual relations of
these categories and of how they change in the course of the social
process, in production and circulation in the reproductive process of
society. He emphasises here a radical distinction between fixed and
circulating capital from the point of view of the society:

The whole expense of maintaining the fixed capital must evidently be
excluded from the neat revenue of the society. Neither the materials
necessary for supporting their useful machines and instruments of trade,
their profitable buildings, etc., nor the produce of the labour
necessary for fashioning those materials into the proper form, can ever
make any part of it. The price of that labour may indeed make a part of
it, as the workmen so employed may place the whole value of their wages
in their stock reserved for immediate consumption. But in other sorts of
labour, both the price and the produce go to this stock, the price to
that of the workmen, the produce to that of other people whose
subsistence, convenience and amusements are augmented by the labour of
those workmen.⁽¹⁴⁾

Here Smith comes up against the important distinction between workers
who produce means of production and those who produce consumer goods.
With regard to the former he remarks that they create the value destined
to replace their wages and to serve as their income in the form of means
of production such as raw materials and instruments which in their
natural form cannot be consumed. With regard to the latter category of
workers, Smith observes that conversely the total product, or better
that part of value contained in it which replaces the wages, the income
of the workers together with its other remaining value, appears here in
the form of consumer goods. (The real meaning latent in this conclusion,
though Smith does not say so explicitly, is that the part of the product
which represents the fixed capital employed in its production appears
likewise in this form.) In the further course of our investigation we
shall see how close Smith has here come to the vantage point from which
Marx tackled the problem. The general conclusion, however, maintained by
Smith without any further examination of the fundamental question, is
that, in any case, whatever is destined for the preservation and renewal
of the fixed capital of society cannot be added to societys net income.

The position is different with regard to circulating capital.

But though the whole expenses of maintaining the fixed capital is thus
necessarily excluded from the neat revenue of the society, it is not the
same case with that of maintaining the circulating capital. Of the four
parts of which this latter capital is composed, money, provisions,
materials and finished work, the three last, it has already been
observed, are regularly withdrawn from it and placed either in the fixed
capital of the society, or in their stock reserved for immediate
consumption. Whatever portion of those consumable goods is not employed
in maintaining the former, goes all to the latter, and makes a part of
the neat revenue of the society, besides what is necessary for
maintaining the fixed capital.⁽¹⁵⁾

We see that Smith here simply includes in this category of circulating
capital everything but the fixed capital already employed, that is to
say, foodstuffs and raw materials and in part commodities which,
according to their natural form, belong to the replacement of fixed
capital. Thus he has made the concept of circulating capital vague and
ambiguous. But a further and most important distinction crops up and
cuts right through this conception:

The circulating capital of a society is in this respect different from
that of an individual. That of an individual is totally excluded from
making any part of his neat revenue, which must consist altogether in
his profits. But though the circulating capital of every individual
makes a part of that of the society to which he belongs, it is not upon
that account totally excluded from making a part likewise of their neat
revenues.⁽¹⁶⁾

In the following illustration Smith expounds what he means:

Though the whole goods in a merchants shop must by no means be placed in
his own stock reserved for immediate consumption, they may in that of
other people, who, from a revenue derived from other funds, may
regularly replace their value to him, together with its profits, without
occasioning any diminution either of his capital or theirs.⁽¹⁷⁾

Here Smith has established fundamental categories with regard to the
reproduction and movement of circulating social capital. Fixed and
circulating capital, private and social capital, private and social
revenue, means of production and consumer goods, are marked put as
comprehensive categories, and their real, objective interrelation is
partly indicated and partly drowned in the subjective and theoretical
contradictions of Smiths analysis. The concise, strict, and classically
clear scheme of the Physiocrat theory is dissolved here into a
disorderly jumble of concepts and relations which at first glance
appears an absolute chaos. But we may already perceive new connections
within the social process of reproduction, understood by Smith in a
deeper, wore modern and vital way than was within Quesnays grasp,
though, like Michelangelos slave in the unhewn block of marble, they are
still inchoate.

This is the only illustration Smith gives of this problem. But at the
same time he attacks it from another angle by an analysis of value. This
very same theory which represents an advance beyond the Physiocrats the
theory that it is an essential quality of all labour to create value;
the strictly capitalist distinction between paid labour replacing wages,
and unpaid labour creating surplus value; and, finally, the strict
division of surplus value into its two main categories, of profit and
rent all this progress from the analysis of the Physiocrats leads Smith
to the strange proposition that the price of every commodity consists of
wages, plus profits, plus rent, or, in Marxs short-hand, of _v_ + _s_.
In consequence, the commodities annually produced by society as a whole
can be resolved completely, as to value, into the two components: wages
and surplus value. Here the category of capital has disappeared all of a
sudden; society produces nothing but income, nothing but consumer goods,
which it also consumes completely. Reproduction without capital becomes
a paradox, and the treatment of the problem as a whole has taken an
immense backward step against that of the Physiocrats.

The followers of Adam Smith have tackled this twofold theory from
precisely the wrong approach. Before Marx nobody concerned himself with
the important beginnings of an exact exposition of the problem in Smiths
second book, while most of his followers jealously preserved Smiths
radically wrong analysis of prices, accepting it, like Ricardo, without
question, or else, like Say, elaborating it into a trite doctrine. Where
Smith raised fruitful doubts and stimulating contradictions, Say
flaunted the opinionated presumption of a commonplace mind. Smiths
observation that the capital of one person may be the revenue of another
induced Say to proclaim every distinction between capital and income on
the social scale to be absurd. The absurdity, however, that income
should completely absorb the total value of annual production which is
thus consumed completely, assumes in Says treatment the character of an
absolutely valid dogma. If society annually consumes its own total
product completely, social reproduction without any means of production
whatever must become an annual repetition of the Miracle of the
Creation.

In this state the problem of reproduction remained up to the time of
Karl Marx.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾ Quesnays TABLEAU ÉCONOMIQUE shows ... how the result of national
production in a certain year, amounting to some definite value, is
distributed by means of the circulation in such a way, that ...
reproduction can take place ... The innumerable individual acts of
circulation are at once viewed in their characteristic social mass
movement the circulation between great social classes distinguished by
their economic function (CAPITAL, Vol.2, p.414).

⁽²⁾ Cf. _Analyse du TABLEAU ÉCONOMIQUE_, in JOURNAL DE LAGRICULTURE, DU
COMMERCE ET DES FINANCES, by Dupont (1766), pp. 305ff. in Onckens
edition of RUVRES DE F. QUESNAY. Quesnay remarks explicitly that
circulation as he describes it is based upon two conditions: unhampered
trade, and a system of taxation applying only to rent: Yet these facts
have indispensable conditions; that the freedom of commerce sustains the
sale of products at a good price, and moreover, that the farmer need not
pay any other direct or indirect charges but this income, part of which,
say two sevenths, must form the revenue of the Sovereign (OP. CIT.,
p.311).

⁽³⁾ Adam Smith, AN ENQUIRY INTO THE NATURE AND CAUSES OF THE WEALTH OF
NATIONS (ed. McCulloch, Edinburgh-London 1828), vol.i, pp.86-8.

⁽⁴⁾OP. CIT., vol.ii, pp.17-18.

⁽⁵⁾IBID., pp.18-19.

⁽⁶⁾IBID., p.23.

⁽⁷⁾ As to the concept of national capital specific to Rodbertus, see
below, ch16.htm.

⁽⁸⁾ J.B. Say, A TREATISE ON POLITICAL ECONOMY (transl. by C.R. Prinsep,
vol.ii, London 1821), pp.75-7.

⁽⁹⁾ Attention must be drawn to the fact that Mirabeau in his
EXPLICATIONS on the TABLEAU ÉCONOMIQUE explicitly mentions the fixed
capital of the unproductive class: The primary advances of this class,
for the establishment of manufactures, for instruments, machines, mills,
smithies (ironworks) and other factories ... (amount to) 2,000 million
livres (TABLEAU ÉCONOMIQUE AVEC SES EXPLICATIONS, 1760, p.82). In his
confusing sketch of the TABLEAU itself, Mirabeau, too, fails to take
this fixed capital of the sterile class into account.

⁽¹⁰⁾ Smith accordingly arrives at this general formulation: The value
which the workmen add to the materials, therefore, resolves itself in
this case into two parts, of which the one pays their wages, the other
the profits of their employer upon the whole stock of materials and
wages which he advanced (OP. CIT., vol.i, p.8). Further, in Book II,
chap.8, on industrial labour in particular: The labour of a manufacturer
adds generally to the value of the materials which he works upon, that
of his own maintenance and of his masters profit. The labour of a menial
servant, on the contrary, adds to the value of nothing. Though the
manufacturer has his wages advanced to him by his master, he in reality
costs him no expense, the value of those wages being generally restored,
together with a profit, in the improved value of the subject upon which
his labour is bestowed (OP. CIT., vol.ii, pp.93-4).

⁽¹¹⁾ The labourers ... therefore, employed in agriculture, not only
occasion, like the workmen in manufactures, the reproduction of a value
equal to their own consumption, or to the capital which employs them;
together with its owners profit, but of a much greater value. Over and
above, the capital of the farmer and all its profits, they regularly
occasion the reproduction of the rent of the landlord (IBID., p.149).

⁽¹²⁾IBID., pp.97-8. Yet already in the following sentence Smith converts
capital completely into wages, that is variable capital: That part of
the annual produce of the land and labour of any country which replaces
a capital, never is immediately employed to maintain any but productive
hands. It pays the wages of productive labour only. That which is
immediately destined for constituting a revenue, either as profit or as
rent, may maintain indifferently either productive or unproductive hands
(IBID., p.98).

⁽¹³⁾IBID., p.19.

⁽¹⁴⁾IBID., pp.19-20.

⁽¹⁴⁾IBID., pp.21-22.

⁽¹⁶⁾IBID., p.22.

⁽¹⁷⁾IBID.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 16.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section One The Problem of Reproduction



CHAPTER 3 A CRITICISM OF SMITHS ANALYSIS


 

LET us recapitulate the conclusions to which Smiths analysis has brought
us:

1.  There is a fixed capital of society, no part of which enters into
    its net revenue. This fixed capital consists in the materials
    necessary for supporting their useful machines and instruments of
    trade and the produce of labour necessary for fashioning those
    materials into the proper form.⁽¹⁾ By singling out the production of
    such fixed capital as of a special kind, and explicitly contrasting
    it with the production of consumer goods, Smith in effect
    transformed fixed capital into what Marx calls constant capital that
    part of capital which consists of all material means of production,
    as opposed to labour power.
2.  There is a circulating capital of society. After eliminating the
    part of fixed, or constant, capital, there remains only the category
    of consumer goods; these are not capital for society but net
    revenue, a fund of consumption.
3.  Capital and net revenue of an individual do not strictly correspond
    with capital and net revenue of society. What is nothing but fixed,
    or constant capital for society as a whole cannot be capital for the
    individual; it must be revenue, too, a fund of consumption,
    comprising as it does those parts of fixed capital which represent
    the workers wages and the capitalists profits. On the other hand,
    the circulating capital of the individuals cannot be capital for
    society but must be revenue, especially in so far as it takes the
    form of provisions.
4.  As regards the value of the total annual social product, no trace of
    capital remains. It can be resolved completely into the three kinds
    of income: wages, profits of capital, and rents.

If we tried from this haphazard collection of odd ideas to build up a
picture of the annual reproduction of total social capital, and of its
mechanism, we should soon despair of our task. Indeed, all these
observations leave us infinitely remote from the solution of the problem
how social capital is annually renewed, how everybodys consumption is
ensured by his income, while the individuals can nevertheless adhere to
their own points of view on capital and income. Yet if we wish to
appreciate fully Marxs contribution to the elucidation of this problem,
we must be fully aware of all this confusion of ideas, the mass of
conflicting points of view.

Let us begin with Adam Smiths last thesis which alone would suffice to
wreck the treatment of the problem of reproduction in classical
economics.

Smiths basic principle is that the total produce of society, when we
consider its value, resolves itself completely into wages, profits and
rents: this conception is deeply rooted in his scientific theory that
value is nothing but the product of labour. All labour performed,
however, is wage labour. This identification of human labour with
capitalist wage labour is indeed the classical element in Smiths
doctrine. The value of the aggregate product of society comprises both
the recompense for wages advanced and a surplus from unpaid labour
appearing as profit for the capitalist and rent for the landowner. What
holds good for the individual commodity must hold good equally for the
aggregate of commodities. The whole mass of commodities produced by
society taken as a quantity of value is nothing but a product of labour,
of paid as well as unpaid labour, and thus it is also to be completely
resolved into wages, profits, and rents.

It is of course true that raw materials, instruments, and the like, must
be taken into consideration in connection with all labour. Yet is it not
true also that these raw materials and instruments in their turn are
equally products of labour which again may have been paid or unpaid? We
may go back as far as we choose, we may twist and turn the problem as
much as we like, yet we shall find no element in the value of any
commodity and therefore none in the price which cannot be resolved
purely in terms of human labour. We can distinguish, however, two parts
in all labour: one part repays the wages and the other accrues to the
capitalist and landlord. There seems nothing left but wages and profits
and yet, there is capital, individual and social capital. How can we
overcome this blatant contradiction? The fact that Marx himself
stubbornly pursued this matter for a long time without getting anywhere
at first as witness his THEORIES OF THE SURPLUS VALUE,⁽²⁾ proves that
this theoretical problem is indeed extremely hard to solve. Yet the
solution he eventually hit on was strikingly successful, and it is based
upon his theory of value. Adam Smith was perfectly right: nothing but
labour constitutes the value of the individual commodity and of the
aggregate of commodities. He was equally right in saying that from a
capitalist point of view all labour is either paid labour which restores
the wages, or unpaid labour which, as surplus value, accrues to the
various classes owning the means of production. What he forgot, however,
or rather overlooked, is the fact that, apart from being able to create
new value, labour can also transfer to the new commodities the old
values incorporated in the means of production employed. A bakers
working day of ten hours is, from the capitalist point of view, divided
into paid and unpaid hours, into _v_ + _s_. But the commodity produced
in these ten hours will represent a greater value than that of ten hours
labour, for it will also contain the value of the flour, of the oven
which is used, of the premises, of the fuel and so on, in short the
value of all the means of production necessary for baking. Under one
condition alone could the value of any one commodity be strictly equal
to _v_ + _s_; if a man were to work in mid-air, without raw materials;
without tools or workshop. But since all work on materials (material
labour) presupposes means of production of some sort which themselves
result from preceding labour, the value of this past labour is of
necessity transferred to the new product.

The process in question does not only take place in capitalist
production; it is the general foundation of human labour, quite
independent of the historical form of society. The handling of man-made
tools is a fundamental characteristic of human civilisation. The concept
of past labour which precedes all new labour and prepares its basis,
expresses the nexus between man and nature evolved in the history of
civilisation. This is the eternal chain of closely interwoven labouring
efforts of human society, the beginnings of which are lost in the grey
dawn of the socialisation of mankind, and the termination of which would
imply the end of the whole of civilised mankind. Therefore we have to
picture all human labour as performed with the help of tools which
themselves are already products of antecedent labour. Every new product
thus contains not only the new labour whereby it is given its final
form, but also past labour which had supplied the materials for it, the
instruments of labour and so forth. In the production of value, that is
commodity production into which capitalist production also enters, this
phenomenon is not suspended, it only receives a particular expression.
Here the labour which produces commodities assumes a twofold
characteristic: it is on the one hand useful concrete labour of some
kind or other, creating the useful object, the value-in-use. On the
other hand, it is abstract, general, socially necessary labour and as
such creates value. In its first aspect it does what labour has always
done: it transfers to the new product past labour, incorporated in the
means of production employed, with this distinction only, that this past
labour, too, now appears as value, as old value. In its second aspect,
labour creates new value which, in capitalist terms, can be reduced to
paid and unpaid labour, to _v_ + _s_. Thus the value of every commodity
must contain old value which has been transferred by labour _qua_ useful
concrete labour from the means of production to the commodity, as well
as the new value, created by the same labour _qua_ socially necessary
labour merely as this labour is expended hour by hour.

This distinction was beyond Smith: he did not differentiate the twofold
character of value-creating labour. Marx once claimed to have discovered
the ultimate source of Smiths strange dogma that the aggregate of
produced values can be completely resolved into _v_ + _s_ in his
fundamentally erroneous theory of value.⁽³⁾ Failure to differentiate
between the two aspects of commodity-producing labour as concrete and
useful labour on the one hand, and abstract and socially necessary
labour on the other, indeed forms one of the most important
characteristics of the theory of value as conceived not only by Smith
but by all members of the classical school.

Disregarding all social consequences, classical economics recognised
that human labour alone is the factor which creates value, and it worked
out this theory to that degree of clarity which we meet in Ricardos
formulation. There is a fundamental distinction, however, between Marxs
theory of value and Ricardos, a distinction which has been misunderstood
not only by bourgeois economists but also in most cases by the
popularisers of Marxs doctrine: Ricardo, conceiving as he did, of
bourgeois economy in terms of natural law, believed also that the
creation of value, too, is a natural property of human labour, of the
specific and concrete labour of the individual human being.

This view is even more blatantly revealed in the writings of Adam Smith
who for instance declares what he calls the propensity to exchange to be
a quality peculiar to human nature, having looked for it in vain in
animals, particularly in dogs. And although he doubted the existence of
the propensity to exchange in animals, Smith attributed to animal as
well as human labour the facility of creating value, especially when he
occasionally relapses into the Physiocrat doctrine:

No equal capital puts into motion a greater quantity of productive
labour than that of the farmer. Not any of his labouring servants, but
his labouring cattle, are productive labourers ...⁽⁴⁾

The labourers and labouring cattle, therefore, employed in agriculture,
not only occasion, like the workmen in manufactures, the reproduction of
a value equal to their own consumption, or to the capital which employs
them, together with its owners profits, but of a much greater value:
Over and above the capital of the farmer and all its profits, they
regularly occasion the reproduction of the rent of the landlord.⁽⁵⁾

Smiths belief that the creation of value is a direct physiological
property of labour, a manifestation of the animal organism in man, finds
its most vivid expression here. Just as the spider produces its web from
its own body, so labouring man produces value labouring man pure and
simple, every man who produces useful objects because labouring man is
by birth a producer of commodities; in the same way human society is
founded by nature on the exchange of commodities, and a commodity
economy is the normal form of human economy.

It was left to Marx to recognise that a given value covers a definite
social relationship which develops under definite historical conditions.
Thus he came to discriminate between the two aspects of
commodity-producing labour: concrete individual labour and socially
necessary labour. When this distinction is made, the solution of the
money problem becomes clear also, as though a spotlight had been turned
on it.

Marx had to establish a dynamic distinction in the course of history
between the commodity producer and the labouring man, in order to
distinguish the twin aspects of labour which appear static in bourgeois
economy. He had to discover that the production of commodities is a
definite historical form of social production before he could decipher
the hieroglyphics of capitalist economy. In a word, Marx had to approach
the problem with methods of deduction diametrically opposed to those of
the classical school, he had in his approach to renounce the latters
faith in the human and normal element in bourgeois production and to
recognise their historical transience: he had to reverse the
metaphysical deductions of the classics into their opposite, the
dialectical.

On this showing Smith could not possibly have arrived at a clear
distinction between the two aspects of value-creating labour, which on
the one hand transfers the old value incorporated in the means of
production to the new product, and on the other hand creates new value
at the same time. Moreover, there seems to be yet another source of his
dogma that total value can be completely resolved into _v_ + _s_. We
should be wrong to assume that Smith lost sight of the fact that every
commodity produced contains not only the value created by its
production, but also the values incorporated in all the means of
production that had been spent upon it in the process of manufacturing
it. By the very fact that he continually refers us from one stage of
production to a former one sending us, as Marx complains, from pillar to
post, in order to show the complete divisibility of the aggregate value
into _v_ + _s_ Smith proves himself well aware of the point. What is
strange in this connection is that he again and again resolves the old
value of the means of production, too, into _v_ + _s_, so as finally to
cover the whole value contained in the commodity.

In the price of corn, for example, one part pays the rent of the
landlord, another pays the wages of maintenance of the labourers and
labouring cattle employed in producing it, and the third pays the profit
of the farmer. These three parts (wages, profit, and rent) seem either
immediately or ultimately to make up the whole price of corn. A fourth
part, it may perhaps be thought, is necessary for replacing the stock of
the farmer, or for compensating the wear and tear of his labouring
cattle and other instruments of husbandry. But it must be considered
that the price of any instrument of husbandry, such as a labouring
horse, is itself made up of the same three parts: the rent of the land
upon which he is reared, the labour of tending and rearing him, and the
profits of the farmer who advances both the rent of this land and the
wages of this labour. Though the price of the corn, therefore, may pay
the price as well as the maintenance of the horse, the whole price still
resolves itself either immediately or ultimately into the same three
parts of rent, of labour, and profit.⁽⁶⁾

Apparently Smiths confusion arose from the following premises: first,
that all labour is performed with the help of means of production of
some kind or other yet what are these means of production associated
with any given labour (such as raw materials and tools) if not the
product of previous labour? Flour is a means of production to which the
baker adds new labour. Yet flour is the result of the millers, work, and
in his hands it was not a means of production but the very product, in
the same way as no the bread and pastries are the product of the baker.
This product, flour, again presupposes grain as a means of production,
arid if we go one step further back this corn is not a means of
production in the hands of the farmer but the product. It is impossible
to find any means of production in which value is embodied, without it
being itself the product of some previous labour.

Secondly, speaking in terms of capitalism, it follows further that all
capital which has been completely used up in the manufacture of any
commodity, can in the end be resolved into a certain quantity of
performed labour.

Thirdly, the total value of the commodity, including all capital
advances, can readily be resolved in this manner into a certain quantity
of labour. What is true for every commodity, must go also for the
aggregate of commodities produced by a society in the course of a year;
its aggregate value can similarly be resolved into a quantity of
performed labour.

Fourthly, all labour performed under capitalist conditions is . divided
into two parts: paid labour which restores the wages advanced, and
unpaid labour which creates profit and rent, or surplus value. All
labour carried out under capitalist conditions thus corresponds to our
formula _v_ + _s_.⁽⁷⁾

All the arguments outlined above are perfectly correct and unassailable.
Smith handled them in a manner which proves his scientific analysis
consistent and undeviating, and his conceptions of value and surplus
value a distinct advance on the Physiocrat approach. Only occasionally,
in his third thesis, he went astray in his final conclusion, saying that
the aggregate value of the annually produced aggregate of commodities
can be resolved into the labour of that very year, although he himself
had been acute enough to admit elsewhere that the value of the
commodities a nation produces in the course of one year necessarily
includes the labour of former years as well, that is the labour embodied
in the means of production which have been handed down.

But even if the four statements enumerated are perfectly correct in
themselves, the conclusion Smith draws from them that the total value of
every commodity, and equally of the annual aggregate of commodities in a
society, can be resolved entirely into _v_ + _s_ is absolutely wrong. He
has the right idea that the whole value of a commodity represents
nothing but social labour, yet identifies it with a false principle,
that all value is nothing but _v_ + _s_. The formula _v_ + _s_ expresses
the function of living labour under capitalism, or rather its double
function, first to restore the wages, or the variable capital, and
secondly, to create surplus value for the capitalist. Wage labour
fulfils this function whilst it is employed by the capitalists, in
virtue of the fact that the value of the commodities is realised in
cash. The capitalist takes back the variable capital he had advanced in
form of wages, and he pockets the surplus value as well. _v_ + _s_
therefore expresses the relation between wage labour and capitalist, a
relationship that is terminated in every instance as soon as the process
of commodity production is finished. Once the commodity is sold, and the
relation _v_ + _s_ is realised for the capitalist in cash, the whole
relationship is wiped out and leaves no traces on the commodity. If we
examine the commodity and its value, we cannot ascertain whether it has
been produced by paid or by unpaid labour, nor in what proportion these
have contributed. Only one fact is beyond doubt: the commodity contains
a certain quantity of socially necessary labour which is expressed in
its exchange. It is completely immaterial for the act of exchange as
well as for the use of the commodity whether the labour which produced
it could be resolved into _v_ + _s_ or not. In the act of exchange all
that matters is that the commodity represents value, and only its
concrete qualities, its usefulness, are relevant to the use we make of
it. Thus the formula _v_ + _s_ only expresses, as it were, the intimate
relationship between capital and labour, the social function of wage
labour, and in the actual product this is completely wiped out. It is
different with the constant capital which has been advanced and invested
in means of production, because every activity of labour requires
certain raw materials, tools, and buildings. The capitalist character of
this state of affairs is expressed by the fact that these means of
production appear as capital, as _c_, as the property of a person other
than the labourer, divorced from labour, the property of those who,
themselves do not, work. Secondly, the constant capital _c_, a mere
advance laid out for the purpose of creating surplus value, appears here
only as the foundation of _v_ + _s_. Yet the concept of constant capital
involves more than this: it expresses the function of the means of
production in the process of human labour, quite independently of all
its historical or social forms. Everybody must have raw materials and
working tools, the means of production, be it the South Sea Islander for
making his family canoe, the communist peasant community in India for
the cultivation of their communal land, the Egyptian fellah for tilling
his village lands or for building Pharaohs pyramids, the Greek slave in
the small workshops of Athens, the feudal serf, the master craftsman of
the medieval guild, or the modern wage labourer. They all require means
of production which, having resulted from human labour, express the link
between human labour and natural matter, and constitute the eternal and
universal prerequisites of the human process of production in the
formula _c_ + _v_ + _s_ stands for a certain function of the means of
production which is not wiped out in the succession of the labour
process. Whereas it is completely immaterial, for both the exchange and
the actual use made of a commodity, whether it has been produced by paid
or by unpaid labour, by wage labour, slave labour, forced labour or any
other kind of labour; on the other hand, it is of decisive importance,
as for using it, whether the commodity is itself a means of production
or a consumer good. Whether paid or unpaid labour has been employed in
the production of a machine, matters to the machinery manufacturer and
to his workers, but only to them; for society, when it acquires this
machine by an act of exchange, only the quality of this machine as a
means of production, only its function in the process of production is
of importance. Just as every producing society, since time immemorial,
has had to give due regard to the important function of the means of
production by arranging, in each period of production, for the
manufacture of the means of production requisite for the next period, so
capitalist society, too, cannot achieve its annual production of value
to accord with the formula _v_ + _s_ which indicates the exploitation of
wage labour unless there exists, as the result of the preceding period,
the quantity of means of production necessary to make up the constant
capital. This specific connection of each past period of production with
the period following forms the universal and eternal foundation of the
social process of reproduction and consists in the fact that in every
period parts of the produce are destined to became the means of
production for the succeeding period: but this relation remained hidden
from Smiths sight. He was not interested in means of production in
respect of their specific function within the process to which they are
applied; he was only concerned with them in so far as they are like any
other commodity, themselves the product of wage labour that has been
employed in a capitalist manner. The specifically capitalist function of
wage labour in the productive process completely obscured for him the
eternal and universal function of the means of production within the
labour process. His narrow bourgeois approach overlooked completely the
general relations between man and nature underneath the specific social
relations between capital and wage labour. Here, it seems, is the real
source of Adam Smiths strange dogma, that the total value of the annual
social product can be resolved into _v_ + _s_. He overlooked the fact
that _c_ as the first link in the formula _c_ + _v_ + _s_ is the
essential expression of the general social foundation of exploitation of
wage labour by capital.

We conclude that the value of every commodity must be expressed by the
formula _c_ + _v_ + _s_. The question now arises how far this formula
applies to the aggregate of commodities within a society. Let us turn to
the doubts expressed by Smith on this point, the statement that an
individuals fixed and circulating capital and his revenue do not
strictly correspond to the same categories from the point of view of
society. (Cf. above, p.64, no.3.) What is circulating capital for one
person is not capital for another, but revenue, as for instance capital
advances for wages. This statement is based upon an error. If the
capitalist pays wages to the workers, he does not abandon his variable
capital and let it stray into the workers hands, to become their income.
He only exchanges the value-form of his variable capital against its
natural form, labour power. The variable capital remains always in the
hand of the capitalist, first as money, and then as labour power, to
revert to him later together with the surplus value as the cash proceeds
from the commodities. The worker, on the other hand, never gains
possession of the variable capital. His labour power is never capital to
him, but it is his only asset; the power to work is the only thing he
possesses. Again, if he has sold it and taken a money wage, this wage is
for him not capital but the price of his commodity which he has sold.
Finally, the fact that the worker buys provisions with the wages he has
received, has no more connection with the function this money once
fulfilled as variable capital in the hands of the capitalist, than has
the private use a vendor of a commodity can make of the money he has
obtained by a sale. It is not the capitalists variable capital which
becomes the workers income, but the price of the workers commodity
labour power which he has sold, while the variable capital, now as ever,
remains in the hands of the capitalist and fulfils its specific
function. Equally erroneous is the conception that the income of the
capitalist (the surplus value) which is hidden in machines in our
example of a machinery manufacturer which has not as yet been realised,
is fixed capital for another person, the buyer of the machines. It is
not the machines, or parts of them, which form the income of the
machinery manufacturer, but the surplus value that is hidden in them the
unpaid labour of his wage labourers. After the machine has been sold,
this income simply remains as before in the hand of the machinery
manufacturer; it has only changed its outward shape: it has been changed
from the machine-form into the money-form. Conversely, the buyer of this
machine has not, by its purchase, newly obtained possession of his fixed
capital, for he had this fixed capital in hand even before the purchase,
in the form of a certain amount of cash. By buying this machine, he has
only given to his capital the adequate material form for it to become
productive. The income, or surplus value, remains in the hands of the
machinery manufacturer before and after the sale of the machine, and the
fixed capital remains in the hands of the other person, the capitalist
buyer of the machine, just as the variable capital in the first example
always remained in the hands of the capitalist and the income in the
hands of the worker.

Smith and his followers have caused confusion because, in their
investigation of capitalist exchange, they mixed up the use-form of the
commodities with their relations of value. Further, they did not
distinguish the individual circulations of capitals and commodities
which are ever interlacing. One and the same act of exchange can be
circulation of capital, when seen from one aspect, and at the same time
simple commodity exchange for the purpose of consumption. The fallacy
that whatever is capital for one person must be income for another, and
_vice versa_, must be translated thus into the correct statement that
what is circulation of capital for one person, may be simple commodity
exchange for another, and _vice versa_. This only expresses the capacity
of capital to undergo transformations of its character, and the
interconnections of various spheres of interest in the social process of
exchange. The sharply outlined existence of capital in contrast with
income still stands in both its clearly defined forms of constant and
variable capital. Even so, Smith comes very close to the truth when he
states that capital and income of the individual are not strictly
identical with the same categories from the point of view of the
community. Only a few further connecting links are lacking for a clear
revelation of the true relationship.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾AN ENQUIRY INTO THE NATURE AND CAUSES OF THE WEALTH OF NATIONS,
vol.i, p.19

⁽²⁾THEORIEN ÜBER DEN MEHRWERT (Stuttgart, 1905), vol.i, pp.179-252

⁽³⁾CAPITAL, vol. ii, p. 435

⁽⁴⁾ Smith, OP. CIT., vol.ii, p.148.

⁽⁵⁾IBID., p.149.

⁽⁶⁾OP. CIT., vol.1, pp.86-7.

⁽⁷⁾ In this connection, we have disregarded the contrary conception
which also runs through the work of Smith. According to that, the price
of the commodity cannot be resolved into _v_ + _s_, though the value of
commodities consists in _v_ + _s_. This distinction, however, is more
important with regard to Smiths theory of value than in the present
context where we are mainly interested in his formula _v_ + _s_

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 12.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section One The Problem of Reproduction



CHAPTER 4 MARXS SCHEME OF SIMPLE REPRODUCTION


 

Let us now consider the formula _c_ + _v_ + _s_ as the expression of the
social product as a whole. Is it only a theoretical abstraction, or does
it convey any real meaning when applied to social life has the formula
any objective existence in relation to society as a whole? It was left
to Marx to establish the fundamental importance of _c_, the constant
capital, in economic theory. Yet Adam Smith before him, working
exclusively with the categories of fixed and circulating capital, in
effect transformed this fixed capital into constant capital, though he
was not aware of having achieved this result. This constant capital
comprises not only those means of production which wear out in the
course of years, but also those which are completely absorbed by
production in any one year. His very dogma that the total value is
resolved into _v_ + _s_ and his arguments on this point lead Smith to
distinguish between the two categories of production living labour and
inanimate means of production. On the other hand, when he tries to
construe the social process of reproduction on the basis of the capitals
and incomes of individuals, the fixed capital he conceives of as
existing apart from these, is, in fact, constant capital.

Every individual capitalist uses for the production of his commodities
certain material means of production such as premises, raw materials and
instruments. In order to produce the aggregate of commodities in a given
society, an aggregate of all material means of production used by the
individual capitalists is an obvious requisite. The existence of these
means of production within the society is a real fact, though they
themselves exist in the form of purely private individual capitals. This
is the universal absolute condition of social production in all its
historical forms.⁽¹⁾

The specific capitalist form manifests itself in the fact that the
material means of production function as _c_, as constant capital, the
property of those who do not work; it is the opposite pole to
proletarianised labour power, the counterpart of wage labour. The
variable capital, _v_, is the aggregate of wages actually paid in the
society in the course of a years production. This fact, too, has real
objective existence, although it manifests itself in an innumerable mass
of individual wages. In every society the amount of labour power
actually engaged in production and the annual maintenance of the workers
is a question of decisive importance. Where this factor takes the
specific capitalist form of _v_, the variable capital, it follows that
the means of subsistence first come to the workers in form of a wage
which is the price of the labour power they have sold to another person,
the owner of the material means of production who does not work himself;
under this aspect, it is the latters capitalist property. Further, _v_
is an aggregate of money, that is to say it is the means of subsistence
for the workers in a form of pure value. This concept of _v_ implies
that the workers are free in a double sense free in person and free of
all means of production. It also expresses the fact that in a given
society the universal form of production is commodity production.

Finally, _s_, the surplus value, stands for the total of all surplus
values gained by the individual capitalists. Every society performs
surplus labour, and even a socialist society will have to do the same.
It must perform surplus labour in a threefold sense: it has to provide a
quantity of labour for the maintenance of non-workers (those who are
unable to work, such as children, old people, invalids, and also civil
servants and the so-called liberal professions who do not take an
immediate part in the satisfaction of material⁽²⁾ wants), it has to
provide a fund of social insurance against elementary disasters which
may threaten the annual produce, such as bad harvests, forest fires and
floods; and lastly it must provide a fund for the purpose of increasing
production, either because of an increase in the population, or because
higher standards of civilisation lead to additional wants. It is in two
respects that the capitalist character manifests itself: surplus labour
comes into being

1.  as surplus value, i.e. in commodity-form, realisable in cash, and
2.  as the property of non-workers, of those who own the means of
    production.

Similarly, if we consider _v_ + _s_, these two amounts taken together,
we see that they represent objective quantities of universal validity:
the total of living labour that has been performed within a society in
the course of one year. Every human society, whatever its historical
form, must take note of this datum, with reference to both the results
that have been achieved, and the existing and available labour power.
The division into _v_ + _s_ is a universal phenomenon, independent of
the societys particular historical form. In its capitalist form, this
division shows itself not only in the qualitative peculiarities of both
_v_ and _s_ as already outlined, but also in their quantitative
relationship: _v_ tends to become depressed to a minimum level, just
sufficient for the physiological and social existence of the worker, and
_s_ tends to increase continually at the cost of, and relative to, _v_.

The predominant feature of capitalist production is expressed in this
last circumstance: it is the fact that the creation and appropriation of
surplus value is the real purpose of, and the incentive to, production.

We have examined the relations upon which the capitalist formula of the
aggregate product is based, and have found them universally valid. In
every planned economy they are made the object of conscious regulation
on the part of society; in a communist society by the community of
workers and their democratic organs, and in a society based upon
class-rule by the nucleus of owners and their despotic power. In a
system of capitalist production there is no such planned regulation. The
aggregate of the societys capitals and the aggregate of its commodities
alike consist in reality of innumerable fragments of individual capitals
and individual items of merchandise, taken together.

Thus the question arises whether these sums themselves mean anything
more in a capitalist society than a mere statistical enumeration which
is, moreover, inexact and fluid. Applying the standards of society as a
whole, we perceive that the completely independent and sovereign
individual existence of private enterprises is only the historically
conditioned form, whereas it is social interconnections that provide the
foundation. Although individual capitals act in complete independence of
one another, and a social regulation is completely lacking, the movement
of capitals forms a homogeneous whole. This movement, too, appears in
specifically capitalist forms. In every planned system of production it
is, above all, the relation between all labour, past and present, and
the means of production (between _v_ + _s_ and _c_, according to our
formula), or the relation between the aggregate of necessary consumer
goods (again, in the terms of our formula, _v_ + _s_) and _c_ which are
subjected to regulation. Under capitalist conditions, on the other hand,
all social labour necessary for the maintenance of the inanimate means
of production and also of living labour power is treated as one entity,
as capital, in contrast with the surplus labour that has been performed,
i.e. with the surplus value _s_. The relation between these two
quantities _c_ and (_v_ + _s_) is a palpably real, objective
relationship of capitalist society: it is the average rate of profit;
every capital is in fact treated only as part of a common whole, the
whole of social capital, and assigned the profit to which it is
entitled, according to its size, out of the surplus value wrested from
society, regardless of the quantity which this particular capital has
actually created. Thus social capital and its counterpart, the whole of
social surplus value, are not merely real quantities, having an
objective existence, but, what is more, the relation between them, the
average profit, guides and directs the whole process of exchange. This
it does in three ways:

1.  by the mechanism of the law of value which establishes the
    quantitative relations of exchange between the individual kinds of
    commodities independently of their specific value relationship;
2.  by the social division of labour, the assignment of certain portions
    of capital and labour to the individual spheres of production;
3.  by the development of labour productivity which on the one hand
    stimulates individual capitals to engage in pioneering work for the
    purpose of securing a higher profit than the average, and on the
    other hand extends the progress that has been achieved by
    individuals over the whole field of production.

By means of the average rate of profit, in a word, the total capital of
society completely governs the seemingly independent motions of
individual capitals.

The formula _c_ + _v_ + _s_ thus applies to the aggregate of commodities
produced in a society under capitalism no less than to the value
composition of every individual commodity. It is, however, only the
value-composition for which this holds good the analogy cannot be
carried further.

The formula is indeed perfectly exact if we regard the total product of
a capitalistically producing society as the output of one years labour,
and wish to analyse it into its respective components. The quantity _c_
shows how much of the labour of former years has been taken over towards
the product of the present year in the form of means of production.
Quantities _v_ + _s_ show the value components of the product created by
new labour during the last year only; the relation between _v_ and _s_
finally shows us how the annual labour programme of society is
apportioned to the two tasks of maintaining the workers and maintaining
those who do not work. This analysis remains valid and correct also with
regard to the reproduction of individual capital, no matter what may be
the material form of the product this capital has created. All three,
_c_, _v_, and _s_, appear alike to a capitalist of the machinery
industry in the form of machinery and its parts; to the owner of a music
hall they are represented by the charms of the dancers and the skill of
the acrobats. So long as the product is left undifferentiated, _c_, _v_,
and _s_ differ from one another only in so far as they are _aliquot_
components of value. This is quite sufficient for the reproduction of
individual capital, as such reproduction begins with the value-form of
capital, a certain amount of money that has been gained by the
realisation of the manufactured product. The formula _c_ + _v_ + _s_
then is the given basis for the division of this amount of money one
part for the purchase of the material means of production, a second part
for the purchase of labour power, and a third part in the case of simple
reproduction assumed in the first instance for the capitalists personal
consumption. In the case of expanding reproduction part three is further
subdivided, only a fraction of it being devoted to the capitalists
personal consumption, the remainder to increasing his capital. In order
to reproduce his capital actually, the capitalist must, of course, turn
again to the commodity market with the capital he has divided in this
manner, so that he can acquire the material prerequisites of production
such as raw materials, instruments, and so on. It seems a matter of
course to the individual capitalist as well as to his scientific
ideologist, the vulgar economist, that he should in fact find there just
those means of production and labour power he needs for his business.

The position is different as regards the total production of a society.
From the point of view of society as a whole, the exchange of
commodities can only effect a shifting around, whereby the individual
parts of the total product change hands. The material composition of the
product, however, cannot be changed by this process. After this change
of places, as well as before it, there can be reproduction of total
capital, if, and only if, there is in the total product of the preceding
period: first, a sufficient quantity of means of production, secondly,
adequate provisions to maintain the same amount of labour as hitherto,
and, last but not least, the goods necessary to maintain the capitalist
class and its hangers-on in a manner suitable to their station. This
brings us to a new plane: we are now concerned with material points of
view instead of pure relations of value. It is the use-form of the total
social product that matters now. What the individual capitalist
considers nobody else's business becomes a matter of grave concern for
the totality of capitalists. Whereas it does not make the slightest
difference to the individual capitalist whether he produces machinery,
sugar, artificial manure or a progressive newspaper provided only that
he can find a buyer for his commodity so that he can get back his
capital plus surplus value it matters infinitely to the total capitalist
that his total product should have a definite use-form. By that we mean
that it must provide three essentials: the means of production to renew
the labour process, simple provisions for the maintenance of the
workers, and provisions of higher quality and luxury goods for the
preservation of the total capitalist himself. His desire in this respect
is not general and vague, but determined precisely and quantitatively.
If we ask what quantities of all three categories are required by the
total capitalist, the value-composition of last years total product
gives us a definite estimate, as long, that is, as we confine ourselves
to simple reproduction, which we have taken for our starting point.
Hitherto we have conceived of the formula _c_ + _v_ + _s_ as a merely
quantitative division of the total value, applicable alike to total
capital and to individual capital, and representing the quantity of
labour contained in the annual product of society. Now we see that the
formula is also the basis of the material composition of the product.
Obviously the total capitalist, if he is to take up reproduction to the
same extent as before, must find in his new total product as many means
of production as correspond to the size of _c_, as many simple
provisions for the workers as correspond to the sum of wages _v_, and as
many provisions of better quality for himself and his hangers-on as
correspond to _s_. In this way our analysis of the value of the societys
aggregate product is translated into a general recipe for this product
as follows: the total _c_ of society must be re-embodied in an equal
quantity of means of production, the _v_ in provisions for the workers,
and the _s_ in provisions for the capitalists, in order that simple
reproduction may take place.

Here we come up against palpable differences between the individual
capitalist and the total capitalist. The manner in which the former
always reproduces his constant and variable capital as well as his
surplus value is such that all three parts are contained in the same
material form within his homogeneous product, that this material form,
moreover, is completely irrelevant and may have different qualities in
the case of each individual capitalist. The total capitalist, for his
part, reproduces every component of the value of his annual product in a
different material form, _c_ as means of production, _v_ as provisions
for the workers, and _s_ as provisions for the capitalists. In the case
of the reproduction of individual capitals, there is no discrepancy
between relations of value and material points of view. Besides, it is
quite clear that individual capital may concentrate on aspects of value,
accepting material conditions as a law from heaven, as self-evident
phenomena of commodity exchange, whereas the total capitalist has to
reckon with material points of view. If the total _c_ of society were
not reproduced annually in the form of an equal amount of means of
production, every individual capitalist would be doomed to search the
commodity market in vain with his _c_ realised in cash, unable to find
the requisite materials for his individual reproduction. From the point
of view of reproducing the total capital, the formula _c_ + _v_ + _s_ is
inadequate. This again is proof of the fact that the concept of total
capital is something real and does not merely paraphrase the concept of
production. We must, however, make general distinctions in our
exposition of total capital: instead of showing it as a homogeneous
whole, we must demonstrate its three main categories; and we shall not
vitiate our theory if, for the sake of simplicity, we consider for the
present only two departments of total capital: the production of
producer goods, and that of consumer goods for workers and capitalists.
We have to examine each department separately, adhering to the
fundamental conditions of capitalist production in each case. At the
same time, we must also emphasise the mutual connections between these
two departments from the point of view of reproduction. For only if each
is regarded in connection with the other, do they make up the basis of
the social capital as a whole.

We made a start by investigating individual capital. But we must
approach the demonstration of total capital and its total product in a
somewhat different manner. Quantitatively, as a quantity of value, the
_c_ of society consists precisely in the total of individual constant
capitals, and the same applies to the other amounts, _v_ and _s_. But
the outward shape of each has changed the _c_ of constant capitals
re-emerges from the process of production as an element of value with
infinitely varied facets, comprising a host of variegated objects for
use, but in the total product it appears, as it were, contracted into a
certain quantity of means of production. Similarly with _v_ and _s_,
which in the case of the individual capitalist re-emerge as items in a
most colourful jumble of commodities, being provisions in adequate
quantities for the workers and capitalists. Adam Smith came very close
to recognising this fact when he observed that the categories of fixed
and circulating capital and of revenue in relation to the individual
capitalist do not coincide with these categories in the case of society.

We have come to the following conclusions:

1.  The formula _c_ + _v_ + _s_ serves to express the production of
    society viewed as a whole, as well as the production of individual
    capitalists.
2.  Social production is divided into two departments, engaged in the
    production of producer and consumer goods respectively.
3.  Both departments work according to capitalist methods, that is to
    say they both aim at the production of surplus value, and thus the
    formula _c_ + _v_ + _s_ will apply to each of them.
4.  The two departments are interdependent, and are therefore bound to
    display a certain quantitative relationship, namely the one
    department must produce all means of productions the other all
    provisions for the workers and capitalists of both departments.

Proceeding from this point of view, Marx devised the following diagram
of capitalist reproduction:

  --------------------------------------------------------------------------
   I. 4,000_c_ + 1,000_v_ + 1,000_s_ = 6,000 means of production
  II. 2,000_c_ +    500_v_ +    500_s_ = 3,000 articles of consumption.⁽³⁾

  --------------------------------------------------------------------------

The figures in this diagram express quantities of value, amounts of
money which are chosen arbitrarily, but their ratios are exact. Each
department is characterised by the use-form of the commodities produced.
Their mutual circulation takes place as follows: Department I supplies
the means of production for the entire productive process, for itself as
well as for Department II. From this alone it follows, that for the
undisturbed continuance of reproduction for we still presume simple
reproduction on the old scale the total produce of Department I (I
6,000) must have the same value as the sum of constant capitals in both
departments: (I 4,000_c_ + II 2,000_c_). Similarly, Department II
supplies provisions for the whole of society, for its own workers and
capitalists as well as for the workers and capitalists of Department I.
Hence it follows that for the undisturbed course of consumption and
production and its renewal on the old scale it is necessary that the
total quantity of provisions supplied by Department II should equal in
value all the incomes of the employed workers and capitalists of society
[here II 3,000 = I(1,000_v_ + 1,000_s_ + II(500_v_ + 500s)].

Here we have indeed expressed relationships of value which are the
foundation not only of capitalist reproduction but of reproduction in
every society. In every producing society, whatever its social form, in
the primitive small village community of the Bakairi of Brazil, in the
_oikos_ of a Timon of Athens with its slaves, or in the imperial
_corvée_ farm of Charlemagne, the labour power available for society
must be distributed in such away that means of production as well as
provisions are produced in adequate quantities. The former must suffice
for the immediate production of provisions as well as for the future
renewal of the means of production themselves, and the provisions in
their turn must suffice for the maintenance of the workers occupied in
the production alike of these same provisions and of the means of
production, and moreover for the maintenance of all those who do not
work.

In its broad outline, Marxs scheme corresponds with the universal and
absolute foundation of social reproduction, with only the following
specifications: socially necessary labour appears here as value, the
means of production as constant capital, the labour necessary for the
maintenance of the workers as variable capital and that necessary for
the maintenance of those who do not work as surplus value.

In capitalist society, however, the connections between these two great
departments depend upon exchange of commodities, on the exchange of
equivalents. The workers and capitalists of Department I can only obtain
as many provisions from Department II as they can deliver of their own
commodities, the means of production. The demand of Department II for
means of production, on the other hand, is determined by the size of its
constant capital. It follows therefore that the sum of the variable
capital and of the surplus value in the production of producer goods
[here I(1,000_v_ + 1,000_s_)] must equal the constant capital in the
production of provisions [here II(2,000_c_)].

An important proviso remains to be added to the above scheme. The
constant capital which has been spent by the two departments is in
reality only part of the constant capital used by society. This constant
capital is divided into two parts; the first is fixed capital premises,
tools, labouring cattle which functions in a number of periods of
production, in every one of which, however, only part of its value is
absorbed by the product, according to the amount of its wear and tear.
The second is circulating capital such as raw materials, auxiliary
semi-finished products; fuel and lighting its whole value is completely
absorbed by the new product in every period of production. Yet only that
part of the means of production is relevant for reproduction which is
actually absorbed by the production of value; without becoming less
correct, an exact exposition of social circulation may disregard the
remaining part of the fixed capital which has not been absorbed by the
product, though it should not completely forget it. This is easy to
prove.

Let us assume that the constant capital, 6,000_c_, in the two
departments, which is in fact absorbed by the annual product of these
departments, consists of 1,500_c_ fixed and 4,500_c_ circulating
capital, the 1,500_c_ of fixed capital representing here the annual wear
and tear of the premises, machinery and labouring cattle. This annual
wear and tear equals, say, 10 per cent of the total value of the fixed
capital employed. Then the total social capital would really consist of
19,500_c_ + 1,500_v_, the constant capital in both departments being
1,500_c_ of fixed and aggregate fixed capital, with 10 per cent wear and
tear, is ten years _ex hypothesi_, the fixed capital needs renewal only
after the lapse of ten years. Meanwhile one-tenth of its value enters
into social production in every year. If all the fixed capital of a
society, with the same rate of wear and tear, were of equal durability,
it would, on our assumption, need complete renewal once within ten
years. This, however, is not the case. Some of the various use-forms
which are part of the fixed capital may last longer and others shorter,
wear and tear and duration of life are quite different in the different
kinds and individual representations of fixed capital. In consequence,
fixed capital need not be renewed reproduced in its concrete use-form
all at once, but parts of it are continually renewed at various stages
of social production, while other parts still function in their older
form. Our assumption of a fixed capital of 15,000_c_ with a 10 per cent
rate of wear and tear does not mean that this must be renewed all at
once every ten years, but that an annual average renewal and replacement
must be effected of a part of the total fixed social capital
corresponding to one-tenth of its value; that is to say, Department I
which has to satisfy the needs of society for means of production must
reproduce, year by year, not only all its raw and partly finished
materials, etc., its circulating capital to the value of 4,500, but must
also reproduce the use-forms of its fixed capital premises, machinery,
and the like to the extent of 1,500, corresponding with the annual wear
and tear of fixed capital. If Department I continues in this manner to
renew one-tenth of the fixed capital in its use-form every year, the
result will be that every ten years the total fixed capital of society
will have been replaced throughout by new items; thus it follows that
the reproduction of those parts disregarded so far is also completely
accounted for in the above scheme.

In practice, the procedure is that every capitalist sets aside from his
annual production, from the realisation of his commodities, a certain
amount for the redemption of his fixed capital. These individual annual
deductions must amount to a certain quantity of capital, therefore the
capitalist has in fact renewed his fixed capital, that is, he has
replaced it by new and more efficient items. This alternating procedure
of building up annual reserves of money for the renewal of fixed capital
and of the periodical employment of the accumulated amounts for the
actual renewal of fixed capital varies with the individual capitalist,
so that some are accumulating reserves, while others have already
started their renewals. Thus every year part of the fixed capital is
actually renewed. The monetary procedure here only disguises the real
process which characterises the reproduction of fixed capital.

On closer observation we see that this is as it should be. The whole of
the fixed capital takes part in the process of production, for
physically the mass of usable objects, premises, machinery, labouring
cattle, are completely employed. It is their peculiarity as fixed
capital, on the other hand, that only part of the value is absorbed in
the production of value, since in the process of reproduction (again
postulating simple reproduction), all that matters is to replace in
their natural form the values which have been actually used up as means
of subsistence and production during a years production. Therefore,
fixed capital need only be reproduced to the extent that it has in fact
been used up in the production of commodities. The remaining portion of
value, embodied in the total use-form of fixed capital, is of decisive
importance for production as a labour process, but does not exist for
the annual reproduction of society as a process of value-formation.

Besides, this process which is here expressed by relations of value
applies equally to every society, even to a community which does not
produce commodities. If once upon a time, for instance, say ten years
labour of 1,000 fellaheen was required for the construction of the
famous Lake Moeris and the related Nile canals that miraculous lake,
which Herodotus tells us was made by hand and if for the maintenance of
this, the most magnificent drainage system of the world, the labour of a
further 100 fellaheen was annually required (the figures, of course, are
chosen at random), we might say that after every hundred years the
Moeris dam and the canals were reproduced anew, although in fact the
entire system was not constructed as a whole in every century. This is
manifestly true. When, amid the stormy incidents of political history
and alien conquests, the usual crude neglect of old monuments of culture
set in as displayed, e.g. by the English in India when the
reproductional needs of ancient civilisations were understood no longer
then in the course of time the whole Lake Moeris, its water, dikes and
canals, the two pyramids in its midst, the colossus upon it and other
marvellous erections, disappeared without a trace, as though they had
never been built. Only ten lines in Herodotus, a dot on Ptolemys map of
the world, traces of old cultures, and of villages and cities bear
witness that at one time rich life sprang from this magnificent
irrigation system, where to-day there are only stretches of arid desert
in inner Lybia, and desolate swamps along the coast. There is only one
point where Marxs scheme of simple reproduction may appear
unsatisfactory or incomplete in relation to constant capital, and that
is when we go back to that period of production, when the total fixed
capital was first created. Indeed, society possesses transformed labour
amounting to more than those parts of fixed capital which are absorbed
into the value of the annual product and are in turn replaced by it. In
the figures of our example, the total social capital does not consist of
6,000_c_ + 1,500_v_, as in the diagram, but of 19,500_c_ + 1,500_v_.
Though 1,500 of the fixed capital (which, on our assumption, amounts to
15,000) are annually reproduced in the form of appropriate means of
production, an equal amount is also consumed by the same production each
year, though the whole of the fixed capital as a use-form, an aggregate
of objects, has been renewed. After ten years, society possesses in the
eleventh, just as in any other year, a fixed capital of 15,000, whereas
it has annually achieved only 1,500_c_; and its constant capital as a
whole is 19,500, whereas it has created only 6,000. Obviously, since it
must have created this surplus of 13,500 fixed capital by its labour, it
possesses more accumulated past labour than our scheme of reproduction
warrants. Even at this stage, the annual labour of society must be based
on some previous annual labour that has been hoarded. This question of
past labour, however, as the foundation of all present labour, brings us
to the very first beginning which is as meaningless with regard to the
economic development of mankind as it is for the natural development of
matter. The scheme of reproduction grasps the social process as
perpetually in motion, as a link in the endless chain of events, it
neither wants to demonstrate its initial origin, nor should it do so.
The social reproductive process is always based on past labour, we may
trace it back as far as we like. Social labour has no beginning, just as
it has no end. Like the historical origin of Herodotus Lake Moeris, the
beginnings of the reproductive process in the history of civilisation
are lost in the twilight of legend. With the progress of techniques and
with cultural development, the means of production change their form,
crude paleoliths are replaced by sharpened tools, stone implements by
elegant bronze and iron, the artisans tool by steam-driven machinery.
Yet, though the means of production and the social organisation of the
productive process continually change their form, society already
possesses for its labour process a certain amount of past labour serving
as the basis for annual reproduction.

Under capitalist methods of production past labour of society preserved
in the means of production takes the form of capital, and the question
of the origin of this past labour which forms the foundation of the
reproductive process becomes the question of the genesis of capital.
This is much less legendary, indeed it is writ in letters of blood in
modern history. The very fact, however, that we cannot think of simple
reproduction unless we assume a hoard of past labour, surpassing in
volume the labour annually performed for the maintenance of society,
touches the sore spot of simple reproduction; and it shows that simple
reproduction is a fiction not only for capitalist production but also
for the progress of civilisation in general. If we merely wish to
understand this fiction properly, and to reduce it to a scheme, we must
presume, as its _sine qua non_, results of a past productive process
which cannot possibly be restricted to simple reproduction but
inexorably points towards enlarged reproduction. By way of illustration,
we might compare the aggregate fixed capital of society with a railway.
The durability and consequently the annual wear and tear of its various
parts is very different. Parts such as viaducts and tunnels may last for
centuries, steam engines for decades, but other rolling stock will be
used up in a short time, in some instances in a few months. Yet it is
possible to work out an average rate of wear and tear, say thirty years,
so that the value of the whole is annually depreciated by one thirtieth.
This loss of value is now continually made good by partial reproduction
of the railway (which may count as repairs), so that a coach is renewed
to-day, part of the engine to-morrow, and a section of sleepers the day
after. On our assumption then, the old railway is replaced by a new one
after thirty years, a similar amount of labour being performed each year
by the society so that simple reproduction takes place. But the railway
can only be reproduced in this manner it cannot be so produced. In order
to make it fit for use and to make good its gradual wear and tear, the
railway must have been completed in the first place. Though the railway
can be repaired in parts, it cannot be made fit for use piecemeal, an
axle to-day and a coach to-morrow. Indeed, the very essence of fixed
capital is always to enter into the productive process in its entirety,
as a material use-value. In order to get this use-form ready in the
first place, society must apply a more concentrated amount of labour to
its manufacture. In terms of our example, the labour of thirty years
that is used for repairs, must be compressed into, say, two or three
years. During this period of manufacture, society must therefore expend
an amount of labour far greater than the average, that is to say it must
have recourse to expanding reproduction; later, when the railway is
finished, it may return to simple reproduction. Though we need not
visualise the aggregate fixed capital as a single coherent use-object or
a conglomeration of objects which must be produced all at once, the
manufacture of all the more important means of production, such as
buildings, transport facilities, and agricultural structures, requires a
more concentrated application of labour, and, this is true for the
modern railway or steamship as much as it was for the rough stone-axe
and the handmill. Therefore it is only in theory that simple
reproduction can be conceived as alternating with enlarged reproduction;
the latter is not only a general condition of a progressive civilisation
and an expanding population, but also the _sine qua non_ for the
economic form of fixed capital, or those means of production which in
every society correspond to the fixed capital.

Marx deals with this conflict between the formation of fixed capital and
simple reproduction but indirectly, in connection with fluctuations in
the wear and tear of the fixed capital, more rapid in some years than in
others. Here he emphasises the need for perpetual over-production, i.e.
enlarged reproduction, since a strict policy of simple reproduction
would periodically lead to reproductive losses. In short, he regards
enlarged reproduction under the aspect of an insurance fund for the
fixed capital of the society, rather than in the light of the actual
productive process.⁽⁴⁾

In quite a different context Marx appears to endorse the opinion
expressed above. In THEORIES ON THE SURPLUS VALUE, vol.ii, part 2,
analysing the conversion of revenue into capital, he speaks of the
peculiar reproduction of the fixed capital, the replacement of which in
itself already provides a fund for accumulation. He draws the following
conclusion:

The point we have in mind is as follows: even if the aggregate capital
employed in machine manufacture were just large enough to make good the
annual wear and tear of the machines, many more machines could be
annually produced than are required, since the wear and tear is in parts
merely _idealiter_ and must be made good _realiter_, _in natura_, only
after a certain number of years. Capital so employed supplies each year
a mass of machinery which becomes available for, and anticipates new,
capital investments. Let us suppose, for instance, a machine
manufacturer who starts production this year. During this year, he
supplies machines for £12,000. If he were merely to reproduce the
machines he has manufactured, he would have to produce, during the
subsequent eleven years, machines for £1,000 only, and even then, a
years production would not be consumed within the year. Still less could
it be consumed, if he were to employ the whole of his capital. To keep
this capital working, to keep it reproducing itself every year, a new
and continuous expansion of the branches of manufacture that require
these machines, is indispensable. This applies even more, if the machine
manufacturer himself accumulates. In consequence, even _if the capital
invested in one particular branch of production is simply being
reproduced_,⁽⁵⁾ a continuous accumulation in the other branches of
production must go with it.⁽⁶⁾

We might take the machine manufacturer of Marxs example as illustrating
the production of fixed capital. Then the inference is that if society
maintains simple reproduction in this sphere, employing each year a
similar amount of labour for the production of fixed capital (a
procedure which is, of course, impossible in practical life), then
annual production in all other spheres must expand. But if here, too,
simple reproduction is to be maintained, then, if the fixed capital once
created is to be merely renewed, only a small part of the labour
employed in its creation can be expended. Or, to put it the other way
round: if society is to provide for investment in fixed capital on a
large scale, it must, even assuming simple reproduction to prevail on
the whole, resort periodically to enlarged reproduction.

With the advance of civilisation, there are changes not only in the form
of the means of production but also in the quantity of value they
represent or better, changes in the social labour stored up in them.
Apart from the labour necessary for its immediate preservation, society
has increasingly more labour time and labour power to spare, and it
makes use of these for the manufacture of means of production on an ever
increasing scale. How does this affect the process of reproduction? How,
in terms of capitalism, does society create out of its annual labour a
greater amount of capital than it formerly possessed? This question
touches upon enlarged reproduction, and it is not yet time to deal with
it.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾ For the sake of simplicity, we shall follow general usage and speak
here and in the following of annual production, though this term,
strictly speaking, applies in general to agriculture only. The periods
of industrial production, or of the turnover of capitals, need not
coincide with calendar years.

⁽²⁾ The distinction between intellectual and material labour need not
involve special categories of the population in a planned society, based
on common ownership of the means of production. It will always find
expression in the existence of a certain number of spiritual leaders who
must be materially maintained. The same individuals may exercise these
various functions at different times.

⁽³⁾CAPITAL, vol.ii, p.459.

⁽⁴⁾CAPITAL, Vol.2, pp.544-7. Cf. also p.202 on the necessity of enlarged
reproduction under the aspect of a reserve fund.

⁽⁵⁾ Marxs italics.

⁽⁶⁾THEORIEN ÜBER DEN MEHRWERT, vol.ii, part 2, p.248.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 12.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section One The Problem of Reproduction



CHAPTER 5 THE CIRCULATION OF MONEY


 

In our study of the reproductive process we have not so far considered
the circulation of money. Here we do not refer to money as a measuring
rod, an embodiment of value, because all relations of social labour have
been expressed, assumed and measured in terms of money. What we have to
do now is to test our diagram of simple reproduction under the aspect of
money as a means of exchange.

Quesnay already saw that we shall only understand the social
reproductive process if we assume, side by side with the means of
production and consumer goods, a certain quantity of money.⁽¹⁾

Two questions now arise:

  1.  by whom should the money be owned, and
  2.  how much of it should there be?

The answer to the first question, no doubt, is that the workers receive
their wages in the form of money with which they buy consumer goods.
From the point of view of society, this means merely that the workers
are allocated a certain share of the fund for consumption: every
society, whatever its historical form of production, makes such
allocations to its workers. It is, however, an essential characteristic
of the capitalist form of production that the workers do not obtain
their share directly in the form of goods but by way of commodity
exchange, just as it is an essential feature of the capitalist mode of
production that their labour power is not applied directly, as a result
of a relation of personal domination, but again by way of commodity
exchange: the workers selling their labour power to the owners of the
means of production, and purchasing freely their consumer goods.
Variable capital in its money form is the expression and medium of both
these transactions.

Money, then, comes first into circulation by the payment of wages. The
capitalist class must therefore set a certain quantity of money
circulating in the first place, and this must be equal to the amount
they pay in wages. The capitalists of Department I need 1,000 units of
money, and the capitalists of Department II need 500 to meet their wages
bill. Thus, according to our diagram, two quantities of money are
circulating: I(1,000_v_) and II(500_v_). The workers spend the total of
1,500 on consumer goods, i.e on the products of Department II. In this
way, labour power is maintained, that is to say the variable capital of
society is reproduced in its natural forth, as the foundation of all
other reproductions of capital. At the same time, the capitalists of
Department II dispose of their aggregate product (1,500) in the
following manner: their own workers receive 500 and the workers of
Department I receive 1,000. This exchange gives the capitalists of
Department II possession of 1,500 money units: 500 are their own
variable capital which has returned to them; these may start circulating
again as variable capital but for the time being they have completed
their course. The other 1,000 accrue to them year by year out of the
realisation of one third of their own products. The capitalists of
Department II now buy means of production from the capitalists of
Department I for these 1,000 money units in order to renew the part of
their own constant capital that has been used up. By means of this
purchase, Department II renews in its natural form half of the constant
capital II_c_ it requires. Department I now has in return 1,000 money
units which are nothing more than the money originally paid to its own
workers. Now, after having changed hands twice, the money has returned
to Department I, to become effective later as variable capital. This
completes the circulation of this quantity of money for the moment, but
the circulation within society has not yet come to an end. The
capitalists of Department I have not yet realised their surplus value to
buy consumer goods for themselves; it is still contained in their
product in a form which is of no use to them. Moreover, the capitalists
of Department II have not yet renewed the second half of their constant
capital. These two acts of exchange are identical both in substance and
in value, for the capitalists of Department I receive their goods from
Department II in exchange for the I(1,000_c_) means of production needed
by the capitalists of Department II. However, a new quantity of money is
required to effect this exchange. It is true that the same money which
has already completed its course, might be brought into circulation
again for this purpose in theory, there could be no objection to this.
In practice, however, this solution is out of the question, for the
needs of the capitalists, as consumers, must be satisfied just as
constantly as the needs of the workers they run parallel to the process
of production and must be mediated by specific quantities of money.
Hence it follows that the capitalists of both departments that is to say
all capitalists must have a further cash reserve in hand, in addition to
the money required as variable capital, in order to realise their own
surplus value in the form of consumer goods. On the other hand, before
the total product is realised and during the process of its production,
certain parts df the constant capital must be bought continually. These
are the circulating parts of the constant capital, such as raw and
auxiliary materials, semi-finished goods, lighting and the like.
Therefore, not only must the capitalists of Department I have certain
quantities of money in hand to satisfy their needs as consumers, but the
capitalists of Department II must also have money to meet the
requirements of their constant capital. The exchange of 1,000_s_ I (the
surplus value of Department I contained in the means of production)
against goods is thus effected by money which is advanced partly by the
capitalists of Department I in order to satisfy their needs as
consumers, and partly by the capitalists of Department II in order to
satisfy their needs as producers.⁽²⁾ Both lots of capitalists may each
advance 500 units of the money necessary for the exchange, or possibly
the two departments will contribute in different proportions. At any
rate, two things, are certain:

a.  the money set aside for the purpose by ..both departments must
    suffice to effect the exchange between I(1,000_s_) and II(1,000_c_);
b.  whatever the distribution of this money, between the two departments
    may have been, the exchange transaction completed, each department
    of capitalist production must again possess the same amount of money
    it had earlier put into circulation.

This latter maxim applies quite generally to social circulation as a
whole: once the process of circulation is concluded, money will always
have returned to its point of origin. Thus all capitalists, after
universal exchange, have achieved a twofold result: first they have
exchanged products which, in their natural form, were of no use to them,
against other products which, in their natural form, the capitalists
require either as means of production or for their own consumption.
Secondly, they have regained, possession of the money which they set in
circulation so as to effect these acts of exchange.

This phenomenon is unintelligible from the point of view of simple
commodity circulation, where commodity and money continually change
places possession of the commodity excluding the possession of money, as
money constantly usurps the place which the commodity, has given up, and
_vice versa_. Indeed, this is perfectly true with regard to every
individual act of commodity exchange which is the form of social
circulation. Yet this social circulation itself is more than mere
exchange of commodities: it is the circulation of capital. It is,
however, an essential and characteristic feature of this kind of
circulation, that it does not only return to the capitalist the value,
of his original capital plus an increase the surplus value, but that it
also assists social reproduction by providing the means of production
and labour power in the natural form of productive capital, and by
ensuring the, maintenance of those who do not work. Possessing both the
means of production and the money needed, the capitalists start the
total social process of circulation as soon a the social capital has
completed its circuit, everything is again in their hands, apportioned
to each department according to the investments made by it. The workers
have only temporary possession of money during which time they convert
the variable capital from its money form into its natural form. The
variable capital in the capitalists hands is nothing but the outward
shape of part of their capital, and for this reason it must always
revert to them.

So far, we have only considered circulation as it takes place between
the two large departments of production. Yet 4,000 units of the first
Departments produce remain there in the form of means of production to
renew its constant capital of 4,000_c_. Moreover 500 of the consumer
goods produced in Department II [corresponding to the surplus value
II(500_s_)] also remain in this department in the form of consumer goods
for the capitalist class. Since in both departments the mode of
production is capitalistic, that is unplanned, private production, each
department can distribute its own products means of production in
Department I and consumer goods in Department II amongst its own
capitalists only by way of commodity exchange, i.e by a large number of
individual sale transactions between capitalists of the same department.
Therefore the capitalists of both departments must have a reserve of
money with which to perform these exchange transactions to renew both
the means of production in Department I and the consumer goods for the
capitalist class in Department II. This part of circulation does not
present any features of specific interest, as it is merely simple
commodity circulation. Vendor and purchaser alike belong to the same
category of agents of production, and circulation is concerned only with
money and commodity changing hands within the same class and department.
All the same, the money needed for this circulation must from the outset
be in the hands of the capitalist class: it is part of their capital.

So far, the circulation of total social capital presents no
peculiarities, even if we consider the circulation of money. From the
very outset it is self-evident that society must possess a certain
quantity of money to make this circulation possible, and this for two
reasons: first, the general form of capitalist production is that of
commodity production which implies the circulation of money; secondly,
the circulation of capital is based upon the continuous alternation of
the three forms of capital: money capital, productive capital, and
commodity capital. And as it is this very money, finally, which operates
as capital our diagram referring to capitalist production exclusively
the capitalist class must have possession of this money, as it has
possession of every other form of capital; it throws it into circulation
in order to regain possession as soon as the process of circulation has
been completed.

At first glance, only one detail might strike us: if the capitalist
themselves have set in motion all the money which circulates in society,
they must also advance the money needed for the realisation of their own
surplus value. Thus it seems that the capitalists as a class ought to
buy their own surplus value with their own money. As the capitalist
class has possession of this money resulting from previous periods of
production, even prior to the realisation of the product of each working
period, the appropriation of surplus value at first sight does not seem
to be based upon the unpaid labour of the wage labourer as it in fact is
but merely the result of an exchange of commodities against an
equivalent quantity of money both supplied by the capitalist class
itself. A little reflection, however, dispels this illusion. After the
general completion of circulation, the capitalists, now as before,
possess their money funds which either reverted to them or remained in
their hands. Further, they acquired consumer goods for the same amount
which they have consumed. (Note that we are still confining ourselves to
simple reproduction as the, prime condition of our diagram of
reproduction: the renewal of production on the old scale and the use of
all surplus value produced for the personal consumption of the
capitalist class.)

Moreover, the illusion vanishes completely if we do not confine
ourselves to one period of production but observe a number of successive
periods in their mutual interconnections. The value the capitalist puts
into circulation to-day in the form of money for the purpose of
realising his own surplus value, is in fact nothing but his surplus
value resulting from the preceding period of production in form of
money. The capitalist must advance money out of his own pocket in order
to buy his goods for consumption. On the one hand, the surplus value
which he produces each year either exists in a natural-form which
renders it unfit for consumption, or, if it takes a consumable form, it
is temporarily in the hands of another person. On the other hand, he
(the capitalist) has regained possession of the money, and he is now
making his advances by realising his surplus value from the preceding
period. As soon as he has realised his new surplus value, which is still
embodied in the commodity form, this money will return to him.
Consequently, in the course of several periods of production, the
capitalist class draws its consumer goods from the pool, as well as the
other natural forms of its capital. The quantity of money originally in
its possession, however, remains unaffected by this process.

Investigation of the circulation of money in society shows that the
individual capitalist can never invest the whole of his money capital in
production but must always keep a certain money reserve to be employed
as variable capital, i.e as wages. Further, he must keep a capital
reserve for the purchase of means of production at any given period, and
in addition, he must have a cash reserve for his personal consumption.

The process of reproducing the total social capital thus entails the
necessity of producing and reproducing the substance of money. Money is
also capital, for Marxs diagram which we have discussed before,
conceives of no other than capitalist production. Thus the diagram seems
incomplete. We ought to add a further department, that of production of
the means of exchange, to the other two large departments of social
production [those of means of production (I) and of consumer goods
(II)]. It is, indeed, a characteristic feature of this third department
that it serves neither the purposes of production nor those of
consumption, merely representing social labour in an undifferentiated
commodity that cannot be used. Though money and its production, like the
exchange and production of commodities, are much older than the
capitalist mode of production, it was only the latter which made the
circulation of money a general form of social circulation, and thus the
essential element of the social reproductive process. We can only obtain
a comprehensive diagram of the essential points of capitalist production
if we demonstrate the original relationship between the production and
reproduction of money and the two other departments of social
production.

Here, however, we deviate from Marx. He included the production of gold
(we have reduced the total production of money to the production of gold
for the sake of simplicity) in the first department of social
production.

The production of gold, like that of metals generally, belongs to
department 1, which occupies itself with means of production.⁽³⁾

This is correct only in so far as the production of gold is the
production of metal for industrial purposes (jewellery, dental toppings,
etc.). But gold in its capacity as money is not a metal but rather an
embodiment of social labour _in abstracto_. Thus it is no more a means
of production than it is a consumer good. Besides, a mere glance at the
diagram of reproduction itself shows what inconsistencies must result
from confusing means of exchange with means of production. If we add a
diagrammatic representation of the annual production of gold as the
substance of money to the two departments of social production, we get
the following three sets of figures:

  -------------------------------------------------------------------------
    I. 4,000_c_ +  1,000_v_ + 1,000_s_ = 6,000 means of production
   II. 2,000_c_ +    500_v_ +    500_s_ = 3,000 means of subsistence
  III.      20_c_ +        5_v_ +        5_s_ =      30 means of exchange

  -------------------------------------------------------------------------

This quantity of value of 30, chosen by Marx as an example, obviously
does, not represent the quantity of money which circulates annually in
society; it only stands for that part which is annually reproduced, the
annual wear, and tear of the money substance which, on the average,
remains constant so long as social reproduction remains on the same
level. The turnover of capital goes on in a regular manner and
the,realisation of commodities proceed sat an equal pace. If we consider
the third line as an integral part of the first one, as Marx wants us to
do, the following difficulty arises: the constant capital of the third
department consists of real and concrete means of production, premises,
tools, auxiliary materials, vessels, and the like, just as it does in
the two other departments. Its product, however, the 30_g_ which
represent money, cannot operate in its natural formulas constant capital
in any process of production. If we therefore include this 30_g_ as an
essential part of the product of Department I (6,000 means of
production) the means of production will show a social deficit of this
size which will prevent Departments I and II from resuming their
reproduction on the old scale. According to the previous assumption
which forms the foundation of Marxs whole diagram reproduction as a
whole starts from the product of each department in its actual useform.
The proportions of the diagram are based upon this assumption; without
it, they dissolve in chaos. Thus the first fundamental relation of value
is based upon the equation: I(6,000) equals I(4,000) + II(2,000). This
cannot apply to the product III(30_g_), since neither department can use
gold as a means of production [say, in the proportion of
I(20_c_) + II(10_c_)]. The second fundamental relation derived from this
is based upon the equation I(1,000_v_) + I(1,000_s_) = II(2,000). This
would mean, with regard to the production of gold, that as many consumer
goods are taken from Department II as there are means of production
supplied to it. But this is equally untrue. Though the production of
gold removes concrete means of production from the total social product
and uses them as its constant capital, though it takes concrete consumer
goods for the use of its workers and capitalists, corresponding to its
variable capital and surplus value, the product it supplies yet cannot
operate in any branch of production as a means of production, nor is it
a consumer good, fit for human consumption. To include the production of
money in the activities of Department I, therefore, is to run counter to
all the general proportions which express the relations of value in
Marxs diagram, and to diminish the diagrams validity.

The attempt by Marx to find room for the production of gold within
Department I (means of production) moreover leads to dubious results.
The first act of circulation between this new sub-Department (called by
Marx I_g_) and Department II (consumer goods) consists as usual in the
workers purchase of consumer goods from Department II with the money
obtained as wages from the capitalists. This money is not yet a product
of the new period of production. It has been reserved by the capitalists
of Department I_g_ out of the money contained in their product of an
earlier period. This, indeed, is the normal procedure. But now Marx
allows the capitalists of Department II to buy gold from I_g_ with the
money they have reserved, gold as a commodity material to the value of
2. This is a leap from the production of money into the industrial
production of gold which is no more to do with the problem of the
production of money than with the production of boot-polish. Yet out of
the 5 I_g_ _v_ that have been reserved, 3 still remain, and as the
capitalist, unable to use them as constant capital, does not know what
to do with them, Marx arranges for him to add them on to his own reserve
of money. Marx further finds the following way out to avoid a deficit in
the constant capital of II which must be exchanged completely against
the means of production (I_v_ + I_s_):

Therefore, this money must be entirely transferred from lie to us, no
matter whether it exists in necessities of life or articles of luxury,
and vice versa, a corresponding value of commodities must be transferred
from II_s_ to II_c_. Result: A portion of the surplus-value is
accumulated as a hoard of money.⁽⁴⁾

A strange result, in all conscience! We have achieved an increase in
money, a surplus of the money substance, by simply confining ourselves
to the annual wear and tear of the money find. This surplus value comes
into existence, for some unknown reason, at the expense of the
capitalists in the consumer goods department. They practise abstinence,
not because they may want to expand their production of surplus value,
let us say, but in order to secure a sufficient quantity of consumer
goods for the workers engaged in the production of gold.

The capitalists of Department II, however, get poor reward for this
Christian virtue. In spite of their abstinence, they are not only unable
to expand their reproduction, but they are no longer even in the
position to resume their production on its former scale. Even if the
corresponding commodity value is transferred from II_g_ to II_c_, it is
not only the value but its actual and concrete fort) which matters. As
the new part of the product of I now consists of money which cannot be
used as a means of production, Department II, in spite of its
abstinence, cannot renew its constant material capital on the old scale.
As our diagram presupposes simple reproduction, its conditions are thus
violated in two directions: surplus value is being hoarded, and the
constant capital shows a deficit. Marxs own results, then, prove that
the production of gold cannot possibly find a place in either of the two
departments of his diagram; the whole diagram is upset as soon as the
first act of exchange between Departments I and II has been completed.
As Engels remarks, in his footnote, the analysis of the exchange of
newly produced gold within the constant capital of Department I is not
contained in the MS.⁽⁵⁾ Besides, the inconsistency would then only have
been greater. The point of view we advocate is confirmed by Marx himself
when he gives an exhaustive answer to the question, as striking as it is
brief: Money in itself is not an element of actual reproduction.⁽⁶⁾

There is another important reason why we should put the production of
money in a third and separate department of social production as a
whole: Marxs diagram of simple reproduction is valid as the
starting-point and foundation of the reproductive process not only for
capitalism but also, mutatis mutaudis, for every regulated and planned
economic order, for instance a socialist one. However, the production of
money, just like the commodity-form of the products, becomes obsolete
when private ownership of the means of production is abolished. It
constitutes the illegitimate liabilities, the _faux frais_ of the
anarchic economy under capitalism, a peculiar burden for a society based
upon private enterprise, which implies the annual expenditure of a
considerable amount of labour on the manufacture of products which are
neither means of production nor yet consumer goods. This peculiar
expenditure of labour by a society producing under capitalism will
vanish in a socially planned economy. It is most adequately demonstrated
by means of a separate department within the process of reproducing
social capital. It is quite immaterial in this connection whether we
picture a country which produces its own gold or a country which imports
gold from abroad. The same expenditure of social labour which in the
first case is necessary for the direct production of gold, is required
in the second case to effect the exchange transactions.

These observations show that the problem of the reproduction of total
capital is not so crude as it often appears to those who approach it
merely from the point of view of crises. The central problem might be
formulated as follows: how is it possible that, in an unplanned economy,
the aggregate production of innumerable individual capitalists can
satisfy all the needs of society? One answer that suggests itself points
to the continual fluctuations in the level of production in accordance
with the fluctuating demand, i.e the periodical changes in the market.
This point of view, which regards the aggregate product of society as an
undifferentiated mass of commodities, and treats social demand in an
equally absurd way, overlooks the most important element, the
_differentia specifica_ of the capitalist mode of production. We have
seen that the problem of capitalist reproduction contains quite a number
of precisely defined relations referring to specific capitalist
categories and also, _mutatis mutandis_, to the general categories of
human labour., The real problem consists in their inherent tendencies
towards both confilet and harmony. Marxs diagram is the scientific
formulation of the problem.

Inquiry must now be made into the implications of this diagram analytic
of the process of production. Has it any real bearing on the problems of
actual life? According to the diagram, circulation absorbs the entire
social product; all consumers needs are satisfied, and reproduction
takes place without friction; The circulation of money succeeds the
circulation of commodities, completing the cycle of social capital. But
what is the position in real life? The relations outlined in the diagram
lay down a precise first principle for the division of social labour in
a planned production always providing a system of simple reproduction,
i.e no changes in the volume of production. But no such planned
organisation of the total process exists in a capitalist economy, and
things do not run smoothly, along a mathematical formula, as suggested
by the diagram. On the contrary, the course of reproduction shows
continual deviations from :the proportions of the diagram which become
manifest _(a)_ in the fluctuations of prices from day to day; _(b)_ in
the continual fluctuations of profits; _(c)_ in the ceaseless flow of
capital from one branch of production to another, and finally in the
periodical and cyclical swings of reproduction between overproduction
and crisis.

And yet, apart from all these deviations, the diagram presents a
socially necessary average level in which all these movements must
centre, to which they are always striving to return, once they have left
it. That is why the fluctuating movements of the individual capitalists
do not degenerate into chaos but are: reduced to a certain order which
ensures the prolonged existence of society in spite of its lack of a
plan.

In comparison, the similarities and the profound discrepancies between
Marks diagram of reproduction and Quesnays TABLEAU ÉCONOMIQUE strike us
at once. These two diagrams, the beginning and end of the period of
classical economics, are the only attempts to describe an apparent chaos
in precise terms, a chaos created by the interrelated movements of
capitalist production and consumption, and by the disparity of
innumerable private producers and consumers. Both writers reduce this
chaotic jumble of individual capitals to a few broadly conceived rules
which serve, as it were, as moorings for the development of capitalist
society, in spite of its chaos. They both achieve a synthesis between
the two aspects which are the basis of the whole movement of social
capital: that circulation is at one and the same time a capitalist
process of producing and appropriating surplus value, and also a social
process of producing and consuming material goods necessary to civilised
human existence. Both show the circulation of commodities to act as a
mediator for the social process as a whole, and both conceive of the
circulation of money as a subsidiary phenomenon, an external and
superficial expression of the various stages within the circulation of
commodities.

It is socially necessary labour which creates value. This inspired
fundamental law of Marxs theory of value which provided the solution of
the money problem, amongst others, further led him first to distinguish
and then to integrate those two aspects in the total reproductive
process: the aspect of value and that of actual material connections.
Secondly, Marxs diagram is based upon the precise distinction between
constant and variable capital which alone reveals the internal
mechanisms of the production of surplus value and brings it, as a
value-relationship, into precise relation with the two material
categories of production: that of producer and consumer goods.

After Quesnay, some classical economists, Adam Smith and Ricardo in
particular, came fairly close to this point of view. Ricardos
contribution, his precise elaboration of the theory of value, has even
been frequently confused with that of Marx. On the basis of his own
theory of value, Ricardo saw that Smiths method of resolving the price
of all commodities into _v_ + _s_ a theory which wrought so much havoc
in the analysis of reproduction is wrong; but he was not much interested
in Smiths mistake, nor indeed very enthusiastic about the problem of
reproduction as a whole. His analysis, in fact, represents a certain
decline after that of Adam Smith, just as Smith had partly retrogressed
as against the Physiocrats. If Ricardo expounded the fundamental value
categories of bourgeois economy wages, surplus value and capital much
more precisely and consistently than his predecessors, he also treated
them more rigidly. Adam Smith had, shown infinitely more understanding
for the living connections, the broad movements of the whole. In
consequence he did not mind giving two, or, as in the case of the
problem of value, even three or four different answers to the same
question. Though he contradicts himself quite cheerfully in the various
parts of his analysis, these very contradictions are ever stimulating
him to renewed effort, they make him approach the problem as a whole
from an ever different point of view, and so to grasp its dynamics.
Ultimately, it was the limitation of their bourgeois mentalities which
doomed d both. Smith and Ricardo to failure. A proper understanding of
the fundamental categories of capitalist production, of value and
surplus value as living dynamics of the social process demands the
understanding of this process in its historical development and of the
categories themselves as historically conditioned forms of the general
relations of labour. This means that only a socialist can really solve
the problem of the reproduction of capital. Between the TABLEAU
ÉCONOMIQUE and the diagram of reproduction in the second volume of
CAPITAL there lies the prosperity and decline of bourgeois economics,
both in time and in substance.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾ In his seventh note to the TABLEAU ÉCONOMIQUE, following up his
arguments against the mercantilist theory of money as identical with
wealth, Quesnay says: The bulk of money in a nation cannot increase
unless this reproduction itself increases; otherwise, an increase in the
bulk of money would inevitably be prejudicial to the annual production
of wealth ... Therefore we must not judge the opulence of states on the
basis of a greater or smaller quantity of money: thus a stock of money,
equal to the income of the landowners, is deemed much more than enough
for an agricultural nation where the circulation proceeds in a regular
manner, and where commerce takes place in confidence and full liberty
(ANALYSE DU TABLEAU ÉCONOMIQUE, ed. Oncken, pp.324-5).

⁽²⁾ Marx (CAPITAL, Vol.2, p.482) takes the money spent directly by the
capitalists of Department II as the starting point of this act of
exchange. As Engels rightly says in his footnote, this does not affect
the final result of circulation, but the assumption is not the correct
condition of circulation within society. Marx himself has given a better
exposition in CAPITAL, Vol.2, pp. 461-2.

⁽³⁾IBID., p.548.

⁽⁴⁾IBID., p.550.

⁽⁵⁾IBID., p.551.

⁽⁶⁾IBID., p.572.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 11.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section One The Problem of Reproduction



CHAPTER 6 ENLARGED REPRODUCTION


 

THE shortcomings of the diagram of simple reproduction are obvious: it
explains the laws of a form of reproduction which is possible only as an
occasional exception in a capitalist economy. It is not simple but
enlarged reproduction which is the rule in every capitalist economic
system, even more so than in any other.⁽¹⁾

Nevertheless, this diagram is of real scientific importance in two
respects. In practice, even under conditions of enlarged reproduction,
the greater part of the social product can be looked on as simple
reproduction, which forms the broad basis upon which production in every
case expands beyond its former limits. In theory, the analysis of simple
reproduction also provides the necessary starting point for all
scientific exposition of enlarged reproduction. The diagram of simple
reproduction of the aggregate social capital therefore inevitably
introduces the further problem of the enlarged reproduction of the total
capital.

We already know the historical peculiarity of enlarged reproduction on a
capitalist basis. It must represent itself as accumulation of capital,
which is both its specific form and its specific condition. That is to
say, social production as a whole which on a capitalist basis is the
production of surplus value can in every case be expanded only in so far
as the social capital that has been previously active is now augmented
by surplus value of its own creation. This use of part of the surplus
value (and in particular the use of an increasing part of it) for the
purpose of production instead of personal consumption by the capitalist
class, or else the increase of reserves, is the basis of enlarged
reproduction under capitalist conditions of production.

The characteristic feature of enlarged reproduction of the aggregate
social capital just as in our previous assumption of simple reproduction
is the reproduction of individual capitals, since production as a whole,
whether regarded as simple or as enlarged production, can in fact only
occur in the form of innumerable independent movements of reproduction
performed by private individual capitals.

The first comprehensive analysis of the accumulation of individual
capitals is given in volume i of Marxs CAPITAL, section 7, chapters 22,
23. Here Marx treats of _(a)_ the division of the surplus value into
capital and revenue; _(b)_ the circumstances which determine the
accumulation of capital apart from this division, such as the degree of
exploitation of labour power and labour productivity; _(c)_ the growth
of fixed capital relative to the circulating capital as a factor of
accumulation; and _(d)_ the increasing development of an industrial
reserve army which is at the same time both a consequence and a
prerequisite of the process of accumulation. In the course of this
discussion, Marx deals with two inspired notions of bourgeois economists
with regard to accumulation: the theory of abstinence as held by the
more vulgar economists, who proclaim that the division of surplus value
into capital, and thus accumulation itself, is an ethical and heroic act
of the capitalists; and the fallacy of the classical economists, their
doctrine that the entire capitalised part of the surplus value is used
solely for consumption by the productive workers, that is to say spent
altogether on wages for the workers employed year by year. This
erroneous assumption, which completely overlooks the fact that every
increase of production must manifest itself not only in the increased
number of employed workers but also in the increase of the material
means of production (premises, tools, and, certainly, raw materials) is
obviously rooted in that dogma of Adam Smith which we have already
discussed. Moreover, the assumption that the expenditure of a greater
amount of capital on wages is sufficient to expand production, also
results from the mistaken idea that the prices of all commodities are
completely resolved into wages and surplus value, so that the constant
capital is disregarded altogether. Strangely enough, even Ricardo who
was, at any rate occasionally, aware of this element of error in Smiths
doctrine, subscribes most emphatically to its ultimate inferences,
mistaken though they were:

It must be understood, that all the productions of a country are
consumed; but it makes the greatest difference imaginable whether they
are consumed by those who reproduce, or by those who do not reproduce
another value. When we say that revenue is saved, and added to capital,
what we mean is, that the portion of revenue, so said to be added to
capital, is consumed by productive, instead of unproductive
labourers.⁽²⁾

If all the goods produced are thus swallowed up by human consumption,
there can clearly be no room to spare in the total social product for
such unconsumable means of production as tools and machinery, new
materials and buildings, and consequently enlarged reproduction, too,
will have to take a peculiar course. What happens according to this odd
conception is simply that staple foodstuffs for new workers will be
produced to the amount of the capitalised part of surplus value instead
of the choice delicacies previously provided for the capitalist class.
The classical theory of enlarged reproduction does not admit of any
variations other than those connected with the production of consumer
goods. After our previous observations it is not surprising that Marx
could easily dispose of this elementary mistake of both Ricardo and
Smith. Just as simple reproduction requires a regulated renewal of the
constant capital, the material means of production, quite apart from the
production of consumer goods in the necessary quantity for labourer and
capitalist, equally so in the case of expanding production must part of
the new additional capital be used to enlarge the constant capital, that
is to add to the material means of production. Another law, Marx
discovered, must also be applied here. The constant capital, continually
overlooked by the classical economists, increases relative to the
variable capital that is spent on wages. This is merely the capitalist
expression of the general effects of increasing labour productivity.
With, technical progress, human labour is able to set in motion ever
larger masses of means of production and to convert them into goods. In
capitalist terms, this means a progressive decrease in expenses for
living labour, in wages, relative to the expenses for inanimate means of
production. Contrary to the assumption of Adam Smith and Ricardo,
enlarged reproduction must not only start with the division of the
capitalised part of the surplus value into constant and variable
capital, but, as the technique of production advances, it is bound to
allocate in this division ever increasing portions to the constant, and
ever diminishing portions to the variable capital. This continuous
qualitative change in the composition of capital is the specific
manifestation of the accumulation of capital, that is to say of enlarged
reproduction on the basis of capitalism.⁽³⁾

The other side of this picture of continual changes in the relation
between the portions of constant and variable capital is the formation
of a relative surplus population, as Marx called it, that is to say that
part of the working population which exceeds the average needs of
capital, and thus becomes redundant. This reserve of unemployable
industrial labour (taken here in a broader sense, and including a
proletariat that is dominated by merchant capital) is always present. It
forms a necessary prerequisite of the sudden expansion of production in
times of boom, and is another specific condition of capitalist
accumulation.⁽⁴⁾

From the accumulation of individual capitals we can therefore deduce the
following four characteristic phenomena of enlarged reproduction:

1.  The volume of enlarged reproduction is independent, within certain
    limits, of the growth of capital, and can transcend it. The
    necessary methods for achieving this are: increased exploitation of
    labour and natural forces, and increased labour productivity
    (including increased efficiency of the fixed capital).
2.  All real accumulation starts with that part of the surplus value
    which is intended for capitalisation being divided into constant and
    variable capital.
3.  Accumulation as a social process is accompanied by continuous
    changes in the relation between constant and variable capital,
    whereby that portion of capital which is invested in inanimate means
    of production continually increases as compared with that expended
    on wages.
4.  Concomitant with the accumulative process, and as a condition of the
    latter, there develops an industrial reserve army.

These characteristics, derived from the reproductive process as it is
performed by the individual capitals, represent an enormous step forward
as compared with the analyses of bourgeois economists. Now, however, our
problem is to demonstrate the accumulation of the aggregate capital
which originates from these movements of individual capitals, and on the
basis of the diagram of simple reproduction to establish the precise
relations between the aspects of value prevalent in the production of
surplus value and the material considerations in the production of
consumer and producer goods, with a view to accumulation.

The essential difference between enlarged reproduction and simple
reproduction consists in the fact that in the latter the capitalist
class and its hangers-on consume the entire surplus value, whereas in
the former a part of the surplus value is set aside from the personal
consumption of its owners, not for the purpose of hoarding, but in order
to increase the active capital, i.e. for capitalisation. To make this
possible, the new additional capital must also find the material
prerequisites for its activity forthcoming. Here the concrete
composition of the aggregate social product becomes important. Marx says
already in volume i, when he considers the accumulation of individual
capitals:

The annual production must in the first place furnish all those objects
(use-values) from which the material components of capital, used up in
the course of the year, have to be replaced. Deducting these there
remains the net or surplus-products in which the surplus value lies. And
of what does this surplus product consist? Only of things destined to
satisfy the wants and desires of the capitalist class, things which,
consequently, enter into the consumption fund of the capitalists? Were
that the case, the cup of surplus-value would be drained to the very
dregs, and nothing but simple reproduction would ever take place. To
accumulate it is necessary to convert a portion of the surplus product
into capital. But we cannot, except, by a miracle, convert into capital
anything but such articles as can be employed in the labour-process
(i.e. means of production), and such further articles as are suitable
for the sustenance of the labourer, (i.e. means of subsistence).
Consequently, a part of the annual surplus-labour must have been applied
to the production of additional means of production and subsistence,
over and above the quantity of these things required to replace the
capital advanced. In one word, surplus-value is convertible into capital
solely because the surplus-product, whose value it is, already comprises
the material elements of new capital.⁽⁵⁾

Additional means of production, however, and additional consumer goods
for the workers alone are not sufficient; to get enlarged reproduction
really going, additional labour is also required. Marx now finds a
specific difficulty in this last condition:

For this the mechanism of capitalist production provides beforehand, by
converting the working class into a class dependent on wages, a class
whose ordinary wages suffice, not only for its maintenance, but for its
increase. It is only necessary for capital to incorporate this
additional labour-power, annually supplied by the working class in the
shape of labourers of all ages, with the surplus means of production
comprised in the annual produce, and the conversion of surplus-value
into capital is complete.⁽⁶⁾

This is the first solution which Marx gave to the problem of the
accumulation of the aggregate capital. Having dwelt on this aspect of
the question already in volume i of CAPITAL, Marx returns to the problem
at the end of the second volume of his main work whose concluding 21st
chapter is devoted to accumulation and enlarged reproduction of the
aggregate capital.

Let us examine Marxs diagrammatic exposition of accumulation more
closely. On the model of the diagram of simple reproduction with which
we are already familiar, he devised a diagram for enlarged reproduction,
the difference appearing most clearly if we compare the two.

Assuming that society's annual aggregate product can be represented by
an amount to the value of 9,000 (denoting millions of working hours, or,
in capitalist monetary terms, any arbitrary amount of money), the
aggregate product is to be distributed as follows:

  -----------------------------------------------
  I. 4,000_c_ + 1,000_v_ + 1,000_s_ = 6,000 
  II. 2,000_c_ +    500_v_ +    500_s_ = 3,000 
  Total:  9,000 

  -----------------------------------------------

Department I represents means of production, Department II consumer
goods. One glance at the proportion of the figures shows that in this
case simple reproduction alone is possible. The means of production made
in Department I equal the total of the means of production actually used
by the two departments. If these are merely renewed, production can be
repeated only on its previous scale. On the other hand, the aggregate
product of Department II equals the total of wages and surplus value in
both departments. This shows that the consumer goods available permit
only the employment of just as many workers as were previously employed,
and that the entire surplus value is similarly spent on consumer goods,
i.e. the personal consumption of the capitalist class.

Now let us take the same aggregate product of 9,000 in the following
equation:

  -----------------------------------------------
  I. 4,000_c_ + 1,000_v_ + 1,000_s_ = 6,000 
  II. 1,500_c_ +    750_v_ +    750_s_ = 3,000 
  Total:  9,000 

  -----------------------------------------------

Here a double disproportion confronts us: 6,000 means of production are
created more than those which are actually used by the society, i.e.
4,000_c_ + 1,500_c_; leaving a surplus of 500. Similarly, less consumer
goods (3,000) are produced than the sum of what is paid out in wages
(i.e. 1,000_v_ + 750_v_, the requirement of the workers), plus the
aggregate of surplus value that has been produced (1,000_s_ + 750_s_).
This results in a deficit of 500. Since our premises do not allow us to
decrease the number of workers employed the consequence must be that the
capitalist class cannot consume the entire surplus value it has
pocketed. This proves fully consistent with the two material
preconditions of enlarged reproduction on a capitalist basis: part of
the appropriated surplus value is not to be consumed but is used for the
purposes of production; and more means of production must be produced so
as to ensure the use of the capitalised surplus value for the actual
expansion of reproduction.

In considering the diagram of simple reproduction, we saw that its
fundamental social conditions are contained in the following equation:
the aggregate of means of production (the product of Department I) must
be equivalent to the constant capital of both departments, but the
aggregate of consumer goods (the product of Department II) must equal
the sum of variable capitals _and_ surplus values of the two
departments. As regards enlarged reproduction, we must now infer a
precise inverse double ratio. The general precondition of enlarged
reproduction is that the product of Department I must be greater in
value than the constant capital of both departments taken together, and
that of Department II must be so much less than the sum total of both
the variable capital and the surplus value in the two departments.

This, however, by no means completes the analysis of enlarged
reproduction; rather has it led us merely to the threshold of the
question. Having deduced the proportions of the diagram, we must now
pursue their further activities, the flow of circulation and the
continuity of reproduction. Just as simple reproduction may be compared
to an unchanging circle, to be repeated time and again, so enlarged
reproduction, to quote Sismondi, is comparable to a spiral with ever
expanding loops. Let us begin by examining the loops of this spiral. The
first general question arising in this connection is how actual
accumulation proceeds in the two departments under the conditions now
known to us, i.e. how the capitalists may capitalise part of their
surplus value, and at the same time acquire the material prerequisites
necessary for enlarged reproduction.

Marx expounds the question in the following way:

Let us assume that half the surplus value of Department I is being
accumulated. The capitalists, then, use 500 for their consumption but
augment their capital by another 500. In order to become active, this
additional capital of 500 must be divided, as we now know, into constant
and variable capital. Assuming the ratio of 4 to 1 remains what it was
for the original capital, the capitalists of Department I will divide
their additional capital of 500 thus: they will buy new means of
production for 400 and new labour for 100. This does not present any
difficulties, since we know that Department I has already produced a
surplus of 500 means of production. Yet the corresponding enlargement of
the variable capital by 100 units of money is not enough, since the new
additional labour power must also find adequate consumer goods which can
only be supplied by Department II. Now the circulation between the two
large departments is shifting. Formerly, under conditions of simple
reproduction, Department I acquired 1,000 consumer goods for its own
workers, and now it must find another 100 for its new workers.
Department I therefore engages in enlarged reproduction as follows:

  ---------------------
  4,400_c_ + 1,100_v_
  ---------------------

Department II, in turn, after selling these consumer goods to the value
of 100, is now in a position to acquire additional means of production
to the same amount from Department I. And in fact, Department I still
has precisely one hundred of its surplus product left over which now
find their way into Department II, enabling the latter to expand its own
reproduction as well. Yet here, too, the additional means of production
alone are not much use; to make them operate, additional labour power is
needed. Assuming again that the previous composition of capital has been
maintained, with a ratio of 2 to 1 as regards constant and variable
capital, additional labour to the tune of 50 is required to work the
additional 100 means of production. This additional labour, however,
needs additional consumer goods to the amount of its wage, which are in
fact supplied by Department II itself. This department must therefore
produce, in addition to the 100 additional consumer goods for the new
workers of Department I and the goods for the consumption of its own
workers, a further amount of consumer goods to the tune of 50 as part of
its aggregate product. Department II therefore starts on enlarged
reproduction at a rate of 1,600_c_ + 800_v_.

Now the aggregate product of Department I (6,000) has been absorbed
completely. 5,500 were necessary for renewing the old and used-up means
of production in both departments, and the remaining 500 for the
expansion of production: 400 in Department I and 100 in Department II.
As regards the aggregate product of Department II (3,000), 1,900 have
been used for the increased labour force in the two departments, and the
1,100 consumer goods which remain serve the capitalists for their
personal consumption, the consumption of their surplus value. 500 are
consumed in Department I, and 600 in Department II where, out of a
surplus value of 700, only 150 had been capitalised (100 being expended
on means of production and 50 on wages).

Enlarged reproduction can now proceed on its course. If we maintain our
rate of exploitation at 100 per cent, as in the case of the original
capital, the next period will give the following results:

  -----------------------------------------------
  I. 4,400_c_ + 1,100_v_ + 1,100_s_ = 6,600 
  II. 1,600_c_ +    800_v_ +    800_s_ = 3,200 
  Total:  9,800 

  -----------------------------------------------

The aggregate product of society has grown from 9,000 to 9,800, the
surplus value of Department I from 1,000 to 1,100 and of Department II
from 750 to 800. The object of the capitalist expansion of production,
the increased production of surplus value, has been gained. At the same
time, the material composition of the aggregate social product again
shows a surplus of 600 as regards the means of production (6,600) over
and above those which are actually needed (4,400 + 1,600), and also a
deficit in consumer goods as against the sum total made up by the wages
previously paid (1,100_v_ + 800_v_) and the surplus value that has been
created (1,100_s_ + 800_s_). And thus we again have the material
possibility as well as the necessity to use part of the surplus value,
not for consumption by the capitalist class, but for a new expansion of
production.

The second enlargement of production, and increased production of
surplus value, thus follows from the first as a matter of course and
with mathematical precision. The accumulation of capital, once it has
started, automatically leads farther and farther beyond itself. The
circle has become a spiral which winds itself higher and higher as if
compelled by a natural law in the guise of mathematical terms. Assuming
that in the following years there is always capitalisation of half the
surplus value, while the composition of the capital and the rate of
exploitation remain unchanged, the reproduction of capital will result
in the following progression:

  --
  --

Thus, after five years of accumulation, the aggregate social product is
found to have grown from 9,000 to 14,348, the social aggregate capital
from (5,500_c_ + 1750_v_ = 7,250) to (8,784_c_ + 2,782_v_ = 11,566) and
the surplus value from (1,000_s_ + 500_s_ = 1,500) to
(1,464_s_ + 1,065_s_ = 2,529), whereby the surplus value for personal
consumption, being 1,500 at the beginning of accumulation, has grown to
732 + 958=1,690 in the last year.⁽⁷⁾ The capitalist class, then, has
capitalised more, it has practised greater abstinence, and yet it has
been able to live better. Society, in a material respect, has become
richer, richer in means of production, richer in consumer goods, and it
has equally become richer in the capitalist sense of the term since it
produces more surplus value. The social product circulates _in toto_ in
society. Partly it serves to enlarge reproduction and partly it serves
consumption. The requirements of capitalist accumulation correspond to
the material composition of the aggregate social product. What Marx said
in volume i of CAPITAL is true: the increased surplus value can be added
on to capital because the social surplus product comes into the world
from the very first in the material form of means of production, in a
form incapable of utilisation except in the productive process. At the
same time reproduction expands in strict conformity with the laws of
circulation: the mutual supply of the two departments of production with
additional means of production and consumer goods proceeds as an
exchange of equivalents. It is an exchange of commodities in the course
of which the very accumulation of one department is the condition of
accumulation in the other and makes this possible. The complicated
problem of accumulation is thus converted into a diagrammatic
progression of surprising simplicity. We may continue the above chain of
equations _ad infinitum_ so long as we observe this simple principle:
that a certain increase in the constant capital of Department I always
necessitates a certain increase in its variable capital, which
predetermines beforehand the extent of the increase in Department II,
with which again a corresponding increase in the variable capital must
be coordinated. Finally, it depends on the extent of increase in the
variable capital in both departments, how much of the total may remain
for personal consumption by the capitalist class. The extent of this
increase will also show that this amount of consumer goods which remains
for private consumption by the capitalist is exactly equivalent to that
part of the surplus value which has not been capitalised in either
department.

There are no limits to the continuation of this diagrammatic development
of accumulation in accordance with the few easy rules we have
demonstrated. But now it is time to take care lest we should only have
achieved these surprisingly smooth results through simply working out
certain fool-proof mathematical exercises in addition and subtraction,
and we must further inquire whether it is not merely because
mathematical equations are easily put on paper that accumulation will
continue _ad infinitum_ without any friction.

In other words: the time has come to look for the concrete social
conditions of accumulation.

 

<< Last Chapter     |     Next Chapter >>

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾ The premise of simple reproduction, that I(_v_ + _s_) is equal to
II_c_, is irreconcilable with capitalist production, although this does
not exclude the possibility that a certain year in an industrial cycle
of ten or eleven years may not show a smaller total production than the
preceding year, so that there would not have been even a simple
reproduction, compared to the preceding year. Indeed, considering the
natural growth of population per year, simple reproduction could take
place only in so far as a correspondingly larger number of unproductive
servants would partake of the 1,500 representing the aggregate
surplus-product. But accumulation of capital, actual capitalist
production, would be impossible under such circumstances (CAPITAL,
vol.ii, p.608).

⁽²⁾ Ricardo, PRINCIPLES, chap.viii, _On Taxes_. MacCullochs edition of
RICARDOS WORKS, p.87, note. (Reference not given in original)

⁽³⁾ The specifically capitalist mode of production, the development of
the productive power of labour corresponding to it, and the change
thence resulting in the organic composition of capital, do not merely
keep pace with the advance of accumulation, or with the growth of social
wealth. They develop at a much quicker rate because mere accumulation,
the absolute increase of the total social capital, is accompanied by the
centralisation of the individual capitals of which that total is made
up; and because the change in the technological composition of the
additional capital goes hand in hand with a similar change in the
technological composition of the original capital. With the advance of
accumulation, therefore, the proportion of constant to variable capital
changes. If it was originally say 1:1, it now becomes successively 2:1,
3:1, 4:1, 5:1, 7:1, etc., so that, as the capital increases, instead of
its total value, only ¹/3, ¹/4, ¹/5, ¹/6, ¹/8, etc., is transformed into
labour-power, and, on the other hand, ²/3, ³/4, ⁴/5, ⁵/6, ⁷/8 into means
of production. Since the demand for labour is determined not by the
amount of capital as a whole, but by its variable constituent alone,
that demand falls progressively with the increase of the total capital,
instead of, as previously assumed, rising in proportion to it. It falls
relatively to the magnitude of the total capital, and at an accelerated
rate, as this magnitude increases. With the growth of the total capital,
its variable constituent or the labour incorporated in it, also does
increase, but in a constantly diminishing proportion. The intermediate
pauses are shortened, in which accumulation works as simple extension of
production, on a given technical basis. It is not merely that an
accelerated accumulation of total capital, accelerated in a constantly
growing progression, is needed to absorb an additional number of
labourers, or even, on account of the constant metamorphosis of old
capital, to keep employed those already functioning. In its turn, this
increasing accumulation and centralisation becomes a source of new
changes in the composition of capital, of a more accelerated diminution
of its variable, as compared with its constant constituent (CAPITAL,
vol.i, pp.642-3).

⁽⁴⁾ The course characteristic of modern industry, viz., a decennial
cycle (interrupted by smaller oscillations), of periods of average
activity, production at high pressure, crisis and stagnation, depends on
the constant formation, the greater or less absorption, and the
re-formation of the industrial reserve army or surplus population. In
their turn, the varying phases of the industrial cycle recruit the
surplus population, and become one of the most energetic agents of its
reproduction (IBID., pp.646-7).

⁽⁵⁾CAPITAL, vol.i, pp.593-4)

⁽⁶⁾IBID., p.594.

⁽⁷⁾OP. CIT., vol.ii, pp.596-601.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 12.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section One The Problem of Reproduction



CHAPTER 7 ANALYSIS OF MARXS DIAGRAM OF ENLARGED REPRODUCTION


 

The first enlargement of reproduction gave the following picture.

  -----------------------------------------------
  I. 4,400_c_ + 1,100_v_ + 1,100_s_ = 6,600 
  II. 1,600_c_ +    800_v_ +    800_s_ = 3,200 
  Total:  9,800 

  -----------------------------------------------

This already clearly expresses the interdependence of the two
departments but it is a dependence of a peculiar kind. Accumulation here
originates in Department I, and Department II merely follows suit. Thus
it is Department I alone that determines the volume of accumulation.
Marx effects accumulation here by allowing Department I to capitalise
one-half of its surplus value; Department II, however, may capitalise
only as much as is necessary to assure the production and accumulation
of Department I. He makes the capitalists of Department II consume
600_s_ as against the consumption of only 500_s_ by the capitalists of
Department I who have appropriated twice the amount of value and far
more surplus value. In the next year, he assumes the capitalists of
Department I again to capitalise half their surplus value, this time
making the capitalists of Department II capitalise more than in the
previous year summarily fixing the amount to tally exactly with the
needs of Department I. 500_s_ now remain for the consumption of the
capitalists of Department I less than the year before surely a rather
queer result of accumulation on any showing. Marx now describes the
process as follows:

Then let Department I continue accumulation at the same ratio, so that
550_s_ are spent as revenue, and 55_s_ accumulated. In that case, 1,100
I_v_ are first replaced by 1,100 I_c_, and 550 I_s_ must be realised in
an equal amount of commodities of II, making a total of 1,650
I(_v + s_). But the constant capital of II, which is to be replaced,
amounts only to 1,600, and the remaining 50 must be made up out of 800
II_s_. Leaving aside the money aspect of the matter, we have as a result
of this transaction:

I. 4,400_c_ + 550_s_ (to be capitalised); furthermore, realised in
commodities of II for the fund for consumption of the capitalists and
labourers of I, 1,650 (_v + s_)
II. 1,650_c_ + 825_v_ + 725_s_.

In Department I, 550_s_ must be capitalised. If the former proportion is
maintained, 440 of this amount form constant capital, and 110 variable
capital. These 110 must be eventually taken out of 725 II_s_, that is to
say, articles of consumption to the value of 110 are consumed by the
labourers of I instead of the capitalists of II, so that the latter are
compelled to capitalise these 110_s_ which they cannot consume. This
leaves 615 II_s_ of the 725 II_s_. But if II thus converts these 110
into additional constant capital, it requires an additional variable
capital of 55. This again must be taken out of its surplus value.
Subtracting this amount from 615 II_s_, we find that only 560 II_s_
remain for the consumption of the capitalists of II, and we obtain the
following values of capital after accomplishing all actual and potential
transfers:

+-----------------------------------------------------------------------+
| I.                                                                    |
| (4,400_c_ + 440_c_) + (1,100_v_ + 110_v_) = 4,840_c_ + 1,210_v_       |
|       = 6,050                                                         |
| II.                                                                   |
| (1,600_c_ + 50_c_ + 110_c_) + 800_v_ + 25_v_ + 55_v_) = 1,760_c_ + 88 |
| 0_v_ = 2,640                                                          |
|                                                                       |
| Total: 8,690⁽¹⁾                                                       |
+-----------------------------------------------------------------------+

This quotation is given at length since it shows very clearly how Marx
here effects accumulation in Department I at the expense of Department
II. In the years that follow, the capitalists of the provisions
department get just as rough a deal. Following the same rules, Marx
allows them in the third year to accumulate 264_s_ a larger amount this
time than in the two preceding years. In the fourth year they are
allowed to capitalise 290_s_ and to consume 678_s_, and in the fifth
year they accumulate 320_s_ and consume 745_s_. Marx even says: If
things are to proceed normally, accumulation in II must take place more
rapidly than in I because that portion of I(_v + s_) which must be
converted into commodities of II_c_, would otherwise grow more rapidly
than II_c_, for which it can alone be exchanged.⁽²⁾

Yet the figures we have quoted fail to show a quicker accumulation in
Department II, and in fact show it to fluctuate. Here the principle
seems to be as follows: Marx enables accumulation to continue by
broadening the basis of production in Department I. Accumulation in
Department II appears only as a condition and consequence of
accumulation in Department I: absorbing, in the first place, the others
surplus means of production and supplying it, secondly, with the
necessary surplus of consumer goods for its additional labour.
Department I retains the initiative all the time, Department II being
merely a passive follower. Thus the capitalists of Department II are
only allowed to accumulate just as much as, and are made to consume no
less than, is needed for the accumulation of Department I. While in
Department I half the surplus value is capitalised every time, and the
other half consumed, so that there is an orderly expansion both of
production and of personal consumption by the capitalists, the twofold
process in Department II takes the following erratic course:

  --
  --

Here there is no rule in evidence for accumulation and consumption to
follow; both are wholly subservient to the requirements of accumulation
in Department I.

Needless to say, the absolute figures of the diagram are arbitrary in
every equation, but that does not detract from their scientific value.
It is the _quantitative ratios_ which are relevant, since they are
supposed to express strictly determinate relationships. Those precise
logical rules that lay down the relations of accumulation in Department
I, seem to have been gained at the cost of any kind of principle in
construing these relations for Department II; and this circumstance
calls for a revision of the immanent connections revealed by the
analysis.

It might, however, be permissible to assume the defect to lie in a
rather unhappy choice of example. Marx himself, with the diagram quoted
above, proceeded forthwith to give a second example in order to
elucidate the movements of accumulation, where the figures of the
equation run in the following order:

  -----------------------------------------------
  I. 5,000_c_ + 1,000_v_ + 1,000_s_ = 7,000 
  II. 1,430_c_ +    285_v_ +    285_s_ = 2,000 
  Total:  9,000 

  -----------------------------------------------

In contrast to the previous example, the capital of both departments is
here seen to have the same composition, i.e. constant and variable
capital are in a ratio of 5 to 1. This already presupposes a
considerable development of capitalist production, and accordingly of
social labour productivity a considerable preliminary expansion of the
scale of production, and finally, a development of all the circumstances
which bring about a relatively redundant surplus population in the
working class. We are no longer introduced to enlarged reproduction, as
in the first example, at the stage of the original transition from
simple to enlarged reproduction the only point of that is in any case
for the sake of abstract theory. This time, we are brought face to face
with the process of accumulation as it goes on at a definite and rather
advanced stage of development. It is perfectly legitimate to assume
these conditions, and they in no way distort the principles we must
employ in order to work out the individual loops of the reproductive
spiral. Here again Marx takes for a starting point the capitalisation of
half the surplus value in Department I.

Now take it that the capitalist class of I consumes one-half of the
surplus-value, or 500, and accumulates the other half. In that case
(1,000_v_ + 500_s_) I, or 1,500, must be converted into 1,500 II_c_.
Since II_c_ amounts to only 1,430, it is necessary to take 70 from the
surplus-value. Subtracting this sum from 285_s_ leaves 215 II_s_. Then
we have:

I. 5,000_c_ + 500_s_ (to be capitalised)  + 1,500(_v_ + _s_) in the fund
set aside for consumption by capitalists and labourers.
II. 1,430_c_ + 70_s_ (to be capitalised) + 285_v_ + 215_s_.

As 70 II_s_ are directly annexed by II_c_, a variable capital of 70:5,
or 14, is required to set this additional constant capital in motion.
These 14 must come out of the 215_s_, so that only 201 remain, and we
have:

II. (1,430 + 70_c_ + (285_v_ + 14_v_) + 201_s_.⁽³⁾

After these preliminary arrangements, capitalisation can now proceed.
This is done as follows:

In Department I the 500_s_ which have been capitalised are divided into
five-sixths (417_c_) + one-sixth (83_v_). These 83_v_ withdraw a
corresponding amount from II_s_ which serves to buy units of constant
capital and thus accrues to II_c_. An increase of II_c_ by 83 involves
the necessity of an increase in II_v_ by 17 (one-fifth of 83). After the
completion of this turnover we therefore have:

  ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------
  I. (5,000_c_ + 417_s_) + (1,000_v_ + 83_s_)_v_ = 5,417_c_ + 1,083_v_ = 6,500 
  II. (1,500_c_ +   83_s_) +    (299_v_ + 17_s_)   = 1,538_c_ +    316_v_ = 1,899 
  Total:  8,399 

  ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------

The capital of Department I has grown from 6,000 to 6,500, i.e. by
one-twelfth; in Department II it has grown from 1,715 to 1,899, i.e. by
just over one-ninth.

At the end of the next year, the results of reproduction on this basis
are:

  -------------------------------------------------
  I. 5,417_c_ + 1,083_v_ + 1,083_s_ =   7,583 
  II. 1,583_c_ +    316_v_ +    316_s_ =   2,215 
  Total:    9,798 

  -------------------------------------------------

If the same ratio is maintained in the continuance of accumulation, the
result at the end of the second year is as follows:

  -------------------------------------------------
  I. 5,869_c_ + 1,173_v_ + 1,173_s_ =   8,215 
  II. 1,715_c_ +    342_v_ +    342_s_ =   2,399 
  Total: 10,614 

  -------------------------------------------------

And at the end of the third year:

  -------------------------------------------------
  I. 6,358_c_ + 1,271_v_ + 1,271_s_ =   8,900 
  II. 1,858_c_ +    371_v_ +    371_s_ =   2,600 
  Total: 11,500 

  -------------------------------------------------

In the course of three years, the total social capital has increased
from I. 6,000 + II. 1,715 = 7,715 to I. 7,629 + II. 2,229 = 9,858, and
the total product from 9,000 to 11,500.

Accumulation in both departments here proceeds uniformly, in marked
difference from the first example. From the second year onwards, both
departments capitalise half their surplus value and consume the other
half. A bad choice of figures in the first example thus seems to be
responsible for its arbitrary appearance. But we must check up to make
sure that it is not only a mathematical manipulation with cleverly
chosen figures which this time ensures the smooth progress of
accumulation.

In the first as well as in the second example, we are continually struck
by a seemingly general rule of accumulation: to make any accumulation
possible, Department II must always enlarge its constant capital by
precisely the amount by which Department I increases _(a)_ the
proportion of surplus value for consumption and _(b)_ its variable
capital. If we take the example of the first year as an illustration,
the constant capital of Department II must be increased by 70. And why?
because this capital was only 1,430 before.

But if the capitalists of Department I wish to accumulate half their
surplus value (1,000) and to consume the other half, they need consumer
goods for themselves and for their workers to the tune of 1,500 units
which they can obtain only from Department II in exchange for their own
products means of production. Since Department II has already satisfied
its own demand for producer goods to the extent of its own constant
capital (1,430), this exchange is only possible if Department II decides
to enlarge its own constant capital by 70. This means that it must
enlarge its own production and it can do so only by capitalising a
corresponding part of its surplus value. If this surplus value amounts
to 285 in Department II, 70 of it must be added to the constant capital.
The first step towards expansion of production in Department II is thus
demonstrated to be at the same time the condition for, and the
consequence of increased consumption by the capitalists of Department I.
But to proceed. Hitherto, the capitalists of Department I could only
spend one-half of their surplus value (500) on personal consumption. To
capitalise the other half, they must redistribute these 500_s_ in such a
way as to maintain at least the previous ratio of composition, i.e. they
must increase the constant capital by 417 and the variable capital by
83. The first operation presents no difficulties: the surplus value of
500 belonging to the capitalists of Department I is contained in a
natural form in their own product, the means of production, and is fit
straightway to enter into the process of production; Department I can
therefore enlarge its constant capital with the appropriate quantity of
its own product. But the remaining 83 can only be used as variable
capital if there is a corresponding quantity of consumer goods for the
newly employed workers. Here it becomes evident for the second time that
accumulation in Department I is dependent upon Department II: Department
I must receive for its workers 83 more consumer goods than before from
Department II. As this is again possible only by way of commodity
exchange, Department I can satisfy its demands only on condition that
Department II is prepared for its part to take up products of Department
I, producer goods, to the tune of 83. Since Department II has no use for
the means of production except to employ them in the process of
production, it becomes not only possible but even necessary that
Department II should increase its own constant capital, by these very 83
which will now be used for capitalisation and are thus again withdrawn
from the consumable surplus value of this department. The increase in
the variable capital of Department I thus entails the second step in the
enlargement of production in Department II. All material prerequisites
of accumulation in Department I are now present and enlarged
reproduction can proceed. Department II, however, has so far made only
two increases in its constant capital. The result of this enlargement is
that if the newly acquired means of production are indeed to be used,
the quantity of labour power must be increased correspondingly.
Maintaining the previous ratio, the new constant capital of requires a
new variable capital of 31. This implies the necessity to capitalise a
corresponding further amount of the surplus value. Thus the fund for the
capitalists personal consumption in Department II comes to be what
remains of the surplus value (285_s_) after deduction of the amounts
used for twice enlarging the constant capital (70 + 83) and a
commensurate increase in the variable capital (31) a fund of 101, after
deducting a total of 184. Similar operations in the second year of
accumulation result for Department II in its surplus value being divided
into 158 for capitalisation and 158 for the consumption of its
capitalists, and in the third year, the figures become 172 and 170
respectively.

We have studied this process so closely, tracing it step by step,
because it shows clearly that the accumulation of Department II is
completely determined and dominated by the accumulation of Department I.
Though this dependence is no longer expressed, as in Marxs first
example, by arbitrary changes in the distribution of the surplus value,
it does not do away with the fact itself; even if now the surplus value
is always neatly halved by each department, one-half for capitalisation
and the other for personal consumption. Though there is nothing to
choose between the capitalists of the two departments as far as the
figures are concerned, it is quite obvious that Department I has taken
the initiative and actively carries out the whole process of
accumulation, while Department II is merely a passive appendage. This
dependence is also expressed in the following precise rule: accumulation
must proceed simultaneously in both departments, and it can do so only
on condition that the provisions-department increases its constant
capital by the precise amount by which the capitalists of the
means-of-production department increase both their variable capital and
their find for personal consumption. This equation (increase
II_c_ = increase I_v_ + increase I_s.c._)⁽⁴⁾ is the mathematical
cornerstone of Marxs diagram of accumulation, no matter what figures we
may choose for its concrete application. But now we must see whether
capitalist accumulation does in actual fact conform to this hard and
fast rule.

Let us first return to simple reproduction. Marxs diagram, it will be
remembered, was as follows:

  -------------------------------------------------------------------
   I. 4,000_c_ + 1,000_v_ + 1,000_s_ = 6,000 means of production
  II. 2,000_c_ +    500_v_ +    500_s_ = 3,000 means of consumption

  -------------------------------------------------------------------

Here, too, we established certain equations which form the foundation of
simple reproduction; they were:

a.  The product of Department I equals in value the sum of the two
    constant capitals in Departments I and II.
b.  The constant capital of Department II equals the sum of variable
    capital and surplus value in Department I a necessary consequence of
    _(a)_.
c.  The product of Department II equals the sum of variable capital and
    surplus value in both departments a necessary consequence of _(a)_
    and _(b)_.

These equations correspond to the conditions of capitalist commodity
production (at the restricted level of simple reproduction, however).
Equation _(b)_, for instance, is a result of the production of
commodities, entailed by the fact, in other words, that the
entrepreneurs of either department can only obtain the products of the
other by an exchange of equivalents. Variable capital and surplus value
in Department I together represent the demand of this department for
consumer goods. The product of Department II must provide for the
satisfaction of this demand, but consumer goods can only be obtained in
exchange for an equivalent part of the product of Department I, the
means of production. These equivalents, useless to Department II in
their natural form if not employed as constant capital in the process of
production, will thus determine how much constant: capital there is to
be in Department II. If this proportion were not adhered to, if, e.g.,
the constant capital of Department II (as a quantity of value) were
larger than I (_v_ + _s_), then it could not be completely transformed
into means of production, since the demand of Department I for consumer
goods would be too small; if the constant capital (II) were smaller than
I(_v_ + _s_._c_), either the previous quantity of labour power could not
be employed in this department, or the capitalists could not consume the
whole of their surplus value. In all these cases, the premises of simple
reproduction would be violated.

These equations, however, are not just an exercise in mathematics, nor
do they merely result from the system of commodity production. To
convince us of this fact, there is a simple means at hand. Let us
imagine for a moment that, instead of a capitalist method of production,
we have a socialist, i.e. a planned society in which the social division
of labour has come to replace exchange. This society also will divide
its labour power into producers of means of production and producers of
means of consumption. Let us further imagine the technical development
of labour to be such that two-thirds of social labour are employed in
the manufacture of producer goods and one third in the manufacture of
consumer goods. Suppose that under these conditions 1,500 units
(reckoned on a daily, monthly, or yearly basis) suffice to maintain the
whole working population of the society, one thousand of these being
employed, according to our premise, in Department soc. I (making means
of production), and five hundred in Department soc. II (making consumer
goods), and that the means of production dating from previous labour
periods and used up during one years labour, represent 3,000 labour
units. This labour programme, however, would not be adequate for the
society, since considerably more labour will be needed to maintain all
those of its members who do not work in the material, the productive
sense of the term: the child, the old and sick, the civil servant, the
artist and the scientist. Moreover, every society needs certain reserves
against a rainy day, as a protection against natural calamities. Taking
it that precisely the same quantity of labour and, similarly, of means
of production as that required for the workers own maintenance is needed
to maintain all the non-workers and to build up the reserves, then, from
the figures previously assumed, we should get the following diagram for
a regulated production:

  -------------------------------------------------------------------
   I. 4,000_c_ + 1,000_v_ + 1,000_s_ = 6,000 means of production
  II. 2,000_c_ +    500_v_ +    500_s_ = 3,000 means of consumption

  -------------------------------------------------------------------

Here _c_ stands for the material means of production that have been
used, expressed in terms of social labour time; _v_ stands for the
social labour time necessary to maintain the workers themselves and _s_
for that needed to maintain those who do not work and to build up the
reserves.

If we check up on the proportions of this diagram, we obtain the
following result: there is neither commodity production nor exchange,
but in truth a social division of labour. The products of Department I
are assigned to the workers of Department II in the requisite
quantities, and the products of Department II are apportioned to
everyone, worker or no, in both departments, and also to the
reserve-fund; all this being the outcome not of an exchange of
equivalents but of a social organisation that plans and directs the
process as a whole because existing demands must be satisfied and
production knows no other end but to satisfy the demands of society.

Yet all that does not detract from the validity of the equations. The
product of Department I must equal I_c_ + II_c_: this means simply that
Department I must annually renew all the means of production which
society has used up during one years labour. The product of Department
II must equal the sum of I(_v_ + _s_) + II(_v_ + _s_): this means that
society must each year produce as many consumer goods as are required by
all its members, whether they work or not, plus a quota for the reserve
fund. The proportions of the diagram are as natural and as inevitable
for a planned economy as they are for a capitalist economy based upon
anarchy and the exchange of commodities. This proves the diagram to have
objective social validity, even if, just because it concerns _simple_
reproduction, it has hardly more than theoretical interest for either a
capitalist or a planned economy, finding practical application only in
the rarest of cases.

The same sort of scrutiny must now be turned on the diagram of enlarged
reproduction. Taking Marxs second example as the basis for our test, let
us again imagine a socialist society. From the point of view of a
regulated society we shall, of course, have to start with Department II,
not with Department I. Assuming this society to grow rapidly, the result
will be an increasing demand for provisions by its members, whether they
work or not. This demand is growing so quickly that a constantly
increasing quantity of labour disregarding for the moment the progress
of labour productivity will be needed for the production of consumer
goods. The, quantities required, expressed in terms of social labour
incorporated in them, increase from year to year in a progression of,
say, 2,000 : 2,215 : 2,399 : 2,600 and so on. Let us further assume that
technical conditions demand an increasing amount of means of production
for producing this growing quantity of provisions, which, again measured
in terms of social labour, mounts from year to year in the following
progression: 7,000 : 7,583 : 8,215 : 8,900 and so on. To achieve this
enlargement of production, we must further have a growth in the labour
performed _per annum_ according to the following progression:
2,570 : 2,798 : 3,030 : 3,284. [The figures correspond to the respective
amounts of I(_v_ + _s_) + II(_v_ + _s_).] Finally, the labour performed
annually must be so distributed that one-half is always used for
maintaining the workers themselves, a quarter for maintaining those who
do not work, and the last quarter for the purpose of enlarging
production in the following year. Thus we obtain the proportions of
Marxs second diagram of enlarged reproduction for a socialist society.
In fact, three conditions are indispensable if production is to be
enlarged in any society, even in a planned economy:

1.  the society must have an increasing quantity of labour power at its
    disposal;
2.  in every working period, the immediate needs of society must not
    claim the whole of its working time, so that part of the time can be
    devoted to making provision for the future and its growing demands;
3.  means of production must be turned out year after year in
    sufficiently growing quantities without which production cannot be
    enlarged on a rising scale.

In respect of all these general points, Marxs diagram of enlarged
reproduction has objective validity _mutatis mutandis_ for a planned
society.

It remains to test whether it is also valid for a capitalist economy.
Here we must ask first of all: what is the starting point of
accumulation? That is the approach on which we have to investigate the
mutual dependence of the accumulative process in the two departments of
production. There can be no doubt that under capitalist conditions
Department his dependent upon Department I in so far as its accumulation
is determined by the additional means of production available.
Conversely, the accumulation in Department I depends upon a
corresponding quantity of additional consumer goods being available for
its additional labour power. It does not follow, however, that so long
as both these conditions are observed, accumulation in both departments
is bound, as Marxs diagram makes it appear, to go on automatically year
after year. The conditions of accumulation we have enumerated are no
more than those without which there can be no accumulation. There may
even be a desire to accumulate in both departments, yet the desire to
accumulate plus the technical prerequisites of accumulation is not
enough in a capitalist economy of commodity production. A further
condition is required to ensure that accumulation can in fact proceed
and production expand: the effective demand for commodities must also
increase. Where is this continually increasing demand to come from,
which in Marxs diagram forms the basis of reproduction on an ever rising
scale?

It cannot possibly come from the capitalists of Departments I and II
themselves so much is certain right away it cannot arise out of their
personal consumption. On the contrary, it is the very essence of
accumulation that the capitalists refrain from consuming part of their
surplus value which must be ever increasing at least as far as absolute
figures are concerned that they use it instead to make goods for the use
of other people. It is true that with accumulation the personal
consumption of the capitalist class will grow and that there may even be
an increase in the total value consumed; nevertheless it will still be
no more than a part of the surplus value that is used for the
capitalists consumption. That indeed is the foundation of accumulation:
the capitalists abstention from consuming the whole of their surplus
value. But what of the remaining surplus value, the part that is
accumulated? For whom can it be destined? According to Marks diagram,
Department I has the initiative: the process starts with the production
of producer goods. And who requires these additional means of
production? The diagram answers that Department II needs them in order
to produce means of consumption in increased quantities. Well then, who
requires these additional consumer goods? Department I, of course
replies the diagram because it now employs a greater number of workers.
We are plainly running in circles. >From the capitalist point of view it
is absurd to produce more consumer goods merely in order to maintain
more workers, and to, turn out more means of production merely to keep
this surplus of workers occupied. Admittedly, as far as the individual
capitalist is concerned, the worker is just as good a consumer, i.e.
purchaser of his commodity, as another capitalist or anyone else,
provided that he can pay. Every individual capitalist realises his
surplus value in the price of his commodity, whether he sells it to the
worker or to some other buyer. But this does not hold true from the
point of view of the capitalist class as a whole. The working class in
general receives from the capitalist class no more than an assignment to
a determinate part of the social product, precisely to the extent of the
variable capital. The workers buying consumer goods therefore merely
refund to the capitalist class the amount of the wages they have
received, their, assignment to the extent of the variable capital. They
cannot return a groat more than that; and if they are in a position to
save in order to make themselves independent as small entrepreneurs,
they may even return less, though this is the exception.

Part of the surplus value is consumed by the capitalist class itself in
form of consumer goods, the money exchanged for these being retained in
the capitalists pockets. But who can buy the products incorporating the
other, the capitalised part of the surplus value? Partly the capitalists
themselves the diagram answers who need new means of production for the
purpose of expanding production, and partly the new workers who will be
needed to work these new means of production. But that implies a
previous capitalist incentive to enlarge production; if new workers are
set to work with new means of production, there must have been a new
demand for the products which are to be turned out.

Perhaps the answer is that the natural increase of the population
creates this growing demand. In fact, the growth of the population and
its needs provided the starting point for our examination of enlarged
reproduction in an hypothetical socialist society. There the
requirements of society could serve as an adequate basis, since the only
purpose of production was the satisfaction of wants. In a capitalist
society, however, the matter is rather different. What kind of people
are we thinking of when we speak of an increase in the population? There
are only two classes of the population according to Marxs diagram, the
capitalists and the workers. The natural increase of the former is
already catered for by that part of the surplus value which is consumed
inasmuch as it increases in absolute quantity. In any case, it cannot be
the capitalists who consume the remainder, since capitalist consumption
of the entire surplus value would mean a reversion to simple
reproduction. That leaves the workers, their class also growing by
natural increase. Yet a capitalist economy is not interested in this
increase for its own sake, as a starting point of growing needs.

The production of consumer goods for I_v_ and II_v_ is not an end in
itself, as it would be in a society where the economic system is shaped
for the workers and the satisfaction of their wants. In a capitalist
system, Department II does not produce means of consumption in large
quantities simply to keep the workers of Departments I and II. Quite the
contrary: a certain number of workers in Departments I and II can
support themselves in every case because their labour power is useful
under the obtaining conditions of supply and demand. This means that the
starting point of capitalist production is not a given number of workers
and their demands, but that these factors themselves are constantly
fluctuating, dependent variables of the capitalist expectations of
profit. The question is therefore whether the natural increase of the
working class also entails a growing effective demand over and above the
variable capital. And that is quite impossible. The only source of money
for the working class in our diagram is the variable capital which must
therefore provide in advance for the natural increase of the workers.
One way or the other: either the older generation must earn enough to
keep their offspring who cannot, then, count as additional consumers;
or, failing that, the next generation, the young workers, must turn to
work in order to obtain wages and means of subsistence for themselves in
which case the new working generation is already included in the number
of workers employed. On this count, the process of accumulation in Marxs
diagram cannot be explained by the natural increase of the population.

But wait! Even under the sway of capitalism, society does not consist
exclusively of capitalists and wage labourers. Apart from these two
classes, there are a host of other people: the landowners, the salaried
employees, the liberal professions such as doctors, lawyers, artists and
scientists. Moreover, there is the Church and its servants, the Clergy,
and finally the State with its officials and armed forces. All these
strata of the population can be counted, strictly speaking, neither
among the capitalist nor among the working class. Yet society has to
feed and support them. Perhaps it is they, these strata apart from the
capitalists and wage labourers, who call forth enlarged reproduction by
their demand. But this seeming solution cannot stand up to a closer
scrutiny. The landowners must as consumers of rent, i.e. of part of the
surplus value, quite obviously be numbered among the capitalist class;
since we are here concerned with the surplus value in its undivided,
primary form, their consumption is already allowed for in the
consumption of the capitalist class. The liberal professions in most
cases obtain their money, i.e. the assignment to part of the social
product, directly or indirectly from the capitalist class who pay them
with bits of their own surplus value. And the same applies to the
Clergy, with the difference only that its members also obtain their
purchasing power in part from the workers, i.e from wages. The upkeep of
the State, lastly, with its officers and armed forces is borne by the
rates and taxes, which are in their turn levied upon either the surplus
value or the wages. Within the limits of Marxs diagram there are in fact
only the two sources of income in a society: the labourers wages and the
surplus value. All the strata of the population we have mentioned as
apart from the capitalists and the workers, are thus to be taken only
for joint consumers of these two kinds of income. Marx himself rejects
any suggestion that these third persons are more than a subterfuge:

All members of society not directly engaged in reproduction, with or
without labour, can obtain their share of the annual produce of
commodities in other words, their articles of consumption ... only out
of the hands of those classes who are the first to handle the product,
that is to say, productive labourers, industrial capitalists, and real
estate owners. To that extent their revenues are substantially derived
from wages (of the productive labourers), profit and ground rent, and
appear as indirect derivations when compared to these primary sources of
revenue. But, on the other hand, the recipients of these revenues, thus
indirectly derived, draw them by grace of their social functions, for
instance that of a king, priest, professor, prostitute, soldier, etc.,
and they may regard these functions as the primary sources of their
revenue.⁽⁵⁾

And about the consumers of interest and ground rent as buyers, Marx
says:

Now, if that portion of the surplus-value of commodities, which the
industrial capitalist yields in the form of ground rent or interest to
other shareholders in the surplus value, cannot be in the long run
converted into money by the sale of the commodities, then there is an
end to the payment of rent and interest, and the landowners or
recipients of interest can no longer serve in the role of miraculous
interlopers, who convert aliquot portions of the annual reproduction
into money by spending their revenue. The same is true of the
expenditure of all so-called unproductive labourers, State officials,
physicians, lawyers, etc., and others who serve economists as an excuse
for explaining inexplicable things, in the role of the general
public.⁽⁶⁾

Seeing that we cannot discover within capitalist society any buyers
whatever for the commodities in which the accumulated part of the
surplus value is embodied, only one thing is left: foreign trade. But
there are a great many objections to a method that conceives of foreign
trade as a convenient dumping ground for commodities which cannot be
found any proper place in the reproductive process. Recourse to foreign
trade really begs the question: the difficulties implicit in the
analysis are simply shifted quite unresolved from one country to
another. Yet if the analysis of the reproductive process actually
intends not any single capitalist country but the capitalist world
market, there can be no foreign trade: all countries are home. This
point is made by Marx already in the first volume of CAPITAL, in
connection with accumulation:

We here take no account of export trade, by means of which a nation can
change articles of luxury either into means of production or means of
subsistence, and _vice versa_. In order to examine the object of our
investigation in its integrity, free from all disturbing subsidiary
circumstances, we must treat the whole world as one nation and assume
that capitalist production is everywhere established and has possessed
itself of every branch of industry.⁽⁷⁾

The same difficulty presents itself if we consider the matter from yet
another aspect. In Marxs diagram of accumulation we assumed that the
portion of the social surplus value intended for accumulation exists
from the first in a natural form which demands it to be used for
capitalisation.

In one word, surplus-value is convertible into capital solely because
the surplus-product, whose value it is, already, comprises the material
element of new capital.⁽⁸⁾

In the figures of our diagram:

  -------------------------------------------------------------------
   I. 5,000_c_ + 1,000_v_ + 1,000_s_ = 7,000 means of production
  II. 1,430_c_ +    285_v_ +    285_s_ = 2,000 means of consumption

  -------------------------------------------------------------------

Here, a surplus value of 570_s_ can be capitalised because from the very
outset it consists in means of production. To this quantity of producer
goods there correspond besides additional consumer goods to the amount
of 140_s_ that 684_s_ can be capitalised in all. But the process here
assumed of simply transferring means of production to constant capital
on the one hand, consumer goods to variable capital on the other, in
commensurate quantities, is in contradiction with the very structure of
capitalist commodity production. Whatever natural form the surplus value
may have, there can be no immediate transfer to the place of production
for the purpose of accumulation. It must first be realised, it must be
turned into hard cash.⁽⁹⁾

Of the surplus value in Department I, 500 are fit to be capitalised, but
not until they have first been realised; the surplus value has to shed
its natural form and assume the form of pure value before it can be
added to productive capital. This is true for each individual capitalist
and also for the aggregate capitalist of society, it being a prime
condition for capitalist production that the surplus value must be
realised in the form of pure value. Accordingly, regarding reproduction
from the point of view of society as a whole

We must not follow the manner copied by Proudhon from bourgeois economy,
which looks upon this matter as though a society with a capitalist mode
of production would lose its specific historical and economic
characteristics by being taken as a unit. Not at all. We have, in that
case, to deal with the aggregate capitalist.⁽¹⁰⁾

The surplus value must therefore shed its form as surplus product before
it can re-assume it for the purpose of accumulation; by some means or
other it must first pass through the money stage. So the surplus product
of Departments I and II must be bought by whom? On the above showing,
there will have to be an effective demand outside I and II, merely in
order to realise the surplus value of the two departments, just so that
the surplus product can be turned to cash. Even then, we should only
have got to the stage where the surplus value has become money. If this
realised surplus value is further to be employed in the process of
enlarging reproduction, in accumulation, an even larger demand must be
expected for the future, a demand which is again to come from outside
the two departments. Either the demand for the surplus product will
therefore have to increase annually in accordance with the rate of
increase of the accumulated surplus value, or _vice versa_ accumulation
can only proceed precisely in so far as the demand outside I and II is
rising.

 

<< Last Chapter     |     Next Chapter >>

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾CAPITAL, vol.ii, pp.598-9.

⁽²⁾IBID., p.599.

⁽³⁾IBID., pp.600-1.

⁽⁴⁾ Surplus consumption.

⁽⁵⁾CAPITAL, vol.ii, p.429.

⁽⁶⁾ Ibid., pp.531-532.

⁽⁷⁾OP. CIT., vol.i, p.594, note 1.

⁽⁸⁾IBID., p.594.

⁽⁹⁾ Here we can leave out of account instances of products capable in
part of entering the process of production without any exchange, such as
coal in the mines. Within capitalist production as a whole such cases
are rare (cf. Marx, THEORIEN ..., vol.ii, part 2, pp.255ff.)

⁽¹⁰⁾CAPITAL, vol.i, p.503.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 11.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section One The Problem of Reproduction



CHAPTER 8 MARXS ATTEMPT TO RESOLVE THE DIFFICULTY


 

COMPLETE abstraction from the circulation of money, though making the
process of accumulation so smooth and simple in the diagram of enlarged
reproduction, has great disadvantages of its own, we see. There was much
to be said for this method in the analysis of simple reproduction, where
consumption is the be-all and end-all of production. Money there had an
ephemeral part, mediating the distribution of the social product among
the various groups of consumers the agent for the renewal of capital. In
the process of accumulation, however, the money form has an essential
function: it no longer serves as a mere agent in the circulation of
commodities here it has come to be a feature of capital itself, an
element in the circulation of capital. Even if the transformation of the
surplus value is not essential to real reproduction, it is the economic
_sine qua non_ of capitalist accumulation. In the transition from
production to reproduction, the surplus product is thus subjected to two
metamorphoses: first it casts off its use-form and then it assumes a
natural form which is fit for the purpose of accumulation. The point
here is not that the different cycles of production are counted off in
units of years. It would be just as well to take the month; for that
matter, the successive transformation of individual portions of the
surplus value in Departments I and II may even intersect in time. Series
of years here do not mean units of time but really intend the sequence
of economic transformations. What matters is that this sequence must be
observed if accumulation is to keep its capitalist character, whether it
extends over a longer or a shorter period of time. This brings us back
to the old question: How, and by whom, is the accumulated surplus value
to be realised?

Marx was well aware that his seemingly water-tight scheme of
accumulation did not cover this point adequately, and he himself kept
reviewing the problem from various angles. What he says is this:

It has been shown in volume i, how accumulation works in the case of the
individual capitalist. By the conversion of the commodity-capital into
money, the surplus-product, in which the surplus-value is incorporated,
is also monetised. The capitalist reconverts the surplus-value thus
monetised into additional natural elements of his productive capital. In
the next cycle of production the increased capital furnishes an
increased product. But what happens in the case of tile individual
capital, must also show, in the annual reproduction of society as a
whole, just as we have seen it does in the case of reproduction on a
simple scale, where the successive precipitation of the depreciated
elements of fixed capital in the form of money, accumulated, as a hoard,
also makes itself felt in the annual reproduction of society.⁽¹⁾

He examines the mechanism of accumulation further from this very point
of view, focusing on the fact that surplus value must pass through the
money stage before it is accumulated.

For instance, capitalist A, who sells during one year, or during a
number of successive years, certain quantities of commodities produced
by him, thereby converts that portion of the commodities, which bears
surplus-value, the surplus-product, or, in other words, the surplus
value produced by himself; successively into money, accumulates it
gradually, and thus makes for himself a new potential money-capital. It
is potential money-capital on account of its capacity and destination,
of being converted into the elements of productive capital. But
practically he merely, accumulates a simple hoard, which is not an
element of actual production. His activity for the time being consists
only in withdrawing circulating money out of circulation. Of course, it
is not impossible that the circulating money thus laid away by him, was
itself; before it entered into circulation, a portion of some other
hoard.⁽²⁾ Money is withdrawn from circulation and accumulated as a hoard
by the sale of commodities, without a subsequent purchase: If this
operation is conceived as one taking place universally, then it seems
inexplicable where the buyers are to come from, since in that case
everybody would want to sell in order to hoard, and no one would want to
buy. And it must be so conceived, since every individual capital may be
in process of accumulation.

If we were to conceive of the process of circulation as one taking place
in a straight line between the various divisions of annual reproduction
which would be incorrect as it consists with a few exceptions of
mutually retroactive movements then we should have to start out from the
producer of gold (or silver) who buys without selling, and to assume
that all others sell to him. In that case, the entire social
surplus-product of the current year would pass into his hands,
representing the entire surplus-value of the year, and all the other
capitalists would distribute among themselves their relative shares in
his surplus product, which consists naturally of money, gold being the
natural form of his surplus-value. For that portion of the product of
the gold producer, which has to make good his active capital, is already
tied up and disposed of. The surplus-value of the gold producer, in the
form of gold, would then be the only fund from which all other
capitalists would have to derive the material for the conversion of
their annual surplus-product into gold. The magnitude of its value would
then have to be equal to the entire annual surplus-value of society,
which must first assume the guise of a hoard. Absurd as this assumption
would be, it would accomplish nothing more than to explain the
possibility of a universal formation of a hoard at the same period. It
would not further reproduction itself, except on the part of the gold
producer, one single step.

Before we solve this _seeming difficulty_, we must distinguish ...⁽³⁾

The obstacle in the way of realising the surplus value which Marx here
calls a seeming difficulty nevertheless is important enough for the
whole further discussion in CAPITAL, volume ii, to be concentrated on
overcoming it. As a first attempt, Marx proffers the solution of a hoard
which, owing to the separation of the different individual constant
capitals in the process of circulation, will inevitably be formed in a
capitalist system of production. Inasmuch as different capital
investments have different spans of life, and there is always an
interval before the parts of a plant are due for renewal, at any given
moment we may find that one individual capitalist is already busy
renewing his plant, while another is still building up reserves from the
proceeds yielded by the sale of his commodities against the day when he
will have enough to renew his fixed capital.

For instance, let A sell 600, representing 400_c_ + 100_v_ + 100_s_ to
B, who may represent more than one buyer. A sells 600 in commodities for
600 in money, of which 100 are surplus-value which he withdraws from
circulation and hoards in the form of money. But these 100 in money are
but the money-form of the surplus-product in which a value of 100 was
incorporated.⁽⁴⁾

In order to comprehend the problem in complete purity, Marx here assumes
the whole of the surplus value to be capitalised, for which reason he
ignores altogether that part of the surplus value is used for the
capitalists personal consumption; in addition, A_'_, A_''_ and A_'''_ as
well as B_'_, B_''_ and B_'''_ here belong to Department I.

The formation of a hoard, then, is not a production, nor is it an
increment of production. The action of the capitalist consists merely in
withdrawing from circulation 100 obtained by the sale of his
surplus-product, in holding and hoarding this amount. This operation is
carried on, not alone on the part of A, but at numerous points of the
periphery of circulation by other capitalists named A_'_, A_''_, A_'''_
... However, A accomplishes the formation of a hoard only to the extent
that he acts as a seller, so far as his surplus-product is concerned,
not as a buyer. His successive production of surplus-products, the
bearers of his surplus-value convertible into money, is therefore a
premise for the formation of his hoard. In the present case, where we
are dealing only with the circulation within Department I, the natural
form of the surplus-product, and of the total product of which it is a
part, is that of an element of constant capital of I, that is to say it
belongs to the category of a means of production creating means of
production. We shall see presently, what becomes of it, what function it
performs, in the hands of the buyers such as B, B_'_, B_''_, etc.

It must particularly be noted at this point that A, while withdrawing
money from circulation and hoarding it, on the other hand throws
commodities into it without withdrawing other commodities in return. The
capitalists, B, B_'_, B_''_, etc., are thereby enabled to throw only
money into it and withdraw only commodities from it. In the present
case, these commodities, according to their natural form and
destination, become a fixed or circulating element of the constant
capital of B, B_'_, etc.⁽⁵⁾

There is nothing new about this whole process. Marx had already
described it extensively in connection with simple reproduction, since
it alone can explain how a society is able to renew constant capital
under conditions of capitalist reproduction. How this process can lay
the besetting problem of our analysis of enlarged reproduction is far
from self-evident. The difficulty had been that for the purpose of
accumulation, part of the surplus value is not consumed by the
capitalists but added to capital in order to expand production, giving
rise to the question of buyers for this additional product. The
capitalists do not want to consume it and the workers are not able to do
so, their entire consumption being covered in every case by the
available variable capital. Whence the demand for the accumulated
surplus value? or, as Marx would have it: Whence the money to pay for
the accumulated surplus value?

If, by way of answer, we are referred to the process of hoarding
attendant upon the gradual renewal of the constant capital by the
individual capitalists at various times, the connection between these
two points remains obscure. As long as B, B_'_ and B_''_, etc., buy
producer goods from their colleagues A, A_'_ and A_''_ in order to renew
their constant capital that has in fact been used up, the limits of
simple reproduction are not transcended, and the whole thing has nothing
to do with our problem. The moment the producer goods purchased by B,
B_'_, B_''_, etc., serve to increase their constant capital, however,
for purposes of accumulation, a number of new questions clamour for
attention. First and foremost where do the Bs get the cash to buy an
additional product from the As? The only way they could have made their
money is by sale of their own surplus product. Before they can acquire
new means of production for expanding their enterprises, before they
appear as buyers, that is to say, of the surplus product that is to be
accumulated, they must first have disposed of their own surplus product
in a word, B, B_'_, B_''_, etc., must have been vendors themselves. But
who could have bought their surplus product? It is obvious that the
difficulty is simply shifted from the As to the Bs without having been
mastered.

At one stage of the analysis it really does seem for a time as if a
solution were found at last. After a short digression, Marx returns to
the main line of his investigation in the following words:

In the present case, this surplus-product consists at the outset of
means of production used in the creation of means of production. It is
not until it reaches the hands of B, B_'_, B_''_, etc.; (I) that this
surplus-product serves as an additional constant capital. But it is
virtually that even in the hands of the accumulators of hoards, the
capitalists A, A_'_, A_''_, (I), before it is sold. If we consider
merely the volume of values of the reproduction on the part of I, then
we are still moving within the limits of simple reproduction, for no
additional capital has been set in motion for the purpose of creating
this virtual additional capital (the surplus-product), nor has any
greater amount of surplus-labour been performed than that done on the
basis of simple reproduction. The difference is here only one of the
form of the surplus-labour performed, of the concrete nature of its
particularly useful service. It is expended in means of production for
Department I_c_ instead of II_c_, in means of production of means of
production instead of means of production of articles of consumption. In
the case of simple reproduction it had been assumed that the entire
surplus-value was spent as revenue in the commodities of II. Hence it
consisted only of such means of production as restore the constant
capital of II_c_ in its natural form. In order that the transition from
simple to expanded reproduction may take place, the production in
Department I must be enabled to create fewer elements for the constant
capital of II and more for that of I ... Considering the matter merely
from the point of view of the volume of values, it follows, then, that
the material requirements of expanded reproduction are produced within
simple reproduction. It is simply a question of the expenditure of the
surplus-labour of the working class of I for the production of means of
production, the creation of virtual additional capital of I. The virtual
additional money capital, created on the part of A, A_'_, A_''_, by the
successive sale of their surplus-product, which was formed without any
capitalist expenditure of money, is in this case simply the money-form
of the additional means of production made by I.⁽⁶⁾

On this interpretation, the difficulty seems to dissolve into thin air
at our touch. Accumulation requires no new sources of money at all.
Before, when the capitalists themselves consumed their surplus value,
they had to have a corresponding money reserve in hand, the analysis of
simple reproduction already having proved that the capitalist class must
itself put into circulation the money needed for the realisation of
their surplus value. Now, instead of consumer goods, the capitalist
class, or rather B, B_'_, and B_''_, buy an equivalent amount of means
of production in order to expand their production. In this way, money to
the same value is accumulated in the hands of the other capitalist
group, viz. A, A_'_, A_''_, etc.

This hoarding ... does not in any way imply an addition to the wealth in
precious metals, but only a change of function on the part of money
previously circulating. A while ago it served as a medium of
circulation, now it serves as a hoard, as a virtual additional
money-capital in process of formation.⁽⁷⁾

And that is that! Yet this way out of the difficulty is open to us only
on one condition, and that is not far to seek: Marx here takes
accumulation in its first rudiments, _in statu nascendi_, as it begins
to evolve from simple reproduction. In respect of the amount of value,
production is not yet enlarged, it has only been rearranged so that its
material elements are grouped in a different way. That the sources of
money also seem adequate is therefore not surprising. This solution,
however, is only true for one specific moment, the period of transition
from simple reproduction to enlarged reproduction in short, a moment
that has no reference to reality and can only be conceived
speculatively. Once accumulation has been established for some time,
when increasing amounts of value are thrown upon the market in every
period of production, buyers for these additional values cannot fail to
become a problem. And on this point the proffered solution breaks down.
For that matter, it was never more than a seeming solution, _not a real
one_. On closer scrutiny, it fails us even at the precise instant it
appears to have smoothed the way for us. For if we take accumulation
just at the very moment of its emergence from simple reproduction, the
prime condition it demands is a decrease in the consumption of the
capitalist class. No sooner have we discovered a way to expand
reproduction with the means of circulation already at hand, than we find
previous consumers trickling away at the same rate. What, then, is the
good of expanding production; who is there able to buy from B, B_'_ and
B_''_ this increased amount of products which they could turn out only
by denying themselves the money they need for buying new means of
production from A, A_'_ and A_''_?

That solution, we see, was a mere illusion the difficulty still
persists. Marx himself at once re-opens the question where B, B_'_ and
B_''_ get the money to buy the surplus product of A, A_'_ and A_''_.

To the extent that the products created by B, B_'_, B_''_, etc., (I)
re-enter in their natural form into their own process, it goes without
saying that a corresponding portion of their own surplus-product is
transferred directly (without any intervention of circulation) to their
productive capital and becomes an element of additional constant
capital. To the same extent they do not help to convert any
surplus-product of A, A_'_, A_''_, etc., (I) into money. Aside from
this, where does the money come from? We know that they have formed
their hoard in the same way as A, A_'_, etc., by the sale of their
respective surplus products. Now they have arrived at the point where
their accumulated hoard of virtual money-capital is to enter effectually
upon its function as additional money-capital. But this is merely
turning around in a circle. The question still remains: Where does the
money come from, which the various Bs (I) withdrew from the circulation
and accumulated?⁽⁸⁾

His prompt reply again seems surprisingly simple:

Now we know from the analysis of simple reproduction, that the
capitalists of I and II must have a certain amount of ready money in
their hands, in order to be able to dispose of their surplus products.
In that case, the money which served only for the spending of revenue in
articles of consumption returned to the capitalists in the same measure
in which the advanced it for the purpose of disposing of their
commodities. Here the same money reappears, but in a different function.
The As and Bs supply one another alternately with the money for
converting their surplus-product into virtual additional capital, and
throw the newly formed money-capital alternately into circulation as a
medium of purchase.⁽⁹⁾

That is harking back to simple reproduction all over again. It is quite
true, of course, that the capitalists A and the capitalists B are
constantly accumulating a hoard of money bit by bit so as to be able to
renew their constant (fixed) capital from time to time, and in this way
they really are assisting one another in realising their products. Yet
this accumulating hoard does not drop from the clouds it is simply a
natural precipitation of the fixed capital that is (in terms of value)
continually being transferred in installments to the products which are
then one by one realised in the process of sale. Owing to its very
nature, the accumulated hoard can only cover the renewal of the old
capital; there cannot possibly be enough to serve further for purchasing
additional constant capital. That means that we are still within the
limits of simple reproduction. Perhaps, though, that part of the medium
of circulation which hitherto served the capitalists for their personal
consumption, and is now to be capitalised, becomes a new source of
additional money? For that to be true, however, we should have to be
back at the unique and fleeting moment that has no more than theoretical
existence the period of transition from simple to enlarged reproduction.
Beyond this gap accumulation cannot proceed we are in truth going round
in circles.

So the capitalist hoarding will not do as a way out of our difficulties.
This conclusion should not come as a surprise, since the very exposition
of the difficulty was misleading. It is not the source of money that
constitutes the problem of accumulation, but the source of the demand
for the additional goods produced by the capitalised surplus value; not
a technical hitch in the circulation of money but an economic problem
pertaining to the reproduction of the total social capital. Quite apart
from the question which had claimed Marxs entire attention so far,
namely where B, B_'_, etc., (I), get the money to buy additional means
of production from A, A_'_, etc., (I), successful accumulation will
inevitably have to face a far more serious problem: to whom can B, B_'_,
etc., now sell their increased surplus product? Marx finally makes them
sell their products to one another:

It may be that the different B, B_'_, B_''_, etc., (I), whose virtual
new capital enters upon its active function, are compelled to buy from
one another their product (portions of their surplus product) or to sell
it to one another. In that case, the money advanced by them for the
circulation of their surplus-product flows back under normal conditions
to the different Bs in the same proportion in which they advanced it for
the circulation of their respective commodities.⁽¹⁰⁾

In that case the problem simply has not been solved, for after all B,
B_'_, and B_''_ have not cut down on their consumption and expanded
their production just so as to buy each others increased product, i.e.
means of production. Even that, incidentally, would only be possible to
a very limited extent Marx assumes a certain division of labour in
Department I itself: the As turn out means of production for making
producer goods and the Bs means of production for making consumer goods,
which is as much as to say that, though the product of A, A_'_, etc.,
need never leave Department I, the product of B, B_'_, etc., is by its
natural form predestined from the first for Department II. Already the
accumulation of B, B_'_, etc., it follows, must lead us to circulation
between Departments I and II. Thus Marxs analysis itself confirms that,
if Department I is to accumulate, the department for means of
consumption must, in the last resort, increase its immediate or mediate
demand for means of production, and so it is to Department II and its
capitalists that we must look for buyers for the additional product
turned out by Department I.

Sure enough, Marxs second attack on the problem takes up from there: the
demand of capitalists in Department II for additional means of
production. Such a demand inevitably implies that the constant capital
II_c_ is in process of expanding. This is where the difficulty becomes
truly formidable:

Take it now that A(I) converts his surplus-product into gold by selling
it to a capitalist B in Department II. This can be done only by the sale
of means of production on the part of A(I) to B(II) without a subsequent
purchase of articles of consumption, in other words, only by a one-sided
sale on As part. Now we have seen that II_c_ cannot be converted into
the natural form of productive constant capital unless not only I_v_ but
also at least a portion of I_s_, is exchanged for a portion of II_c_,
which II_c_ exists in the form of articles of consumption. But now that
A has converted his I_s_ into gold by making this exchange impossible
and withdrawing the money obtained from II_c_ out of circulation,
instead of spending it for articles of consumption of II_c_, there is
indeed on the part of A(I) a formation of additional virtual
money-capital, but on the other hand there is a corresponding portion of
the value of the constant capital B(II) held in the form of
commodity-capital, unable to transform itself into natural productive
constant capital. In other words, a portion of the commodities of B(II),
and at that a portion which must be sold if he wishes to reconvert his
entire constant capital into its productive form, has become unsaleable.
To that extent, there is an overproduction which clogs reproduction,
even on the same scale.⁽¹¹⁾

Department Is efforts to accumulate by selling its additional product to
Department II have met with an unlooked-for result: a deficit for the
capitalists of Department II serious enough to prevent even simple
reproduction on the old scale.

Having got to this crucial point, Marx seeks to lay bare the root of the
problem by careful and detailed exposition:

Let us now take a closer look at the accumulation in Department II. The
first difficulty with reference to II_c_, that is to say the conversion
of an element of the commodity-capital of II into the natural form of
constant capital of II, concerns simple reproduction. Let us take the
formula previously used. (1,000_v_ + 1,000_s_) I are exchanged for 2,000
II_c_. Now, if one half of the surplus-product of I, or 500_s_, is
reincorporated in Department I as constant capital, then this portion,
being detained in Department I, cannot take the place of any portion of
II_c_. Instead of being converted into articles of consumption, it is
made to serve as an additional means of production in Department I
itself ... It cannot perform this function simultaneously in I and II.
The capitalist cannot spend the value of his surplus product for
articles of consumption, and at the same time consume the
surplus-product itself productively, by incorporating it in his
productive capital. Instead of 2,000 I(_v_ + _s_), only 1,500 are
exchangeable for 2,000 II_c_, namely 1,000_v_ + 500_s_ of I. But 500
I_c_ cannot be reconverted from the form of commodities into productive
constant capital of II.⁽¹²⁾

By now, hardly anybody could fail to be convinced that the difficulty is
real, but we have not taken a single step nearer a solution. This,
incidentally, is where Marx has to do penance for his ill-advised
continual recourse in an earlier over-simplification, to a fictitious
moment of transition in order to elucidate the problem of accumulation
from simple reproduction to enlarged reproduction, making his major
premise accumulation at its very inception, in its feeble infancy
instead of its vigorous stride. There was something to be said, at
least, for this fiction, so long as it was just a question of
accumulation within Department I. The capitalists of Department I, who
denied themselves part of what they had been wont to consume, at once
had a new hoard of money in hand with which they could start
capitalisation. But when it comes to Department II, the same fiction
only piles on the difficulties. The abstinence of the capitalists in
Department I here finds expression in a painful loss of consumers for
whose expected demand production had largely been calculated. Since the
capitalists of Department II, on whom we tried the experiment whether
they might not possibly be the long-sought buyers of the additional
product of accumulation in Department I, are themselves in sore straits
not knowing as yet where to go with their own unsold product they are
even less likely to be of any help to us. There is no shutting our eyes
to the fact that an attempt to make one group of capitalists accumulate
at the expense of the other is bound to get involved in glaring
inconsistencies.

Yet another attempt to get round the difficulty is subsequently
mentioned by Marx who at once rejects it as a subterfuge. The
unmarketable surplus value in Department II, that is the result of
accumulation in Department I might be considered a reserve of
commodities the society is going to need in the course of the following
year. This interpretation Marx counters with his usual thoroughness:

(1) ... the forming of such supplies and the necessity for it applies to
all capitalists, those of I as well as of II. Considering them in their
capacity as sellers of commodities, they differ only by the fact that
they sell different kinds of commodities. A supply of commodities of II
implies a previous supply of commodities of I. If we neglect this supply
on the one side, we must also do so on the other. But if we count them
in on both sides, the problem is not altered in any way. (2) Just as
this year closes on the side of II with a supply of commodities for the
next year, so it was opened by a supply of commodities on the same side,
taken over from last year. In the analysis of annual reproduction,
reduced to its abstract form, we must therefore strike it out at both
ends. By leaving this year in possession of its entire production,
including the supply held for next year, we take from it the supply of
commodities transferred from last year, and thus we have actually to
deal with the aggregate product of an average year as the object of our
analysis. (3) The simple circumstance that the difficulty which must be
overcome did not show itself in the analysis of simple reproduction
proves that it is a specific phenomenon due merely to the different
arrangement of the elements of Department I with a view to reproduction,
an arrangement without which reproduction on an expanded scale cannot
take place at all.⁽¹³⁾

The last remark, be it noted, is equally damaging to his own earlier
attempt at resolving the specific difficulties of accumulation by
moments pertaining to simple reproduction, viz. the formation of a hoard
consequent upon the gradual turnover of the fixed capital in the hands
of the capitalists which was previously adduced as the explanation of
accumulation in Department I.

Marx then proceeds to set out enlarged reproduction in the form of
diagrams. But no sooner does he begin to analyse his diagram, than the
same difficulty crops up anew in a slightly different guise. Assuming
that the capitalists of Department II must for their part convert 140_s_
into constant capital so as to make accumulation possible for the
others, he asks:

Therefore Department II must buy 140_s_ for cash without recovering this
money by a subsequent sale of its commodities to I. And this is a
process which is continually repeated in every new annual production, so
far as it is reproduction on an enlarged scale. Where does II get the
money for this?⁽¹⁴⁾

In the following, Marx tries out various approaches in order to discover
this source. First the expenditure on variable capital by the
capitalists in Department II is closely scrutinised. True, it exists in
the form of money; but its proper function is the purchase of labour
power, and it cannot possibly be withdrawn and made to serve, maybe, for
purchasing additional means of production.

This continually repeated departure from and return to the starting
point, the pocket of the capitalist, does not add in any way to the
money moving in this cycle. This, then, is not a source of the
accumulation of money.⁽¹⁵⁾

Marx then considers all conceivable dodges, only to show them up as
evading the issue.

But stop! he claims. Isnt there a chance to make a: little profit?⁽¹⁵⁾

He considers whether the capitalists could not manage to save a little
of the variable capital by depressing the wages of the workers below the
normal average and thus to tap a new source of money for accumulation. A
mere flick of his fingers, of course, disposes of this notion:

But it must not be forgotten that the wages actually paid (which
determine the magnitude of the variable capital under normal conditions)
do not depend on the benevolence of the capitalists, but must be paid
under certain conditions. This does away with this expedient as a source
of additional money.⁽¹⁵⁾

He even explores what hidden methods there may be of saving on the
variable capital, such as the truck system, frauds, etc., only to
comment finally: This is the same operation as under (1), only disguised
and carried out by a detour. Therefore it must likewise be rejected as
an explanation of the present problem.⁽¹⁶⁾

All efforts to make the variable capital yield a new source of money for
the purpose of accumulation are thus unrewarded: In short, we cannot
accomplish anything with 376 II_v_ for the solution of this
question.⁽¹⁶⁾

Marx next turns to the cash reserves which the capitalists in Department
II keep for the circulation of their own consumption and investigates
whether none of this money, can be diverted to the purposes of
capitalisation. Yet this, he allows, is still more impossible.

Here the capitalists of the same department are standing face to face,
heavily buying and selling their articles of consumption. The money
required for these transactions serves only as a medium of circulation
and must flow back to the interested: parties in the normal course of
things, to the extent that they have advanced it to the circulation, in
order to pass again and again over the same course.⁽¹⁷⁾

The next attempt to follow belongs, as was to have been expected, to the
category of those subterfuges which Marx ruthlessly refutes: the attempt
to explain that money-capital can be formed in the hands of one
capitalist group in Department II by defrauding the other capitalists
within the same department viz. in the process of the mutual selling of
consumer goods. No time need be wasted on this little effort.

Then comes a more sober proposition: Or, a certain portion of II_s_,
represented by necessities of life, might be directly converted into new
variable capital of Department II.⁽¹⁸⁾

It is not quite clear how this can help us over the hurdle, help to get
accumulation going. For one thing, the formation of additional variable
capital in Department II is not much use if we have no additional
constant capital for this department, being in fact engaged on the task
of finding it. For another thing, our present concern is to see if we
can find in Department II a source of money for the purchase of
additional means of production from I, and Department IIs problem how to
place its own additional product in some way or other in the process of
production is beside the point. Further, is the implication that the
respective consumer goods should be used direct, i.e. without the
mediation of money, in the production of Department II, so that the
corresponding amount of money can be diverted from variable capital to
the purpose of accumulation? If so, we could not accept the solution.
Under normal conditions of capitalist production, the remuneration of
the workers by consumer goods direct is precluded, one of the
corner-stones of capitalist economy being the money-form of the variable
capital, the independent transaction between the worker as buyer of
commodities and producer of consumer goods. Marx himself stresses this
point in another context:

We know that the actual variable capital consists of labour power, and
therefore the additional must consist of the same thing. It is not the
capitalist of I who among other things buys from II a supply of
necessities of life for his labourers, or accumulates them for this
purpose, as the slave holder had to do. It is the labourers themselves
who trade with II.⁽¹⁹⁾

And that goes for the capitalists of Department II just as much as for
those of Department I, thus disposing of Marxs last effort.

Marx ends up by referring us to the last part of CAPITAL, volume ii,
chapter 21, the _Concluding Remarks SUB IV_, as Engels has called them.
Here we find the curt explanation:

The original source for the money of II is _v_ + _s_ of the gold
producers in Department I, exchanged for a portion of II_c_. Only to the
extent that the gold producer accumulates surplus value or converts it
into means of production of I, in other words, to the extent that he
expands his production, does his _v_ + _s_ stay out of Department II. On
the other hand, to the extent that the accumulation of gold on the part
of the gold producer himself leads ultimately to an expansion of
production, a portion of the surplus-value of gold production not spent
as revenue passes into Department II as additional variable capital of
the gold producers, promotes, the accumulation of new hoards in II and
supplies it with means by which to buy from I without having to sell to
it immediately.⁽²⁰⁾

After the breakdown of all conceivable attempts at explaining
accumulation, therefore, after chasing from pillar to post, from A I to
B I, and from B I to A II, we are made to fall back in the end on the
very gold producer, recourse to whom Marx had at the outset of his
analysis branded as absurd. The analysis of the reproductive process,
and the second volume of CAPITAL finally comes to a close without having
provided the long sought-for solution to our difficulty.

 

<< Last Chapter     |     Next Chapter >>

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾CAPITAL, vol.ii, p.571.

⁽²⁾IBID., p.576.

⁽³⁾IBID., pp.573-4.

⁽⁴⁾IBID., p.375.

⁽⁵⁾IBID., pp.575-6.

⁽⁶⁾IBID., pp.579-81.

⁽⁷⁾IBID., p.581.

⁽⁸⁾IBID., pp.583-4.

⁽⁹⁾IBID., p.584.

⁽¹⁰⁾IBID., p.585.

⁽¹¹⁾IBID., pp.586-7.

⁽¹²⁾IBID., pp.588-9.

⁽¹³⁾IBID., pp.590-1.

⁽¹⁴⁾IBID., p.593.

⁽¹⁵⁾IBID., p.594.

⁽¹⁶⁾IBID., p.595.

⁽¹⁷⁾IBID.

⁽¹⁸⁾IBID., p.596.

⁽¹⁹⁾IBID., p.601.

⁽²⁰⁾IBID., p.610.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 12.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section One The Problem of Reproduction



CHAPTER 9 THE DIFFICULTY VIEWED FROM THE ANGLE OF THE PROCESS OF CIRCULATION


 

THE flaw in Marxs analysis is, in our opinion, the misguided formulation
of the problem as a mere question of the sources of money, whereas the
real issue is the effective demand, the use made of goods, not the
source of the money which is paid for them. As to money as a means of
circulation: when considering the reproductive process as a whole, we
must assume that capitalist society must always dispose of money, or a
substitute, in just that quantity that is needed for its process of
circulation. What has to be explained is the great social transaction of
exchange, caused by real economic needs. While it is important to
remember that capitalist surplus value must invariably pass through the
money stage before it can be accumulated, we must nevertheless try to
track down the economic demand for the surplus product, quite apart from
the puzzle where the money comes from. As Marx himself says in another
passage:

The money on one side in that case calls forth expanded reproduction on
the other, because the possibility for it exists without the money. For
money in itself is not an element of actual reproduction.⁽¹⁾

And in a different context, Marx actually shows the question about the
sources of money to be a completely barren formulation of the problem of
accumulation.

In fact, he had come up against this difficulty once before when
examining the process of circulation. Still dealing with simple
reproduction, he had asked, in connection with the circulation of the
surplus value:

But the commodity capital must be monetised before its conversion into
productive capital, or before the surplus-value contained in it can be
spent. Where does the money for this purpose come from? This question
seems difficult at the first glance, and neither Tooke nor anyone else
has answered it so far.⁽²⁾

And he was then quite uncompromising about getting to the root of the
matter:

The circulating capital of 500 p.st. advanced in the form
economy-capital, whatever may be its period of turn-over, may now stand
for the total capital of society, that is to say, of the capitalist
class. Let the surplus value be 100 p.st. How can the entire capitalist
class manage to draw continually 600 p.st out of the circulation, when
they continually throw only 500 p.st. into it?⁽³⁾

All that, mind you, refers to simple reproduction, where the entire
surplus value is used for the personal consumption of the capitalist
class. The question should therefore from the outset have been put more
precisely in this form: how can the capitalists secure for themselves,
consumer goods to the amount of £100 surplus value on top of putting
£500 into circulation for constant and variable capital? It is
immediately obvious that those £500 which, in form capital, always serve
to buy means of production and to pay the workers, cannot simultaneously
defray the expense of the capitalists personal consumption. Where, then,
does the additional money come from? the £100 the capitalists need to
realise their own surplus value? Thus all theoretical dodges one might
devise for this point are summarily disposed of by Marx right away:

It should not be attempted to avoid this difficulty by plausible
subterfuges.

For instance: So far as the constant circulating capital is concerned,
it is obvious that not all invest it simultaneously. While the
capitalist A sells his commodities so that his advanced capital assumes
the form of money, there is on the other hand, the available
money-capital of the buyer B which assumes the form of his means of
production which A is just producing. The same transaction, which
restores that of B to its productive form, transforms it from money into
materials of production and labour-power; the same amount of money
serves in the two-sided process as in every simple purchase CM. On the
other hand, when A reconverts his money into means of production, he
buys from C, and this man pays B with it, etc., and thus the transaction
would be explained.

But none of the laws referring to the quantity of the circulating money,
which have been analysed in the circulation of commodities (vol.i,
chap.iii), are in any way changed by the capitalist character of the
process of production.

Hence, when we have said that the circulating capital of society, to be
advanced in the form of money, amounts to 500 p.st., we have already
accounted for the fact that this is on the one hand the sum
simultaneously advanced, and that, on the other hand, it sets in motion
more productive capital than 500 p.st., because it serves alternately as
the money fund of different productive capitals. This mode of
explanation, then, assumes that money as existing whose existence it is
called upon to explain.

It may be furthermore said: Capitalist A produces articles which
capitalist B consumes unproductively, individually. The money of B
therefore monetises the commodity-capital of A, and thus the same amount
serves for the monetisation of the surplus-value of B and the
circulating constant capital of A. But in that case, the solution of the
question to be solved is still more directly assumed, the question:
Whence does B get the money for the payment of his revenue? How does he
himself monetise this surplus-portion of his product?

It might also be answered that that portion of the circulating variable
capital, which A continually advances to his labourers, flows back to
him continually from the circulation, and only an alternating part stays
continually tied up for the payment of wages. But a certain time elapses
between the expenditure and the reflux, and meanwhile the money paid out
for wages might, among other uses, serve for the monetisation of
surplus-value. But we know, in the first place, that the greater the
time, the greater must be the supply of money which the capitalist A
must keep continually in reserve. In the second place, the labourer
spends the money, buys commodities for it, and thus monetises to that
extent the surplus-value contained in them. Without penetrating any
further into the question at this point, it is sufficient to say that
the consumption of the entire capitalist class, and of the unproductive
persons dependent upon it, keeps step with that of the labouring class;
so that, simultaneously with the money thrown into circulation by the
labouring class, the capitalists must throw money into it, in order to
spend their surplus-value as revenue. Hence money must be withdrawn from
circulation for it. This explanation would merely reduce the quantity of
money required, but not do away with it.

Finally it might be said: A large amount of money is continually thrown
into circulation when fixed capital is first invested, and it is not
recovered from the circulation until after the lapse of years, by him
who threw it into circulation. May not this sum suffice to monetise the
surplus-value? The answer to this is that the employment as fixed
capital, if not by him who threw it into circulation, then by some one
else, is probably implied in the sum of 500 p.st. (which includes the
formation of a hoard for needed reserve funds). Besides, it is already
assumed in the amount expended for the purchase of products serving as
fixed capital, that the surplus-value contained in them is also paid,
and the question is precisely, where the money for this purpose came
from.⁽⁴⁾

This parting shot, by the way, is particularly noteworthy in that Marx
here expressly repudiates the attempt to explain realisation of the
surplus value, even in the case of simple reproduction, by means of a
hoard, formed for the periodical renewal of fixed capital. Later on,
with a view to realising the surplus value under the much more difficult
conditions of accumulation he makes more than one tentative effort to
substantiate an explanation of this type which he himself dismissed as a
plausible subterfuge.

Then follows a solution which has a somewhat disconcerting ring:

The general reply has already been given: When a mass of commodities
valued at _x_ times 1,000 p.st. has to circulate, it changes absolutely
nothing in the quantity of the money required for this circulation,
whether this mass of commodities contains any surplus-value or not, and
whether this mass of commodities has been produced capitalistically or
not. In other words, _the problem itself does not exist_. All other
conditions being given, such as velocity of circulation of money, etc.,
a definite sum of money is required in order to circulate the value of
commodities worth _x_ times 1,000 p.st., quite independently of the fact
how much or how little of this value falls to the share of the, direct
producers of these commodities. So far as any problem exists here, it
coincides with the general problem: Where does all the money required
for the circulation of the commodities of a certain country come
from?⁽⁵⁾

The argument is quite sound. The answer to the general question about
the origin of the money for putting a certain quantity of commodities
into circulation within a country will also tell us where the money for
circulating the surplus value comes from. The division of the bulk of
value contained in these commodities into constant and variable capital,
and surplus value, does not exist from the angle of the circulation of
money in this connection, it is quite meaningless. But it is only from
the angle of the circulation of money, or of a simple commodity
circulation, that the problem has no existence. Under the aspect of
social reproduction as a whole, it is very real indeed; but it should
not, of course, be put in that misleading form that brings us back to
simple commodity circulation, where it has no meaning. We should not
ask, accordingly: Where does the money required for realising the
surplus value come from? but: Where are the consumers for this surplus
value? It is they, for sure, who must have this money in hand in order
to throw it into circulation. Thus, Marx himself; although he just now
denied the problem to exist, keeps coming back to it time and again:

Now, there are only two points of departure: The capitalist and the
labourer. All third classes of persons must either receive money for
their services from these two classes, or, to the extent that they
receive it without any equivalent services, they are joint owners of the
surplus-value in the form of rent, interest, etc. The fact that the
surplus-value does not all stay in the pocket of the industrial
capitalist, but must be shared by him with other persons, has nothing to
do with the present question. The question is: How does he maintain his
surplus-value, not, how does he divide the money later after he has
secured it? For the present case, the capitalist may as well be regarded
as the sole owner of his surplus-value. As for the labourer it has
already been said that he is but the secondary point of departure, while
the capitalist is the primary starting point of the money thrown by the
labourer into circulation. The money first advanced as variable capital
is going through its second circulation, when the labourer spends it for
the payment of means of subsistence.

The capitalist class, then, remains the sole point of departure of the
circulation of money. If they need 400 p.st. for the payment of means of
production, and 100 p.st. for the payment of labour-power, they throw
500 p.st. into circulation. But the surplus-value incorporated in the
product with a rate of surplus value of 100 per cent, is equal to the
value of 100 p.st. How can they continually draw 600 p.st. out of
circulation, when they continually, throw only 100 p.st. into it? From
nothing comes nothing. The capitalist class as a whole cannot draw out
of circulation what was not previously in it.⁽⁶⁾

Marx further explodes another device which night conceivably be thought
adequate to the problem, i.e. a more rapid turnover of money enabling a
larger amount of value to circulate by means of a smaller amount of
money. The dodge will not work, of course, since the velocity of money
in circulation is already taken into account by equating the aggregate
bulk of commodities with a certain number of pounds sterling. But, then
at last we seem in sight of a proper solution:

Indeed, paradoxical as it may appear at first sight, it is the
capitalist class itself that throws the money into circulation which
serves for the realisation of the surplus-value incorporated in the
commodities. But, mark well, it is not thrown into circulation as
advanced money, not as capital. The capitalist class spends it for their
individual consumption. The money is not advanced by them, although they
are the point of departure of its circulation.⁽⁷⁾

This lucid and comprehensive account is the best evidence that the
problem is not just imaginary but very real. It provides a solution, not
by disclosing a new source of money for the realisation of the surplus
value, but by pointing out at last the consumers of this surplus value.
We are still, on Marxs assumption, within the bounds of simple
reproduction; the capitalist class, that is to say, use the whole of
their surplus value for personal consumption. Since the capitalists are
the consumers of surplus value, it is not so much a paradox as a truism
that they must, in the nature of thing possess the money for
appropriating the objects of consumption, the natural form of this
surplus value. The circulatory transaction of exchange is the necessary
consequence of the fact that the individual capitalist cannot
immediately consume his individual surplus value, and accordingly the
individual surplus product, as could, for instance, the employer of
slave labour. As a rule the natural material form of the surplus product
tends to preclude such use. The aggregate surplus value of the
capitalists in general is, however, contained in the total social
product as long as there is simple reproduction as expressed by a
corresponding quantity of consumer goods for the capitalist class, just
as the sum total of variable capital has its corresponding equivalent in
the quantity of consumer goods for the working class, and as the
constant capital of all individual capitalists taken together is
represented by material means of production in an equivalent quantity.
In order to exchange the unconsumable individual surplus values for a
corresponding amount of consumer goods, a double transaction of
commodity exchange is needed: first, the sale of ones own surplus
product and then the purchase of consumer goods out of the surplus
product of society. These two transactions can only take place among
members of the capitalist class, among individual capitalists, which
means that their agent, the money, thereby merely changes hands as
between one capitalist and another without ever being alienated from the
capitalist class in general. Since simple reproduction inevitably
implies the exchange of equivalents, one and the same amount of money
can serve year by year for the circulation of the surplus value, and
only an excess of zeal will inspire the further query: where does the
money which mediates the capitalists own consumption come from in the
first place? This question, however, reduces to a more general one: how
did money capital initially come into the hands of the capitalists, that
money capital of which they always retain a certain part for their
personal consumption, apart from what they use for productive
investment? Put in this way, however, the question belongs in the
chapter of so-called primitive accumulation, i.e. the historical genesis
of capital, going beyond the framework of an analysis of the process of
circulation as well as of reproduction.

Thus the fact is clear and unequivocal so long as we remain within the
bounds of simple reproduction. Here the problem is solved by the
premises themselves; in fact, the solution is already anticipated by the
very concept of simple reproduction which indeed is based on the entire
surplus value being consumed by the capitalist class. This implies that
it must also be the latter who buy it, that is to say, individual
capitalists must buy it from each other.

In the present case, Marx says himself; we had assumed, that the sum of
money which the capitalist throws into circulation until the first
surplus-value flows back to him, is exactly equal to the surplus-value
which he is going to produce and monetise. This is obviously an
arbitrary assumption, so far as the individual capitalist is concerned.
But it must be correct when applied to the entire capitalist class, when
simple reproduction is assumed. It expresses the same thing that this
assumption does, namely, that the entire surplus-value is consumed
unproductively, but it only, not any portion of the original capital
stock.⁽⁸⁾

But simple reproduction on a capitalist basis is after all an imaginary
quantity in economic theory: no more and no less legitimate, and quite
as unavoidable as 1 in mathematics. What is worse, it cannot offer any
help at all with the problem of realising the surplus value in real
life, i.e. with regard to enlarged reproduction or accumulation. Marx
himself says so for a second time in the further development of his
analysis.

Where does the money for realising the surplus value come from if there
is accumulation, i.e. not consumption but capitalisation of part of the
surplus value? Marxs first answer is as follows:

In the first place, the additional money-capital required for the
function of the increasing productive capital is supplied by that
portion of the realised surplus-value which is thrown into circulation
by the capitalists as money-capital, not as the money form of their
revenue. The money is already present in the hands of the capitalists.
Only its employment is different.⁽⁹⁾

Our investigation of the reproductive process has already made us
familiar with this explanation, and we are equally familiar with its
defects; for one thing, the answer rests on the moment of the first
transition from simple reproduction to accumulation. The capitalists
only yesterday consumed their entire surplus value, and thus had in hand
an appropriate amount of money for their circulation. To-day they decide
to save part of the surplus value and to invest it productively instead
of squandering it. Provided that material means of production were
manufactured instead of luxury goods, they need only put part of their
personal money fund to a different use. But the transition from simple
reproduction to expanded reproduction is no less a theoretical fiction
than simple reproduction of capital itself, for which reason Marx
immediately goes on to say:

Now, by means of the additional productive capital, its product, an
additional quantity of commodities, is thrown into circulation. Together
with this additional quantity of commodities, a portion of the
additional money required for its circulation is thrown into
circulation, so far as the value of this mass of commodities is equal to
that of the productive capital consumed in their production. This
additional quantity of money has precisely been advanced as an
additional money capital, and therefore it flows back to the capitalist
through the turn-over of his capital. Here the same question reappears,
which we met previously. Where does the additional money come from, by
which the additional surplus-value now contained in the form of
commodities is to be realised?⁽¹⁰⁾

The problem could not be put more precisely. But instead of a solution,
there follows the surprising conclusion:

The general reply is again the same. The sum total of the prices of the
commodities has been increased, not because the prices of a given
quantity of commodities have risen, but because the mass of the
commodities now circulating is greater than that of the previously
circulating commodities, and because this increase has not been offset
by a fall in prices. The additional money required for the circulation
of this greater quantity of commodities of greater value must be
secured, either by greater economy in the circulating quantity of money
whether by means of balancing payments, etc., or by some measure which
accelerates the circulation of the same coins, or by the transformation
of money from the form of a hoard into that of a circulating medium.⁽¹¹⁾

All this amounts to an exposition along these lines: under conditions of
developing and growing accumulation, capitalist reproduction dumps ever
larger masses of commodity values on the market. To put this commodity
mass of a continually increasing value into circulation requires an ever
larger amount of money. This increasing amount of money must be found
somehow or other. All this is, no doubt, plausible and correct as far as
it goes; but our problem is not solved, it: is merely wished away.

One thing or the other! Either we regard the aggregate social product in
a capitalist economy simply as a mass, a conglomeration of commodities
of a certain value, seeing under conditions of accumulation, a mere
increase in this undifferentiated mass of commodities and in the bulk of
its value. Then all we need say is that a corresponding quantity of
money is required for circulating this bulk of value, that with an
increasing bulk of value the quantity of money must also increase,
unless this growth of value is offset by acceleration of; and economy
in, the traffic. And the final question, where does all money originally
come from, could then be answered on Marxs recipe: from the gold mines.
This, of course, is one way of looking at things, that of simple
commodity circulation. But in that case there is no need to drag in
concepts such as constant and variable capital, or surplus value, which
have no place in simple commodity circulation, belonging essentially to
the circulation of capitals and to social reproduction; nor is there
need to inquire for sources of money for the realisation of the social
surplus value under conditions of first simple, and then enlarged,
reproduction. Under the aspect of simple commodity circulation puzzles
of this kind are without meaning or content. But once these questions
have been raised, once the course has been set for an investigation into
the circulation of capitals and social reproduction, there can be no
appealing to the sphere of simple commodity circulation, where there is
no such problem at all; and consequently no solution to it. There can be
no looking for the answer there, and then saying triumphantly that the
problem has long been solved and in fact never really existed.

All this time, it appears, Marx has been tackling the problem from a
wrong approach. No intelligent purpose can be served by asking for the
source of the money needed to realise the surplus value. The question is
rather where the demand can arise to find an effective demand for the
surplus value. If the problem had been put in this way at the start, no
such long-winded detours would have been needed to show whether it can
be solved or not. On the basis of simple reproduction, the matter is
easy enough: since all surplus value is consumed by the capitalists,
they themselves are the buyers and provide the full demand for the
social surplus value, and by the same token they must also have the
requisite cash in hand for circulation of the surplus value. But on this
showing it is quite evident that under conditions of accumulation, i.e.
of capitalisation of part of the surplus value, it cannot, _ex
hypothesi_, be the capitalists themselves who buy the entire surplus
value, that they cannot possibly realise it. True, if the capitalised
surplus value is to be realised at all, money must be forthcoming in
adequate quantifies for its realisation. But it is quite impossible that
this money should come from the purse of the capitalist class itself.
Just because accumulation is postulated, the capitalists cannot buy
their surplus value themselves, even though they might, _in abstracto_,
have the money to do so. But who else could provide the demand for the
commodities incorporating the capitalised surplus value?

Apart from this class (the capitalists), there is, according to our
assumption the general and exclusive domination of capitalist production
no other class but the working class. All that the working class buys is
equal to the sum total of its wages, equal to the sum total of the
variable capital advanced by the entire capitalist class.⁽¹²⁾

The workers, then, are even less able than the capitalist class to
realise the capitalised surplus value. Somebody must buy it, if the
capitalists are still to be able to recover the capital they have
accumulated and advanced; and yet we cannot think of any buyers other
than capitalists and workers. How can the entire capitalist class
accumulate money under such circumstances?⁽¹²⁾

Realisation of the surplus value outside the only two existing classes
of society appears as indispensable as it looks impossible. The
accumulation of capital has been caught in a vicious circle. At any
rate, the second volume of CAPITAL offers no way out.

If we should now ask why Marxs CAPITAL affords no solution to this
important problem of the accumulation of capital, we must bear in mind
above all that this second volume is not a finished whole but a
manuscript that stops short half way through.

The external form of its last chapters in particular proves them to be
in the nature of notes, intended to clear the authors own mind, rather
than final conclusions ready for the readers enlightenment. This fact is
amply authenticated by the man best in the position to know: Friedrich
Engels, who edited the second volume. In his introduction to the second
volume he reports in detail on the conditions of the preliminary studies
and the manuscripts Marx had left, which were to form the basis of this
volume:

The mere enumeration of the manuscripts left by Marx as a basis for
Volume II proves the unparalleled conscientiousness and strict
self-criticism which he practised in his endeavour to fully elaborate
his great economic discoveries before he published them. This
self-criticism rarely permitted him to adapt his presentation of the
subject, in content as well as in form, to his ever widening horizon,
which he enlarged by incessant study.

The material ... consists of the following parts: First, a manuscript
entitled _A contribution to the Critique of Political Economy_,
containing 1,472 quarto pages in 23 divisions, written in the time from
August 1861 to June 1863. It is a continuation of the work of the same
title, the first volume of which appeared in Berlin, in 1859 ... This
manuscript, valuable though it is, could not be used in the present
edition of Volume II.

The manuscript next following in the order of time is that of Volume III
...

The period after the publication of Volume I, which is next in order, is
represented by a collection of four manuscripts for Volume II, marked
I-IV by Marx himself. Manuscript I (150 pages) presumably written in
1865 or 1867, is the first independent, but more or less fragmentary,
elaboration of the questions now contained in Volume II. This manuscript
is likewise unsuited for this edition. Manuscript III is partly a
compilation of quotations and references to the manuscripts containing
Marxs extracts and comments, most of them relating to the first section
of volume II, partly an elaboration of special points, particularly a
critique of Adam Smiths statements as to fixed and circulating capital
and the source of profits; furthermore, in a discussion of the relations
of the rate of surplus-value to the rate of profit, which belongs in
Volume III. The references furnished little that was new, while the
elaborations for Volumes II and III were rendered valueless through
subsequent revisions and had to be ruled out for the greater part.
Manuscript IV is an elaboration, ready for printing, of the first
section and the first chapters of the second section of Volume II, and
has been used in its proper place. Although it was found that this
manuscript had been written earlier than Manuscript II, yet it was far
more finished in form and could be used with advantage for the
corresponding part of this volume. I had to add only a few supplementary
parts of Manuscript II. This last manuscript is the only fairly
completed elaboration of Volume II and dates from the year 1870. The
notes for the final revision, which I shall mention immediately, say
explicitly: The second elaboration must be used as a basis.

There is another interruption after 1870, due mainly to ill health. Marx
employed this time in his customary way, that is to say he studied
agronomics, agricultural conditions in America and especially Russia,
the money market and banking institutions, and finally natural sciences,
such as geology and physiology. Independent mathematical studies also
form a large part of the numerous manuscripts of this period. In the
beginning of 1877, Marx had recovered sufficiently to resume once more
his chosen lifes work. The beginning of 1877 is marked by references and
notes from the above named four manuscripts intended for a new
elaboration of Volume II, the beginning of which is represented by
Manuscript V (56 pages in folio). It comprises the first four chapters
and is not very fully worked out. Essential points are treated in
footnotes. The material is rather collected than sifted, but it is the
last complete presentation of this most important first section. A
preliminary attempt to prepare this part for the printer was made in
Manuscript VI (after October 1877 and before July 1878), embracing 17
quarto pages, the greater part of the first chapter. A second and last
attempt was made in Manuscript VII, dated July 2, 1878, and consisting
of 7 pages in folio.

About this time Marx seems to have realised that he would never be able
to complete the second and third volume in a manner satisfactory to
himself, unless a complete revolution in his health took place.
Manuscripts V-VIII show traces of hard struggles against depressing
physical conditions far too frequently to be ignored. The most difficult
part of the first section had been worked over in Manuscript V. The
remainder of the first, and the entire second section, with the
exception of Chapter 17, presented no great theoretical difficulties.
But the third section, dealing with the reproduction and circulation of
social capital, seemed to be very much in need of revision. Manuscript
II, it must be pointed out, had first treated of this reproduction
without regard to the circulation which is instrumental in effecting it,
and then taken up the same question with regard to circulation. It was
the intention of Marx to eliminate this section and to reconstruct it in
such a way that it would conform to his wider grasp of the subject. This
gave rise to Manuscript VIII, containing only 70 pages in quarto. A
comparison with Section III, as printed after deducting the paragraphs
inserted out, of Manuscript II, shows the amount of matter compressed by
Marx into this space.

Manuscript VIII is likewise merely a preliminary presentation of the
subject, and its main object was to ascertain and develop the new points
of view not set forth in Manuscript 2, while those points were ignored
about which there was nothing new to say. An essential part of Chapter
17, Section 2, which is more or less relevant to Section III, was at the
same time drawn into this discussion and expanded. The logical sequence
was frequently interrupted, the treatment of the subject was incomplete
in various places, and especially the conclusion was very fragmentary.
But Marx expressed as nearly as possible what he intended to say on the
subject;

This is the material for Volume II, out of which I was supposed to make
something, as Marx said to his daughter Eleanor shortly before his
death..⁽¹³⁾

We cannot but admire this something which Engels managed to make from
material of such a kind. As far as our present problem is concerned,
however, this detailed report makes it clear that no more than the first
two of the three sections that make up volume 2 were anything like ready
for print in the manuscripts Marx left: the section _On the Circulation
of Money and Commodity Capital_ and on _The Causes of Circulation and
the Turnover of Capital_. The third section which treats of the
reproduction of total capital is merely a collection of fragments which
Marx himself considered to be very much in need of revision. Yet it is
the last part of this section, i.e. chapter 21, _On Accumulation and
Enlarged Reproduction_, which is of primary importance in the present
context, and of the whole book this is the most incomplete. It comprises
thirty five pages of print in all and breaks off right in the middle of
the analysis.

Besides this extraneous circumstance, we would suggest another point of
great influence. Marxs investigation of the social reproductive process
starts off, as we have seen, from the analysis of Adam Smith which came
to grief, among other reasons, because of the erroneous doctrine that
the price of all commodities is composed of _v_ + _s_. Polemics against
this dogma dominated Marxs entire analysis of the reproductive process.
He devoted all his attention to proving that the total capital of
society must serve, not only for consumption to the full amount of the
various sources of revenue, but also for renewal of the constant
capital. And inasmuch as the purest theoretical form for this line of
reasoning is given, not by enlarged reproduction, but by simple
reproduction, Marx tends to consider reproduction mainly from a point of
view that is the very opposite of accumulation, from the assumption that
the entire surplus value is consumed by the capitalists. How greatly
these polemics influenced his analysis is proved by his returning time
and again in the course of his work to the attack on Adam Smith from the
most various angles. So already in volume i, the following pages are
devoted to it: vol.i, sect.7, chap.24, (2), pp.588-602, and in vol. ii,
pp.417-56, p.473, pp.504-8, and pp.554f.

Marx again takes up the question of total reproduction in volume 3 but
from the start becomes once more involved with the problem set by Smith
to which he devotes the whole of his 49th chapter and most of chapter 50
(pp. 968-92 and 9921022). Finally, in THEORIEN ÜBER DEN MEHRWERT, we
again find detailed polemics against Smiths dogma: pp.264-253 in vol.i,
and pp.92, 95, 126, 233, and 262 in vol.ii, part 2. Marx repeatedly
stressed and emphasised the fact that he considered replacement of the
constant capital from the aggregate social product the most difficult
and important problem of reproduction.⁽¹⁴⁾ The other problem, that of
accumulation, i.e. realisation of the surplus value for the purpose of
capitalisation, was thus pushed into the background, so that in the end
Marx hardly touched upon it.

This problem being of such paramount importance for capitalist economy,
it is not surprising that bourgeois economists have dealt with it again
and again. Attempts to grapple with this vital question for capitalist
economy, with the question whether capital accumulation is possible in
practice, come up time and again in the history of economic theory. To
these historical attempts, before and after Marx, at solving this
problem we shall now turn.

 

<< Last Chapter     |     Next Chapter >>

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾CAPITAL, vol.ii, p.572.

⁽²⁾IBID., pp.380-1.

⁽³⁾IBID., p.381.

⁽⁴⁾IBID., pp.381-3.

⁽⁵⁾IBID., p.383.

⁽⁶⁾IBID., pp.384-5.

⁽⁷⁾IBID., p.385.

⁽⁸⁾IBID., p.387.

⁽⁹⁾IBID., p.397.

⁽¹⁰⁾IBID.

⁽¹¹⁾IBID., pp.397-8.

⁽¹²⁾IBID., p.401.

⁽¹³⁾IBID., p.8ff.

⁽¹⁴⁾ Cf. e.g. Capital, vol.ii, pp.430, 522, and 529.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 12.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Two Historical Exposition of the Problem * First Round Sismondi-Malthus _v._ Say-Ricardo-MacCulloch 

 



CHAPTER 10 SISMONDIS THEORY OF REPRODUCTION


 

THE first grave doubts as to the divine character of the capitalist
order came to bourgeois economists under the immediate impact of the
first crises of 1815 and 1818-19 in England. Even then it had still been
external circumstances which led up to these crises, and they appeared
to be ephemeral. Napoleons blockade of the Continent which for a time
had cut off England from her European markets and had favoured a
considerable development of home industries, in some of the continental
countries, was partly responsible; for the rest the material exhaustion
of the Continent, owing to the long period of war, made for a smaller
demand for English products than had been expected when the blockade was
lifted. Still, these early crises were enough to reveal to the
contemporary world the sinister aspects of this best of all social
orders. Glutted markets, shops filled with goods nobody could buy,
frequent bankruptcies and on the other hand the glaring poverty of the
toiling masses for the first time all this starkly met the eyes of
theorists who had preached the gospel of the beautiful harmonies of
bourgeois _laissez-faire_ and had sung its praises in all keys. All
contemporary trade reports, periodicals and travellers notes told of the
losses sustained by English merchants. In Italy, Germany, Russia, and
Brazil, the English disposed of their commodity stocks at a loss of
anything between 25 per cent and 33¹/3 per cent. People at the Cape of
Good Hope in 1818 complained that all the shops were flooded with
European goods offered at lower prices than in Europe and still
unmarketable. From Calcutta there came similar complaints. From New
Holland whole cargoes returned to England. In the United States, a
contemporary traveller reports, there was no town nor hamlet from one
end to the other of this immense and prosperous continent where the
amount of commodities displayed for sale did not considerably exceed the
means of the purchasers, although the vendors tried to attract custom by
long-term credits, all sorts of facilities for payment, payment by
installments and acceptance of payment in kind.

At the same time, England was hearing the desperate outcry of her
workers. The EDINBURGH REVIEW of 1820⁽¹⁾ quotes an address by the
Nottingham frame-work knitters which contained the following statements:

After working from 14 to 16 hours a day, we only earn from 4_s._ to
7_s._ a week, to maintain our wives and families upon; and we farther
state, that although we have substituted bread and water, or potatoes
and salt, for that more wholesome food an Englishmans table used to
abound with, we have repeatedly retired, after a heavy days labour, and
have been under the necessity of putting our children supperless to bed,
to stifle the cries of hunger. We can most solemnly declare, that for
the last eighteen months we have scarcely known what it was to be free
from the pangs of hunger.⁽²⁾

Then Owen in England, and Sismondi in France, almost simultaneously
raised their voices in a weighty indictment of capitalist society. Owen,
as a hard-headed Englishman and citizen of the leading industrial state,
constituted himself spokesman for a generous social reform, whereas the
petty-bourgeois Swiss rather lost himself in sweeping denunciations of
the imperfections of the existing social order and of classical
economics. And yet, by so doing, Sismondi gave bourgeois economics a
much harder nut to crack than Owen, whose fertile practical activities
were directly applied to the proletariat.

Sismondi explained in some detail that the impetus for his social
criticism came from England, and especially her first crisis. In the
second edition of his NOUVEAUX PRINCIPES DECONOMIE POLITIQUE OU DE LA
RICHESSE DANS SES RAPPORTS AVEC LA POPULATION,⁽³⁾ eight years after the
publication of the first edition in 1819, he writes as follows:

It was in England that I performed the task of preparing the new
edition. England has given birth to the most celebrated Political
Economists: the science is cultivated even at this time with increased
ardour ... Universal competition or the effort always to produce more
and always cheaper, has long been the system in England, a system which
I have attacked as dangerous. This system has used production by
manufacture to advance with gigantic steps, but it has from time to time
precipitated the manufacturers into frightful distress. It was in
presence of these convulsions of wealth that I thought I ought to place
myself, to review my reasonings and compare them with facts. The study
of England has confirmed me in my NEW PRINCIPLES. In this astonishing
country, which seems to be subject to a great experiment for the
instruction of the rest of the world, I have seen production increasing,
whilst enjoyments were diminishing. The mass of the nation here, no less
than philosophers, seems to forget that the increase of wealth is not
the end in political economy, but its instrument in procuring the
happiness of all. I sought for this happiness in every class, and I
could nowhere find it. The high English aristocracy has indeed arrived
to a degree of wealth and luxury which surpasses all that can be seen in
other nations; nevertheless it does not itself enjoy the opulence which
it seems to have acquired at the expense of the other classes; security
is wanting and in every family most of the individuals experience
privation rather than abundance ... Below this titled and not titled
aristocracy, I see commerce occupy a distinguished rank; its enterprises
embrace the whole world, its agents brave the ices of the poles, and the
heats of the equator, whilst every one of its leading men, meeting on
Exchange, can dispose of thousands. At the same time, in the streets of
London, and in those of the other great towns of England, the shops
display goods sufficient for the consumption of the world. But have
riches secured to the English merchant the kind of happiness which they
ought to secure him?, No: in no country are failures so frequent,
nowhere are those colossal fortunes, sufficient in themselves to supply
a public loan to uphold an Empire, or a republic overthrown with as much
rapidity. All complain that business is scarce, difficult, not
remunerative. Twice, within an interval of a few years, a terrible
crisis has ruined part of the bankers, and spread desolation among all
the English manufacturers. At the same time another crisis has ruined
the farmers, and been felt in its rebound by retail dealers. On the
other hand, commerce, in spite of its immense extent, has ceased to call
for young men who have their fortunes to make; every place is occupied,
in the superior ranks of society no less than in the inferior; the
greater number offer their labour in vain, without, being able to obtain
remuneration. Has, then, this national opulence, whose material progress
strikes every eye, nevertheless tended to the advantage of the poor? Not
so. The people of England are destitute of comfort now, and of security
for the future. There are no longer yeomen, they have been obliged to
become day labourers. In the towns there are scarcely any longer
artisans, or independent heads of a small business, but only
manufacturers. The operative, to employ a word which the system has
created, does not know what it is to have a station; he only gains
wages, and as these wages cannot suffice for all seasons, he is almost
every year reduced to ask alms from the poor-rates. This opulent nation
has found it more economical to sell all the gold and silver which she
possessed, to do without coin, and to depend entirely on a paper
circulation; she has thus voluntarily deprived herself of the most
valuable of all the advantages of coin stability of value. The holders
of the notes of the provincial banks run the risk every day of being
ruined by frequent and, as it were, epidemic failures of the bankers;
and the whole state is exposed to a convulsion in the fortune of every
individual, if an invasion or a revolution should shake the credit of
the national bank. The English nation has found it more economical to
give up those nodes of cultivation which require much hand-labour, and
she has dismissed half the cultivators who lived in the fields. She has
found it more economical to supersede workmen by steam-engines; she has
dismissed ... the operatives in towns, and weavers giving place to
power-looms, are now sinking under famine; she has found it more
economical to reduce all working people to the lowest possible wages on
which they can subsist, and these working people being no longer
anything but a rabble, have not feared plunging into still deeper misery
by the addition of an increasing family. She has found it more
economical to feed the Irish with potatoes, and clothe them in rags; and
now every packet brings legions of Irish, who, working for less than the
English, drive them from every employment. What is the fruit of this
immense accumulation of wealth? Have they had any other effect than to
make every class partake of care, privation and the danger of complete
ruin? Has not England, by forgetting men for things, sacrificed the end
to the means?⁽⁴⁾

This mirror, held up to capitalist society almost a century before the
time of writing, is clear and comprehensive enough in all conscience.
Sismondi put his finger on every one of the sore spots of bourgeois
economics: the ruin of small enterprise; the drift from the country; the
proletarisation of the middle classes; the impoverishment of the
workers; the displacement of the worker by the machine; unemployment;
the dangers of the credit system; social antagonisms; the insecurity of
existence; crises and anarchy. His harsh, emphatic scepticism struck a
specially shrill discord with the complacent optimism, the idle worship
of harmony as preached by vulgar economics which, in the person of
MacCulloch in England and of Say in France, was becoming the fashion in
both countries. It is easy to imagine what a deep and painful impression
remarks like the following were bound to make:

There can only be luxury if it is bought with anothers labour; only
those will work hard and untiringly who have to do so in order to get
not the frills but the very necessities of life.⁽⁵⁾

Although the invention of the machine which increases mans capacity, is
a blessing for mankind, it is made into a scourge for the poor by the
unjust distribution we make of its benefits.⁽⁶⁾

The gain of an employer of labour is sometimes nothing if not despoiling
the worker he employs; he does not benefit because his enterprise
produces much more than it costs, but because he does not pay all the
costs, because he does not accord the labourer a remuneration equal to
his work. Such an industry is a social evil, for it reduces those who
perform the work to utmost poverty, assuring to those who direct it but
the ordinary profits on capital.⁽⁷⁾

Amongst those who share in the national income, one group acquires new
rights each year by new labours, the other have previously acquired
permanent rights by reason of a primary effort which makes a years
labour more advantageous.⁽⁸⁾

Nothing can prevent that every new discovery in applied mechanics should
diminish the working population by that much. To this danger it is
constantly exposed, and society provides no remedy for it.⁽⁹⁾

A time will come, no doubt, when our descendants will condemn us as
barbarians because we have left the working classes without security,
just as we already condemn, as they also will, as barbarian the nations
who reduced those same classes to slavery.⁽¹⁰⁾

Sismondis criticism thus goes right to the root of the matter; for him
there can be no compromise or evasion which might try to gloss over the
dark aspects of capitalist enrichment he exposed, as merely temporary
shortcomings of a transition period. He concludes his investigation with
the following rejoinder to Say:

For seven years I have indicated this malady of the social organism, and
for seven years it has continuously increased. I cannot regard such
prolonged suffering as the mere frictions which always accompany a
change. Going back to the origin of income, I believe to have shown the
ills we experience to be the consequence of a flaw in our organisation,
to have shown that they are not likely to come to an end.⁽¹¹⁾

The disproportion between capitalist production and the distribution of
incomes determined by the former appears to him the source of all evil.
This is the point from which he comes to the problem of accumulation
with which we are now concerned.

The main thread of his criticism against classical economics is this:
capitalist production is encouraged to expand indefinitely without any
regard to consumption; consumption, however, is determined by income.

All the modern economists, in fact, have allowed that the fortune of the
public, being only the aggregation of private fortunes, has its origin,
is augmented, distributed and destroyed by the same means as the fortune
of each individual. They all know perfectly well, that in a private
fortune, the most important fact to consider is the income, and that by
the income must be regulated consumption or expenditure, or the capital
will be destroyed. But as in the fortune of the public, the capital of
one becomes the income of another, they have been perplexed to decide
what was capital, and what income, and they have therefore found it more
simple to leave the latter entirely out of their calculations. By
neglecting a quality so essential to be determined, Say and Ricardo have
arrived at the conclusion, that consumption is an unlimited power, or at
least having no limits but those of production, whilst it is in fact
limited by income ... They announced that whatever abundance might be
produced, it would always find consumers, and they have encouraged the
producers to cause that glut in the markets, which at this time
occasions the distress of the civilised world; whereas they should have
forewarned the producers that they could only reckon on those consumers
who possessed income.⁽¹²⁾

Sismondi thus grounds his views in a theory of income. What is income,
and what is capital? He pays the greatest attention to this distinction
which he calls the most abstract and difficult question of political
economics. The fourth chapter of his second book is devoted to this
problem. As usual, Sismondi starts his investigation with Robinson
Crusoe. For such a one, the distinction between capital and income was
still confused; it becomes essential only in society. Yet in society,
too, this distinction is very difficult, largely on account of the
already familiar myth of bourgeois economics, according to which the
capital of one becomes the income of another, and _vice versa_. Adam
Smith was responsible for this confusion which was then elevated to an
atom by Say in justification of mental inertia and superficiality. It
was loyally accepted by Sismondi.

The nature of capital and of income are always confused by the mind; we
see that what is income for one becomes capital for another, and the
same object, in passing from hand to hand, successively acquires
different denominations; the value which becomes detached from an object
that has been consumed, appears as a metaphysical quantity which one
expends and the other exchanges, which for one perishes together with
the object itself and which for the other renews itself and lasts for
the time of circulation.⁽¹³⁾

After this promising introduction, Sismondi dives right into the
difficult problem and declares all wealth is a product of labour; income
is part of wealth, and must therefore have the same origin. However, it
is customary to recognise three kinds of income, called rent, profit and
wage respectively, which spring from the three sources of land,
accumulated capital and labour. As to the first thesis, he is obviously
on the wrong tack. As the wealth of a society, i.e. as the aggregate of
useful objects, of use-values, wealth is not merely a product of labour
but also of nature who both supplies raw materials and provides the
means to support human labour. Income, on the other hand, is a concept
of value. It indicates the amount to which an individual or individuals
can dispose over part of the wealth of society or of the aggregate
social product. In view of Sismondis insistence that social income is
part of social wealth, we might assume him to understand by social
income the actual annual fund for consumption. The remaining part of
wealth that has not been consumed, then, is the capital of society. Thus
we obtain at least a vague outline of the required distinction between
capital and income on a social basis. At the very next moment, however,
Sismondi accepts the customary distinction between three kinds of
income, only one of which derives exclusively from accumulated capital
while in the other two land or labour are conjoined with capital. The
concept of capital thus at once becomes hazy again. However, let us see
what Sismondi has to say about the origin of these three kinds of income
which betray a rift in the foundations of society. He is right to take a
certain development of labour productivity as his point of departure.

By reason of the advances both in industry and science, by which man has
subjugated the forces of nature, every worker can produce more, far
more, in a day than he needs to consume.⁽¹⁴⁾

Sismondi thus rightly stresses the fact that the productivity of labour
is an indispensable condition for the historical foundation of
exploitation. Yet he goes on to explain the actual origin of
exploitation in a way typical of bourgeois economics: But even though
his labour produces wealth, this wealth, if he is called upon to enjoy
it, will make him less and less fit for work. Besides, wealth hardly
ever remains in the possession of the man who must live by the work of
his hands.⁽¹⁵⁾

Thus he makes exploitation and class antagonism the necessary spur to
production, quite in accord with the followers of Ricardo and Malthus.
But now he comes to the real cause of exploitation, the divorce of
labour power from the means of production.

The worker cannot, as a rule, keep the land as his own; land, however,
has a productive capacity which human labour but directs to the uses of
man. The master of the land on which labour is performed, reserves a
share in the fruits of labour to which his land has contributed, as his
remuneration for the benefits afforded by this productive capacity.⁽¹⁶⁾

This is called rent. And further:

In our state of civilisation, the worker can no longer call his own an
adequate fund of objects for his consumption, enough to live while he
performs the labours he has undertaken until he has found a buyer. He no
longer owns the raw materials, often coming from far away, on which he
must exercise his industry. Even less does he possess that complicated
and costly machinery which facilitates his work and makes it infinitely
more productive. The rich man who possesses his consumption goods, his
raw materials and his machines, need not work himself, for by supplying
the worker with all these, he becomes in a sense the master of his work.
As reward for the advantages he has put at the workers disposal, he
takes outright the greater part of the fruits of his labour.⁽¹⁷⁾

This is called capital profits. What remains of wealth, after the cream
has been taken off twice, by landlord and capitalist; is the wage of
labour, the income of the worker. And Sismondi adds: He can consume it
without reproduction.⁽¹⁸⁾

Thus, Sismondi makes the fact of non-reproduction the criterion of
income as distinct from capital for wages as well as for rent. In this,
however, he is only right with regard to rent and the consumed part of
capital profits; as for the part of the social product which is consumed
inform of wages, it certainly does reproduce itself; it becomes the
labour power of the wage labourer for him a commodity by whose sale he
lives, which he can bring to market again and again; for society it
becomes the material form of variable capital which must reappear time
and again in the aggregate reproduction of a year, if there is to be no
loss.

So far so good. Hitherto we have only learned two facts: the
productivity of labour permits of the exploitation of the workers by
those who do not work themselves, and exploitation becomes the actual
foundation of the distribution of income owing to the divorce of the
worker from his means of production. But we still do not know what is
capital and what income, and Sismondi proceeds to clarify this point,
starting as usual with Robinson Crusoe:

In the eyes of the individual all wealth was nothing but a provision
prepared beforehand for the time of need. Even so, he already
distinguished two elements in this provision ... one part which he
budgets to have at hand for immediate or almost immediate use, and the
other which he will not need until it is to afford him new production.
Thus one, part of his corn must feed him until the next harvest, another
part, reserved for sowing, is to bear fruit the following year. The
formation of society and the introduction of exchange, permit to
increase this seed, this fertile part of accumulated wealth, almost
indefinitely, and this is what is called capital.⁽¹⁹⁾

Balderdash would be a better name for all this. In using the analogy of
seed, Sismondi here identifies means of production and capital, and this
is wrong for two reasons. First, means of production are capital not
intrinsically, but only under quite definite historical conditions;
secondly, the concept of capital covers more than just the means of
production. In capitalist society with all the conditions Sismondi
ignores the means of production are only a part of capital, i.e. they
are constant capital.

Sismondi here lost his thread plainly because he tried to establish a
connection between the capital concept and the material aspects of
social reproduction. Earlier, so long as he was concerned with the
individual capitalist, he listed means of subsistence for the workers
together with means of production as component parts of capital again a
mistake, in view of the material aspects of the reproduction of
individual capitals. Yet as soon as he tries to focus the material
foundations of social reproduction and sets out to make the correct
distinction between consumer goods and means of production, the concept
of capital dissolves in his lands.

However, Sismondi well knows that the means of production are not the
sole requisites for production and exploitation; indeed, he has the
proper instinct that the core of the relation of exploitation is the
very fact of exchange with living labour. Having just reduced capital to
constant capital, he now immediately reduces it exclusively to variable
capital:

When the farmer has put in reserve all the corn he expects to need till
the next harvest, he will find a good use for the surplus corn: he will
feed what he has left over to other people who are going to work for
him, till his land, spin and weave his hemp and wool, etc. ... By this
procedure, the farmer converts a part of his income into capital, and in
fact, this is the way in which new capital is always formed ... The corn
he has reaped over and above what he must eat while he is working, and
over and above what he will have to sow in order to maintain the same
level of exploitation, is wealth which he can give away, squander and
consume in idleness without becoming any poorer; it was income, but as
soon as he uses it to feed producers, as soon as he exchanges it for
labour, or for the fruits to come from the work of his labourers, his
weavers, his miners, it is a permanent value that multiplies and will no
longer perish; it is capital.⁽²⁰⁾

Here there is some grain mixed up with quite a lot of chaff. Constant
capital seems still required to maintain production on the old scale,
although it is strangely reduced to circulating capital, and although
the reproduction of fixed capital is completely ignored. Circulating
capital apparently is also superfluous for the expansion of
reproduction, for accumulation: the whole capitalised part of the
surplus value is converted into wages for new workers who evidently
labour in mid-air, without material means of production. The same view
is expressed even more clearly elsewhere:

When the rich man cuts down his income in order to add to his capital,
he is thus conferring a benefit on the poor, because he himself shares
out the annual product; and whatever he calls income, he will keep for
his own consumption; whatever he calls capital, he gives to the poor man
to constitute an income for him.⁽²¹⁾

Yet at the same time Sismondi gives due weight to the secret of
profit-making and the origin of capital. Surplus value arises from the
exchange of capital for labour, from variable capital, and capital
arises from the accumulation of surplus value.

With all this, however, we have not made much progress towards a
distinction between capital and income. Sismondi now attempts to
represent the various elements of production and income in terms of the
appropriate parts of the aggregate social product.

The employer of labour, as also the labourer, does not use all his
productive wealth for the sowing; he devotes part of it to buildings,
mills and tools which render the work easier and more productive, just a
share of the labourers wealth had been devoted to the permanent work of
making the soil more fertile. Thus we see how the different kinds of
wealth successively come into being and become distinct. One part of the
wealth accumulated by society is devoted by every one who possesses it
to render labour more profitable by slow consumption, and make the blind
forces of nature execute the work of man; this part is called _fixed
capital_ and comprises reclaiming, irrigation, factories, the tools of
trade, and mechanical contrivances of every description. A second part
of wealth is destined for immediate consumption, to reproduce itself in
the work it gets done, to change its form, though not its value, without
cease. This part is called _circulating capital_ and it comprises seed,
raw materials for manufacture, and wages. Finally, a third of wealth
becomes distinguishable from the second: it is the value by which the
finished job exceeds the advances which had to be made: this part is
called _income_ on capitals and is destined to be consumed without
reproduction.⁽²²⁾

After this laborious attempt to achieve a division of the aggregate
social production according to incommensurable categories, fixed
capital, circulating capital, and surplus value, Sismondi soon shows
unmistakable signs that he means constant capital when he speaks of
fixed capital, and variable capital when he speaks of circulating
capital. For all that is created, is destined for human consumption,
though fixed capital is consumed mediately while the circulating capital
passes into the consumption fund of the worker whose wage it forms. Thus
we are a little nearer to the division of the social product into
constant capital (means of production), variable capital (provisions for
the workers) and surplus value (provisions for the capitalists). But so
far Sismondis explanations are not particularly illuminating on the
subject which he himself describes as fundamental. In this welter of
confusion, at any rate, we cannot see any progress beyond Adam Smiths
massive thought.

Sismondi feels this himself and would clarify the problem by the
simplest of all methods, sighing that this movement of wealth is so
abstract and requires such great power of concentration to grasp it
properly. Thus again we put on blinkers with a focus on Robinson
[Crusoe], who in the meantime has changed to the extent that he has
produced a family and is now a pioneer of colonial policy:

A solitary farmer in a distant colony on the border of the desert has
reaped 100 sacks of corn this year; there is no market where to bring
them; this corn, in any case, must be consumed within the year, else it
will be of no value to the farmer; yet the farmer and his family eat
only 30 sacks of it; this will be his expenditure, constituting the
exchange of his income; it is not reproduced for anybody whatever. Then
he will call for workers, he will make them clear woods, and drain
swamps in his neighbourhood and put part of the desert under the plough.
These workers will eat another 30 sacks of corn: this will be their
expenditure; they will be in a position to afford this expenditure at
the price of their revenue, that is to say their labour; for the farmer
it will be an exchange: he will have converted his 30 sacks into fixed
capital. In the end, he is left with 40 sacks. He will sow them that
year, instead of the 20 he had sown the previous year; this constitutes
his circulating capital which he will have doubled. Thus the 100 sacks
will have been consumed, but, of these 100 sacks 70 are a real
investment for him, which will reappear with great increase, some of
them at the very next harvest, and the others in all subsequent
harvests. The very isolation of the farmer we have just assumed gives us
a better feeling for the limitations of such an operation. If he has
only found consumers for 60 of the 100 sacks harvested in that year, who
is going to eat the 200 sacks produced the following year by the
increase in his sowing? His family, you might say, which will increase.
No doubt; but human generations do not multiply as quickly as
subsistence. If our farmer had hands available to repeat this assumed
process each year, his corn harvest will be doubled every year, and his
family could at the most be doubled once in 25 years.⁽²³⁾

Though the example is naïve, the vital question stands out clearly in
the end: where are the buyers for the surplus value that has been
capitalised? The accumulation of capital can indefinitely increase the
production of the society. But what about the consumption of society?
This is determined by the various kinds of income. Sismondi explains
this important subject in chapter v of book ii, _The Distribution of the
National Income Among the Various Classes of Citizens_, in a resumed
effort to describe the components of the social product.

Under this aspect, the national income is composed of two parts and no
more; the one consists in annual production ... the profit arising from
wealth. The second is the capacity for work which springs from life.
This time we understand by wealth both territorial possessions and
capital, and by profit the net income accruing to the owners as well as
the profit of the capitalist.⁽²⁴⁾

Thus all the means of production are separated from the national income
as wealth, and this income is divided into surplus value and labour
power, or better, its equivalent, the variable capital. This, then,
though still far too vague, is our division into constant capital,
variable capital and surplus value. But national income, it soon
transpires, means for Sismondi the annual aggregate product of society:

Similarly, annual production, or the result of all the nations work in
the course of a year, is composed of two parts: one we have just
discussed the profit resulting from wealth; the other is the capacity
for work, which is assumed to equal the part of wealth for which it is
exchanged, or the subsistence of the workers.⁽²⁵⁾

The aggregate social product is thus resolved, in terms of value, into
two parts: variable capital and surplus value constant capital has
disappeared. We have arrived at Smiths dogma that the commodity price is
resolved into _v_ + _s_ (or is composed of _v_ + _s_) in other words,
the aggregate product consists solely of consumer goods for workers and
capitalists.

Sismondi then goes on to the problem of realizing the aggregate product.
On the one hand, the sum total of incomes in a society consists of
wages, capital profits and rents, and is thus represented by _v_ + _s_;
on the other hand, the aggregate social product, in terms of value, is
equally resolved into _v_ + _s_ so that national income and annual
production balance each other (and appear as equal quantities), i.e. so
that they must be equal in value.

Annual production is consumed altogether during the year, but in part by
the workers who, by exchanging their labour for it, convert it into
capital and reproduce it; in part by the capitalists who, exchanging
their income for it, annihilate it. The whole of the annual income is
destined to be exchanged for the whole of annual production.⁽²⁶⁾

This is the basis on which, in the sixth chapter of book ii, _On
Reciprocal Determination of Production and Consumption_, Sismondi
finally sets up the following precise law of reproduction: It is the
income of the past year which must pay for the production of the present
year.⁽²⁷⁾

If this is true, how can there be any accumulation of capital? If the
aggregate product must be completely consumed by the workers and
capitalists, we obviously remain within the bounds of simple
reproduction, and there can be no solution to the problem of
accumulation. Sismondis theory in fact amounts to a denial of the
possibility of accumulation. The aggregate so social demand being the
bulk of wages given to the workers and the previous consumption of the
capitalists, who will be left to buy the surplus product if reproduction
expands? On this count, Sismondi argues that accumulation is objectively
impossible, as follows:

What happens after all is always that we exchange the whole of
production for the whole production of the previous year. Besides, if
production gradually increases, the exchange, at the same time as it
improves, future conditions must entail a small loss every year.⁽²⁸⁾

In other words, when the aggregate product is realised, accumulation is
bound each year to create a surplus, that cannot be sold. Sismondi,
however, is afraid of drawing this final conclusion, and prefers a
middle, course necessitating a somewhat obscure subterfuge: If this loss
is not heavy, and evenly distributed, everyone will bear with it without
complaining about his income. This is what constitutes the national
economy, and the series of such small sacrifices increases capital and
common wealth.⁽²⁸⁾

If, on the other, hand, there is ruthless accumulation, this surplus
residue becomes a public calamity, and the result is crisis. Thus a
petty-bourgeois subterfuge becomes the solution of Sismondi: putting the
dampers on accumulation. He constantly polemises against the classical
school which advocates unrestricted development of the productive forces
and expansion of production; and his whole work is a warning against the
fatal consequences of giving full rein to the desire to accumulate.

Sismondis exposition proves that he was unable to grasp the reproductive
process as a whole. Quite apart from his unsuccessful attempt to
distinguish between the categories of capital and income from the point
of view of society his theory of reproduction suffers from the
fundamental error he took over from Adam Smith: the idea that personal
consumption absorbs the entire annual products without leaving any part
of the value for the renewal of society constant capitals and also, that
accumulation consists merely of the transformation of capitalised
surplus value into variable capital. Yet, if later critics of Sismondi
e.g., the Russian Marxist Ilyin,⁽²⁹⁾ think that pointing out this
fundamental error in the analysis of the aggregate product can justify a
cavalier dismissal of Sismondis entire theory of accumulation as
inadequate, as nonsense, they merely demonstrate their own obtuseness in
respect of Sismondis real concern, his ultimate problem. The analysis of
Marx at a later date, showing up the crude mistakes of Adam Smith for
the first time, is the best proof that the problem of accumulation is
far from solved just by attending to the equivalent of the constant
capital in the aggregate product. This is proved even more strikingly in
the actual development of Sismondis theory: his views involved him in
bitter controversy with the exponents and popularisers of the classical
school, with Ricardo, Say and MacCulloch. The two parties to the
conflict represent diametrically opposed points of view: Sismondi stands
for the sheer impossibility, the others for the unrestricted
possibility, of accumulation. Sismondi and his opponents alike disregard
constant capital in their exposition of reproduction, and it was Say in
particular who presumed to perpetuate Adam Smiths confused concept of
the aggregate product as _v_ + _s_ as an unassailable dogma.

The knowledge we owe to Marx that the aggregate product must, apart from
consumer goods for the workers and capitalists (_v_ + _s_), also contain
means of production to renew what has been used, that accumulation
accordingly consists not merely in the enlargement of variable but also
of constant capital, is not enough, as amply demonstrated by this
entertaining turn of events, to solve the problem of accumulation. Later
we shall see how this stress on the share of constant capital in the
reproductive process gave rise to new fallacies in the theory of
accumulation. At present it will suffice to put on record that the
deference to Smiths error about the reproduction of aggregate capital is
not a weakness unique to Sismondis position but is rather the common
ground on which the first controversy about the problem of accumulation
was fought out. Scientific research, not only in this sphere, proceeds
in devious ways; it often tackles the upper storeys of the edifice, as
it were, without making sure of the foundations; and so this conflict
only resulted in that bourgeois economics took on the further
complicated problem of accumulation without even having assimilated the
elementary problem of simple reproduction. At all events, Sismondi, in
his critique of accumulation, had indubitably given bourgeois economics
a hard nut to crack seeing that in spite of his transparently feeble and
awkward deductions, Sismondis opponents were still unable to get the
better of him.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾ In the review of an essay on _Observations on the injurious
Consequences of the Restrictions upon Foreign Commerce_, by a Member of
the late Parliament, London 1820 (EDINBURGH REVIEW, vol.lxvi,
pp.331ff.). This interesting document, from which the following extracts
are taken, an essay with a Free Trade bias, paints the general position
of the workers in England in the most dismal colours. It gives the facts
as follows:

The manufacturing classes in Great Britain ... have been suddenly
reduced from affluence and prosperity to the extreme of poverty and
misery. In one of the debates in the late Session of Parliament, it was
stated that the wages of weavers of Glasgow and its vicinity which, when
highest, had averaged about 25_s._ or 27_s._ a week, had been reduced in
1816 to 10_s._; had in 1819 to the wretched pittance of 56_s._ or 6_s_.
They have not since been materially augmented.

In Lancashire, according to the same evidence, the direct weekly wage of
the weavers was from 6_s._ to 12_s._ a week for 55 hours labour a day,
whilst half-starved children worked 12 to 16 hours a day for 2_s._ or
3_s._ a week. Distress in Yorkshire was, if possible, even greater. As
to the address by the frame-work knitters of Nottingham, the author says
that he himself investigated conditions and had come to the conclusion
that the declarations of the workers were not in the slightest degree
exaggerated.

⁽²⁾IBID., p.334.

⁽³⁾ Paris 1827.

⁽⁴⁾_Preface_ to the second edition. Translation by M. Mignet, in
POLITICAL ECONOMY AND THE PHILOSOPHY OF GOVERNMENT (London 1847),
pp.114ff.

⁽⁵⁾NOUVEAUX PRINCIPES ... (2nd ed), vol.i, p.79.

⁽⁶⁾IBID., p.xv.

⁽⁷⁾IBID., p.92.

⁽⁸⁾IBID., pp.111-12.

⁽⁹⁾IBID., p.335.

⁽¹⁾OP. CIT., vol.ii, p.435.

⁽¹⁾IBID., p.463.

⁽¹²⁾OP. CIT., vol.i, p.xiii (pp.120-1 of Mignets translation).

⁽¹³⁾IBID., p.84.

⁽¹⁴⁾IBID., p.85.

⁽¹⁵⁾IBID., p.86.

⁽¹⁶⁾IBID., pp.86-7.

⁽¹⁷⁾IBID., p.87.

⁽¹⁸⁾IBID., pp.87-8.

⁽¹⁹⁾IBID., pp.88-9.

⁽²⁰⁾IBID., pp.108-9.

⁽²¹⁾IBID., pp.93-4.

⁽²²⁾IBID., p.95.

⁽²³⁾IBID., pp.95-6.

⁽²⁴⁾IBID., pp.104-5.

⁽²⁵⁾IBID., p.105.

⁽²⁶⁾IBID., pp.105-6.

⁽²⁷⁾IBID., pp.113, 120.

⁽²⁸⁾IBID., p.121.

⁽²⁹⁾ Vladimir Ilyich [Lenin], _Economic Studies and Essays_, St.
Petersburg 1899.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 12.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Two Historical Exposition of the Problem * First Round Sismondi-Malthus _v._ Say-Ricardo-MacCulloch 

 



CHAPTER 11 MACCULLOCH _V._ SISMONDI


 

SISMONDIS emphatic warnings against the ruthless ascendancy of capital
in Europe called forth severe opposition on three sides: in England the
school of Ricardo, in France J.B. Say, the commonplace vulgariser of
Adam Smith, and the St. Simonians. While Owen in England, profoundly
aware of the dark aspects of the industrial system and of the crises in
particular, saw eye to eye with Sismondi in many respects, the school of
that other great European, St. Simon, who had stressed the
world-embracing conception of large industrial expansion, the unlimited
unfolding of the productive forces of human labour, felt perturbed by
Sismondis alarms. Here, however, we are interested in the controversy
between Sismondi and the Ricardians which proved the most fruitful from
the theoretical point of view. In the name of Ricardo, and, it seemed,
with Ricardos personal approval, MacCulloch anonymously published a
polemical article⁽¹⁾ against Sismondi in the EDINBURGH REVIEW in October
1819, i.e. immediately after the publication of the NOUVEAUX PRINCIP ES.

In 1820, Sismondi replied in Rossis ANNALES DE JURISPRUDENCE with an
essay entitled: _Does the Power of Consuming Necessarily Increase with
the Power to Produce? An Enquiry_.⁽²⁾

In his reply Sismondi⁽³⁾ himself states that his polemics were conceived
under the impact of the commercial crisis:

This truth we are both looking for, is of utmost importance under
present conditions. It may be considered as fundamental for economics
Universal distress is in evidence in the trade, in industry and, in many
countries certainly, even in agriculture. Such prolonged and
extraordinary suffering has brought misfortune to countless families and
insecurity and despondency to all, until it threatens the very bases of
the social order. Two contrasting explanations have been advanced for
the distress that has caused such a stir. Some say: we have produced too
much, and others: we have not produced enough. There will be no
equilibrium, say the former, no peace and no prosperity until we consume
the entire commodity surplus which remains unsold on the market, until
we organise production for the future in accordance with the buyers
demand. There will be a new equilibrium, say the latter, if only we
double our efforts to accumulate as well as to produce Ins a mistake to
believe that there is a glut on the market; no more than half our
warehouses are full; let us fill the other half, too, and the mutual
exchange of these new riches will revive our trade.⁽⁴⁾

In this supremely lucid way, Sismondi sets out and underlines the real
crux of the dispute. MacCullochs whole position in truth stands or falls
with the statement that exchange is actually an interchange of
commodities; every commodity accordingly represents not only supply but
demand. The dialogue then continues as follows:

Demand and supply are truly correlative and convertible terms. The
supply of one set of commodities constitutes the demand for another.
Thus, there is a demand for a given quantity of agricultural produce,
when a quantity of wrought goods equal thereto in productive cost is
offered in exchange for it; and conversely, there is an effectual demand
for this quantity of wrought goods, when the supply of agricultural
produce which it required the same expense to raise, is presented as its
equivalent.⁽⁵⁾

The Ricardians dodge is obvious: he has chosen to ignore the circulation
of money and to pretend that commodities are immediately bought and paid
for by commodities.

From the conditions of highly developed capitalist production, we are
thus suddenly taken to a stage of primitive barter such as we might find
still flourishing at present in Central Africa. There is a distant
element of truth in this trick since money, in a simple circulation of
commodities, plays merely the part of an agent. But of course, it is
just the intervention of an agent which separates the two transactions
of circulation, sale and purchase, and makes them independent of one
another in respect of both time and place. That is why a further
purchase need not follow hard upon a sale for one thing; and secondly,
sale and purchase are by no means bound up with the same people: in
fact, they will involve the same performers only in rare and exceptional
cases. MacCulloch, however, makes just this baseless assumption by
confronting, as buyer and seller, industry on the one hand and
agriculture on the other. The universality of these categories, _qua_
total categories of exchange, obscures the actual splitting up of this
social division of labour which results in innumerable private exchange
transactions where the sale and purchase of two commodities rarely come
to the same thing. MacCullochs simplified conception of commodity
exchange in general which immediately turns the commodity, into money
and pretends that it can be directly exchanged, makes it impossible to
understand the economic significance of money, its historical
appearance.

Sismondis answer to this is regrettably clumsy. In order to show that
MacCullochs explanation of commodity exchange has no application for
capitalist production, he takes recourse to the Leipsic Book Fair.⁽⁶⁾

At the Book Fair of Leipsic, booksellers from all over Germany arrive,
each with four or five publications of his own in some 40 or 50 dozen
copies; these are exchanged for others and every seller takes home 200
dozen books, just as he has brought 200 dozen, with the sole difference,
that he brought four different works and takes home 200. This is the
demand and the production which, according to M. Ricardos disciple, are
correlative and convertible; one buys the other, one pays for the other,
one is the consequence of the other. But as far as we are concerned, for
the bookseller and for the general public, demand and consumption have
not even begun. For all that it has changed hands at Leipsic, a bad book
will still be just as unsold (a bad mistake of Sismondis, this!), it
will still clutter up the merchants shops, either because nobody wants
it, or because everyone has a copy already. The books exchanged at
Leipsic will only sell if the booksellers can find individuals who not
only want them but are also prepared to make sacrifices in order to
withdraw them from circulation. They alone constitute an effective
demand.⁽⁷⁾

Although this example is rather crude, it shows clearly that Sismondi
was not side-tracked by his opponents trick, that he knows after all
what he is talking about.

MacCulloch then attempts to turn the examination from abstract commodity
exchange to concrete social conditions:

Supposing, for the sake of illustration, that a cultivator advanced food
and clothing for 100 labourers, who raised for him _food_ for 200; while
a master-manufacturer also advanced food and clothing for 100, who
fabricated for him _clothing_ for 200. Then the farmer, besides
replacing the food of his own labourers, would have food for 100 to
dispose of, while the manufacturer, after replacing the clothing of his
own labourers, would have clothing for 100 to bring to market. In this
case, the two articles would be exchanged against each other, the supply
of food constituting the demand for the clothing, and that of the
clothing the demand for the food.⁽⁸⁾

What are we to admire more in this hypothesis: the absurdity of the
set-up which reverses all actual relations, or the effrontery which
simply takes for granted in the premises all that is later claimed
proven? In order to prove that it is always possible to create an
unlimited demand for all kinds of goods, MacCulloch chooses for his
example two commodities which pertain to the most urgent and elementary
wants of every human being: food and clothing. In order to prove that
commodities may be exchanged at any time, and without regard to the
needs of society, he chooses for his example two products in quantities
which are right from the start in strict conformity with these needs,
and which therefore contain no surplus as far as society is concerned.
And yet he calls this quantity needed by society a surplus _viz._ as
measured against the producers personal requirements for his own
product, and is consequently able to demonstrate brilliantly that any
amount of commodity surplus can be exchanged for a corresponding surplus
of other commodities. Finally, in order to prove that different
privately produced commodities can yet be exchanged, although their
quantity, production costs and social importance must of course be
different, he chooses for his example commodities whose quantity,
production cost and general social necessity are precisely the same
right from the start. In short, MacCulloch posits a planned, strictly
regulated production without any overproduction in order to prove that
no crisis is possible in an unplanned private economy.

The principal joke of canny Mac, however, lies elsewhere. What is at
issue is the problem of accumulation. Sismondi was worried by, and
worried Ricardo and his followers with, the following question: if part
of the surplus value is capitalised, i.e. used to expand production over
and above the income of society, instead of being privately consumed by
the capitalists, where are we to find buyers for the commodity surplus?
What will become of the capitalised surplus value? Who will buy the
commodities in which it is hidden? Thus Sismondi and the flower of
Ricardos school, its official representative on the Chair of London
University, the authority for the then English Ministers of the Liberal
Party and for the City of London, the great Mr. MacCulloch replies by
constructing an example in which no surplus value whatever is produced.
His capitalists slave away in agriculture and industry in the name of
charity, and all the time the entire social product, including the
surplus is only enough for the needs of the workers, for the wages,
while the farmer and manufacture see to production and exchange without
food and clothing.

Sismondi, justly impatient, now exclaims: The moment we want to find out
what is to constitute the surplus of production over consumption of the
workers, it will not do to abstract from that surplus which forms the
due profit of labour and the due share of the master.⁽⁹⁾

MacCullochs only reaction is to multiply his silly argument by a
thousand. He asks the reader to assume 1,000 farmers, and also 1,000
master-manufacturers all acting as ingenuously as the individuals. The
exchange, then, proceeds as smoothly as can be desired. Finally, he
exactly doubles labour productivity in consequence of more skilful
application of labour and of the introduction of machinery thus that
every one of the 1,000 farmers, by advancing food and clothing for 100
labourers, obtains a return consisting of ordinary food for 200 together
with sugar, grapes and tobacco equal in production cost to that food,
while every manufacturer obtains, by an analogous procedure, in addition
to the previous quantity of clothing for all workers, ribbands, cambrics
and lace, equal in productive cost, and therefore in exchangeable value,
to that clothing.⁽¹⁰⁾ After such complete reversal of the chronological
order, the assumption, that is, of first the existence of private
property with wage labour, and then, at a later stage, such level of
labour productivity as makes exploitation possible at all, he now
assumes labour productivity to progress with equal speed in all spheres,
the surplus product to contain precisely the same amount of value in all
branches of industry, and to be divided among precisely the same number
of people. When these various surplus products are then exchanged
against one another, is it any wonder that the exchange proceeds
smoothly and completely to everybodys satisfaction? It is only another
of his many absurdities that MacCulloch makes the capitalists who had
hitherto lived on air and exercised their profession in their birthday
suits, now live exclusively on sugar, tobacco and wine, and array
themselves only in ribbons, cambrics and lace.

The most ridiculous performance, however, is the _volte-face_ by which
he evades the real problem. The question had been what happens to the
capitalist surplus, that surplus which is used not for the capitalists
own consumption but for the expansion of production. MacCulloch solves
it on the one hand by ignoring the production of surplus value
altogether, and on the other, by using all surplus value in the
production of luxury goods. What buyers, then, does he advance for this
new luxury production? The capitalists, evidently; the farmers and
manufacturers, since, apart from these, there are only workers in
MacCullochs model. Thus the entire surplus value is consumed for the
personal satisfaction of the capitalists, that is to say, simple
reproduction takes place. The answer to the problem of the
capitalisation of surplus value is, according to MacCulloch, either to
ignore surplus value altogether, or to assume simple reproduction
instead of accumulation as soon as surplus value comes into being. He
still _pretends_ to speak of expanding reproduction, but again, as
before when he pretended to deal with the surplus, he uses a trick,
_viz._ first setting out an impossible species of capitalist production
without any surplus value, and then persuading the reader that the
subsequent _début_ of the surplus value constitutes an expansion of
production.

Sismondi is not quite up to these Scottish acrobatics. He had up to now
succeeded in pinning his Mac down, proving him to be obviously absurd.
But now he himself becomes confused with regard to the crucial point at
issue. On the above rantings of his opponent, he should have declared
coldly: Sir, with all respect for the flexibility of your mind, you are
dodging the issue. I keep on asking, who will buy the surplus product,
if the capitalists use it for the purpose of accumulation, i.e. to
expand production, instead of squandering it altogether? And you reply:
Oh well, they will expand their production of luxury goods, which they
will, of course, eat up themselves. But this is a conjuring trick,
seeing that the capitalists consume the surplus value in so far as they
spend it on their luxuries they do not accumulate at all. My question is
about the possibility of accumulation, not whether the personal luxuries
of the capitalists are possible. Answer this clearly, if you can, or
else go play with your wine and tobacco, or go to blazes for all I care.

But Sismondi, instead of putting the screws on the vulgariser, suddenly
begins to moralise with pathos and social conscience. He exclaims: Whose
demand? Whose satisfaction? The masters or the workers in town or
country? On this new conception [of Macs] there is a surplus of
products, an advantage from labour to whom will it accrue?⁽¹¹⁾ and gives
his own answer in the following impassioned words:

But we know full well, and the history of the commercial world teaches
us all too thoroughly, that it is not the worker who profits from the
increase in products and labour; his pay is not in the least swelled by
it. M. Ricardo himself said formerly that it ought not to be, unless you
want the social wealth to stop growing. On the contrary, sorry
experience teaches us that wages nearly always contract by very reason
of this increase. Where, then, does the accumulation of wealth make
itself felt as a public benefit? Our author assumes 1,000 farmers who
profit, while 100,000 workers toil; 1,000 entrepreneurs who wax rich,
while 100,000 artisans are kept under their others. Whatever good may
result from the accumulation of the frivolous enjoyment of luxuries is
only felt by a 100th part of the nation. And will this 100th part,
called upon to consume the entire surplus product of the whole working
class, be adequate to a production that may grow without let or
hindrance, owing to progress of machinery and capitals? In the
assumption made by the author, every time the national product is
doubled, the master of the farm or of the factory must increase his
consumption a hundredfold; if the national wealth to-day, thanks to the
invention of so many machines, is a hundred times what it was when it
only covered the cost of production, every employer would to-day have to
consume enough products to support 10,000 workers.⁽¹²⁾

At this point Sismondi again believes himself to have a firm grasp on
how crises begin to arise:

We might imagine, if put to it, that a rich man can consume the goods
manufactured by 10,000 workers, this being the fate of the ribbons, lace
and cambrics whose origin the author has shown us. But a single
individual would not know how to consume agricultural products to the
same tune, the wines, sugar and spices which M. Ricardo [whom Sismondi
evidently suspected of having written the article since he only got to
know Anonymous of the EDINBURGH REVIEW at a later date] conjures up in
exchange, are too much for the table of one man. They will not sell, or
else the strict proportion between agricultural and industrial products,
apparently the basis of his whole system, cannot be maintained.⁽¹³⁾

Sismondi, we see, has thus fallen into MacCullochs trap. Instead of
waiving an answer to the problem of accumulation which refers to the
production of luxuries, he pursues his opponent into this field without
noticing that the ground under his feet has shifted. Here he finds two
causes for complaint. For one thing, he has moral objections to
MacCullochs allowing the capitalists instead of the workers to benefit
by the surplus value, and is side-tracked into polemising against
distribution under capitalism. From this digression, he unexpectedly
reverts to the original problem which he now formulates as follows: the
capitalists, then, consume the entire surplus value in luxuries. Let it
be so. But could anyone increase his consumption as rapidly and
indefinitely as the progress of labour productivity makes the surplus
value increase? And in this second instance, Sismondi himself abandons
his own problem. Instead of perceiving that it is the lack of consumers
other than workers and capitalists which accounts for the difficulty in
capitalist accumulation, he discovers a snag in simple reproduction
because the capitalists capacity to consume has physical limits. Since
the absorptive capacity of the capitalists for luxuries cannot keep up
with labour productivity, that is to say with the increase in surplus
value, there must be crises and over-production. We have encountered
this line of thought once before in the NOUVEAUX PRINCIPES so Sismondi
himself was manifestly not quite clear about the problem at all times.
And that is hardly surprising, since one can really come to grips with
the whole problem of accumulation only when one has fully grasped the
problem of simple reproduction, and we have seen how much Sismondi was
at fault in this respect.

Yet in spite of all this, the first time that Sismondi crossed swords
with the heirs of the classical school, he proved himself by no means
the weaker party. On the contrary, in the end he routed his opponent. If
Sismondi misunderstood the most elementary principles of social
reproduction and ignored constant capital, quite in keeping with Adam
Smiths dogma, he was in this respect no worse at any rate than his
opponent. Constant capital does not exist for MacCulloch either, his
farmers and manufacturers advance merely food and clothing to their
workers, and food and clothing between them make up the aggregate
product of society. If there is, then, nothing to choose between the two
as far as this elementary blunder is concerned, Sismondi towers heads
above Mac because of his intuitive understanding of the contradictions
in the capitalist mode of production. In the end, the Ricardian was at a
loss to answer Sismondis scepticism concerning the possibility of
realising the surplus value. Sismondi also shows himself more
penetrating in that he throws the Nottingham proletarians cry of
distress in the teeth of the apostles and apologists of harmony with
their smug complacency, of those who deny any surplus of production over
demand, any congestion of the market, any suffering, when he proves that
the introduction of the machine must of necessity create a superabundant
population, and particularly in the end, when he underlines the tendency
of the capitalist world market in general with its inherent
contradictions. MacCulloch denies outright that general over-production
is possible. He has a specific for every partial over-production up his
sleeve:

It may be objected, perhaps, that on the principle that the demand for
commodities increases in the same ratio as their supply, there is no
accounting for the gluts and stagnation produced by overtrading. We
answer very easily A glut is an increase in the supply of a particular
class of commodities, unaccompanied by a corresponding increase in the
supply of those other commodities which should serve as their
equivalents. While our 1,000 farmers and 1,000 master-manufacturers are
exchanging their respective surplus products, and reciprocally affording
a market to each other, if 1,000 new capitalists were to join their
society, employing each 100 labourers in tillage, there would be an
immediate glut in agricultural produce because in this case there would
be no contemporaneous increase in the supply of the manufactured
articles which should purchase it. But let one half of the new
capitalists become manufacturers, and equivalents in the form of wrought
goods will be created for the new produce raised by the other half: the
equilibrium will be restored, and the 1,500 farmers and 1,500
master-manufacturers will exchange their respective surplus products
with exactly the same facility with which the 1,000 farmers and 1,000
manufacturers formerly exchanged theirs.⁽¹⁴⁾

Sismondi answers this buffoonery which very easily pokes about in a fog,
by pointing to the real changes and revolutions which take place before
his own eyes.

It was possible to put barbarous countries under the plough, and
political revolutions, changes in the financial system, and peace, at
once brought cargoes to the ports of the old agricultural countries
which almost equalled their entire harvest. The recent Russian conquest
of the vast provinces on the Black Sea, the change in the system of
government in Egypt, and the outlawing of piracy in High Barbary, have
suddenly poured the granaries of Odessa, Alexandria and Tunis into the
Italian ports and have put such an abundance of corn on the markets that
all along the coasts the farmers trade is fighting a losing battle. Nor
is the remainder of Europe safe from a similar revolution, caused by the
simultaneous ploughing under of immense expanses of new land on the
banks of the Mississippi, which export all their agricultural produce.
Even the influence of New Holland may one day be the ruin of English
industry, if not in the price of foodstuffs, which are too expensive to
transport, at least in respect of wool and other agricultural products
which are easier to transport.⁽¹⁵⁾

What would MacCulloch have to advise in view of such an agrarian crisis
in Southern Europe? That half the new farmers should turn manufacturer.
Whereupon Sismondi counters:

Such counsel cannot seriously apply to the Tartars of the Crimea or to
the fellaheen of Egypt.

And he adds

The time is not yet ripe to set up new industries in the regions
overseas or in New Holland.⁽¹⁶⁾

Sismondis acuity recognised that industrialisation of the lands overseas
was only a matter of time. He was equally aware of the fact that the
expansion of the world market would not bring with it the solution to
the difficulty but would only reproduce it in a higher degree, in yet
more potent crises. His prediction for the expansive tendency of
capitalism is that it will reveal an aspect of fiercer and fiercer
competition, of mounting anarchy within production itself. Indeed, he
puts his finger on the fundamental causes of crises in a passage where
he states the trend of capitalist production precisely as surpassing all
limits of the market. At the end of his reply to MacCulloch he says:

Time and again it has been proclaimed that the equilibrium will
re-establish itself, that work will start again, but a single demand
each time provides an impetus in excess of the real needs of trade, and
this new activity, must soon be followed by a yet more painful glut.⁽¹⁷⁾

To such a profound grasp of the real contradictions in the movements of
capital, the _vulgarus_ on the Chair of London University with his
harmony, cant and his country-dance of 1,000 beribboned farmers and
1,000 bibulous manufacturers could find no effective answer.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾ The article in the EDINBURGH REVIEW was really directed against
Owen, sharply attacking on 24 pages of print the latters four treatises:
(1) _A New View of Society, or Essays on the formation of Human
Character_, (2) _Observations on the Effects of the Manufacturing
System_, (3) _Two Memorials on Behalf of the Working Classes, Presented
to the Governments of America and Europe_, and finally (4) _Three
Tracts_ and _An Account of Public Proceedings relative to the Employment
of the Poor_. Anonymous here attempts a detailed proof that Owens
reformist ideas by no means get down to the real causes of the misery of
the English proletariat, these causes being: the transition to the
cultivation of barren land (Ricardos theory of ground rent!), the corn
laws and high taxation pressing upon farmer and manufacturer alike. Free
trade and _laissez-faire_ thus is his alpha and omega. Given
unrestricted accumulation, all increase in production will create for
itself an increase in demand. Owen is accused of profound ignorance as
regards Say and James Mill. In his reasonings, as well as in his plans,
Mr. Owen shows himself profoundly ignorant of all the laws which
regulate the production and distribution of wealth. From Owen, the
author proceeds to Sismondi and formulates the point of contention as
follows: He [Owen] conceives that when competition is unchecked by any
artificial regulations, and industry permitted to flow in its natural
channels, the use of machinery may increase the supply of the several
articles of wealth beyond the demand for them, and by creating an excess
of all commodities, throw the working classes out of employment. This is
the position Which we hold to be fundamentally erroneous; and as it is
strongly insisted on by the' celebrated M. de Sismondi in his NOUVEAUX
PRINCIPES DÉCONOMIE POLITIQUE, we must entreat the indulgence of our
readers while we endeavour to point out its fallacy, and to demonstrate,
that the power of consuming necessarily increases with every increase in
the power of producing (EDINBURGH REVIEW, Oct. 1819, p.470).

⁽²⁾ The original title is: _Examen de cette question: Le pouvoir de
consommer saccroît-il toujours dans la société avec le pouvoir de
produire?_ We have not been able to obtain a copy of Rossis ANNALES, but
the essay as a whole was incorporated by Sismondi in the second edition
of his NOUVEAUX PRINCIPES.

⁽³⁾ At the time of writing, Sismondi was still in the dark as to the
identity of Anonymous in the EDINBURGH REVIEW.

⁴⁾ Sismondi, OP. CIT., Vol.ii, pp.376-8.

⁽⁵⁾ MacCulloch, LOC. CIT., p.470.

⁽⁶⁾ Incidently, Sismondis Leipsic Book Fair, as a microcosm of the
capitalist world, has staged a come-back after 55 years in Eugen
Dührings system. Engels, in his devastating criticism of that
unfortunate universal genius adduces this idea as proof that Dühring, by
attempting to elucidate a real industrial crisis by means of an
imaginary one on the Leipsic Book Fair, a storm at sea by a storm in a
teacup, has shown himself a real German _literatus_. But, as in many
other instances exposed by Engels, the great thinker has simply borrowed
here from someone else on the sly.

⁽⁷⁾ Sismondi, OP. CIT., vol.ii, pp.381-2.

⁽⁸⁾ MacCulloch, LOC. CIT., p.470.

⁽⁹⁾ Sismondi, OP. CIT., vol.ii, p.384.

⁽¹⁰⁾ MacCulloch, LOC. CIT., p.471.

⁽¹¹⁾ Sismondi, OP. CIT., vol.ii, pp.394-5.

⁽¹¹⁾IBID., pp.396-7.

⁽¹³⁾IBID., pp.397-8.

⁽¹⁴⁾ MacCulloch, LOC. CIT., pp.471-2.

⁽¹⁵⁾ Sismondi, OP. CIT., vol.ii, pp.400-1.

⁽¹⁶⁾ Sismondi, OP. CIT., vol.ii, p.401.

⁽¹⁷⁾IBID., pp.405-6.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 11.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Two Historical Exposition of the Problem * First Round Sismondi-Malthus _v._ Say-Ricardo-MacCulloch 

 



CHAPTER 12 RICARDO _V._ SISMONDI


 

MACCULLOCHs reply to Sismondis theoretical objections evidently did not
settle the matter to Ricardos own satisfaction. Unlike that shrewd
Scottish arch-humbug, as Marx calls him, Ricardo really wanted to
discover the truth and throughout retained the genuine modesty of a
great mind.⁽¹⁾ That Sismondis polemics against him and his pupil had
made a deep impression is proved by Ricardos revised approach to the
question of the effects of the machine, that being the point on which
Sismondi, to his eternal credit, had confronted the classical school of
harmony with the sinister aspects of capitalism. Ricardos followers had
enlarged upon the doctrine that the machine can always create as many or
even more opportunities for the wage labourers as it takes away by
displacing living labour. This so-called theory of compensation was
subjected to a stern attack by Sismondi in the chapter _On the Division
of Labour and Machinery_⁽²⁾ and in another chapter significantly
entitled: _Machinery Creates a Surplus Population_,⁽³⁾ both published in
the NOUVEAUX PRINCIPES of 1819, two years later than Ricardos main work.
In 1821, after the MacCulloch-Sismondi controversy, Ricardo inserted a
new chapter in the third edition of his PRINCIPLES, where he frankly
confesses to his error and says in the strain of Sismondi: That the
opinion entertained by the labouring classes, that the employment of
machinery is frequently detrimental to their interests, is not founded
on prejudice and error, but is conformable to the correct principles of
political economy.⁽⁴⁾

He, like Sismondi, had to defend himself against the suspicion that he
is opposing technical progress, but, less ruthless, he compromises with
the evasion that the evil emerges only gradually. To elucidate the
principle, I have been supposing, that improved machinery is _suddenly_
discovered; and extensively used; but the truth is that these
discoveries are gradual, and rather operate in determining the
employment of the capital which is saved and accumulated, than in
diverting capital from its actual employment.⁽⁵⁾

Yet the problem of crises and accumulation continued to worry Ricardo
also. In 1823, the last year of his life, he spent some days in Geneva
in order to talk the problem over face to face with Sismondi. The result
of these talks is Sismondis essay _On the Balance Between Consumption
and Production_, published in the REVUE ENCYCLOPÉDIQUE of May 1824.⁽⁶⁾

In his PRINCIPLES, Ricardo had at the crucial points completely accepted
Says trite doctrine of harmony in the relations between production and
consumption. In chapter xxi he had declared:

M. Say has, however, most satisfactorily shown, that there is no amount
of capital which may not be employed in a country, because demand is
only limited by production. No man produces, but with a view to consume
or sell, and he never sells, but with an intention to purchase some
other commodity, which may be immediately useful to him, or which may
contribute to future production. By producing, then, he necessarily
becomes either the consumer of his own goods, or the purchaser and
consumer of the goods of some other person.⁽⁷⁾

To this conception of Ricardos, Sismondis NOUVEAUX PRINCIPES were a
powerful challenge, and the dispute as a whole turned also on this
point. Ricardo could not deny the fact of crises which had but recently
passed over England and other countries. What was at issue was the
explanation for them. Right at the outset of their debate, Sismondi and
Ricardo had agreed on a remarkably lucid and precise formulation of the
problem, excluding the question of foreign commerce altogether. Sismondi
grasped the significance and necessity of foreign trade for capitalist
production, its need for expansion, well enough; in this line he was
quite in step with Ricardos Free Traders, whom he considerably excelled
in his dialectical conception of the expansionist needs of capital. He
fully admitted that industry is increasingly led to look for its vents
on foreign markets where it is threatened by greater revolutions.⁽⁸⁾ He
forecast, as we have seen, the rise of a dangerous competition for
European industry in the overseas countries. This was after all a
creditable achievement in the year 1820, and one which reveals Sismondis
deep insight into the relations of capitalist world economy. But even
so, Sismondi was in fact far from conceiving the problem of realising
the surplus value, the problem of accumulation, to depend on foreign
commerce as its only means of salvation, a view attributed to him by
later critics. On the contrary, Sismondi was quite explicit in the sixth
chapter of volume i:⁽⁹⁾

In order to make these calculations with greater certainty and to
simplify these questions, we have hitherto made complete abstraction
from foreign trade and supposed an isolated nation; this isolated nation
is human society itself, and what is true for a nation without foreign
commerce, is equally true for mankind.

In other words: in considering the entire world market as one society
producing exclusively by capitalist methods, Sismondi grounds his
problem in the same premises as Marx was to do after him. That was also
the basis on which he came to terms with Ricardo.

From the question that troubled us, we had each of us dismissed the
instance of a nation that sold more abroad than it needed to buy there,
that could command a growing external market for its growing internal
production. In any case, it is not for us to decide whether fortunes of
war or politics could perhaps bring forth new consumers for a nation
what is needed is proof that a nation can create these for itself simply
by increasing its production.⁽¹⁰⁾

This is how Sismondi formulated the problem of realising the surplus
value in all precision, just as it confronts us throughout the ensuing
era in economics, in contrast with Ricardo who actually maintains along
with Say, as we are already aware and shall show in further detail, that
production creates its own demand.

Ricardos thesis in the controversy with Sismondi takes the following
form:

Supposing that 100 workers produce 1,000 sacks of corn, and 100 weavers
1,000 yards woollen fabric. Let us disregard all other products useful
to man and all intermediaries between them, and consider them alone in
the world. They exchange their 1,000 yards against the 1,000 sacks.
Supposing that the productive power of labour has increased by a tenth
owing to a successive progress of industry, the same people will
exchange 1,100 yards against 1,100 sacks, and each will be better
clothed and fed; new progress will make them exchange 1,200 yards for
1,200 sacks, and so on. The increase in products always only increases
the enjoyment of those who produce.⁽¹¹⁾

The great Ricardo standards of reasoning, it must regretfully be stated,
are if anything even lower than those of the Scottish arch-humbug,
MacCulloch. Once again we are invited to witness a harmonious and
graceful country-dance of sacks and yards the very proportion which is
to be proved, is again, taken for granted. What is more, all relevant
premises for the problem are simply left out. The real problem you will
recollect the object of the controversy had been the question: who are
the buyers and consumers of the surplus product that comes into being if
the capitalists produce more goods than are needed for their own and
their workers consumption; if, that is to say, they capitalise part of
their surplus value and use it to expand production, to increase their
capital? Ricardo answers it by completely ignoring the capital increase.
The picture he paints of the various stages of production is merely that
of a gradually increasing productivity of labour. According to his
assumptions, the same amount of labour first produces 1,000 sacks and
1,000 yards textiles, then 1,100 sacks and 1,100 yards, further 1,200
sacks and 1,200 yards, and so on, in a gracefully ascending curve. Not
only that the image of a marshalled uniform progression on both sides,
of conformity even in the number of objects brought to exchange, is
wearisome, the expansion of capital is nowhere as much as mentioned in
the model. Here we have no enlarged but simple reproduction with a
greater bulk of use-values indeed, but without any increase in the value
of the aggregate social product. Since only the amount of value, not the
number of use-values is relevant to the exchange transaction, and this
amount remains constant in the example, Ricardo makes no real advances,
even though he seems to analyse the progressive expansion of production.
Finally, he is quite oblivious of the relevant categories of
reproduction. MacCulloch had, begun by making the capitalists produce
without any surplus value and live on air, but at least he recognised
the existence of the workers, making provision for their consumption.
Ricardo, however, does not even mention the workers; for him the
distinction between variable capital and surplus value does not exist at
all. Besides this major omission, it is of small account that he, just
like his disciple, takes no notice of constant capital. He wants to
solve the problem of realising the surplus value and expanding capital
without positing more than the existence of a certain quantity of
commodities which are mutually exchanged.

Sismondi was blind to the fact that the venue has been changed
altogether. Yet he tried faithfully to bring the fantasies of his famous
guest and opponent down to earth and to analyse their invisible
contradictions, plaintively saying that these assumptions, just like
German metaphysics, abstract from time and space.⁽¹²⁾ He grafts Ricardos
hypothesis on to society in its real organisation, with unpropertied
workers whose wage is fixed by competition and who can be dismissed the
moment their master has no further need of their work ... for remarks
Sismondi, as acute as he is modest it is just this social organisation
to which our objection refers.⁽¹³⁾

He lays bare the many difficulties and conflicts bound up with the
progress of labour productivity under capitalism, and shows that
Ricardos postulated changes in the technique of labour, from the point
of view of society, lead to the following alternative: Either a number
of workers corresponding to the increase in labour productivity will
have to he dismissed outright then there will be a surplus of products
on the one hand, and on the other unemployment and misery a faithful
picture of present-day society. Or the surplus product will be used for
the maintenance of the workers in a new field of production, the
production of luxury goods. Here Sismondi undoubtedly proves himself
superior: he suddenly remembers the existence of the constant capital,
and now it is he who subjects the English classic to a frontal attack:

For setting up a new industry for manufacturing luxuries, new capital is
also needed; machines will have to be built, raw materials procured, and
distant commerce brought into activity; for the wealthy are rarely
content, with enjoying what is immediately in front of them. Where,
then, could we find this new capital which may perhaps be much more
considerable than that required by agriculture? ... Our luxury workers
are still a long way from eating our labourers grain, from wearing the
clothes from our common factories; they are not yet made into workers,
they may not even have been born yet, their trade does not exist, the
materials on which they are to work have not arrived from India. All
those among whom the former should distribute their bread, wait for it
in vain.⁽¹⁴⁾

Sismondi now takes constant capital into account, not only in the
production of luxuries, but also in agriculture, and further raises the
following objection against Ricardo:

We must abstract from time, if we make the assumption that the
cultivator, whom a mechanical discovery or an invention of rural
industry enables to treble the productive power of his workers, will
also find sufficient capital to treble his exploitation, his
agricultural implements, his equipment, his livestock, his granaries: to
treble the circulating capital which must serve him while waiting for
his harvest.⁽¹⁵⁾

In this way Sismondi breaks with the superstition of the classical
school that with capital expanding all additional capital would be
exclusively spent on wages, on the variable capital. He clearly dissents
from Ricardos doctrine which did not, however, prevent his allowing all
the errors arising out of this doctrine three years later again to creep
into the second edition of his NOUVEAUX PRINCIPES. In opposition to
Ricardos facile doctrine of harmony, Sismondi underlines two decisive
points: on the one hand, the objective difficulties of the process of
enlarged reproduction which works by no means so smoothly in capitalist
reality as it does in Ricardos absurd hypothesis; on the other hand, the
fact that all technical progress in social labour productivity is always
achieved under capitalism at the expense of the working class, bought
with their suffering. Sismondi shows himself superior to Ricardo in yet
a third point: he represents the broad horizon of the dialectical
approach as against Ricardos blunt narrow-mindedness with its incapacity
to conceive of any forms of society other than those of bourgeois
economics:

Our eyes, he exclaims, are so accustomed to this new organisation of
society, this universal competition, degenerating into hostility between
the rich and the working class, that we no longer conceive of any mode
of existence other than that whose ruins surround us on all sides. They
believe to prove me absurd by confronting me with the vices of preceding
systems. Indeed, as regards the organisation of the lower classes, two
or three systems have succeeded one another; yet, since they are not to
be regretted, since, after first doing some good, they then imposed
terrible disasters on mankind, may we conclude from this that we have
now entered the true one? May we conclude that we shall not discover the
besetting vice of the system of wage labour as we have discovered that
of slavery, of vassalage, and of the guilds? A time will come, no doubt,
when our descendants will condemn us as barbarians because we have left
the working classes without security, just as we already condemn, as
they also will, as barbarian the nations who have reduced those same
classes to slavery.⁽¹⁶⁾

Sismondis statement, putting in a nutshell the vital differences between
the parts played by the proletariat in a modern society and in the
society of ancient Rome, shows his profound insight into historical
connections. He shows no less discern then in his polemics against
Ricardo, when analysing the specific economic character of the
slave-system and of feudal economy as well as their relative historical
significance, and finally then emphasising, as the dominant universal
tendency of bourgeois economy, that it severs completely all kind of
property from every kind of labour.

The second round, no more than the first, between Sismondi and the
classical school, brought little glory for Sismondis opponents.⁽¹⁷⁾

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾ It is typical that on his election to Parliament in 1819, when he
already enjoyed the highest reputation on account of his economic
writings, Ricardo wrote to a friend: You will have seen that I have
taken my seat in the House of Commons. I fear I shall be of little use
there. I have twice attempted to speak but I proceeded in the most
embarrassed manner, and I have no hope of conquering the alarm with
which I am assailed the moment I hear the sound of my own voice (LETTERS
OF M. RICARDO TO J.R. MACCULLOCH, N.Y. 1895, pp. 23-4). Such diffidence
was quite unknown to the gasbag MacCulloch.

⁽²⁾NOUVEAUX PRINCIPES ..., book iv, chap.vii.

⁽³⁾IBID., book vii, chap.vii.

⁽⁴⁾ D. Ricardo, ON THE PRINCIPLES OF POLITICAL ECONOMY AND TAXATION (3rd
edition, London 1821), p.474.

⁽⁵⁾IBID., p.478.

⁽⁶⁾ This essay, _Sur la Balance des Consommations avec les Productions_,
is reprinted in the second edition of NOUVEAUX PRINCIPES, vol.ii,
pp.408ff. Sismondi tells us about this discussion:

M. Ricardo, whose recent death has been a profound bereavement not only
to his friends and family but to all those whom he enlightened by his
brilliance, all those whom he inspired by his lofty sentiments, stayed
for some days in Geneva in the last year of his life. We discussed in
two or three sessions this fundamental question on which we disagreed.
To this enquiry he brought the urbanity, the good faith, the love of
truth which distinguished him, and a clarity which his disciples
themselves had not heard, accustomed as they were to the efforts of
abstract thought he demanded in the lecture room.

⁽⁷⁾ Ricardo, OP. CIT., p.339.

⁽⁸⁾ Sismondi, OP. CIT., vol.ii, p.361.

⁽⁹⁾NOUVEAUX PRINCIPES ..., book iv, chap.iv; _Comment la Richesse
commerciale suit lAccroissement du Revenu_ (vol.i, p.115).

⁽¹⁰⁾ Sismondi, OP. CIT., vol.ii, p.412.

⁽¹¹⁾IBID., p.416.

⁽¹²⁾IBID., p.424.

⁽¹³⁾IBID., p.417.

⁽¹⁴⁾IBID., pp.425-6.

⁽¹⁵⁾IBID., p.429.

⁽¹⁶⁾IBID., pp.434-5.

⁽¹⁷⁾ Thus, if Tugan Baranovski, championing Say-Ricardos views, tells us
about the controversy between Sismondi and Ricardo (STUDIES ON THE
THEORY AND HISTORY OF COMMERCIAL CRISES IN ENGLAND, p.176), that
Sismondi was compelled to acknowledge as correct the doctrine he had
attacked and to concede his opponent all that is necessary; that
Sismondi himself had abandoned his own theory which still finds so many
adherents, and that the victory in this controversy lies with Ricardo,
this shows a lack of discrimination to put it mildly such as is
practically unheard-of in a work of serious scientific pretensions.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 11.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Two Historical Exposition of the Problem * First Round Sismondi-Malthus _v._ Say-Ricardo-MacCulloch 

 



CHAPTER 13 SAY _V._ SISMONDI


 

SISMONDIS essay against Ricardo in the REVUE ENCYCLOPÉDIQUE of May 1824,
was the final challenge for J.B. Say, at that time the acknowledged
prince of economic science (_prince de la science économique_), the
so-called representative, heir and populariser of the school of Adam
Smith on the Continent. Say, who had already advanced some arguments
against Sismondi in his letters to Malthus, countered the following July
with an essay on _The Balance Between Consumption and Production_ in the
REVUE ENCYCLOPÉDIQUE, to which Sismondi in turn published a short reply.
The chronology of Sismondis polemical engagements was thus inverse to
the sequence of the opposing theories, for it had been Say who first
communicated his doctrine of a divinely established balance between
production and consumption to Ricardo who had in turn handed it down to
MacCulloch. In fact, as early as 1803, Say, in his TRAITÉ D'ÉCONOMIE
POLITIQUE, book i, chapter xii, had coined the following peremptory
statement: Products are paid for with other products. It follows that if
a nation has too many goods of one kind, the means of selling them would
be to create goods of a different kind.⁽¹⁾

Here we meet again the all too familiar conjuring recipe which was
accepted alike by Ricardos school and by the vulgar economists as the
corner-stone of the doctrine of harmony.⁽²⁾

Essentially, Sismondis principal work constitutes a sustained polemic
against this thesis. At this stage Say charges to the attack in the
REVUE ENCYCLOPÉDIQUE with a complete _volte-face_, as follows:

Objection may be made that, because of mans intelligence, because of the
advantage he can draw from the means provided by nature and artifice,
every human society can produce all the things fit to satisfy its needs
and increase its enjoyment in far larger quantities than it can itself
consume. But there I would ask how it is possible that we know of no
nation that is supplied with everything. Even in what rank as prospering
nations seven eighths of the population, are lacking in a multitude of
things considered necessities in ... I will not say wealthy family, but
in a modest establishment. The village I live in at present lies in one
of the richest parts of France; yet in 19 out of 20 houses I enter here,
I see but the coarsest fare and nothing that makes for the well-being of
the people, none of the things the English call comforts.⁽³⁾

There is something to admire about the effrontery of the excellent Say.
It was he who had maintained that in a capitalist economy there could be
no difficulties, no surplus, no crises and no misery; since goods can be
bought one for the other, we need only go on producing more and more and
everything in the garden will be lovely. It was in Says hands that this
postulate had become a tenet of the doctrine of harmony, that doctrine
so typical of vulgar economics, which had evoked a sharp protest from
Sismondi who proved this view untenable. The latter had shown that goods
cannot be sold in any quantity you like, but that a limit is set to the
realisation of goods by the income of society in each case, by
_v_ + _s_; inasmuch as the wages of the workers are depressed to a mere
subsistence level, and inasmuch as there is also a natural limit to the
consumptive capacity of the capitalist class, an expansion of
production, Sismondi says, must inevitably lead to slumps, crises and
ever greater misery for the great masses. Says come-back to this is
masterly in its ingenuity. If you will insist that over-production is
possible, how can it happen that there are so many people in our society
who are naked, hungry and in want? Pray, explain this contradiction if
you can. Say, whose own position excels by contriving blithely to shrug
off the circulation of money altogether by operating with a system of
barter, now censures his critic for speaking of an over-abundance of
products in relation not only to purchasing power but to the real needs
of society, and that although Sismondi had left no doubt at all about
this very salient point of his deductions. Even if there is a very great
number of badly fed, badly clothed and badly housed people in a society,
the society can only sell what it buys, and, as we have seen, it can
only buy with its income.⁽⁴⁾

A little further on, Say concedes this point but alleges that his
opponent has made a new mistake: It is not consumers, then, in which the
nation is lacking, he says, but-purchasing power. Sismondi believes that
this will be more extensive, when the products are rare, when
consequently they are dearer and their production procures ampler pay
for the workers.⁽⁵⁾

That is how Say attempts to degrade, in his own trite method of thought,
or better, method of canting, Sismondis theory which attacked the very
foundations of capitalist organisation and its mode of distribution. He
burlesques the NOUVEAUX PRINCIPES, turning them into a plea for rare
goods and high prices, and holds up to them the mirror of an artfully
flattered capitalist accumulation at its peak. If production becomes
more vigorous, he argues, labour grows in numbers and the volume of
production expands, the nations will be better and more universally
provided for, and he extols the conditions in countries where industrial
development is at its highest, as against the misery of the Middle Ages.
Sismondis maxims he declares subversive to capitalist society: Why does
he call for an inquiry into the laws which might oblige the entrepreneur
to guarantee a living for the worker he employs? Such an inquiry would
paralyse the spirit of enterprise. Merely the feat that the authorities
might interfere with private contracts is a scourge and harmful to the
wealth of a nation.⁽⁶⁾

Not to be diverted from his purpose by this indiscriminate apologia of
Says, Sismondi once more turns the discussion on the fundamental issue.

Surely I have never denied that since the time: of Louis XIV France has
been able to double her population and to quadruple her consumption, as
he contends. I have only claimed that the increase of products is a good
if it is desired, paid for and consumed; that, on the other hand, it is
an evil if, there being no demand, the only hope of the producer is to
entice the consumers of a rival industry's products. I have tried to
show that the natural course of the nations is progressive increase of
their property, an increase consequent upon theft demand for new
products and their means to pay for them, but that in consequence of our
institutions, of our legislation having robbed the working class of all
property and every security, they have also been spurred to a disorderly
labour quite out of touch with the demand and with purchasing power,
which accordingly only aggravates poverty.⁽⁷⁾

And he winds up the debate by inviting the preacher of harmony to
reflect upon the circumstance that, though a nation may be rich, public
misery no less than material wealth is constantly on the increase, the
class which produces everything being daily brought nearer to a position
where it may consume nothing. On this shrill discordant note of
capitalist contradictions closes the first clash about the problem of
accumulation.

Summing up the general direction of this first battle of wits, we must
note two points:

(1) In spite of all the confusion in Sismondis analysis, his superiority
to both Ricardo and his followers and to the self styled heir to the
mantle of Adam Smith is quite unmistakable. Sismondi, in taking things
from the angle of reproduction, looks for concepts of value (capital and
income) and for factual elements (producer and consumer goods) as best
he can, in order to grasp how they are interrelated within the total
social process. In this he is nearest to Adam Smith, with the difference
only that the contradictions there appearing as merely subjective and
speculative, are deliberately stressed as the keynote of Sismondis
analysis where the problem of capital accumulation is treated as the
crucial point and principal difficulty.

Sismondi has therefore made obvious advances on Adam Smith, while
Ricardo and his followers as well as Say throughout the debate think
solely in terms of simple commodity production. They only see the
formula CMC, even reducing everything to barter, and believe that such
barren wisdom can cover all the problems specific to the process of
reproduction and accumulation. This is a regress even on Smith, and over
such myopic vision, Sismondi scores most decisively. He, the social
critic, evinces much more understanding for the categories of bourgeois
economics than their staunchest champions just as, at a later date, the
socialist Marx was to grasp infinitely more keenly than all bourgeois
economists together the _differentia specifica_ of the mechanism of
capitalist economy. If Sismondi exclaims in the face of Ricardos
doctrine: What, is wealth to be all, and man a mere nothing?⁽⁸⁾ it is
indicative not only of the vulnerable moral strain in his
petty-bourgeois approach compared to the stern, classical impartiality
of Ricardo, but also of a critical perception, sharpened by social
sensibilities for the living social connections of economy; an eye, that
is, for intrinsic contradictions and difficulties as against the rigid,
hidebound and abstract views of Ricardo and his school. The controversy
had only shown up the fact that Ricardo, just like the followers of Adam
Smith, was not even able to grasp, let alone solve the puzzle of
accumulation put by Sismondi.

(2) The clue to the problem, however, was already impossible of
discovery, because the whole argument had been side-tracked and
concentrated upon the problem of crises. It is only natural that the
outbreak of the first crisis should dominate the discussion, but no less
natural that this effectively prevented either side from recognising
that crises are far from constituting the problem of accumulation, being
no more than its characteristic phenomenon: one element in the cyclical
form of capitalist reproduction. Consequently, the debate could only
result in a twofold _quid pro quo_: one party deducing from crises that
accumulation is impossible, and the other from barter that crises are
impossible. Subsequent developments of capitalism were to give the lie
to both conclusions alike.

And yet, Sismondis criticism sounds the first alarm of economic theory
at the domination of capital, and for this reason its historical
importance is both great and lasting. It paves the way for the
disintegration of a classical economics unable to cope with the problem
of its own making. But for all Sismondis terror of the consequences
attendant upon capitalism triumphant, he was certainly no reactionary in
the sense of yearning for pre-capitalistic conditions, even if on
occasion he delights in extolling the patriarchal forms of production in
agriculture and handicrafts in comparison with the domination of
capital. He repeatedly and most vigorously protests against such an
interpretation as e.g., in his polemic against Ricardo in the _Revue
Encyclopédique_:

I can already hear the outcry that I jib at improvements in agriculture
and craftsmanship and at every progress man could make; that I doubtless
prefer a state of barbarism to a state of civilisation, since the plough
is a tool, the spade an even older one, and that, according to my
system, man ought no doubt to work the soil with his bare hands.

I never said anything of the kind, and I crave indulgence to protest
once for all against all conclusions imputed to my system such as I
myself have never drawn. Neither those who attack me nor those who
defend me have really understood me, and more than once I have been put
to shame by my allies as much as by my opponents. I beg you to realise
that it is not the machine, new discoveries and inventions, not
civilisation to which I object, but the modern organisation of society,
an organisation which despoils the man who works of all property other
than his arms, and denies him the least security in a reckless
over-bidding that makes for his harm and to which he is bound to fall a
prey.⁽⁹⁾

There can be no question that the interests of the proletariat were at
the core of Sismondis criticism, and he is making no false claims when
he formulates his main tendency as follows:

I am only working for means to secure the fruits of labour to those who
do the work, to make the machine benefit the man, who puts it in
motion.⁽¹⁰⁾

When pressed for a closer definition of the social organisation towards
which he aspires, it is true he hedges and confesses himself unable to
do so:

But what remains to be done is of infinite difficulty, and I certainly
do not intend to deal with it to-day. I should like to convince the
economists as completely as I am convinced myself that their science is
going off on a wrong tack. But I cannot trust myself to be able to show
them the true course; it is a supreme effort the most my mind will run
to to form a conception even of the actual organisation of society. Yet
who would have the power to conceive of an organisation that does not
even exist so far, to see the future, since we are already hard put to
it to see the present?⁽¹¹⁾

Surely it was no disgrace to admit oneself frankly powerless to envisage
a future beyond capitalism in the year 1820 at a time when capitalism
had only just begun to establish its domination over the big industries,
and when the idea of socialism was only possible in a most Utopian form.
But as Sismondi could neither advance beyond capitalism nor go back to a
previous stage, the only course open to his criticism was a
petty-bourgeois compromise. Sceptical of the possibility of developing
fully both capitalism and the productive forces, he found himself under
necessity to clamour for some moderation of accumulation, for some
slowing down of the triumphant march of capitalism. That is the
reactionary aspect of his criticism.⁽¹²⁾

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾ Largent ne remplit quun office passager dans ce double échanges. Les
échanges terminés, il se trouve quon a payé des produits avec des
produits. En conséquence, quand une nation a trop de produits dans un
genre, le moyen de les écouler est dun créer dun autre genre (J.B. Say,
TRAITÉ DÉCONOMIE POLITITIQUE, Paris 1803, vol.i, p.154)

⁽²⁾ In fact, here again, Says only achievement lies in having given a
pompous and dogmatic form to an idea that others had expressed before
him. As Bergmann points out, in his THEORY OF CRISES (Stuttgart 1895),
the work of Josiah Tucker (1752), Turgots annotations to the French
pamphlets, the writings of Quesnay, Dupont de Nemours, and of others
contain quite similar observations on a natural balance, or even
identity, between demand and supply. Yet the miserable Say, as Marx once
called him, claims credit as the evangelist of harmony for the great
discovery of the _théorie des débouchés_, modestly comparing his own
work to the discovery of the principles of thermodynamics, of the lever,
and of the inclined plane. In the preface and table of contents, e.g.,
to the 6th edition of his TRAITÉ (1841, pp.51, 616) he says: The theory
of exchange and of vents, such as it is developed in this work, will
transform world politics. The same point of view is also expounded by
James Mill in his COMMERCE DEFENDED of 1808, and it is he whom Marx
calls the real father of the doctrine of a natural equilibrium between
production and demand.

⁽³⁾ Say in REVUE ENCYCLOPÉDIQUE, vol.23, July 1824, pp.20f.

⁽⁴⁾NOUVEAUX PRINCIPES ..., vol.i, p.117.

⁽⁵⁾ Say, LOC. CIT., p.21.

⁽⁶⁾ Say, LOC. CIT., p.29. Say indicts Sismondi as the arch-enemy of
bourgeois society in the following ranting peroration:

It is against the modern organisation of society, an organisation which,
by despoiling the working man of all property save his hands, gives him
no security in the face of a competition directed towards his detriment.
What! Society despoils the working man because it ensures to every kind
of entrepreneur free disposition over his capital, that is to say his
property! I repeat: there is nothing more dangerous than views conducive
to a regulation of the employment of property for hands and faculties
... are also property (IBID., p.30).

⁽⁷⁾ Sismondi, OP. CIT., pp.462-3.

⁽⁸⁾IBID., p.331.

⁽⁹⁾IBID., pp.423-3.

⁽¹⁰⁾IBID., p.449.

⁽¹¹⁾IBID., p.448.

⁽¹²⁾ Marx, in his history of the opposition to Ricardos school and its
dissolution, makes only brief mention of Sismondi, explaining: I leave
Sismondi out of this historical account, because the criticism of his
views belongs to a part with which I can deal only after this treatise,
the actual movement of capital (competition and credit) (THEORIEN ÜBER
DEN MEHRWERT, vol.21, p.52). Later on, however, in connection with
Malthus, he also deals with Sismondi in a passage that, on the whole, is
comprehensive:

Sismondi is profoundly aware of the self-contradiction of capitalist
production; he feels that its forms, its productive conditions, spur on
an untrammelled development of the productive forces and of wealth on
the one hand, yet that these conditions, on the other, are only
relative; that their contradictions of value-in-use and
value-in-exchange, of commodity and money, of sale and purchase, of
production and consumption, of capital and wage labour, and so on, take
on ever larger dimensions, along with the forward strides of the
productive forces. In particular, he feels the fundamental conflict:
here the untrammelled development of productive power and of a wealth
which, at the same time, consists in commodities, must be monetised; and
there the basis restriction of the mass of producers to the necessary
means of subsistence. He therefore does not, like Ricardo, conceive of
the crises as merely incidental, but as essential, as eruptions of the
immanent conflicts on ever grander scale and at determinate periods.
Which faces him with the dilemma: is the state to put restrictions on
the _productive forces_ to adapt them to the productive conditions, or
upon the _productive conditions_ to adapt them to the _productive
forces_? Frequently he has recourse to the past, becomes _loudator
temporis acti_, and seeks to master the contradictions by a different
regulation of income relative to capital, or of distribution relative to
production, quite failing to grasp that the relation of distribution are
nothing but the relations of production _sub alia specie_. He has a
perfect picture of the contradictions immanent in bourgeois production,
yet he does not understand them, and therefore fails also to understand
the process of their disintegration. (And indeed, how could he, seeing
this production was still in the making? _R.L._) And yet, his view is in
fact grounded in the premonition that new forms of appropriating wealth
must answer to the productive forces, developed in the womb of
capitalist production, to the material and social conditions of creating
this wealth; that the bourgeois forms of appropriation are but
transitory and contradictory, wealth existing always with contrary
aspects and presenting itself at once as its opposite. Wealth is ever
based on the premises of poverty, and can develop only by developing
poverty (IBID., p.55).

In THE POVERTY OF PHILOSOPHY, Marx opposes Sismondi to Proudhon in
sundry passages, yet about the man himself he only remarks tersely:

Those, who, like Sismondi, wish to return to the true proportions of
production, while preserving the present basis of society, are
reactionary, since, to be consistent, they must also wish to bring all
the other conditions of industry of former times (THE POVERTY OF
PHILOSOPHY, London 1936, p.57).

Two short references to Sismondi are in ON THE CRITIQUE OF POLITICAL
ECONOMY: once he is ranked, as the last classic of bourgeois economies
in France, with Ricardo in England; in another passage emphasis is laid
on the fact that Sismondi, contrary to Ricardo, underlined the
specifically social character of labour that creates value. In the
COMMUNIST MANIFESTO, finally, Sismondi is mentioned as the head of the
petty-bourgeois school.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 11.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Two Historical Exposition of the Problem * First Round Sismondi-Malthus _v._ Say-Ricardo-MacCulloch 

 



CHAPTER 14 MALTHUS


 

At the same time as Sismondi, Malthus also waged war against some of the
teachings of Ricardo. Sismondi, in the second edition of his work as
well as in his polemics, repeatedly referred to Malthus as an authority
on his side. Thus he formulated the common aims of his campaign against
Ricardo in the REVUE ENCYCLOPÉDIQUE:

Mr. Malthus, on the other hand, has maintained in England, as I have
tried to do on the Continent, that consumption is not the necessary
consequence of production, that the needs and desires of man, though
they are truly without limits, are only satisfied by consumption in so
far as means of exchange go with them. We have affirmed that it is not
enough to create these means of exchange, to make them circulate among
those who have these desires and wants; that it can even happen
frequently that the means of exchange increase in society together with
a decrease in the demand for labour, or wages, so that the desires and
wants of one part of the population cannot be satisfied and consumption
also decreases. Finally, we have claimed that the unmistakable sign of
prosperity in a society is not an increasing production of wealth, but
an increasing demand for labour, or the offer of more and more wages in
compensation for this labour. Messrs. Ricardo and Say, though not
denying that an increasing demand for labour is a symptom of prosperity,
maintained that it inevitably results from an increase of production. As
for Mr. Malthus and myself, we regard these two increases as resulting
from independent causes which may at times even be in opposition.
According to our view, if the demand for labour has not preceded and
determined production, the market will be flooded, and then new
production becomes a cause of ruin, not of enjoyment.⁽¹⁾

These remarks suggest far-reaching agreement, a brotherhood in arms of
Sismondi and Malthus, at least in their opposition against Ricardo and
his school. Marx considers the PRINCIPLES OF POLITICAL ECONOMY, which
Malthus published in 1820, an outright plagiarism of the NOUVEAUX
PRINCIPES which had been published the year before. Yet Sismondi and
Malthus are frequently at odds regarding the problem with which we are
here concerned.

Sismondi is critical of capitalist production, he attacks it sharply,
even denounces it, while Malthus stands for the defence. This does not
mean that he denies its inherent contradictions, as Say or MacCulloch
had done. On the contrary he raises them quite unmercifully to the
status of a natural law and asserts their absolute sanctity. Sismondis
guiding principle is the interests of the workers. He aspires, though
rather generally and vaguely, towards a thoroughgoing reform of
distribution in favour of the proletariat. Malthus provides the ideology
for those strata who are the parasites of capitalist exploitation, who
live on ground rent and draw upon the common wealth; and advocates the
allocation of the greatest possible portion of the surplus value to
these unproductive consumers. Sismondis general approach is
predominantly ethical, it is the approach of the social reformer.
Improving upon the classics, he stresses, in opposition to them, that
consumption is the only end of accumulation, and pleads for restricted
accumulation. Malthus, on the contrary, bluntly declares that production
has no other purpose than accumulation and advocates unlimited
accumulation by the capitalists, to be supplemented and assured by the
unlimited consumption of their parasites. Finally, Sismondi starts off
with a critical analysis of the reproductive process, of the relation
between capital and income from the point of view of society; while
Malthus, opposing Ricardo, begins with an absurd theory of value from
which he derives an equally absurd theory of surplus value, attempting
to explain capitalist profits as an addition to the price over and above
the value of commodities.⁽²⁾

Malthus opposes the postulate that supply and demand are identical with
a detailed critique in chapter vi of his DEFINITIONS IN POLITICAL
ECONOMY.⁽³⁾ In his ELEMENTS OF POLITICAL ECONOMY, James Mill had
declared:

What is it that is necessarily meant, when we say that the supply and
the demand are accommodated to one another? It is this: that goods which
have been produced by a certain quantity of labour, exchange for goods
which have been produced by an equal quantity of labour. Let this
proposition be duly attended to, and all the rest is clear. Thus, if a
pair of shoes is produced with an equal quantity of labour as a hat, so
long as a hat exchanges for a pair of shoes, so long the supply and
demand are accommodated to one another. If it should so happen, that
shoes fell in value, as compared with hats, which is the same thing as
hats rising in value compared with shoes, this would simply imply that
more shoes had been brought to market, as compared with hats. Shoes
would then be in more than the due abundance. Why? Because in them the
produce of a certain quantity of labour would not exchange for the
produce of an equal quantity. But for the very same reason hats would be
in less than the due abundance, because the produce of a certain
quantity of labour in them would exchange for the produce of more than
an equal quantity in shoes.⁽⁴⁾

Against such trite tautologies, Malthus marshals a twofold argument. He
first draws Mills attention to the fact that he is building without
solid foundations. In fact, he argues, even without an alteration in the
ratio of exchange between hats and shoes, there may yet be too great a
quantity of _both_ in relation to the demand. This will result in both
being sold at less than the cost of production plus an appropriate
profit.

But can it be said on this account, he asks, that the supply of hats is
suited to the demand for hats, or the supply of shoes suited to the
demand for shoes, when they are both so abundant that neither of them
will exchange for what will fulfil the conditions of their continued
supply?⁽⁵⁾

In other words, Malthus confronts Mill with the possibility of general
over-production: ... when they are compared with the costs of production
... it is evident that ... they may all fall or rise at the same
time.⁽⁶⁾

Secondly, he protests against the way in which Mill, Ricardo and company
are wont to model their postulates on a system of barter:

The hop planter who takes a hundred bags of hops to Weyhill fair, thinks
little more about the supply of hats and shoes than he does about the
spots in the sun. What does he think about, then? and what does he want
to exchange his hops for? Mr. Mill seems to be of opinion that it would
show great ignorance of political economy, to say that what he wants is
money; yet, notwithstanding the probable imputation of this great
ignorance, I have no hesitation in distinctly asserting, that it really
is money which he wants ...⁽⁷⁾

For the rest, Malthus is content to describe the machinery by which an
excessive supply can depress prices below the cost of production and so
automatically bring about a restriction of production, and _vice versa_.

But this tendency, in the natural course of things, to cure a glut or a
scarcity, is no ... proof that such evils have never existed.⁽⁸⁾

It is clear that in spite of his contrary views on the question of
crises, Malthus thinks along the same lines as Ricardo, Mill, Say, and
MacCulloch. For him, too, everything can be reduced to barter. The
social reproductive process with its large categories and interrelations
which claimed the whole of Sismondis attention, is here completely
ignored.

In view of so many contradictions within the fundamental approach, the
criticism of Sismondi and Malthus have only a few points in common:

1.  Contrary to Say and the followers of Ricardo, they both deny the
    hypothesis of a pre-established balance of consumption and
    production.
2.  They both maintain that not only partial but also universal crises
    are possible.

But here their agreement ends. If Sismondi seeks the cause of crises in
the low level of wages and the capitalists limited capacity for
consumption, Malthus, on the other hand, transforms the fact of low
wages into a natural law of population movements; for the capitalists
limited capacity for consumption, however, he finds a substitute in the
consumption of the parasites on surplus value such as the landed gentry
and the clergy with their unlimited capacity for wealth and luxury. The
church with a capacious maw is blest.

Both Malthus and Sismondi look for a category of consumers who buy
without selling, in order to redeem capitalist accumulation and save it
from a precarious position. But Sismondi needs them to get rid of the
surplus product of society over and above the consumption of the workers
and capitalists, that is to say, to get rid of the capitalised part of
the surplus value. Malthus wants them as producers of profit in general.
It remains entirely his secret, of course, how the _rentiers_ and the
incumbents of the state can assist the capitalists in appropriating
their profits by buying commodities at an increased price, since they
themselves obtain their purchasing power mainly from these capitalists.
In view of these profound contrasts, the alliance between Malthus and
Sismondi does not go very deep. And if Malthus, as Marx has it, distorts
Sismondis NOUVEAUX PRINCIPES into a Malthusian caricature, Sismondi in
turn stresses only what is common to them both and quotes Malthus in
support, giving the latters critique of Ricardo a somewhat Sismondian
cast. On occasion, no doubt, Sismondi actually succumbs to the influence
of Malthus; for instance, he takes over the latters theory of reckless
state expenditure as an emergency measure in aid of accumulation and so
becomes involved in contradictions with his own initial assumptions.

On the whole, Malthus neither rendered an original contribution to the
problem of reproduction, nor even grasped it fully. In his controversy
with the followers of Ricardo, he operated with the concepts of simple
commodity circulation, just as they did in their controversy with
Sismondi. His quarrel with that school turns on the unproductive
consumption by the parasites of the surplus value; it is not a quarrel
about the social foundations of capitalist reproduction. Malthus edifice
tumbles to the ground as soon as the absurd mistakes in his theory of
profits are uncovered. Sismondis criticism remains valid, and his
problems remain unsolved even if we accept Ricardos theory of value with
all its consequences.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾NOUVEAUX PRINCIPES ..., vol.ii, p.409

⁽²⁾ Cf. Marx, THEORIEN ÜBER DEN MEHRWERT, vol.iii, pp.1-29, which give a
detailed analysis of Malthus theory of value and profits.

⁽³⁾ Dedicated to James Mill and published in 1827.

⁽⁴⁾ James Mill, ELEMENTS OF POLITICAL ECONOMY (3rd edition, London
1826), pp.239-40.

⁽⁵⁾ Malthus, DEFINITIONS IN POLITICAL ECONOMY (London 1827), p.51.

⁽⁶⁾IBID., pp.64.

⁽⁷⁾IBID., pp.53-4.

⁽⁸⁾IBID., pp.62-3.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 12.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Two Historical Exposition of the Problem * Second Round The Controversy Between Rodbertus and von Kirchmann

 



CHAPTER 15 V. KIRCHMANNS THEORY OF REPRODUCTION


 

THE second theoretical polemics about the problem of accumulation was
also started by current events. If the first English crisis and its
attendant misery of the working class had stimulated Sismondis
opposition against the classical school, it was the revolutionary
working-class movement arisen since which, almost twenty-five years
later, provided the incentive for Rodbertus critique of capitalist
production. The risings of the Lyons silk weavers and the Chartist
movement in England were vastly different from the shadowy spectres
raised by the first crisis, and the ears of the bourgeoisie were made to
ring with their criticism of the most wonderful of all forms of society.
The first socio-economic work of Rodbertus, probably written for the
AUGSBURGER ALLGEMEINE ZEITUNG in the late thirties but not published by
that paper, bears the significant title, _The Demands of the Working
Classes_,⁽¹⁾ and begins as follows:

What do the working classes want? Will the others be able to keep it
from them? Will what they want be the grave of modern civilisation?
Thoughtful people have long realised that a time must come when history
would put this question with great urgency. Now, the man in the street
has learned it too, from the Chartist meetings and the Birmingham
scenes.

During the forties, the leaven of revolutionary ideas was most
vigorously at work in France in the formation of the various secret
societies and socialist schools of the followers of Proudhon, Blanqui,
Cabet, Louis Blanc, etc. The February revolution and the June
proclamation of the right to work led to a first head on clash between
the two worlds of capitalist society an epoch making eruption of the
contradictions latent in capitalism. As regards the other, visible form
of those contradictions the crises the available data for observation at
the time of the second controversy were far more comprehensive than in
the early twenties of the century. The dispute between Rodbertus and v.
Kirchmann took place under the immediate impact of the crises in 1837,
1839, 1847, and even of the first world crisis in 1857 Rodbertus writing
his interesting pamphlet ON COMMERCIAL CRISES AND THE MORTGAGE PROBLEM
OF THE LANDOWNERS⁽²⁾ in 1858. Thus the inherent contradictions of
capitalist society meeting his eyes were in strident discord with the
doctrine of harmony held by the English classics and their vulgarisers
both in England and on the Continent, quite unlike any critique in he
times when Sismondi had raised his voice in warning.

Incidentally, a quotation from Sismondi in Rodbertus first writing
proves that the formers strictures immediately influenced Rodbertus. He
was thus familiar with contemporary French writings against the
classical school, though perhaps less so with the far more numerous
English literature. There is no more than this flimsy support for the
myth of the German professors about the so-called priority of Rodbertus
over Marx in the foundation of socialism. Accordingly, Professor Diehl
writes in his article on Rodbertus in HANDWÖRTERBUCH DER
STAATSWISSENSCHAFTEN:

Rodbertus must be considered the real founder of scientific socialism in
Germany, since in his writings between 1839 and 1842, even before Marx
and Lassalle, he provided a comprehensive socialist system, a critique
of Adam Smiths doctrine, new theoretical foundations and proposals for
social reform.

This piece of god-fearing, pious righteousness comes from the second
edition of 1901, after all that had been written by Engels, Kautsky and
Mehring to destroy this learned legend, and in spite of it. Quite
inevitably, of course, and proof against any evidence to the contrary,
however weighty, it was only right in the eyes of all the learned German
economists that the palm of priority should be wrested from Marx, the
revolutionary anarchist, by Rodbertus, the socialist with monarchist,
Prussian and nationalist leanings, the man who believed in communism
five hundred years from now, but for the present supported a steady
exploitation rate of 200 per cent. However, we are interested in another
aspect of Rodbertus analysis. The same Professor Diehl continues his
eulogy as follows: Rodbertus was not only a pioneer of socialism;
political economy as a whole owes much stimulation and furtherance to
him; economic theory in particular is indebted to him for the critique
of classical economics, for the new theory of the distribution of
income, for the distinction between the logical and historical
categories of capital, and so on.

Here we shall deal with these latter achievements of Rodbertus,
especially with the and so on.

Rodbertus decisive treatise, TOWARDS THE UNDERSTANDING OF OUR
POLITICO-ECONOMIC CONDITIONS⁽³⁾ of 1842, set the ball rolling. v.
Kirchmann replied in DEMOKRATISCHE BLÄTTER with two essays _On the
Social Aspects of Ground Rent_⁽⁴⁾ and _The Society of Barter_⁽⁵⁾ and
Rodbertus parried in 1850 with his LETTERS ON SOCIAL PROBLEMS.⁽⁶⁾ Thus
the discussion entered the same theoretical arena where Malthus-Sismondi
and Say-Ricardo-MacCulloch had fought out their differences thirty years
earlier. In his earliest writings, Rodbertus had already expressed the
thought that the wages of labour present an ever diminishing part of the
national product in modern society where the productivity of labour is
increasing. He claimed this to be an original idea, and from that moment
until his death thirty years later he did nothing but reiterate it and
formulate it in various ways. This declining wage rate is for him the
root of all evils to be found in modern society, in particular of
pauperism and the crises, whose combination he calls the social problem
of our times.

v. Kirchmann does not agree with this explanation. He traces pauperism
back to the effects of a rising ground rent; crises, on the other hand,
to a lack of markets. About the latter especially he says: The greatest
part of social ills is caused not by defects of production but by a lack
of markets for the products ... the more a country can produce, the more
means it has for satisfying every need, the more it is exposed to the
danger of misery and want. The labour-problem is here included as well,
for the notorious right to work ultimately reduces to the question of
markets. We see, he concludes, that the social problem is almost
identical with the problem of markets. Even the ills of much-abused
competition will vanish, once markets are secure; its advantages alone
will remain. There will remain a spirit of rivalry to supply good and
cheap commodities, but the life-and-death struggle will disappear which
is caused only by insufficient markets.⁽⁷⁾

The difference between the points of view of Rodbertus and v. Kirchmann
is evident. Rodbertus sees the root of the evil in a faulty distribution
of the national product, and v. Kirchmann in the limitations of the
markets for capitalist production. Notwithstanding all the confusion in
his expositions, especially in his idealist vision of a capitalist
competition content with a laudable rivalry for better and cheaper
commodities, and also in his conception of the notorious right to work
as a problem of markets, v. Kirchmann up to a point still shows more
understanding for the sore spot of capitalist production, i.e. the
limitations of its market, than Rodbertus who clings to distribution.
Thus it is v. Kirchmann who now takes up the problem which Sismondi had
originally put on the agenda. Nevertheless, he by no means agrees with
Sismondis elucidation and solution of the problem, siding rather with
the opponents of the latter. Not only does he accept Ricardos theory of
ground rent, and Adam Smiths dogma that the price of the commodity is
composed of two parts only, of the interests on capital and the wages of
labour. (v. Kirchmann transforms the surplus value into interest on
capital); he also subscribes to the thesis of Say and Ricardo that
products are only bought with other products and that production creates
its own demand, so that if one side appears to have produced too much,
it only means there was not enough production on the other v. Kirchmann,
we see, faithfully follows the classics, if in a somewhat German
edition. He begins by arguing, e.g., that Says law of a natural balance
between production and demand still does not give a comprehensive
picture of reality, and adds:

Commerce involves yet further hidden laws which prevent this postulated
order from obtaining in complete purity. They must be discovered if we
are to explain the present flooding of the market, and their discovery
might perhaps also show us the way to avoid this great evil. We believe
that there are three relations in the modern system, of society which
cause these conflicts between Says indubitable law and reality.

These relations are (1) too inequitable a distribution of the products
here, as we see, v. Kirchmann somewhat approximates to Sismondis point
of view; (2) the difficulties which nature puts in the way of human
labour engaged in production; and (3) finally, the defects of commerce
as a mediator between production and consumption. Disregarding the last
two obstacles to Says law, we shall now consider v. Kirchmanns reasoning
of his first point.

The first relation, he explains, can be put more briefly as too low a
wage of labour, which is thus the cause of a slump. Those who know that
the price of commodities is composed of two parts only, of the interest
on capital and the wage of labour, might consider this a startling
statement; if the wage of labour is low, prices are low as well, and if
one is high, so is the other.

(We see v. Kirchmann accepts Smiths dogma even in its most misleading
form: the price is not _resolved_ into wage of labour and surplus value,
but is _composed_ of them as a mere sum a view in which Adam Smith
strayed furthest from his own theory of the value of labour.)

Wage and price thus are directly related, they balance each other.
England only abolished her corn laws, her tariffs on meat and other
victuals, in order to cause wages to fall and thus to enable her
manufacturers to oust all other competitors from the world markets by
means of still cheaper commodities. This, however, only holds good up to
a point and does not affect the ratio in which the product is
distributed among the workers and the capitalists. Too inequitable a
distribution among these two is the primary and most important cause why
Says law is not fulfilled in real life, why the markets are flooded
although there is production in all branches.

v. Kirchmann gives a detailed illustration of this statement. Using the
classical method, he takes us, of course, to an imaginary isolated
society which makes an unresisting, if thankless, object for the
experiments of political economy. v. Kirchmann suggests we should
imagine a place (_Ort_) which comprises 903 inhabitants, no more, no
less, _viz._ three entrepreneurs with 300 workers each. _Ort_ is to be
able to satisfy all needs by its own production in three establishments,
that is to say, one for clothing, a second for food, lighting, fuel and
raw materials, and a third for housing, furniture and tools. In each of
these three departments, the capital together with the raw materials is
to be provided by the entrepreneur, and the remuneration of the workers
is to be so arranged that the workers obtain as their wage one half of
the annual produce, the entrepreneurs retaining the other half as
interest on capital and profits of the enterprise. Every business is to
produce just enough to satisfy all the needs of the 903 inhabitants.
_Ort_ accordingly has all the conditions necessary for general
well-being, and, everybody can therefore tackle his work with courage
and vigour. After a few days, however, joy and delight turn into a
universal misery and gnashing of teeth: something has happened on v.
Kirchmanns Island of the Blessed which was no more to be expected than
for the skies to fall: an industrial and commercial crisis according to
all modern specifications has broken out! Only the most essential
clothing, food and hoping for the 900 workers has been produced, yet,
the warehouses of the three entrepreneurs are full of clothes and raw
materials, and their houses stand empty: they complain of a lack of
demand, while the workers in turn complain that their wants are not
fully satisfied. What has gone wrong? Could it be that there is too much
of one kind of produce and too little of another, as Say and Ricardo
would have it? Not at all, answers v. Kirchmann. Everything is available
in _Ort_ in well-balanced quantities, just enough to satisfy all the
wants of the community. What, then, has thrown a spanner into the works,
why the crisis? The obstruction is caused by distribution alone but this
must be savoured in v. Kirchmanns own words

The obstacle, why nevertheless no smooth exchange takes place, lies
solely and exclusively in the distribution of these products. They are
not distributed equitably among all, but the entrepreneurs retain half
of them for themselves as interest and profit, and only give half to the
workers. It is clear that the worker in the clothing department can
exchange, against half of his product, only half of the food, lodging,
etc., that has been produced, and it is clear that the entrepreneur,
cannot get rid of the other half since no worker has any more products
to give in exchange. The entrepreneurs do not know what to do with their
stocks, the workers do not know what to do for hunger and nakedness.

Nor does the reader, we might add, know what to do with v. Kirchmanns
constructions. His model is so childish that every advance leads deeper
into the maze.

First of all, there seems to be no reason whatever why, and to what
purpose, v. Kirchmann should devise this splitting-up of production into
three parts. If analogous examples by Ricardo and MacCulloch usually
confront tenant farmers and manufacturers, that is presumably only
inspired by the antiquated Physiocrat conception of social reproduction
which Ricardo had adopted, although his own theory of value as against
the Physiocrats deprived it of all meaning, and although Adam Smith had
already made a good start in considering the real material foundations
of the social reproductive process. Still, we have seen that the
tradition of distinguishing between agriculture and industry as the
foundation of reproduction was kept up in economic theory until Marx
introduced his epoch making distinction of the two productive
departments in society for producer and consumer goods. v. Kirchmanns
three departments, however, have no real significance at all. Obviously,
no material consideration of reproduction can have been responsible for
this supremely arbitrary division which jumbles up tools and furniture,
raw materials and food, but makes clothing a department in its own
right. One might as well postulate one department for food, clothing and
housing, another for medicines and a third for tooth brushes. v.
Kirchmanns primary concern, no doubt, is with the social division of
labour; hence the assumption of as nearly equal quantities of products
as possible in the transactions of exchange. Yet this exchange, on which
the argument turns, plays no part at all in v. Kirchmanns example since
it is not the value which is distributed but the quantities of products,
the bulk of use-values as such. In this intriguing _Ort_ of v.
Kirchmanns imagining, again, the products are distributed first, and
only afterwards, when the distribution is accomplished, is there to be
universal exchange, whereas on the solid ground of capitalist production
it is, as we know, the exchange which inaugurates the distribution of
the product and serves as its agent. Besides, the queerest things happen
in v. Kirchmanns distributive system: As we all know, the prices of the
products, i.e. the price of the aggregate product of society, consist of
_v_ + _s_, of wage and capital interest alone so that the aggregate
product must be distributed entirely among workers and entrepreneurs;
but then unhappily v. Kirchmann dimly remembers the fact that production
needs things like raw materials and tools. So _Ort_ is provided with raw
materials furtively introduced among the food, and with tools among the
furniture. But now the question arises: who is to get these indigestible
items in the course of general distribution? the workers as wages, or
the capitalists as profits of enterprise? They could hardly expect a
warm welcome from either. And on such feeble premises the star turn of
the performance is to take place: the exchange between workers and
entrepreneurs. The fundamental transaction of exchange in capitalist
production, the exchange between workers and capitalists, is transformed
by v. Kirchmann from an exchange between living labour and capital into
an exchange of products. Not the first act, that of exchanging labour
power for variable capital, but the second, the realisation of the wage
received from the variable capital is put at the centre of the whole,
machinery, the entire commodity exchange of capitalist society being in
turn, reduced to this realisation of the labour-wage. And the crowning
glory is that this exchange between workers and entrepreneurs, the
king-pin of all economic life dissolves into nothing on a closer
scrutiny it does not take place at all. For as soon as all workers have
received their natural wages in the form of half their product, an
exchange will be possible only among the workers themselves; every
worker will only keep one-third of his wage consisting exclusively of
either clothing, food or furniture, as the case may be, and realise the
remainder to equal parts in the two other product groups. The
entrepreneurs no longer come into this at all; the three of them are
left high and dry with their surplus value: half the clothing, furniture
and food that has been produced by the society; and they have no idea
what to do with the stuff. In this calamity of v. Kirchmanns creation,
even the most generous distribution of the product would he of no used.
On the contrary, if larger quantities of the social product were
allotted to the workers, they would have even less to do with the
entrepreneurs in this transaction: all that would happen is that the
exchange of the workers among themselves would increase in volume. The
surplus product which the entrepreneurs have on their hands would then
contract, it is true, though not indeed because the exchange of the
surplus product would be facilitated, but merely because there would be
less surplus value altogether. Now as before, an exchange of the social
product between workers and entrepreneurs is out of the question. One
must confess that the puerile and absurd economics here crammed into
comparatively little space exceed the bounds even of what might be put
up with from a Prussian Public Prosecutor such having been v. Kirchmanns
profession, though he must be credited with having incurred disciplinary
censure on two occasions. Nevertheless, after these unpromising
preliminaries, v. Kirchmann goes right to the root of the matter. He
admits that his assuming the surplus product in a concrete use-form is
the reason why the surplus value cannot be usefully employed. As a
remedy he now allows the entrepreneurs to devote half of the social
labour appropriated as surplus value to the production not of common
goods but of luxuries. The essence of luxury-goods being that they
enable the consumer to use up more capital and labour power than in the
case of ordinary goods, the three entrepreneurs manage to consume by
themselves in the form of laces, fashionable carriages and the like,
their entire half-share in all the labour performed by the society. Now
nothing unsaleable is left, and the crisis is happily avoided;
over-production is made impossible once and for all, capitalists and
workers alike are safe; the name of v. Kirchmanns magic cure which has
brought all these benefits to pass and which re-establishes the balance
between production and consumption, being: luxury. In other words, the
capitalists who do not know what to do with their surplus value which
they cannot realise, are advised by the dear fellow to eat it up. As it
happens, luxury is in fact an old familiar invention of capitalist
society, and still there are recurrent crises. Why is this? v. Kirchmann
enlightens us: The answer can only be that in real life sluggish markets
are entirely due to the fact that there are still _not enough_ luxuries,
or, in other words, that the capitalists, i.e. those who can afford to
consume, still consume too little.

This misguided abstinence of the capitalists, however, results from a
bad habit which political economists have been ill advised to encourage:
the desire to save for purposes of productive consumption. In other
words: crises are caused by accumulation. This is v. Kirchmanns
principal thesis. He proves it again by means of a touchingly simple
example:

Let us assume conditions which economists praise as more favourable, he
says, where the entrepreneurs say: we do not want to spend our income to
the last penny in splendour and luxury, but will re-invest it
productively. What does this mean? Nothing but the setting-up of all
sorts of productive enterprises for delivering new goods of such a kind
that their sale can yield interest (v. Kirchmann means profits) on a
capital saved and invested by the three entrepreneurs from their
unconsumed revenues. Accordingly, the three entrepreneurs decide to
consume only the produce of a hundred workers, that is to say to
restrict their luxury considerably, and to employ the labour power of
the remaining 350 workers together with the capital they use for setting
up new productive enterprises. The question now arises in what kind of
productive enterprises these funds are to be used.

Since, according to v. Kirchmanns assumption, constant capital is not
reproduced, and the entire social product consists entirely of consumer
goods, the three entrepreneurs can only choose again between enterprises
for the manufacture of ordinary goods or for that of luxuries.

In this way, however, the three entrepreneurs will be faced with the
already familiar dilemma: if they turn out common. goods, there will be
a crisis, since the workers lack means to purchase these additional
provisions, having been bought off with half the value of their produce.
If they go in for luxuries, they will have to consume them alone. There
is no other possibility. The dilemma is not even affected by foreign
trade which would only increase the range of commodities on the home
market or increase productivity.

These foreign commodities are therefore either common goods then the
capitalist will not, and the worker, lacking the means, cannot buy them,
or they are luxuries, in which case the worker, of course, is even less
able to buy them, and the capitalist will not want them either because
of his efforts to save.

This argument, however primitive, yet shows quite nicely and clearly the
fundamental conception of v. Kirchmann and the nightmare of all economic
theory: in a society consisting exclusively of workers and capitalists,
accumulation will be impossible v. Kirchmann is therefore frankly
hostile to accumulation, saving, productive consumption of the surplus
value, and strongly attacks these errors advocated by classical
economics. His gospel is increasing luxury together with the
productivity of labour as the specific against crises. We see that v.
Kirchmann, if he grotesquely aped Ricardo and Say in his theoretical
assumptions, is a caricature of Sismondi in his final conclusions. Yet
it is imperative to get v. Kirchmanns approach to the problem perfectly
clear, if we are to understand the import of Rodbertus criticism and the
outcome of the whole controversy.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾_Die Forderungen der arbeitenden Klassen_.

⁽²⁾DIE HANDELSKRISEN UND DIE HYPOTHEKENNOT DER GRUNDBESITZER.

⁽³⁾ZUR ERKENNTNIS UNSERER STAATSWIRTSCHAFTLICHEN ZUSTÄNDE.

⁽⁴⁾ÜBER DIE GRUNDRENTE IN SOCIALER BEZIEHUNG.

⁽⁵⁾DIE TAUSCHGESELLSCHAFT.

⁽⁶⁾SOZIALE BRIEFE.

⁽⁷⁾ Rodbertus quotes v. Kirchmanns arguments explicitly and in great
detail. But according to his editors, no complete copy of DEMOKRATISCHE
BLÄTTER with the original essay is obtainable.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 11.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Two Historical Exposition of the Problem * Second Round The Controversy Between Rodbertus and von Kirchmann

 



CHAPTER 16 RODBERTUS CRITICISM OF THE CLASSICAL SCHOOL


 

Rodbertus digs deeper than v. Kirchmann. He looks for the roots of evil
in the very foundations of social organisation and declares bitter war
on the predominant Free Trade school not against a system of
unrestricted commodity circulation or the freedom of trade which he
fully accepts, but against the Manchester doctrine of _laissez-faire_
within the internal social relations of economy. At that time, after the
period of storm and stress of classical economics, a system of
unscrupulous apologetics was already in full sway which found its most
perfect expression in the doctrine of harmony of M. Frédéric Bastiat,
the famous vulgarian and idol of all Philistines, and quite soon the
various Schultzes were to flourish as commonplace, German imitations of
the French prophet of harmony. Rodbertus strictures are aimed at these
unscrupulous peddlers of free trade. In his first LETTER ON SOCIAL
PROBLEMS⁽¹⁾ he exclaims:

Because of their paltry incomes, five-sixths of the population are not
only deprived of most of the benefits of civilisation, but are in
constant danger of the most terrible outbreaks of real distress to which
they sometimes succumb. Yet they are the creators of all the wealth of
the society. Their labours begin at dawn and end at dusk, continuing
even after night has fallen but no exertion can change this fate; they
cannot raise their income, and only lose that little leisure which ought
to remain nowadays for the improvement of their minds. Hitherto it might
have seemed as if all this suffering were necessary to the progress of
civilisation, but now that a series of the most wonderful discoveries
and inventions have increased human labour power more than a
hundredfold, new prospects of changing these grim conditions are
suddenly revealed. As a result, the wealth and assets of a nation
increase at a growing rate as compared with the population. Could
anything be more natural, I ask, or more justly demanded, than that this
increase should also somehow benefit the creators of this old and new
wealth? that their incomes should be raised or their working-hours
shortened, or that they might join in increasing numbers the ranks of
the lucky ones, privileged to reap the fruits of labour? Yet state
economy, or better, national economy has only achieved the opposite
result. Increasing poverty of these classes goes together with
increasing wealth of the nation, there is even need of special
legislation, lest the working day become longer, and finally, the
working classes swell in number out of proportion with the others. Even
that is not enough! The hundredfold increase of labour efficiency which
was powerless to relieve five sixths of the population, even threatens
periodically the remaining sixth of the nation and thus society as a
whole.

What contradictions in the economic sphere in particular! And what
contradictions in the social sphere in general! The wealth of society is
growing, and this growth is accompanied by a growth of poverty. The
creative efficiency of the means of production is increasing, and the
consequence is that they are scrapped. Social conditions demand that the
material position of the working classes should be raised to the level
of their political status, and economic conditions, by way of answer,
depress them further. Society needs the unrestricted growth of wealth,
and contemporary leaders of production must create restrictions, in
order to discourage poverty. In a single respect alone is there harmony:
just as wrong as the conditions is the authoritative section of the
society with its inclination to look for the root of the evil everywhere
except in the right place. This egotism, which only too often dons the
scholars gown, also accuses the vices of the workers of being the cause
of poverty. The responsibility for the crimes committed against them by
all-powerful facts is ascribed to their alleged discontent and
shiftlessness, and where even such egotism cannot close its eyes to
their innocence, it makes an elaborate dogma of the necessity of
poverty. Unremittingly, it exhorts the workers only to work and to pray,
impresses upon them the duty of abstinence and economy, and at best
infringes upon their rights by the institution of compulsory saving,
adding to the misery of the workers. It does not see that a blind force
of commerce has transformed the prayer for work into the curse of
enforced unemployment, that ... abstinence is impossible or cruel, and
that, lastly, morals always remain ineffective if commended by those of
whom the poet says that they drink wine in secret but preach water in
public.⁽²⁾

Thirty years after Sismondi and Owen, twenty years after the indictment
made by the English socialists, the followers of Ricardo, and last but
not least, after the publication of the COMMUNIST MANIFESTO, such bold
words alone cannot claim to break new ground. What matters above all now
is the theoretical foundation of this indictment. Rodbertus here
proposed a complete system which can be reduced to the following simple
statements.

Owing to the laws of an economy left to its own devices, the high level
of labour productivity achieved by history, together with the
institutions of positive law, that is to say the right of private
ownership, a whole series of wrong and unethical phenomena had emerged:

(1) In the place of normal, constituted value we have exchange value,
and accordingly coined money instead of a proper paper or labour
currency which would genuinely correspond to the concept of money. The
first principle is that all economic goods are products of labour, or,
as we might put it, that labour alone is creative. This statement,
however, does not imply that the value of the product must always equal
the cost of labour, or that, in other words, value is even now measured
in terms of labour. The truth is rather that this still has not become a
_fact_, but is only an _idea_ of political economy.⁽³⁾

If the value could be constituted in accordance with the labour expended
on the product, we might imagine a kind of money which would be, as it
were, a leaf torn from the public account-book, a receipt written on the
most rubbishy material, on rags, which everyone would receive, for the
value he has produced, and which he would realise as a voucher for an
equivalent part of the national product subsequently under distribution
... If, however, for some reason or another, it is _impossible_ or _not
yet possible_ to establish this value, money as such must still retain
the value it is designed to liquidate; made of an intrinsically valuable
commodity like gold or silver, it has to represent a pledge or pawn of
the same value.⁽⁴⁾ As soon as capitalist commodity production has come
into existence, everything is turned upside down: there can no longer be
a constituted value, since it can only be exchange value,⁽⁵⁾ and, since
the value cannot be constituted, money cannot be _purely_ money, it
cannot fully conform to its concept.⁽⁶⁾

In an equitable exchange, the exchange value of the products would have
to equal the quantity of labour needed for producing them, and an
exchange of products would always mean an exchange of equal quantities
of labour. Even assuming, however, that everybody produced just those
use-values which another person requires, yet, since we are here
concerned with human discernment and human volition, there must always
be for a start a correct calculation, adjustment and allocation of the
labour quantities contained in the products for exchange, there must be
a law to which the facts will conform.⁽⁷⁾

It is well-known that Rodbertus, in his discovery of constituted value,
laid great stress on his priority to Proudhon which we shall gladly
concede him. Marx, in his POVERTY OF PHILOSOPHY, and Engels in his
preface to it, have comprehensively shown that this concept is a mere
phantom, still used in theory but in practice buried already in England
well before Rodbertus time, that it is but a Utopian distortion of
Ricardos doctrine of value. We therefore need not deal further with this
music of the future, performed on a toy trumpet.

(2) The economy of exchange resulted in the degradation of labour to a
commodity, the labour wage being determined as an item of expenditure
(_Kostenwert der Arbeit_) instead of representing a fixed rate of the
national product. By a daring jump in history, Rodbertus derives his
wages law indirectly from slavery and regards the specific traits which
a capitalist production of commodities imposes on exploitation as no
more than a lying deception against which he fulminates from a moral
point of view.

So long as the producers themselves remained the property of those who
were not producing, so long as slavery was in existence, it was the
advantage of the masters alone which unilaterally determined the volume
of this share (of the workers). With the producers attaining full
liberty of person, if nothing more as yet, both parties agree on the
wage in advance. The wage, in modern terminology, is the object of a
free contract, that is to say, an object of competition. Labour is
therefore as a matter of course subjected to the same laws of exchange
as its products: labour itself acquires exchange value; the size of the
wage depends on the effects of supply and demand.

Rodbertus, after having thus tuned everything upside down, after
deriving the exchange value of labour from competition, now immediately
derives its value from its exchange value.

Under the laws of exchange value, labour, like produced goods, comes to
have a kind of cost value which exercises some magnetic effects upon its
exchange value, the amount of the labour wage. It is that particular
amount of payment which is necessary for the maintenance of labour, in
other words, which enables labour to continue, if only in the persons of
its progeny-it is the so-called minimum of subsistence.

For Rodbertus, however, this is not a statement of objective economic
laws, but merely an object for moral indignation. He calls the thesis of
the classical school, that labour is worth no more than the wages it can
command, a cynical statement, and he is determined to expose the string
of lies leading to this crude and unethical conclusion.⁽⁸⁾

It was a degrading view to estimate the wages of labour in accordance
with the necessary subsistence, like so many machines to be kept in
repair. Now that labour, the fountainhead of all commodities, has itself
become a commodity of exchange, it is no less degrading to speak of its
natural price, of its costs, just as we speak of the natural price and
costs of its product, and to include this natural price, these costs, in
the amount of goods that is necessary to call forth a continues flow of
labour on the market.

This commodity character of labour power, however, and the corresponding
determination of its value, are nothing but a malicious
misrepresentation of the Free Trade school. Like the good Prussian he
was, Rodbertus put capitalist commodity production as a whole in the
dock, as offending against the obtaining constitutional law, instead of
pointing out its inherent contradiction, the conflict between
determining the value _of_ labour and determining the value _created by_
labour, as the English disciples of Ricardo had done.

Stupid beyond words, he exclaims, is the dualist conception of those
economists who would have the workers, as far as their legal status is
concerned, join in deciding the fate of society, and would for all that,
have these same workers from an economic point of view, always treated
as mere commodities!⁽⁹⁾

Now it only remains to find out why the workers put up with such stupid
and blatant injustice an objection which Hermann for instance raised
against Ricardos theory of value. Rodbertus is ready with this answer:

What were the workers to do after their emancipation other than to agree
to these regulations? Imagine their position: when the workers were
freed, they were naked or in rags, they had nothing but their labour
power. The abolition of slavery or serfdom, moreover, rescinded the
masters legal or moral obligation to feed them and care for their needs.
Yet these needs remained, they still had to live. How, then, could their
labour power provide them with a living? Were they simply to grab some
of the capital existing in the society for their maintenance? The
capital of society was already in the hands of other people, and the
organs of the law would not have tolerated such a step. What, then,
could the workers have done? Only these alternatives were before them:
either to overthrow the law of society or to return, under roughly the
same conditions as before, to their former masters, the owners of the
land and of capital, and to receive as wages what was formerly doled out
to them to keep them fed.⁽¹⁰⁾

It was fortunate for mankind and the Prussian state that the workers
were wise enough not to overthrow civilisation and preferred to submit
to the base demands of their former masters. This, then, is the origin
of the capitalist wage system, of the wages law as a kind of slavery
resulting from an abuse of power on the part of the capitalists, and
from the precarious position and the meek acquiescence on the part of
the proletariat if we are to believe the highly original explanations of
that very Rodbertus whose theories Marx is reputed to have plagiarised.
Let Rodbertus claim priority in this particular theory of value without
challenge, seeing that English socialists and other social critics had
already given far less crude and primitive analyses of the wage-system.
The singular point about it all is that Rodbertus display of moral
indignation about the origin and the economic laws of the wages system
does not lead up to the demand for doing away with this abominable
injustice, the dualism stupid beyond words. Far from it! He frequently
reassures his fellow-men that he does not really mean anything very
serious by roaring he is no lion fell, only one Snug the joiner. Indeed,
an ethical theory of the wages law is necessary only to achieve a
further conclusion:

(3) Since the laws of exchange value determine the wage, an advance in
labour productivity must bring about an ever declining share in the
product for the workers. Here we have arrived at the Archimedean fulcrum
of Rodbertus system. This declining wage rate is his most important
original discovery on which he harps from his first writings on social
problems (probably in 1839) until his death, and which he claims as his
very own. This conception, for all that, was but a simple corollary of
Ricardos theory of value and is contained implicit in the wages fund
theory which dominated bourgeois economics up to the publication of
Marxs CAPITAL. Rodbertus nevertheless believed that this discovery made
him a kind of Galileo in economics, and he refers to his declining wage
rate as explaining every evil and contradiction in capitalist economy.
Above all, he derives from the declining wage rate the phenomenon of
pauperism which, together with the crises, in his opinion constitutes
the social question. It would be as well to draw the attention of
contemporaries, out for Marxs blood, to the fact that it was not Marx
but Rodbertus, a man much nearer their own heart, who set up a whole
theory of progressive poverty in a very crude form, and that he, unlike
Marx, made it the very pivot, not just a symptom, of the entire social
problem. Compare for instance his argument in his first LETTER ON SOCIAL
PROBLEMS to v. Kirchmann on the absolute impoverishment of the working
class. The declining wage rate must serve in addition to explain the
other fundamental phenomena of the social problem the crises. In this
connection Rodbertus tackles the problem of balancing consumption with
production, touching upon the whole lot of cognate controversial issues
which had already been fought out between the schools of Sismondi and
Ricardo.

Rodbertus knowledge of crises was of course based upon far more material
evidence than that of Sismondi. In his first LETTER ON SOCIAL PROBLEMS
he already gives a detailed description of the four crises in 181819,
1825, 18379 and 1847. Since his observations covered a much longer
period, Rodbertus could by and large gain a much deeper insight into the
essential character of crises than his predecessors. As early as 1850 he
formulated the periodical character of the crises which recur at ever
shorter intervals and at the same time with ever increasing severity:

Time after time, these crises have become more terrible in proportion
with the increase in wealth, engulfing an ever greater number of
victims. The crisis of 181819, although even this caused panic in
commerce and inspired misgivings in economics, was of small importance
compared to that of 18256. The first crisis had made such inroads on the
capital assets of England that the most famous economists doubted
whether complete recovery could ever be made. Yet it was eclipsed by the
crisis of 18367. The crises of 183940 and 18467 wrought even greater
havoc than previous ones. According to recent experiences, however, the
crises recur at ever shorter intervals. There was a lapse of 18 years
between the first and the third crisis, of 14 years between the second
and the fourth, and of only 12 years between the third and the fifth.
Already the signs are multiplying that a new disaster is imminent,
though no doubt the events of 1848 put off the catastrophe.⁽¹¹⁾

Rodbertus remarks that an extraordinary boom in production and great
progress in industrial technique always are the heralds of a crisis.
Every one of them [of the crises] followed upon a period of outstanding
industrial prosperity.⁽¹²⁾

From the crises in history he demonstrates that they occur only after a
considerable increase of productivity.⁽¹³⁾ Rodbertus opposes what he
terms the vulgar view which conceives of crises as mere disturbances in
the monetary and credit system, and he criticizes the whole of Peels
currency legislation as an error of judgment, arguing the point in
detail in his essay _On Commercial Crises and the Mortgage Problem_.
There he makes the following comment among others: We would therefore
deceive ourselves if we were to regard commercial crises merely as
crises of the monetary, banking, or credit system. This is only their
outer semblance when they first emerge.⁽¹⁴⁾

Rodbertus also shows a remarkably acute grasp of the part played by
foreign trade in the problem of crises. Just like Sismondi, he states
the necessity of expansion for capitalist production, but he
simultaneously emphasises the fact that the periodical crises are bound
to grow in volume.

Foreign trade, he says, is related to slumps only as charity is related
to poverty. They ultimately only enhance one another.⁽¹⁵⁾

And further:

The only possible means of warding off further outbreaks of crises is
the application of the two-edged knife of expanding foreign markets. The
violent urge towards such expansion is largely no more but a morbid
irritation caused by a sickly organ. Since one factor on the home
market, productivity, is ever increasing, and the other factor,
purchasing power, remains constant for the overwhelming majority of the
population, commerce must endeavour to conjure up a similarly unlimited
amount of purchasing power on the foreign market.⁽¹⁶⁾

In this way, the irritation may be soothed to some extent so that at
least there will not be a new outbreak of the calamity right away. Every
foreign market opened defers the social problem in a like manner.
Colonisation of primitive countries would have similar effects: Europe
rears a market for herself in places where none had been before. Yet
such a medicine would essentially do no more than appease the ill. As
soon as the new markets are supplied, the problem will revert to its
former state a conflict between the two factors: limited purchasing
power versus unlimited productivity. The new attack would be warded off
the small market only to re-appear, in even wider dimensions and with
even more violent incidents, on a larger one. And since the earth is
finite and the acquisition of new markets must some time cone to an end,
the time will come when the question can no longer be simply adjourned.
Sooner or later, a definite solution will have to be found.⁽¹⁷⁾

Rodbertus also recognises the anarchical character of capitalist private
enterprise to be conducive to crises, but only as one factor among many,
seeing it as the source of a particular type of crises, not as the real
cause of crises in general. About the crises at v. Kirchmanns _Ort_,
e.g., he says:

I maintain that a slump of this kind does not occur in real life. The
market of to-day is large, there are countless wants and many branches
of production, productivity is considerable and the data of commerce are
obscure and misleading. The individual entrepreneur does not know how
much others are producing, and so it may easily happen that he
over-estimates the demand for a certain commodity with which he will
then overstock the market.

Rodbertus says outright that the only remedy for these crises is the
complete reversal of contemporary property-relations or a planned
economy, concentrating all means of production in the hands of a single
social authority. To set troubled minds at rest, however, he is quick to
add that he reserves judgment as to whether there can actually be such a
state of affairs yet this would be the only possible way to prevent
slumps of this kind. Thus he expressly regards anarchy in the modern
mode of production as responsible for only a specific and partial
manifestation of crises.

Rodbertus scornfully rejects Say-Ricardos axiom of a natural equilibrium
between consumption and productions just like Sismondi, he emphasises
that everything turns on the purchasing power of society, and also takes
it to be dependent upon the distribution of income. All the same, he
does not endorse Sismondis theory of crises and disagrees sharply with
the conclusions drawn from it. If Sismondi saw the source of all evil in
the unlimited expansion of production without regard to the limitations
of incomes, and advocated a restriction of production, Rodbertus, quite
on the contrary, champions the most powerful and unrestricted expansion
of production, of wealth and of the productive forces, believing this to
be a social necessity. Whoever rejects the wealth of society, rejects at
the same time its power, its progress, and, with its progress, its
virtues. Whoever stands in the way of growing wealth, stands in the way
of all social progress whatever. Every increase in knowledge; resolve
and capacity is conceived as bound up with an increase in wealth.⁽¹⁸⁾
From this point of view, Rodbertus is strongly in favour of issuing
houses which he regards as the indispensable foundations for a rapid and
unrestricted expansion of company promoting. Both his essay of 1859 on
the mortgage problem and the treatise on the FINANCIAL CRISIS IN
PRUSSIA⁽¹⁹⁾ are devoted to this plea. He even polemises outright against
the Sismondian type of _caveat_, as usual broaching the matter first
from his peculiar Utopian ethics.

The entrepreneurs, he holds forth, Care essentially civil servants of
economy. By the institution of property, they are once and for all
entrusted with the nations means of production. If they set them to work
and strain all their energies in the process, they do but their duty,
since capital let me repeat exists entirely for the sake of production.

And a further, factual argument:

Or would you have them (the entrepreneurs) turn acute attacks of
suffering into a chronic state by working persistently and from the
first with fewer forces than are given by the means of production; are
they to pay for a less severe form of the evil with its permanent
duration? Even if we were silly enough to give them this advice, they
would not be able to follow it. How could the entrepreneurs of the world
recognise the limits beyond which the market would cease to be healthy?
They engage in production without knowing the one of the other, they are
producing in the most distant corners of the earth for a market hundreds
of miles away, they produce with such vast forces that a months
production may already overstep the limit. How could production so
divided and yet so powerful conceivably estimate in good time what will
be enough? Where for instance, are the organisations, the up-to date
statistical bureaux and the like to help them in this task? What is
worse, the price alone, its rise and fall, indicates the position of the
market, and this is not like a barometer which predicts the temperature
of the market, but more like a thermometer which only registers it. If
the price falls, the limit has been passed already, and the evil is with
us.⁽²⁰⁾

These thrusts, obviously aimed at Sismondi, exhibit quite fundamental
differences between the two opponents. If Engels then says in his
ANTI-DÜHRING that Sismondi first explained the crises as resulting from
under-consumption, and that Rodbertus borrowed this view from him, he is
not strictly accurate. All that Rodbertus and Sismondi have in common is
their opposition against the classical school and the general
explanation of crises as the result of the distribution of incomes. Even
in this connection Rodbertus mounts his own particular hobby horse:
over-production is not caused by the low level of working class incomes,
nor yet, as Sismondi maintains, by the capitalists limited capacity for
consumption, but solely by the fact that with a growing productivity of
labour, the workers income, in terms of value, represents an ever
smaller share of the product. Rodbertus takes pains to convince the
opposition that it is not the small volume of the workers share which
causes the crises.

Just imagine, he goes on to lecture v. Kirchmann, these shares to be so
small as to ensure only a bare subsistence for those who are entitled to
them. As long as you establish them as representing a proportion of the
national product, you will have a constant vessel for value which can
absorb ever increasing contents, and an ever increasing prosperity of
the working classes as well ... And now imagine on the contrary as large
a share for the working classes as you please, and let it become an ever
smaller fraction of the national product that grows with, increasing
productivity. Then, provided it is not reduced to the present pittance,
this share will still protect the workers from undue privations since
the amount of products it represents will fill be considerably greater
than it is to-day. Once this share begins to decline, however, there
will be spreading discontent, culminating in a commercial crisis for
which the capitalists are not to blame inasmuch as they did no more than
their duty in laying down the volume of production according to the
given magnitude of these shares.

That is why the declining wage rate is the real cause of crises. It can
only be counteracted by legal measures to ensure that the workers share
represents a stable and unchanging rate of the national product. This
grotesque notion takes some understanding if we are to do justice to its
economic implications.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾ To v. Kirchmann, in 1880.

⁽²⁾ Dr. Carl Rodbertus-Jagetzow, SCHRIFTEN (Berlin, 1899), vol.ii,
pp.172-4.

⁽³⁾OP. CIT., vol.ii, pp.104f.

⁽⁴⁾OP. CIT., vol.i, p.99.

⁽⁵⁾IBID., p.173.

⁽⁶⁾IBID., p.176.

⁽⁷⁾OP. CIT., vol.ii, p.65.

⁽⁸⁾OP. CIT., vol.i, pp.182-4.

⁽⁹⁾IBID.

⁽¹⁰⁾IBID., p.72.

⁽¹¹⁾OP. CIT., vol.iii, pp.110-11.

⁽¹²⁾IBID., p.108.

⁽¹³⁾OP. CIT., vol.i, p.62.

⁽¹⁴⁾OP. CIT., vol.iv, p.226.

⁽¹⁵⁾ In TOWARDS THE UNDERSTANDING OF OUR POLITICO-ECONOMIC CONDITIONS,
part ii, n.1.

⁽¹⁶⁾ In ON COMMERCIAL CRISES AND THE MORTGAGE PROBLEM OF THE LANDOWNERS
quoted above (OP. CIT., vol.iii, p.186).

⁽¹⁷⁾OP. CIT., vol.iv, p.233. It is interesting to note in this
connection how Rodbertus appears in practice as an extremely sober and
realistically minded prophet of capitalist colonial policy, in the
manner of the present day Pan-Germans, his moral ranting about the
unhappy fate of the working classes notwithstanding. In a footnote to
the above quotation, he writes: We can go on to glance briefly at the
importance of the opening up of Asia, in particular of China and Japan,
the richest markets in the world, and also of the maintenance of English
rule in India. It is to defer the solution of the social problem. (The
eloquent avenger of the exploited ingenuously discloses the means by
which the profiteering exploiters can continue their stupid and criminal
error, their flagrant injustice for as long as possible.) For the
solution of this problem, the present lacks in unselfishness and moral
resolution no less than in intelligence. (Rodbertus philosophical
resignation is unparalleled!) Economic advantage cannot, admittedly,
constitute a legal title to intervention by force, but on the other
hand, a strict application of modern natural and international law to
all the nations of the world, whatever their state of civilisation, is
quite impracticable. (A comparison with Dorines words in Molières
_Tartuffe_ is irresistible: Le ciel defend, de vraie, certains
contentements, mais il y a avec lui des accommodements.) Our
international law has grown from a civilisation of Christian ethics, and
since all law is based upon reciprocity, it can only provide the
standard for relations between nations of the same civilisation. If it
is applied beyond these limits, it is sentiment rather than natural and
international law and the Indian atrocities should have cured us of it.
Christian Europe should rather partake of the spirit which made the
Greeks and the Romans regard all the other peoples of the world as
barbarians. The younger European nations might then regain the drive for
making world history which impelled the Ancients to spread their native
civilisation over the countries of the globe. They would reconquer Asia
for world history by joint action. Such common purpose and action would
in turn stimulate the greatest social progress, a firm foundation of
peace in Europe, a reduction of armies, a colonisation of Asia in the
ancient Roman style in other words, a genuine solidarity of interests in
all walks of social life. The vision of capitalist colonial expansion
inspires the prophet of the exploited and oppressed to almost poetical
flights, all the more remarkable for coming at a time when a
civilisation of Christian ethics accomplished such glorious exploits as
the Opium Wars against China and the Indian atrocities that is to say,
the atrocities committed by the British in their bloody suppression of
the Indian Mutiny. In his second LETTER ON SOCIAL PROBLEMS, in 1850,
Rodbertus had expressed the conviction that if society lacks the moral
resolution necessary to solve the social question, in other words, to
change the distribution of wealth, history would be forced to use the
whip of revolution against it (OP. CIT., vol.ii, p.83). Eight years
later, however, the stalwart Prussian prefers to crack the whip of a
colonial policy of Christian ethics over the natives of the colonial
countries. It is, of course, what one might expect of the original
founder of scientific socialism in Germany that he should also be a warm
supporter of militarism, and his phrase about the reduction of armies is
but poetic licence in his verbal fireworks. In his essay _On the
Understanding of the Social Question_ he explains that the entire
national tax burden is perpetually gravitating towards the bottom,
sometimes in form of higher prices for wage goods, and sometimes in form
of lower money wages. In this connection, he considers conscription
under the aspect of a charge on the state, explaining that as far as the
working classes are concerned, it is nothing like a tax but rather a
confiscation of their entire income for many years. He adds immediately:
To avoid misunderstanding I would point out that I am a staunch
supporter of our present military constitution (i.e. the military
constitution of counter-revolutionary Prussia) although it may be
oppressive to the working classes and demand great financial sacrifices
from the propertied classes (OP. CIT., vol.iii, p.34). That does not
even sound like a lions roar!

⁽¹⁸⁾SCHRIFTEN, vol.iii, p.182.

⁽¹⁹⁾ Published already in 1845.

⁽²⁰⁾SCHRIFTEN, vol.iv, p.231.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 12.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Two Historical Exposition of the Problem * Second Round The Controversy Between Rodbertus and von Kirchmann

 



CHAPTER 17 RODBERTUS ANALYSIS OF REPRODUCTION


 

To begin with, what does it mean that a decrease in the workers share is
bound immediately to engender overproduction and commercial crises? Such
a view can only make sense provided Rodbertus takes the national product
to consist of two parts, _vide_ the shares of the workers and of the
capitalists, in short of _v_ + _s_, one share being exchangeable for the
other. And that is more or less what he actually seems to say on
occasions, e.g. in his first LETTER ON SOCIAL PROBLEMS:

The poverty of the working classes precludes their income from giving
scope to increasing production. The additional amount of products from
the entrepreneurs point of view lowers the value of the aggregate
product so far as to bar production on the former scale, leaving the
workers at best to their accustomed straits, though, if it could be made
available to the workers, it would not only improve their lot but would
further act as a counterweight by increasing the value of what is
retained by the capitalists (and so enable the latter to keep their
enterprises at the same level).⁽¹⁾

The counterweight which in the hand of the workers increases the value
of what is retained by the entrepreneurs, can in this context only be
the demand. Once again, we have landed happily at the familiar _Ort_ of
v. Kirchmanns where workers and capitalists exchange their incomes for
the surplus product, and where the crises arise because variable capital
is small and the surplus value large. This peculiar notion has already
been dealt with above. There are other occasions, however, when
Rodbertus advances a somewhat different conception. The interpretation
of his theory in the fourth LETTER ON SOCIAL PROBLEMS is that the
continual shifts in the relations of demand, evident in the share of the
working class and caused by the share of the capitalist class, must
result in a chronic disproportion between production and consumption.

What if the entrepreneurs endeavour to keep always within the limits of
those shares, yet the shares themselves are all the time on the decline
for the great majority of the society, the workers, decreasing
gradually, unnoticeably, but with relentless force? What if the share of
these classes is continually decreasing to the same extent as their
productivity is increasing? Is it not really the fact that the
capitalists of necessity organise production in accordance with the
present volume of shares in order to make wealth universal, and that yet
they always produce over and above this volume (of previous shares),
thereby perpetuating dissatisfaction which culminates in this stagnation
of trade?⁽²⁾

On this showing, the explanation of crises should be as follows: the
national product consists of a number of common goods, as v. Kirchmann
puts it, for the workers, and of superior goods for the capitalists. The
wages represent the quantity of the former, and aggregate surplus value
that of the latter. If the capitalists organise their production on this
footing, and if at the same time there is progressive productivity, a
lack of proportion will immediately ensue. For the share of the workers
to-day is no longer that of yesterday, but less. If the demand for
common goods had involved, say, six-sevenths of the national product
yesterday, then to-day it involves only five-sevenths, and the
entrepreneurs, having provided for six-sevenths of common goods, will
find to their painful surprise that they overproduced by one-seventh.
Now, wiser by this experience, they try to organise to-morrows output of
common goods to a mere five-sevenths of the total value of the national
product, but they have a new disappointment coming to them, since the
share of the national product falling to wages to-morrow is bound to be
only four-sevenths, and so on.

In this ingenious theory there are quite a few points to make us wonder.
If our commercial crises are entirely due to the fact that the workers
wage rate, the variable capital, represents a constantly diminishing
portion of the total value of the national product, then this
unfortunate law brings with it the cure for the evil it has caused,
since it must be an ever smaller part of the aggregate product for which
there is over-production. Although Rodbertus delights in such terms as
an overwhelming majority, the large popular masses of consumers, it is
not the number of heads that make up the demand, but the value they
represent which is relevant. This value, if Rodbertus is to be believed,
forms a more and more trifling part of the aggregate product. Crises are
thus made to rest on an ever narrowing economic basis, and all that
remains to discover is how in spite of it all it can still happen that
the crises are universal and increasingly severe besides, as Rodbertus
is fully aware. The purchasing power lost by the working classes should
be gained by the capitalist class; if _v_ decreases, _s_ must grow
larger to make up for it. On this crude scheme, the purchasing power of
society as a whole cannot change, as Rodbertus says in so many words:

I know very well that what is taken from the workers share goes
ultimately to swell that of the rentiers (rent and surplus value are
used as synonyms, _R.L._), and that purchasing power remains constant on
the whole and in the long run. But as far as the product on the market
is concerned, the crisis always sets in before this increase can make
itself felt.⁽³⁾

In short, the most it can amount to is that there is too much of common
goods and too little of superior goods for the capitalists. Quite
unawares, and by devious ways, Rodbertus here falls in with the
Say-Ricardian theory he so ardently contested, the theory that
over-production on one side always corresponds to under-production on
the other. Seeing that the ratio of the two shares is persistently
shifting to the advantage of the capitalists, our commercial crises
might be expected on the whole to take on increasingly the character of
periodical under instead of over-production! Enough of this exercise in
logic. The upshot of it all is that Rodbertus conceives the national
product in respect of its value as made up of two parts only, of _s_ and
_v_, thus wholly subscribing to the views and traditions of the
classical school he is fighting tooth and nail, and even adding his own
flourish that the capitalists consume the entire surplus value. That is
why he repeatedly says without mincing his words, as in the fourth
LETTER ON SOCIAL PROBLEMS:

Accordingly, we must abstract from, the reasons which cause the division
of rent in general into rent: proper fixed capital rent, to find the
basic principle underlying the division of rent (surplus value) in
general, the principle underlying _the division of the labour product
into wage and rent_.⁽⁴⁾

And, in the third LETTER:

Ground rent, capital profit and the wage of labour are, let me repeat,
revenue. By this means landlords, capitalists and workers must live,
must satisfy, that is to say, their immediate human necessities. They
must therefore draw their income in the form of goods suitable for this
purpose.⁽⁵⁾

The misrepresentation of capitalist economy has never been formulated
more crudely, and there is no doubt that Rodbertus claims the palm of
priority not so much over Marx as over all popular economists with full
justification. To leave the reader in no doubt about the utter muddle he
has made, he goes on, in the same letter, to rank capitalist surplus
value as an economic category on the same level as the revenue of the
ancient slave-owner:

The first state (that of slavery) goes with the most primitive natural
economy: that portion of the labour product which is withheld from the
income of workers or slaves and forms the masters or owners property,
will undividedly accrue to the one man who owns the land, the capital,
the worker and the labour product; there is not even a distinction of
thought between rent and capital profits. The second state entails the
most complicated money economy: that portion of the labour product,
withheld from the income of the now emancipated workers, and accruing to
the respective owners of land, and capital, will be further divided
among the owners of the raw material and the manufactured product
respectively; the one rent of the former state will be split up into
ground rent and capital profits, and will have to be differentiated
accordingly.⁽⁶⁾

Rodbertus regards the splitting-up of the surplus value withheld from
the workers income as the most striking difference between exploitation
by slavery and modern capitalist exploitation. It is not the specific
historical form of sharing out newly created value among labour and
capital, but the distribution of the surplus value among the various
people it benefits, which, irrelevant to the productive process, is yet
the decisive fact in the capitalist mode of production. In all other
respects, capitalist surplus value remains just the same as the old
single rent of the slave-owner: a private fund for the exploiters own
consumption!

Yet Rodbertus again contradicts himself in other places, remembering all
of a sudden the constant capital and the necessity for its renewal in
the reproductive process. Thus, instead, of bisecting the aggregate
product into _v_ and _s_, he posits a triple division: _c_, _v_, and
_s_. In his third LETTER ON SOCIAL PROBLEMS he argues on the forms of
reproduction in a slave-economy:

Since the master will see to it that part of the slave labour is
employed in maintaining or even improving the fields, herds,
agricultural and manufacturing tools, there will be capital replacement,
to use a modern term, in which part of the national economic product is
immediately used for the upkeep of the estate, without any mediation by
exchange or even by exchange value.⁽⁷⁾

And, passing on to capitalist reproduction, he continues:

Now, in terms of value, one portion of the labour product, is used or
set aside for the maintenance of the estate, for capital replacement,
another, for the workers subsistence as their money wage; and the owners
of the land, of capital, and of the labour product retain the last as
their revenue or rent.⁽⁸⁾

This, then, is an explicit expression of the triple division into
constant capital, variable capital, and surplus value. Again, in this
third LETTER, he formulates the peculiarity of his new theory with equal
precision:

On this theory, then, and under conditions of adequate labour
productivity, the portion of the product which remains for wages after
the replacement of capital, will be distributed among workers and owners
as wages and rent, on the basis of the ownership in land and capital.⁽⁹⁾

It does seem now as if Rodbertus analysis of the value of the aggregate
product represents a distinct advance over the classical school. Even
Adam Smiths dogma is openly criticised a little further on, and it is
really surprising, that Rodbertus learned admirers, Messrs. Wagner,
Dietzel, Diehl & Co. failed to claim their white-headed boys priority
over Marx on such an important point of economic theory. As a matter of
fact, in this respect no less than in the general theory of value,
Rodbertus priority is of a somewhat dubious character. If he seems on
occasion to gain true insight, it immediately turns out to be a
misunderstanding, or at best a wrong approach. His criticism of Adam
Smiths dogma affords a supreme example of his failure to cope with the
triple division of the national product towards which he had groped his
way. He says literally:

You know that all economists since Adam Smith already divided the value
of the product into wage of labour, rent, and capital profit, that it is
therefore not a new idea to ground the incomes of the various classes,
and especially the various items of the rent, in a division of the
product. But the economists at once go off the track. All of them, not
even excepting Ricardos school, make the mistake, first, not to
recognise that the aggregate product, the finished good, the national
product as a whole, is an entity in which workers, landowners, and
capitalists all share, but conceiving the division of the unfinished
product to be of one kind shared among three partners, and that of the
manufactured product as of another kind again, shared between only two
partners. For these theories both the unfinished product and the
manufactured product constitute as such separate items of revenue.
Secondly, though both Sismondi and Ricardo are free from this particular
error they regard the natural fact that labour cannot produce goods
without material help, i.e. without the land, as an economic fact, and
take the social fact for a primary datum that capital as understood
to-day is required by the division of labour. Thus they set up the
fiction of a fundamental economic relationship on which they base also
for the shares of the various owners, ground rent springing from the
contribution of the land lent by the owner to production, capital
profits from the contribution of capital employed by the capitalist to
this end, and the wages finally from labours contribution, seeing that
there are separate owners of land, capital, and labour in the society.
Says school, elaborating on this mistake with much ingenuity, even
invented the concept of productive service of land, capital, and labour
in conformity with the shares in the product of their respective owners,
so as to explain these shares as the result of productive service.
Thirdly, they are caught up in the ultimate folly of deriving the wage
of labour and the items of rent from the value of the product, the value
of the product in turn being derived from the wage of labour and the
items of rent, so that the one is made to depend on the other and _vice
versa_. This absurdity is quite unmistakable when some of these authors
attempt to expound _The Influence of Rent Upon Production Prices_ and
_The Influence of Production Prices Upon Rent_ in two consecutive
chapters.⁽¹⁰⁾

Yet for all these excellent critical comments the last, particularly
acute, actually does to some extent anticipate Marxs criticism of this
point in CAPITAL, volume ii Rodbertus calmly falls in with the
fundamental blunder of the classical school and its vulgar followers: to
ignore altogether that part of the value of the aggregate product which
is needed to replace the constant capital of the society. This way it
was easier for him to keep up the singular fight against the declining
wage rate.

Under capitalist forms of production, the value of the aggregate social
product is divided into three parts: one corresponding to the value of
the constant capital, the second to the wage total, .i.e. the variable
capital, and the third to the aggregate surplus value of the capitalist
class. In this composition, the portion corresponding to the variable
capital is relatively on the decline, and this for two reasons. To begin
with, the relation of _c_ to (_v_ + _s_) within _c_ + _v_ + _s_ changes
all the time in the direction of a relative increase of _c_ and a
relative decrease of _v_ + _s_. This is the simple law for a progressive
efficiency of human labour, valid for all societies of economic
progress, independently of their historical forms, a formula which only
states that living labour is increasingly able to convert more means of
production into objects for use in an ever shorter time. And if
(_v_ + _s_) decreases as a whole, so must _v_, as its part, decrease in
relation to the total value of the product. To kick against this, to try
and stop the decrease, would be tantamount to contending against the
general effects of a growing labour productivity. Further, there is
within (_v_ + _s_) as well a change in the direction of a relative
decrease in _v_ and a relative increase in _s_, that is to say, an ever
smaller part of the newly created value is spent on wages and an ever
greater part is appropriated as surplus value. This is the specifically
capitalist formula of progressive labour productivity which, under
capitalist conditions of production, is no less valid than the general
law. To use the power of the state to prevent a decrease of _v_ as
against _s_ would mean that the fundamental commodity of labour power is
debarred from this progress which decreases production costs for all
commodities; it would mean the exemption of this one commodity from the
economic effects of technical progress. More than that: the declining
wage rate is only another expression of the rising rate of surplus value
which forms the most powerful and effective means of checking a decline
of the profit rate, and which therefore represents the prime incentive
for capitalist production in general, and for technical progress within
this system of production in particular. Doing away with the declining
wage rate by way of legislation would be as much as to do away with the
_raison dêtre_ of capitalist society, to deal a crippling blow to its
entire system. Let us face the facts: the individual capitalist, just
like capitalist society as a whole, has no glimmering that the value of
the product is made up from the sum total of labour necessary in the
society, and this is actually beyond his grasp. Value, as the capitalist
understands it, is the derivative form, reversed by competition as
production costs. While in truth the value of the product is broken down
into the values of its component fragments _c_, _v_ and _s_, the
capitalist mind conceives of it as the summation of _v_ and _s_. These,
in addition, also appear to him from a distorted perspective and in a
secondary form, as

1.  the wear and tear of his fixed capital,
2.  his advances on circulating capital, including workers wages, and
3.  the current profits, i.e. the average rate of profit on his entire
    capital.

How, then, is the capitalist to be compelled by a law, say of the kind
envisaged by Rodbertus, to maintain a fixed wage rate in the face of the
aggregate value of the product? It would be quite as brilliant to
stipulate by law for exactly one-third, no more, no less, of the total
price of the product to be payable for the raw materials employed in the
manufacture of any commodity. Obviously, Rodbertus supreme notion, of
which he was so proud, on which he built as if it were a new Archimedean
discovery, which was to be the specific for all the ills of capitalist
production, is arrant nonsense from all aspects of the capitalist mode
of production. It could only result from the muddle in the theory of
value which is brought to a head in Rodbertus inimitable phrase: that
now, in a capitalist society, the product must have value-in-exchange
just as it had to have value-in-use in ancient economy.⁽¹¹⁾ People in
ancient society had to eat bread and meat in order to live, but we of
to-day are already satisfied with knowing the price of bread and of
meat. The most obvious inference from Rodbertus monomania about a fixed
wage rate is that he is quite incapable of understanding capitalist
accumulation.

Previous quotations have already shown that Rodbertus thinks solely of
simple commodity, production, quite in keeping with his mistaken
doctrine that the purpose of capitalist production is the manufacture of
consumer goods for the satisfaction of human wants. For he always talks
of capital replacements, of the need to enable the capitalists to
continue their enterprise on the previous scale. His principal argument,
however, is directly opposed to the accumulation of capital. To fix the
rate of the surplus value, to prevent its growth, is tantamount to
paralysing the accumulation of capital. Both Sismondi and v. Kirchmann
had recognised the problem of balancing production and consumption to be
indeed a problem of accumulation, that is to say of enlarged capitalist
reproduction. Both traced the disturbances in the equilibrium of
reproduction to accumulative tendencies denying the possibility of
accumulation, with the only difference that the one recommended a damper
on the productive forces as a remedy, while the other favoured their
increasing employment to produce luxuries, the entire surplus value to
be consumed. In this field, too, Rodbertus follows his own solitary
path. The others might try with more or less success to comprehend the
_fact_ of capitalist accumulation, but Rodbertus prefers to fight the
very concept. Economists since Adam Smith have one after the other
echoed the principle, setting it up as a universal and absolute truth,
that capital could only come about by saving and accumulating.⁽¹²⁾

Rodbertus is up in arms against this deluded judgment. Over sixty pages
of print he sets, out in detail that _(a)_ it is not saving which is the
source of capital but labour, that _(b)_ the economists delusion about
saving hails from the extravagant view that capital is itself
productive, and that _(c)_ this delusion is ultimately due to another:
the error that capital is capital.

v. Kirchmann for his part understood quite well what is at the bottom of
capitalist savings. He had the pretty argument:

Everyone knows that the accumulation of capital is not a mere hoarding
of reserves, an amassing of metal and monies to remain idle in the
owners vaults. Those who want to save do it for the sake of re-employing
their savings either personally or through the agency of others as
capital, in order to yield them revenue. That is only possible if these
capitals are used in new enterprises which can produce so as to provide
the required interest. One may build a ship, another a barn, a third may
reclaim a desolate swamp, a fourth may order a new spinning frame, while
a fifth, in order to enlarge his shoe-making business, would buy more
leather and employ more hands and so on. Only if the capital that has
been saved is employed in this way, can it yield interest (teaming
profit), and the latter is the ultimate object of all saving.⁽¹³⁾

That is how v. Kirchmann described somewhat clumsily, but on the whole
correctly, what is in fact the capitalisation of surplus value, the
process of capitalist accumulation, which constitutes the whole
significance of saving, advocated by classical economists since Adam
Smith with unerring instinct. Declaring war on saving and accumulation
was quite in keeping with v. Kirchmanns premises, considering that he,
like Sismondi, saw the immediate cause of the crises in accumulation.
Here, too, Rodbertus is more thorough. Having learned from Ricardos
theory of value that labour is the source of all value, and consequently
of capital, too, he is completely blinded by this elementary piece of
knowledge to the entire complexity of capitalist production and capital
movements. Since capital is generated by labour, both the accumulation
of capital, i.e. saving, and the capitalisation of the surplus value are
nothing but eyewash.

In order to untangle this intricate network of errors by economists
since Adam Smith, he takes, as we might expect, the example of the
isolated husbandman and proves all that he needs by a long-drawn
vivisection of the unhappy creature. Here already he discovers capital,
that is to say, of course, that famous original stick with which
economists since Adam Smith have hooked the fruits of a theory of
capital from the tree of knowledge. Would saving be able to produce this
stick? is his query. And since every normal person will understand that
saving cannot produce any stick, that Robinson [Crusoe] must have made
it of wood, we have already proved that the savings theory is quite
mistaken. Presently the isolated husbandman hooks a fruit from the tree
with the stick, and this fruit is his income.

If capital were the source of income, already this most elementary and
primitive event would have to give evidence of this relation. Would it
be true to say, then, without doing violence to facts and concepts, that
the stick is a _source_ of income or of part of the income consisting in
the fruit brought down? can we trace income, wholly or in part, back to
the stick as its _cause_, may we consider it, wholly or in parts, as a
_product_ of the stick?⁽¹⁴⁾

Surely not. And since the fruit is the product, not of the stick which
brought it down, but of the tree which grew it, Rodbertus has already
proved that all economists since Adam Smith are grossly mistaken if they
maintain that income derives from capital. After a clear exposition of
all fundamental concepts of economics on the example of Robinson
[Crusoe]s economy, Rodbertus transfers the knowledge thus acquired first
to a fictitious society without ownership in capital or land, that is to
say to a society with a communist mode of possession, and then to a
society with ownership in capital and land, that is to say contemporary
society, and, lo and behold all the laws of Robinson [Crusoe]s economy
apply point for point to these two forms of society as well. Rodbertus
contrives here a theory of capital and income which is the very crown of
his Utopian imagination. Since he has discovered that Robinson [Crusoe]s
capital is the means of production pure and simple, he identifies
capital with the means of production in capitalist economy as well. Thus
reducing capital, with a wave of his hand, to constant capital, he
protests in the name of justice and morality against the fact that the
wages, the workers means of subsistence, are also considered capital. He
contends furiously against the _concept_ of variable capital, seeing in
it the cause of every disaster. If only, he grieves, economists would
pay attention to what I say, if only they would examine without
prejudice whether they are right or I. This is the focal point of all
errors about capital in the ruling system, this is the ultimate source
of injustice against the working classes, in theory and practice
alike.⁽¹⁵⁾

For justice demands that the goods constituting the real wages of the
workers be counted, not as part of capital, but as belonging to the
category of income. Though Rodbertus knows very well that the capitalist
must regard the wages he has advanced as part of his capital, just like
the other part laid out on immediate means of production, yet in his
opinion this applies only to individual capitals. As soon as it is a
question of the social aggregate product, of reproduction as a whole, he
declares the capitalist categories of production an illusion, a
malicious lie and a wrong. Capital _per se_ (properly so-called), the
items which make up capital, capital from the nations point of view, is
something quite different from private capital, capital _assets_,
capital _property_, all that capital in the modern use of the term
usually stands for.⁽¹⁶⁾

An individual capitalist produces by capitalist methods, but society as
a whole must produce like Robinson [Crusoe], as a collective owner
employing communist methods.

It makes no difference from this general and _national point of view_
that greater or smaller parts of the aggregate national product are now
owned in all the various phases of production by private persons who
must not be numbered among the producers proper, and that the latter
always manufacture this national aggregate product as servants without
sharing in the ownership of their own product of these few owners.

Certain peculiarities of the relations within the society as a whole no
doubt result from this, namely (1) the institution of exchange as an
intermediary, and (2) the inequality in the distribution of the product.

Yet all these consequences do not affect the movements of national
production and the shaping of the national product which are always the
same, now as ever (under the rule of communism), no more than they alter
in any respect, as far as the _national point of view_ is concerned, the
contrast between capital and income so far established.

Sismondi had laboured in the sweat of his brow, as had Smith and many
others to disentangle the concepts of capital and income from the
contradictions of capitalist production. Rodbertus has a simpler method
and abstracts from the specific forms determined by capitalist
production for society as a whole; he simply calls the means of
production capital and the article of consumption revenue and leaves it
at that.

The essential influence of ownership in land and capital applies only to
individuals having traffic with one another. If the nation is taken as a
unit, the effects of such ownership upon the individuals completely
disappear.⁽¹⁷⁾

We see that as soon as Rodbertus comes up against the real problem, the
capitalist aggregate product and its movements, he exhibits the Utopians
characteristic obtuseness in respect of the historical peculiarities of
production. Marxs comment on Proudhon, that speaking of society as a
whole, he pretends that this society is no longer capitalist therefore
fits him like a glove. The case of Rodbertus again exemplifies how every
economist before Marx had been at a loss when it came to harmonising the
concrete aspects of the labour process with the perspective of
capitalist production which regards everything in terms of value, to
mediating between the forms of movement performed by individual capitals
and the movement of social capital. Such efforts as a rule vacillate
from one extreme to another: the shallow approach of Say and MacCulloch,
recognising only the conceptions of individual capital, and the Utopian
approach of Proudhon and Rodbertus who recognise only those of the
process of labour. That is the context in which Marxs penetration
appears in its true light. His diagram of simple reproduction
illuminates the entire problem by gathering up all these perspectives in
their harmony and their contradictions, and so resolves the hopeless
obscurities of innumerable tomes into two rows of figures of striking
simplicity.

On the strength of such views on capital and income as these, capitalist
appropriation is clearly quite impossible to understand. Indeed,
Rodbertus simply brands it as robbery and indicts it before the forum of
the rights of property it so blatantly violates.

This personal freedom of the workers which ought legally to involve
ownership in the value of the labour product, leads in practice to their
renunciation of the proprietary claims extorted under pressure of
ownership in land and capital; but the owners do not admit to this great
and universal wrong, almost as though they were instinctively afraid
that history might follow its own stern and inexorable logic.⁽¹⁸⁾

Rodbertus theory in all its details is therefore conclusive proof that
those who praise present-day relations of ownership without being able
at the same time to ground ownership in anything but labour, completely
contradict their own principle. It proves that the property relations of
to-day are in fact founded on a universal violation of this principle,
that the great individual fortunes being amassed in society nowadays are
the result of cumulative robbery mounting up in society with every
newborn worker since time immemorial.⁽¹⁹⁾

Since surplus value is thus branded as robbery, an increasing rate of
surplus value must appear as a strange error of present day economic
organisation. Brissots crude paradox with its revolutionary ring
property is theft had been the starting point for Proudhons first
pamphlet, but Rodbertus thesis is quite another matter, arguing that
capital is theft perpetrated on property. It need only be set side by
side with Marxs chapter on the transformation of the laws of ownership
into the laws of capitalist appropriation this triumph of historical
dialectics in vol.i of Marxs CAPITAL in order to show up Rodbertus
priority. By ranting against capitalist appropriation under the aspect
of the right of property, Rodbertus closed his mind to capital as the
source of surplus value just as effectively as he had previously been
prevented by his tirades against saving from seeing the surplus value as
a source of capital. He is thus in alt even worse position than v.
Kirchmann, lacking all qualifications for understanding capitalist
accumulation.

What it amounts to is that Rodbertus wants unrestricted expansion of
production without saving, that is to say without capitalist
accumulation! He wants an unlimited growth of the productive forces, and
at the same time a rate of surplus value stabilised by an act of law. In
short, he shows himself quite unable to grasp the real foundations of
capitalist production he wishes to reform, and to understand the most
important results of the classical economics he criticises so adversely.

It is no more than to be expected, therefore, that Prof. Diehl should
declare Rodbertus a pioneer of economic theory on the strength of his
new theory of income and of the distinction between the logical and the
historical categories of capital (capital properly so-called in contrast
to individual capital), that Prof. Adolf Wagner should call him the
Ricardo of economic socialism, proving himself ignorant at once of
Ricardo, Rodbertus and socialism alike. Lexis even judges that Rodbertus
is at least the equal of his British rival in power of abstract
thinking, and by far his superior in virtuosity to Say bare the
phenomena in their ultimate connections, in imaginative vitality, and
above all in his ethical approach to economic life. Rodbertus real
achievements in economic theory however, other than his critique of
Ricardos ground-rent, his at times quite clear-cut distinction between
surplus value and profit, his treatment of the surplus value as a whole
in deliberate contrast with its partial manifestations, his critique of
Smiths dogma concerning the analysis of commodities in terms of value,
his precise formulation of the periodical character of the crises and
his analysis of their manifestations all these attempts to carry the
investigation beyond Smith, Ricardo and Say, promising as such, though
doomed to failure because of the confused basic concepts, are rather
above the heads of Rodbertus official admirers. As Franz Mehring already
pointed out, it was Rodbertus strange fortune to be lauded to heaven for
his alleged prowess in economics, by the same people who called him to
task for his real merits in politics. This contrast between economic and
political achievements, however, does not concern us here: in the realm
of economic theory, his admirers built him a grand memorial on the
barren field he had dug with the hopeless zeal of the visionary, while
the modest beds where he had sown a few fertile seeds, were allowed to
be smothered with weeds and forgotten.⁽²⁰⁾

It cannot be said that the problem of accumulation had on the whole been
much advanced beyond the first controversy by this Prusso-Pomeranian
treatment. If in the interim the economic theory of harmony had dropped
from the level of Ricardo to that of a Bastiat-Schultze, social
criticism had correspondingly declined from Sismondi to Rodbertus.
Sismondis critique of 1819 had been an historical event, but Rodbertus
ideas of reform, even on their first appearance, were a miserable
regression still more so on their subsequent reiteration.

In the controversy between Sismondi on the one hand and Say and Ricardo
on the other, one party proved that accumulation was impossible because
of the crises, and therefore warned against full development of the
productive forces. The other party proved that crises were impossible
and advocated an unlimited development of accumulation. Though all
argued from wrong premises, each was logically consistent.

v. Kirchmann and Rodbertus both started, were bound to start, from the
fact of crises. Here the problem of enlarged reproduction of aggregate
capital, the problem of accumulation, was completely identified with the
problem of crises and side-tracked in an attempt to find a remedy for
the crises, although the historical experience of fifty years had shown
all too clearly that crises, as witnessed by their periodical
recurrence, are a necessary phase in capitalist reproduction. One side
now sees the remedy in the complete consumption of the surplus value by
the capitalist, that is to say in refraining from accumulation, the
other in stabilisation of the rate of surplus value by legislative
measures which comes to the same thing, i.e. renouncing accumulation
altogether. This special fad of Rodbertus sprang from his fervent and
explicit belief in an unlimited capitalist expansion of the productive
forces and of wealth, without accumulation of capital. At a time when
capitalist production was developed to a degree which was soon to enable
Marx to make his fundamental analysis, the last attempt of bourgeois
economics to cope with the problem of reproduction degenerated into
absurd and puerile Utopianism.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾SCHRIFTEN, vol.iii, p.176.

⁽²⁾OP. CIT., vol.i, pp.53, 57.

⁽³⁾IBID., p.206.

⁽⁴⁾IBID., p.19.

⁽⁵⁾OP. CIT., vol.ii, p.110.

⁽⁶⁾IBID., p.144.

⁽⁷⁾IBID., p.146.

⁽⁸⁾IBID., p.155.

⁽⁹⁾IBID., p.223.

⁽¹⁰⁾IBID., p.226.

⁽¹¹⁾IBID., p.156.

⁽¹²⁾OP. CIT., vol.i, p.40.

⁽¹³⁾OP. CIT., vol.ii, p.25.

⁽¹⁴⁾OP. CIT., vol.i, p.250.

⁽¹⁵⁾IBID., p.295. Rodbertus reiterates during a lifetime the ideas he
had evolved as early as 1842 in his TOWARDS THE UNDERSTANDING OF OUR
POLITICO-ECONOMIC CONDITIONS.

Under present conditions, we have, however, gone so far as to consider
not only the wage of labour part of the costs of the goods, but also
rents and capital profits. We must therefore refute this opinion in
detail. It has a twofold foundation: _(a)_ a wrong conception of capital
which counts the wage of labour as part of the capital just like
materials and tools, while it is on the same level as rent and profit;
_(b)_ a confusion of the costs of the commodity and the advances of the
entrepreneur or the costs of the enterprise (TOWARDS THE UNDERSTANDING
OF OUR POLITICO-ECONOMIC CONDITIONS, Neubrandenburg & Friedland, G.
Barnovitz, 1842, p.14).

⁽¹⁶⁾SCHRIFTEN, vol.i, p.304. Just so already in TOWARDS THE
UNDERSTANDING OF OUR POLITICO-ECONOMIC CONDITIONS,

We must distinguish between capital in its narrow or proper sense, and
the fund of enterprise, or capital in a wider sense. The former
comprises the actual reserves in tools and materials, the latter the
find necessary for running an enterprise under present conditions of
division of labour. The former is capital absolutely necessary to
production, and the latter achieves such relative necessity only by
force of present conditions. Hence only the former is capital in the
strict and proper meaning of the term; this alone is completely
congruent with the concept of national capital (IBID., pp. 23-4).

⁽¹⁷⁾SCHRIFTEN, vol.i, p.292.

⁽¹⁸⁾OP. CIT., vol.ii, p.136.

⁽¹⁹⁾IBID., p.225.

⁽²⁰⁾ A memorial of the worst kind, by the way, was that of the editors
who published his works after his death. These learned gentlemen,
Messrs. Wagner, Kozak, Moritz Wuertz & Co., quarrelled in the prefaces
to his posthumous writings like a rough crowd of ill-mannered servants
in an antechamber, fighting out publicly their petty personal feuds and
jealousies, and slanging one another. They did not even bother in common
decency to establish the dates for the individual manuscripts they had
found. To take an instance, it needed Mehring to observe that the oldest
manuscript of Rodbertus that had been found was not published in 1837,
as laid down autocratically by Prof. Wagner, but in 1839 at the
earliest, since it refers in its opening paragraphs to historical events
connected with the Chartist movement belonging, as a professor of
economics really ought to know, in the year 1839. In Professor Wagners
introduction to Rodbertus we are constantly bored by his pomposity, his
harping on the excessive demands on his time; in any ease Wagner
addresses himself solely to his learned colleagues and talks above the
heads of the common crowd; he passes over in silence, as befits a great
man, Mehrings elegant correction before the assembled experts. Just as
silently, Professor Diehl altered the date of 1837 to 1839 in the
HANDWÖRTERBUCH DER STAATSWISSENSCHAFTEN, without a word to say when and
by whom he had been thus enlightened.

But the final touch is provided, by the popular, new and inexpensive
edition of Puttkamer and Muehlbrecht (1899). Some of the quarrelling
editors collaborated on it but still continue their disputes in the
introductions. Wagners former vol.ii has become vol.i in this edition,
yet Wagner still refers to vol.ii in the introduction to vol.i. The
first LETTER ON SOCIAL PROBLEMS is placed in vol.iii, the second and
third in vol.ii and the fourth in vol.i. The order of the LETTERS ON
SOCIAL PROBLEMS, of the CONTROVERSIES, of the parts of TOWARDS THE
UNDERSTANDING ..., chronological and logical sequence, the dates of
publication and of writing are hopelessly mixed up, making a chaos more
impenetrable than the stratification of the soil after repeated volcanic
eruptions. 1837 is maintained as the date of Rodbertus earliest MS.,
probably out of respect to Professor Wagner and this in 1899, although
Mehrings rectification had been made in 1894. If we compare this with
Marxs literary heritage in Mehrings and Kautskys edition, published by
Dietz, we see how such apparently superficial matters but reflect deeper
connections: one kind of care for the scientific heritage of the
authority of the class-conscious proletariat, and quite another in which
the official experts of the bourgeoisie squander the heritage of a man
who, in their own self interested legends, had been a first-rate genius.
_Suum cuique_ had this not been the motto of Rodbertus?

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 12.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Two Historical Exposition of the Problem * Third Round Struve-Bulgakov-Tugan Baranovski v. Vorontsov-Nikolayon

 



CHAPTER 18 A NEW VERSION OF THE PROBLEM


 

THE third controversy about capitalist accumulation takes place in an
historical setting quite different from that of the two earlier ones.
The time flow is the period from the beginning of the eighties to the
middle of the nineties, the scene Russia. In Western Europe, capitalism
had already attained maturity. The rose-coloured classical view of Smith
and Ricardo in a budding bourgeois economy had long since vanished ...
the self-interested optimism of the vulgarian Manchester doctrine of
harmony had been silenced by the devastating impact of the world
collapse in the seventies, and under the heavy blows of a violent class
struggle that blazed up in all capitalist countries after the sixties.
Even that harmony patched up with social reformism which had its hey-day
after the early eighties, especially in Germany, soon ended in a
hangover. The trial of twelve years special legislation against the
Social Democratic Party had brought about bitter disillusionment, and
ultimately destroyed all the veils of harmony, revealing the cruel
capitalist contradictions in their naked reality. Since then, optimism
had only been possible in the camp of the rising working class and its
theorists. This was admittedly not optimism about a natural, or
artificially established equilibrium of capitalist economy, or about the
eternal duration of capitalism, but rather the conviction that
capitalism, by mightily furthering the development of the productive
forces, and in virtue of its inherent contradictions, would provide an
excellent soil for the historical progress of society towards new
economic and social forms. The negative, depressing tendency of the
first stage of capitalism, at one time realised by Sismondi alone and
still observed by Rodbertus as late as the forties and fifties, is
compensated by a tendency towards elation: the hopeful and victorious
striving of the workers for ascendancy in their trade-union movement and
by political action.

Such was the setting in Western Europe. In the Russia of that time,
however, the picture was different indeed. Here, the seventies and
eighties represent in every respect a period of transition, a period of
internal crises with all its agonies. Big industry only now staged its
real entry, fostered by the period of high protective tariffs. In
particular, the introduction of a tariff on gold at the Western frontier
in 1877 was a special landmark in the absolutist governments new policy
of forcing the growth of capitalism. Primitive accumulation of capital
flourished splendidly in Russia, encouraged by all kinds of state
subsidies, guarantees, premiums and government orders. It earned profits
which would already seem legendary to the West. Yet the picture of
internal conditions in contemporary Russia was anything but attractive
and auspicious. On the plains, the decline and disintegration of rural
economy under the pressure of exploitation by the Exchequer, and the
monetary system caused terrible conditions, periodical famines and
peasant risings. In the towns, again, the factory proletariat had not
yet been consolidated, either socially or mentally, into a modern
working class. For the greater part, it was still closely connected with
agriculture, and remained semi-rural, particularly in the large
industrial parts of Moscow-Vladimir, the most important centre of the
Russian textile industry. Accordingly, primitive forms of exploitation
were countered by primitive measures of defence. Not until the early
eighties did the spontaneous factory revolts in the Moscow district with
their smashing up of machines provide the impetus for the first
rudiments of factory legislation in the Czarist Empire.

If the economic aspect of Russian public life showed at every step the
harsh discords of a period of transition, there was a corresponding
crisis in intellectual life. Populism, the indigenous, brand of Russian
socialism, theoretically grounded in the peculiarities of the Russian
agrarian constitution, was politically finished with the failure of the
terrorist party of Narodnaya Volya, its extreme revolutionary exponent.
The first writings of George Plekhanov, on the other hand, which were to
pave the way in Russia for Marxist trains of thought, had only been
published in 1883 and 1885, and for about a decade they seemed to have
little influence during the eighties and up to the nineties the mental
life of the Russian, and in particular of the socialist intelligentsia
with theft tendency towards opposition, was dominated by a peculiar
mixture of indigenous populist remnants and random elements of
theoretical Marxism. The most remarkable feature of this mixture was
scepticism as to the possibility of capitalist development in Russia.

At an early date, the Russian intelligentsia had been preoccupied with
the question whether Russia should follow the example of Western Europe
and embark on capitalist development. At first, they noticed only the
bleak aspects of capitalism in the West, its disintegrating effects upon
the traditional patriarchal forms of production and upon the prosperity
and assured livelihood for the broad masses of the population. As
against that, the Russian rural communal ownership in land, the famous
_obshchina_, seemed to offer a short-cut to the blessed land of
socialism, a lead direct to a higher social development of Russia,
without the capitalist phase and its attendant misery as experienced in
Western Europe. Would it be right to fling away this fortunate and
exceptional position, this unique historical opportunity, and forcibly
transplant capitalist production to Russia with the help of the state?
Would it be right to destroy the system of rural holdings and
production, and open the doors wide to proletarisation, to misery and
insecurity of existence for the tolling masses?

The Russian intelligentsia was preoccupied with this fundamental problem
ever since the Agrarian Reform, and even earlier, since Hertzen, and
especially since Chernishevski. This was the wholly unique world view of
populism in a nutshell. An enormous literature was created in Russia by
this intellectual tendency ranging from the avowedly reactionary
doctrines of the Slavophiles to the revolutionary theory of the
terrorist party. On the one hand, it encouraged the collection of vast
material by separate inquiries into the economic forms of Russian life,
into national production and its singular aspects, into agriculture as
practised by the peasant communes, into the domestic industries of the
peasants, the _artel_, and also into the mental life of the peasants,
the sects and similar phenomena. On the other hand, a peculiar type of
_belles lettres_ sprang up as the artistic reflection of the
contradictory social conditions, the struggle between old and new ways
which beset the mind at every step with difficult problems. Finally, in
the seventies and eighties, a peculiarly stuffy philosophy of history
sprang up from the same root and found its champions in Peter Lavrov,
Nicolai Mikhailoysky, Professor Kareyev and V. Vorontsov. It was the
subjective method in sociology which declared critical thought to be the
decisive factor in social development, or which, more precisely, sought
to make a down-at-heel intelligentsia the agent of historical progress.

Here we are interested only in one aspect of this wide field with its
many ramifications, _viz._: the struggle of opinions regarding the
chances of capitalist development, and even then only in so far as these
were based upon general reflections on the social conditions of the
capitalist mode of reduction, since these latter were also to play a big
part in the Russian controversial literature of the eighties and
nineties.

The point at issue was to begin with Russian capitalism and its
prospects, but this, of course, led further afield to the whole problem
of capitalist development. The example and the experiences of the West
were adduced as vital evidence in this debate.

One fact was of decisive importance for the theoretical content of the
discussion that followed: not only was Marxs analysis of capitalist
production as laid down in the first volume of CAPITAL already common
property of educated Russia, but the second volume, too, with its
analysis of the reproduction of capital as a whole had already been
published in 1885. This gave a fundamentally new twist to the
discussion. No more did the problem of crises obscure the real crux of
the problem: for the first time, the argument centred purely in the
reproduction of capital as a whole, in accumulation. Nor was the
analysis bogged any longer by an aimless fumbling for the concepts of
income and of individual and aggregate capital. Marxs diagram of social
reproduction had provided a firm foothold. Finally, the issue was no
longer between _laissez-faire_ and social reform, but between two
varieties of socialism. The petty-bourgeois and somewhat muddled
populist brand of Russian socialists stood for scepticism regarding the
possibility of capitalist development, much in the spirit of Sismondi
and, in part, of Rodbertus, though they themselves frequently cited Marx
as their authority. Optimism, on the other hand, was represented by the
Marxist school in Russia. Thus the setting of the stage had been shifted
completely. One of the two champions of the populist movement,
Vorontsov, known in Russia mainly under the _nom de plume_ V.V. (his
initials), was an odd customer. His economics were completely muddled,
and as an expert on theory he cannot be taken seriously at all. The
other, Nikolayon (Danielson), however, was a man of wide education, and
thoroughly conversant with Marxism. He had edited the Russian
translation of the first volume of CAPITAL and was a personal friend of
Marx and Engels, with both of whom he kept up a lively correspondence
(published in the Russian language in 1908). Nevertheless it was
Vorontsov who influenced public opinion among the Russian intelligentsia
in the eighties, and Marxists in Russia had to fight him above all. As
for our problem: the general prospects of capitalist development, a new
generation of Russian Marxists, who had learned from the historical
experience and knowledge of Western Europe, joined forces with George
Plekhanov in opposition to the above-mentioned two representatives of
scepticism in the nineties. They were amongst others Professor Kablukov,
Professor Manuilov, Professor Issayev, Professor Skvortsov, Vladimir
Ilyin,^((1*)) Peter v. Struve, Bulgakov, and Professor Tugan-Baranovski.
In the further course of our investigation we shall, however, confine
ourselves to the last three of these, since every one of them furnished
a more or less finished critique of this theory on the point with which
we are here concerned. This battle of wits, brilliant in parts, which
kept the socialist intelligentsia spellbound in the nineties and was
only brought to an end by the walkover of the Marxist school, officially
inaugurated the infiltration into Russian thought of Marxism as an
economic-historical theory. Legalist Marxism at that time publicly took
possession of the Universities, the Reviews and the economic book market
in Russia with all the disadvantages of such a position. Ten years
later, when the revolutionary risings of the proletariat demonstrated in
the streets the darker side of this optimism about capitalist
development, none of this Pleïad of Marxist optimists, with but a single
exception, was to be found in the camp of the proletariat.

 

 

Note by MIA

^((1*)) Lenin.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 11.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Two Historical Exposition of the Problem * Third Round Struve-Bulgakov-Tugan Baranovski v. Vorontsov-Nikolayon

 



CHAPTER 19 VORONTSOV AND HIS SURPLUS


 

THE representatives of Russian populism were convinced that capitalism
had no future in Russia, and this conviction brought them to the problem
of capitalist reproduction. V.V. laid down his theories on this point in
a series of articles in the review PATRIOTIC MEMOIRS and in other
periodicals which were collected and published in 1882 under the title
THE DESTINY OF CAPITALISM IN RUSSIA. He further dealt with the problem
in _The Commodity Surplus in the Supply of the Market_,⁽¹⁾_Militarism
and Capitalism_,⁽²⁾OUR TRENDS,⁽³⁾ and finally in OUTLINES OF ECONOMIC
THEORY.⁽⁴⁾ It is not easy to determine Vorontsovs attitude towards
capitalist development in Russia. He sided neither with the purely
slavophil theory which deduced the perversity and perniciousness of
capitalism for Russia from the peculiarities of the Russian economic
structure and a specifically Russian national character, nor with the
Marxists who saw in capitalist development an unavoidable historical
stage which is needed to clear the way towards social progress for
Russian society, too. Vorontsov for his part simply asserts that
denunciation and acclamation of capitalism are equally futile because,
having no roots in Russia, capitalism is just impossible there and can
have no future. The essential conditions of capitalist development are
lacking in Russia, and loves labours lost if the state tries to promote
it artificially one might as well spare these efforts together with the
heavy sacrifices they entail. But if we look into the matter more
closely, Vorontsovs thesis is not nearly so uncompromising. For if we
pay attention to the fact that capitalism does not mean only the
accumulation of capital wealth but also that the small producer is
reduced to the proletarian level, that the labourers livelihood is not
assured and that there are periodical crises, then Vorontsov would by no
means deny that all these phenomena exist in Russia. On the contrary, he
explicitly says in his preface to THE DESTINY OF CAPITALISM IN RUSSIA:
Whilst I dispute the possibility of capitalism as a form of production
in Russia, I do not intend to commit myself in any way as to its future
as a form or degree of exploiting the national resources.

Vorontsov consequently is of the opinion that capitalism in Russia
merely cannot attain the same degree of maturity as in the West, whereas
the severance of the immediate producer from the means of production
might well be expected under Russian conditions. Vorontsov goes even
further: he does not dispute at all that a development of the capitalist
mode of production is quite possible in various branches of production,
and even allows for capitalist exports from Russia to foreign markets.
Indeed he says in his essay on _The Commodity surplus in the Supply of
the Market_ that in several branches of industry, capitalist production
develops very quickly⁽⁵⁾ [in the Russian meaning of the term, of course
_R.L._].

It is most probable that Russia, just like any other country, enjoys
certain natural advantages which enable her to act as a supplier of
certain kinds of commodities on foreign markets. It is extremely
possible that capital can profit by this fact and lay hands upon the
branches of production concerned that is to say the (inter)national
division of labour will make it easy for our capitalists to gain a
foothold in certain branches. This, however, is not the point. We do not
speak of a merely incidental participation of capital in the industrial
organisation of the country, but ask whether it is likely that the
entire production of Russia can be put on a capitalist basis.⁽⁶⁾

Put in this form, Vorontsovs scepticism looks quite different from what
might have been expected at first. He doubts whether the capitalist mode
of production could ever gain possession of the entire production in
Russia; but then, capitalism has not so far accomplished this feat in
any country of the world, not even in England. Such a brand of
scepticism as to the future of capitalism appears at a glance quite
international in outlook. And indeed, Vorontsovs theory here amounts to
a quite general reflection on the nature and the essential conditions of
capitalism; it is based upon a general theoretical approach to the
productive process of social capital as a whole. Vorontsov gives the
following very clear formulation of the specific relations between the
capitalist mode of production and the problem of markets:

The (inter)national division of labour, the distribution of all branches
of industry among the countries taking part in international commerce,
is quite independent of capitalism.

The market which thus comes into being, the demand for the products of
different countries resulting from such a division of labour among the
nations, has intrinsically nothing in common with the market required by
the capitalist mode of production ... The products of capitalist
industry come on the market for another purpose; the question whether
all the needs of the country are satisfied is irrelevant to them, and
the entrepreneur does not necessarily receive in their stead another
material product which may, be consumed. Their main purpose is to
realise the surplus value they contain. What, then, is this surplus
value that it should interest the capitalist for its own sake? From our
point of view, it is the surplus of production over consumption inside
the country. Every worker produces more than he himself can consume, and
all the surplus items accumulate in a few hands; their owners themselves
consume them, exchanging them for the purpose against the most
variegated kinds of necessities and luxuries. Yet eat, drink and dance
as much as they like they will not be able to squander the whole of the
surplus value: a considerable remnant will be left over, of which they
have to dispose somehow even though they cannot exchange it for other
products. They must convert it into money, since it would otherwise just
go bad. Since there is no one inside the country on whom the capitalists
could foist this remnant, it must be exported abroad, and that is why
foreign markets are indispensable to countries embarking on the
capitalist venture.⁽⁷⁾

The above is a literal translation, showing all the peculiarities of
Vorontsovs diction, that the reader may have a taste of this brilliant
Russian theorist with whom one can spend moments of sheer delight.

Later, in 1895, Vorontsov summarised the same views in his book OUTLINES
OF ECONOMIC THEORY now claiming our attention. Here he takes a stand
against the views of Say and Ricardo, and in particular also against
John Stuart Mill who denied the possibility of general over-production.
In the course of his argument he discovers something no one had known
before: he has laid bare the source of all errors the classical school
made about the problem of crises. This mistake lies in a fallacious
theory of the costs of production to which bourgeois economists are
addicted. No doubt, from the aspect of the costs of production (which
according to Vorontsov's equally unheard-of assumption do not comprise
profits), both profit and crises are unthinkable and inexplicable. But
we can only appreciate this original thought to the full in the authors
own words:

According to the doctrine of bourgeois economists, the value of a
product is determined by the labour employed in its manufacture. Yet
bourgeois economists, once they have given this determination of value,
immediately forget it and base their subsequent explanation of the
exchange phenomena upon a different theory which substitutes costs of
production for labour. Thus two products are mutually exchanged in such
quantities that the costs of production are equal on both sides. Such a
view of the process of exchange indeed leaves no room for a commodity
surplus inside the country. Any product of a workers annual labour must,
from this point of view, represent a certain quantity of material of
which it is made of tools which have been used in its manufacture, and
of the products which served to maintain the workers during the period
of production. It [presumably the product _R.L._] appears on the market
in order to change its use-form, to reconvert itself into objects, into
products for the workers and the value necessary for renewing the tools.
As soon as it is split up into its component parts, the process of
reassembling, the productive process, will begin, in the course of which
all the values listed above will be consumed. In their stead, a new
product will come into being which is the connecting link between past
and future consumption.

From this perfectly unique attempt to demonstrate social reproduction as
a continuous process in the light of the costs of production, the
following conclusion is promptly drawn: Considering thus the aggregate
bulk of a countrys products, we shall find no commodity surplus at all
over and above the demand of society; an unmarketable surplus is
therefore impossible from the point of view of a bourgeois economic
theory of value.

Yet, after having eliminated capitalist profit from the costs of
production by an extremely autocratic manhandling of the bourgeois
theory of value, Vorontsov immediately presents this deficiency as a
great discovery: The above analysis, however, reveals yet another
feature in the theory of value prevalent of late: it becomes evident
that this theory leaves no room for capitalist profits.

The argument that follows is striking in its brevity and simplicity:
Indeed, if I exchange my own product, representing a cost of production
of 5 roubles, for another product of equal value, I receive only so much
as will be sufficient to cover my expense, but for my abstinence
[literally so _R.L._] I shall get nothing.

And now Vorontsov really comes to grips with the root of the problem:

Thus it is proved on a strictly logical development of the ideas held by
bourgeois economists that the destiny of the commodity surplus on the
market and that of capitalist profit is identical. This circumstance
justifies the conclusion that both phenomena are interdependent, that
the existence of one is a condition of the other, and indeed, so long as
there is no profit, there is no commodity surplus ... It is different if
the profit comes into being inside the country. Such profit is not
originally related to production; it is a phenomenon which is connected
with the latter not by technical and natural conditions but by an
extraneous social form. Production requires for its continuation ...
only material, tools, and means of subsistence for the workers,
therefore as such it consumes only the corresponding must be found for
the surplus which makes up the profit, and for which there is no room in
the permanent structure of industrial life, in production consumers,
namely, who are not organically connected with production, who are
fortuitous to a certain extent. The necessary number of such consumers
may or may not be forthcoming, and in the latter case there will be a
commodity surplus on the market.⁽⁸⁾

Well content with the simple enlightenment, by which he has turned the
surplus product into an invention of capital and the capitalist into a
fortuitous consumer who is not organically connected with capitalist
production, Vorontsov now turns to the crises. On the basis of Marxs
logical theory of the value of labour which he claims to employ in his
later works, he expounds them as an immediate result of the surplus
value, as follows:

If the working part of the population consumes what enters into the
costs of production in form of the wages for labour, the capitalists
themselves must destroy [literally so _R.L._] the surplus value,
excepting that part of it which the market requires for expansion. If
the capitalists are in a position to do so and act accordingly, there
can be no commodity surplus; if not, over-production, industrial crises,
displacement of the workers from the factories and other evils will
result.

According to Vorontsov, however, it is _the inadequate elasticity of the
human organism_ which cannot enlarge its capacity to consume as rapidly
as the surplus value is increasing, which is in the end responsible for
these evils. He repeatedly expresses this ingenious thought as follows:
The Achilles heel of capitalist industrial organisation thus lies in the
incapacity of the entrepreneurs to consume the whole of their income.

Having thus employed Marxs logical version of Ricardos theory of value,
Vorontsov arrives at Sismondis theory of crises which he adopts in as
crude and simplified a form as possible. He believes, of course, that he
is adopting the views of Rodbertus in reproducing those of Sismondi. The
inductive method of research, he declares triumphantly, has resulted in
the very same theory of crises and of pauperism which had been
objectively stated by Rodbertus.⁽⁹⁾

It is not quite clear what Vorontsov means by an inductive method of
research which he contrasts with the objective method since all things
are possible to Vorontsov, he may conceivably mean Marxs theory. Yet
Rodbertus, too, was not to emerge unimproved from the hands of the
original Russian thinker. Vorontsov corrects Rodbertus theory merely in
so far as he eliminates the stabilisation of the wage rate in accordance
with the value of the aggregate product which, to Rodbertus, had been
the pivot of his whole system. According to Vorontsov, this measure
against crises is a mere palliative, since the immediate cause of the
above phenomena (over-production, unemployment, etc.) is not that the
working classes receive too small a share of the national income, but
that the capitalist class cannot possibly consume all the products which
every year fall to their share.⁽¹⁰⁾

Yet, as soon as he has refitted Rodbertus reform of the distribution of
incomes, Vorontsov, with that strictly logical consistency so peculiar
to him, ultimately arrives at the following forecast for the future
destiny of capitalism:

If industrial organisation which prevails in W. Europe is to prosper and
flourish further still, it can only do so provided that some means will
be found to destroy [_verbatim_ _R.L._] that portion of the national
income which falls to the capitalists share over and above their
capacity to consume. The simplest solution of this problem will be an
appropriate change in the distribution of the aggregate income among
those who take part in production. If the entrepreneurs would retain for
themselves only so much of all increase of the national income as they
sited to satisfy all their whims and fancies, leaving the remainder to
the working class, the mass of the people, then the régime of capitalism
would be assured for a long time to come.⁽¹¹⁾

The hash of Ricardo, Marx, Sismondi and Rodbertus thus is topped with
the discovery that capitalist production could be radically cured of
over-production, that it could prosper and flourish, in all eternity, if
the capitalists would refrain from capitalising their surplus value and
would make a free gift to the working class of the corresponding part of
the surplus value. Meanwhile the capitalists, until they have become
sensible enough to accept Vorontsovs good advice, employ other means for
the annual destruction of a part of their surplus: Value. Modern
militarism, amongst others, is one of these appropriate measures and
this precisely to the exit to which the bills of militarism, are footed
by the capitalists income for Vorontsov can be counted upon to turn
things upside down and not by the working masses. A primary remedy for
capitalism, however, is foreign trade which again is a sore spot in
Russian capitalism. As the last to arrive at the table of the world
market, Russian capitalism fares worst in the competition with older
capitalist countries and thus lacks both prospects as to foreign markets
and the most vital conditions of existence. Russia remains the country
of peasants, a country of populist production.

If all this is correct, Vorontsov concludes his essay on _The Commodity
Surplus in the Supply of the Market_, then capitalism can play only a
limited part in Russia. It must resign from the direction of
agriculture, and its development in the industrial sphere must not
inflict too many injuries upon the domestic industries which under our
economic conditions are indispensable to the welfare of the majority of
the population. If the reader would comment that capitalism might not
accept such a compromise, our answer will be: so much the worse for
capitalism.

Thus Vorontsov ultimately washes his hands of the whole thing, declining
for his part all responsibility for the further fortunes of economic
development in Russia.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾ An essay in PATRIOTIC MEMOIRS, May 1883.

⁽²⁾ An essay in the review RUSSIAN THOUGHT, September 1889.

⁽³⁾ A book published in 1893.

⁽⁴⁾ A book published in 1895.

⁽⁵⁾PATRIOTIC MEMOIRS, vol.v: _A Contemporary Survey_, p.4.

⁽⁶⁾IBID., p.10.

⁽⁷⁾IBID., p.14.

⁽⁸⁾OUTLINES OF ECONOMIC THEORY (St. Petersburg 1895), pp.157ff.

⁽⁹⁾_Militarism and Capitalism_ in RUSSIAN THOUGHT (1889), vol.ix, p.78.

⁽¹⁰⁾IBID., p.80.

⁽¹¹⁾IBID., p.83. Cf. OUTLINES, p.196.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 12.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Two Historical Exposition of the Problem * Third Round Struve-Bulgakov-Tugan Baranovski v. Vorontsov-Nikolayon

 



CHAPTER 20 NIKOLAYON


 

THE second theorist of populist criticism, Nikolayon, brings quite a
different economic training and knowledge to his work. One of the
best-informed experts on Russian economic relations, he had already in
1880 attracted attention by his treatise on the capitalisation of
agricultural incomes, which was published in the review SLOVO. Thirteen
years later, spurred on by the great Russian famine of 1891, he pursued
his inquiries further in a book entitled OUTLINES OF OUR SOCIAL ECONOMY
SINCE THE REFORM. Here he gives a detailed exposition, fully documented
by facts and figures, of how capitalism developed in Russia, and on this
evidence proceeds to show that this development is the source of all
evil, and so of the famine, also, so far as the Russian people are
concerned. His views about the destiny of capitalism in Russia are
grounded in a definite theory about the conditions of the development of
capitalist production in general, and it is this with which we must now
deal.

Since the market is of decisive importance for the capitalist mode of
economy, every capitalist nation tries to make sure of as large a market
as possible. In the first place, of course, it relies on its home
market. But at a certain level of development, the home market is no
longer sufficient for a capitalist nation and this for the following
reasons: all that social labour newly produces in one year can be
divided into two parts the share received by the workers in the form of
wages, and that which is appropriated by the capitalists. Of the first
part, only so many means of subsistence as correspond, in value, to the
sum total of the wages paid within the country can be withdrawn from
circulation. Yet capitalist economy decidedly tends to depress this part
more and more. Its methods are a longer working day, stepping up the
intensity of labour, and increasing output by technical improvements
which enable the substitution of female and juvenile for male labour and
in some cases displace adult labour altogether. Even if the wages of the
workers still employed are rising, such increase can never equal the
savings of the capitalists resulting from these changes. The result of
all this is that the working class must play an ever smaller part as
buyers on the home market. At the same time, there is a further change:
capitalist production gradually takes over even the trades which
provided additional employment to an agricultural people; thus it
deprives the peasants of their resources by degrees, so that the rural
population can afford to buy fewer and fewer industrial products. This
is a further reason for the continual contraction of the home market. As
for the capitalist class, we see that this latter is also unable to
realise the entire newly created product, though for the opposite
reason. However large the requirements of this class, the capitalists
will not be able to consume the entire surplus product in person. First,
because part of it is needed to enlarge production, for technical
improvements which, to the individual entrepreneur, will be a necessary
condition of existence in a competitive society. Secondly, because an
expanding capitalist production implies an expansion in those branches
of industry which produce means of production (e.g. the mining industry,
the machine industry and so forth) and whose products from the very
beginning take a use-form that is incapable of personal consumption and
can only function as capital. Thirdly and lastly, the higher labour
productivity and capital savings that can be achieved by mass production
of cheap commodities increasingly impel society towards mass production
of commodities which cannot all be consumed by a mere handful of
capitalists.

Although one capitalist can realise his surplus value in the surplus
product of another capitalist and _vice versa_, this is only true for
products of a certain branch, for consumer goods. However, the incentive
of capitalist production is not the satisfaction of personal wants, and
this is further shown by the progressive decline in the production of
consumer as compared to that of producer goods.

Thus we see that the aggregate product of a capitalist nation must
greatly exceed the requirements of the whole industrial population
employed, in the same way as each individual factory produces vastly in
excess of the requirements of both its workers and the entrepreneur, and
this is entirely due to the fact that the nation is a capitalist nation,
because the distribution of resources within the society does not aim to
satisfy the real wants of the population but only the effective demand.
Just as an individual factory-owner could not maintain himself as a
capitalist even for a day, if his market were confined to the
requirements of his workers and his own, so the home market of a
developed capitalist nation must also be insufficient.

At a certain level, capitalist development thus has the tendency to
impede its own progress. These obstacles are ultimately due to the fact
that progressive labour productivity, involving the severance of the
immediate producer from the means of production, does not benefit
society as a whole, but only the in entrepreneur; and the mass of labour
power and men hours which has been set free by this process becomes
redundant and thus is not only lost to society but will become a burden
to it.. The real wants of the masses can only be satisfied more fully in
so far as there can be an ascendancy of a populist mode of production
based upon the union between the producer and his means of production.
It is the aim of capitalism, however, to gain possession of just these
spheres of production, and to destroy in the process the main factor
which makes for its own prosperity. The periodical famines in India, for
instance, recurring at intervals of ten or eleven years, were thus among
the causes of periodical industrial crises in England. Any nation that
sets out on capitalist development will sooner or later come up against
these contradictions inherent in this mode of production. And the later
a nation embarks on the capitalist venture, the more strongly will these
contradictions make themselves felt, since, once the home market has
been saturated, no substitute can be found, the outside market having
already been conquered by the older competing countries.

The upshot of it all is that the limits of capitalism are set by the
increasing poverty born of its own development, by the increasing number
of redundant workers deficient in all purchasing power. Increasing
labour productivity which can rapidly satisfy every effective demand of
society corresponds to the increasing incapacity, of ever broader masses
of the population, to satisfy their most vital needs; on the one hand, a
glut of goods that cannot be sold and on the other, large masses who
lack the bare necessities.

These are Nikolayons general views.⁽¹⁾ He knows his Marx, we see, and
has turned the two first volumes of _Capital_ to excellent use. And
still, the whole trend of his argument is genuinely Sismondian. It is
capitalism itself which brings about a shrinking home market since it
impoverishes the masses; every calamity of modern society is due to the
destruction of the populist mode of production, that is to say the
destruction of small-scale enterprise. That is his main theme. More
openly even than Sismondi, Nikolayon sets the tenor of his critique by
an apotheosis of small-scale enterprise, this sole approach to grace.⁽²⁾
The aggregate capitalist product cannot, in the end, be realised within
the society, this can only be done with recourse to outside markets.
Nikolayon here comes to the same conclusion as Vorontsov, in spite of a
quite different theoretical point of departure. Applied to Russia, it is
the economic scientific ground for a sceptical attitude towards
capitalism. Capitalist development in Russia has been without access to
foreign markets from the first, it could only show its worst aspects it
has impoverished the masses of the people. In consequence, it was a
fatal mistake to promote capitalism in Russia.

On this point, Nikolayon fulminates like a prophet of the Old Testament:

Instead of keeping to the tradition of centuries, instead of developing
our old inherited principle of a close connection between the immediate
producer and his means of production, instead of usefully applying the
scientific achievements of W. Europe to their forms of production based
on the peasants ownership of their means of production, instead of
increasing theft productivity by concentrating the means of production
in their hands, instead of benefiting, not by the forms of production in
W. Europe, but by its organisation, its powerful co-operation, its
division of labour, its machinery, etc., etc. instead of developing the
fundamental principle of a landowning peasantry and applying it to the
cultivation of the land by the peasants, instead of making science and
its application widely accessible to the peasants instead of all this,
we have taken the opposite turning. We have failed to prevent the
development of capitalist forms of production, although they are based
on the expropriation of the peasants; on the contrary, we have promote
with all our might the upsetting of our entire economic life which
resulted in the famine of 1891.

Though the evil is much advanced, it is not too late even now to retrace
our steps. On the contrary, a complete reform of economic policy is just
as urgently needed for Russia in view of the threatening proletarisation
and collapse, as Alexanders reforms after the Crimean war were necessary
in their time.

Now a social reform as advocated by Nikolayon is completely Utopian. His
attitude exhibits an even more blatant petty-bourgeois and reactionary
bias than Sismondis ever did, considering that the Russian populist
writes after a lapse of seventy years. For in his opinion, the old
_obshchina_, the rural community founded on the communal ownership of
the soil, is the raft to deliver Russia from the flood of capitalism. On
it, the discoveries of modern big industry and scientific technique are
to be grafted by measures which remain his own secret so that it can
serve as the basis of a socialised higher form of production. Russia can
choose no other alternative: either she turns her back upon capitalist
development, or she must resign herself to death and decay.⁽³⁾

After a crushing criticism of capitalism Nikolayon thus ends up with the
same old populist panacea which had as early as the fifties, though at
that time with greater justification, been hailed as the peculiarly
Russian guarantee of a higher social development, although its
reactionary character as a lifeless relic of ancient institutions had
been exposed in Engels _Flüchtlingsliteratur_ in VOLKSSTAAT (1875).
Engels wrote at the time:

A further development of Russia on bourgeois lines would gradually
destroy communal property there too, quite apart from any interference
of the Russian government with the knout and with bayonets (as the
revolutionary populists imagined). Under the pressure of taxes and
usury, communal landownership is no longer a privilege, it becomes an
irksome chain. The peasants frequently run away from it, either with or
without their families, to seek their living as itinerant labourers, and
leave the land behind. We see that communal ownership in Russia has long
since passed its flower and there is every indication that its decay is
approaching.

With these words, Engels hits right on the target of the _obshchina_
problem eighteen years before the publication of Nikolayons principal
work. If Nikolayon subsequently with renewed courage again conjured tip
the ghost of the obshchina, it was a bad historical anachronism inasmuch
as about a decade later the _obshchina_ was given an official burial by
the state. The absolutist government which had for financial reasons
tried during half a century artificially to keep the machinery of the
rural community: going was compelled to give up this thankless task on
its own accord. The agrarian problem soon made it clear how far the old
populist delusion was lagging behind the actual course of economic
events, and conversely, how powerfully capitalist development in Russia,
mourned and cursed as still-born, could demonstrate with lightning and
thunder its capacity to live and to multiply. Once again, and for the
last time, this turn of events demonstrates in quite a different
historical setting how a social critique of capitalism, which begins by
doubting its capacity for development, must by a deadly logic lead to a
reactionary Utopianism both in the France of 1819 and in the Russia of
1893.⁽⁴⁾

 

 

Footnote

⁽¹⁾ Cf. OUTLINES OF OUR SOCIAL ECONOMY, in particular pp.202-5, 338-41.

⁽²⁾ Vladimir Ilyich [Lenin] has given detailed proof of the striking
similarity between the position of the Russian populists and the views
of Sismondi in his essay _On the Characteristics of Economic
Romanticism_ (1897).

⁽³⁾OUTLINES OF OUR SOCIAL ECONOMY, p.322. Friedrich Engels appraises the
Russian situation differently. He repeatedly tries to convince Nikolayon
that Russia cannot avoid a high industrial development, and that her
sufferings are nothing but the typical capitalist contradictions. Thus
he writes on September 22, 1892:

I therefore hold that at present industrial production necessarily
implies big industry, making use of steam power, electricity, mechanical
looms and frames, and lastly the manufacture of the machines themselves
by mechanical means. From the moment that railways are introduced in
Russia, recourse to all these extremely modern means of production
becomes inevitable. It is necessary that you should be able to mend and
repair your engines, coaches, railways and the like, but to do this
cheaply, you must also be in a position to make at home the things
needing repair. As soon as the technique of war has become a branch of
industry (armour plated cruisers, modern artillery, machine guns, steel
bullets, smokeless gun powder, etc.) big industry that is indispensable
for the production of such items has become a political necessity for
you as well. All these items cannot be made without a highly developed
metal industry which on its part cannot develop unless there is a
corresponding development of all other branches of production, textiles
in particular (MARX-ENGELS TO NIKOLAYON, St. Petersburg 1908, p.75).

And further in the same letter:

So long as Russian industry depends on the home market alone, it can
only satisfy the internal demand. The latter, however, can grow but
slowly, and it seems to me that under present conditions of life in
Russia it is even bound to decrease, since it is one of the unavoidable
consequences of high industrial development that it destroys its own
home market by the same process which served to create it: by destroying
the bases of the peasants domestic industry. Yet peasants cannot live
without such a domestic industry. They are ruined as peasants, their
purchasing power is reduced to a minimum, and unless they grow new roots
in new conditions of life, unless they become proletarians, they will
only represent a very small market for the newly arising plants and
factories.

Capitalist production is a phase of economic transition, full of
inherent contradictions which only develop and become visible to the
extent that capitalist production develops. The tendency of
simultaneously creating and destroying a market is just one of these
contradictions. Another is the hopeless situation that will ensue, all
the sooner in a country like Russia which lacks external markets than in
countries more or less fit to compete in the open world market. These
latter can find some means of relief in this seemingly hopeless
situation by heroic measures of commercial policy, that is to say by
forcibly opening up new markets. China is the most recent market to be
opened up for English commerce, and it proved adequate for a temporary
revival of prosperity. That is why English capital is so insistent on
railroad building in China. Yet railways in China mean the destruction
of the entire foundation of Chinas small rural enterprises and her
domestic industry. In this case, there is not even a native big industry
developed to compensate for this evil to some extent, and hundreds of
millions will consequently find it impossible to make a living at all.
The result will be mass emigration, such as the world has never yet
seen, and America, Asia arid Europe will be flooded with the detested
Chinese. This new competitor on the labour market will compete with
American, Australian and European labour at the level of what the
Chinese consider a satisfactory standard of living, which is well known
to be the lowest in the whole world. Well then, if the whole system of
production in Europe has not been revolutionised by then, that will be
the time to start this revolution (IBID., p.79).

Engels, though he followed Russian developments with attention and keen
interest, persistently refused to take an active part in the Russian
dispute. In his letter of November 24, 1894, i.e. shortly before his
death, he expressed himself as follows:

My Russian friends almost daily and weekly bombard me with requests to
come forward with my objections to Russian books and reviews which not
only misinterpret but even misquote the sayings of our author (Marx). My
friends assure me that my intervention would suffice to put matters
right. Yet I invariably and firmly refuse all such proposals because I
cannot afford to become involved with a dispute held in a foreign
country, in a tongue which I, at least, cannot read as easily and freely
the more familiar W. European languages, and in a literature which is at
best accessible to me only in fortuitous glimpses of some flagments, and
which I cannot pursue anything like systematically enough in all its
stages and details without neglecting my real and serious work. There
are people everywhere who, once they have taken up a certain stand, are
not ashamed to have recourse to misinterpreting the thoughts of others
and to all kinds of dishonest manipulations for their own ends, and if
that is what has happened to our author, I am afraid they will not deal
more kindly with me, so that in the end I shall be compelled to
interfere in the dispute, first to defend others, and then in my own
defence (IBID., p.90).

⁽⁴⁾ We might mention that the surviving champions of populist pessimism,
and Vorontsov in particular, to the last remained loyal to their views,
in spite of all that happened in Russia a fact that does more credit to
their character than to their intelligence. Referring to the 1900 and
1902 crises, Vorontsov wrote in 1902: The doctrinaire dogma of the
Neo-Marxists rapidly loses its power over peoples minds. That the newest
successes of the individualists are ephemeral has obviously dawned even
on their official advocates ... In the first decade of the twentieth
century, we come back to the same views about economic development in
Russia that had been the legacy of the 1870s (Cf. the review POLITICAL
ECONOMICS, October 1902, quoted by A. Finn Yenotayevski in THE
CONTEMPORARY ECONOMY OF RUSSIA 1890-1910, St. Petersburg, 191, p.2.)
Even to-day, then, this last of the populist Mohicans deduces the
ephemeral character, not of his own theory, but of economic reality.
What of the saying of Barrère: Il ny a que les morts qui ne reviennent
pas.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 12.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Two Historical Exposition of the Problem * Third Round Struve-Bulgakov-Tugan Baranovski v. Vorontsov-Nikolayon

 



CHAPTER 21 STRUVES THIRD PERSONS AND THREE WORLD EMPIRES


 

We now turn to the criticism of the above opinions as given by the
Russian Marxists.

In 1894, Peter v. Struve who had already given a detailed appraisal of
Nikolayons book in an essay _On Capitalist Development in Russia_,⁽¹⁾
published a book in Russian,⁽²⁾ criticising the theories of populism
from various aspects. In respect of our present problem, however, he
mainly confines himself to proving, against both Vorontsov and
Nikolayon, that capitalism does not cause a contraction of the home
market but, on the contrary, an expansion. There can be no doubt that
Nikolayon has made a blunder the same that Sismondi had made. They each
describe only a single aspect of the destructive process, performed by
capitalism on the traditional forms of production by small enterprise.
They saw only the resulting depression of general welfare, the
impoverishment of broad strata of the population, and failed to notice
that economic aspect of the process which entails the abolition of
natural economy and the substitution of a commodity economy in rural
districts. And this is as much as to say that, by absorbing further and
further sections of formerly independent and self-sufficient producers
into its own sphere, capitalism continuously transforms into commodity
buyers ever new strata of people who had not before bought its
commodities. In fact, the course of capitalist development is just the
opposite of that pictured by the populists on the model of Sismondi.
Capitalism, far from ruining the home market, really sets about creating
it, precisely by means of a spreading money economy.

Struve in particular refutes the theory that the surplus value cannot
possibly be realised on the home market. He argues as follows: The
conviction that a mature capitalist society consists exclusively of
entrepreneurs and workers forms the basis of Vorontsovs theory, and
Nikolayon himself operates with this concept throughout. From this point
of view, of course, the realisation of the capitalist aggregate product
seems incomprehensible. And Vorontsovs theory is correct in so far as it
states the fact that neither the capitalists nor the workers consumption
can realise the surplus value, so that the existence of third persons
must be presumed.⁽³⁾ But then, is it not beyond any doubt that some such
third persons exist in every capitalist society? The idea of Vorontsov
and Nikolayon is pure fiction which cannot advance our understanding of
any historical process whatever by a hairs breadth.⁽⁴⁾ There is no
actual capitalist society, however highly developed, composed
exclusively of capitalists and workers.

Even in England and Wales, out of a thousand self-supporting
inhabitants, 543 are engaged in industry, 172 in commerce, 140 in
agriculture, 81 in casual wage labour, and 62 in the Civil Service, the
liberal professions and the like.

Even in England, then, there are large numbers of third persons, and it
is they who, by their consumption, help to realise the surplus value in
so far as it is not consumed by the capitalists. Struve leaves it open
whether these third persons consume enough to realise all surplus value
however that may be, the contrary would have to be proved.⁽⁵⁾ This
cannot be done, he claims, for Russia, that vast country with an immense
population. She, in fact, is in the fortunate position to be able to
dispense with foreign markets. In this and here Struve dips into the
intellectual treasures of Professors Wagner, Schaeffle, and Schmoller
she enjoys the same privileges as the United States of America.

If the example of the N. American Union stands for anything, it is proof
of the fact that under certain circumstances capitalist industry can
attain a very high level of development almost entirely on the basis of
the home market.⁽⁶⁾

The negligible amount of industrial exports from the USA in 1882 is
mentioned in support of this statement which Struve formulates a general
doctrine: The vaster the territory, and the larger the population of a
country, the less does that country require foreign markets for its
capitalist development. He infers from this, indirect opposition to the
populists, a more brilliant future (for Russia) than for the other
countries.

On the basis of commodity production, the progressive development of
agriculture is bound to create a market wide enough to support the
development of Russian industrial capitalism. This market would be
capable of unlimited expansion, in step with the economic and cultural
progress of the country, and together with the substitution of a
monetary for a natural economy. In this respect, capitalism enjoys more
favourable conditions in Russia than in other countries.⁽⁷⁾

Struve paints a detailed and highly coloured picture of the new markets
which, thanks to the Trans-Siberian Railway, are opening up in Siberia,
Central Asia, Asia Minor, Persia and the Balkans. But his prophetic zeal
blinds him to the fact that he is no longer talking about the
indefinitely expanding home market but about specific foreign markets.
In later years, he was to throw in his lot, in politics too, with this
optimistic Russian capitalism and its liberal programme of imperialist
expansion, for, which he had laid the theoretical foundations when still
a Marxist.

Indeed, the tenor of Struves argument is a fervent belief in the
unlimited capacity for expansion of capitalist production, but the
economic foundation of this optimism is rather weak. He is somewhat
reticent as to what he means by the third persons whom he considers the
mainstay of accumulation, but his references to English occupational
statistics indicate that he has in mind the various private and public
servants, the liberal professions, in short the notorious _grand public_
so dear to bourgeois economists when they are completely at a loss. It
is this great public of which Marx said that it serves as the
explanation for things which the economist cannot explain. It is obvious
that, if we categorically refer to consumption by the capitalists and
the workers, we do not speak of the entrepreneur as an individual, but
of the capitalist class, as a whole, including their hangers-on
employees, Civil Servants, liberal professions, and the like. All such
third persons who are certainly not lacking in any capitalist society
are, as far as economics is concerned, joint consumers of the surplus
value for the greater part, in so far, namely, as they are not also
joint consumers of the wages of labour. These groups can only derive
their purchasing power either from the wage of the proletariat or from
the surplus value, if not from both; but on the whole, they are to be
regarded as joint consumers of the surplus value. It follows that their
consumption is already included in the consumption of the capitalist
class, and if Struve tries to reintroduce them to the capitalists by
sleight-of-hand as third persons to save the situation and help to
realise the surplus value, the shrewd profiteer will not be taken in. He
will see at once that this great public is nothing but his old familiar
retinue of parasites who buy his commodities with money of his own
providing. No, no, indeed! Struves third persons will not do at all.

Struves theory of foreign markets and their significance for capitalist
production is equally untenable. In this, he defers to the mechanist
approach of the populists who, along with the professors textbooks, hold
that a capitalist (European) country will first exploit the home market
to the limit, and will only look to foreign markets when this is almost
or completely exhausted. Then, following in the footsteps of Wagner,
Schaeffle and Schmoller, Struve arrives at the absurd conclusion that a
country with vast territories and a large population can make its
capitalist production a self-contained whole and rely indefinitely on
the home market alone.⁽⁸⁾ In actual fact, capitalist production is by
nature production on a universal scale. Quite contrary to the bookish
decrees issued by German scholars, it is producing for a world market
already from the word _go_. The various pioneering branches of
capitalist production in England, such as the textile, iron and coal
industries, cast about for markets in all countries and continents, long
before the process of destroying peasants property, the decline of
handicraft and of the old domestic industries within the country had
come to an end. And again, is it likely that the German chemical or
electro-technical industries would be grateful for the sober advice not
to work for five continents, as they have done from the beginning, but
to confine themselves to the German home market which, being largely
supplied from abroad, is evidently far from exhausted, in respect of a
whole lot of other German industries? Or that one should explain to the
German machine industry, it should not venture yet upon foreign markets,
since German import statistics are visible proof that a good deal of the
demand in Germany for products of this branch is satisfied by foreign
supplies? No, this schematic conception of foreign trade does not help
us at all to grasp the complexity of the world market with its uncounted
ramifications and different shades in the division of labour. The
industrial development of the USA who have already at the time of
writing become a dangerous rival to Britain both on the world market and
even in England herself, just as they have beaten German competition,
e.g. in the sphere of electrotechnics, both in the world market and in
Germany herself, has given the lie to Struves inferences, already
out-of-date when they were put on paper.

Struve also shares the crude view of the Russian populists who saw
hardly more than a merchants sordid concern for his market in the
international connections of capitalist economy, and its historical
tendency to create a homogeneous living organism based on social
division of labour as well as the countless variety of natural wealth
and productive conditions of the globe. Moreover he accepts the Three
Empire fiction of Wagner and Schmoller (the self-contained Empires of
Great Britain, Russia and the USA) which completely ignores or
artificially minimises the vital part played by an unlimited supply of
means of subsistence, of raw and auxiliary materials and of labour power
which is just as necessary for a capitalist industry computed in terms
of a world market as the demand for finished products. Alone the history
of the English cotton industry, a reflection in miniature of the history
of capitalism in general, spreading over five continents throughout the
nineteenth century, makes a mockery of the professors childish
pretensions which have only one real significance: to provide the
theoretical justification for the system of protective tariffs.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾ Published in SOCIALDEMOKRATISCHES ZENTRALBLATT, vol.iii, no.i.

⁽²⁾CRITICAL COMMENTS ON THE PROBLEM OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT IN RUSSIA.

⁽³⁾IBID., p.251.

⁽⁴⁾IBID., p.255.

⁽⁵⁾IBID., p.252.

⁽⁶⁾IBID., p.260. There can be no doubt that Struves attempt to refute
what he calls the pessimist outlook on the analogy of the USA is
fallacious. He says that Russia can overcome the evil consequences of
the most recent capitalism just as easily as the USA. But what he
forgets is that the USA from the first represent a new bourgeois state,
that they were founded by a petty bourgeoisie and by peasants who had
fled from European feudalism to set up a purely bourgeois society. In
Russia, on the other hand, we have a primitive communist foundation, a
society of _gentes_, as it were, in the pre-civilised stage which,
though it is already disintegrating, still serves as a material basis
upon which the capitalist revolution (for it is in fact a social
revolution) can take place and become effective. In America, a monetary
economy had been stabilised more than a century ago, whereas a natural
economy had until recently prevailed in Russia. It should be obvious
therefore that this revolution in Russia is bound to be much-more
ruthless and violent, and accompanied, by immensely more, suffering than
in America (Engels to Nikolayon, October 17, 1893, LETTERS ..., p.85).

⁽⁷⁾CRITICAL COMMENTS ..., p.284.

⁽⁸⁾ Professor Schmoller, amongst others, clearly reveals the reactionary
aspect of the Three Empire Theory (viz. Great Britain, Russia and the
USA) evolved by the German professors. In his handbook of commercial
policy (HANDELSPOLITISCHE SÄKULARBETRACHTUNG), the venerable scholar
dolefully frowns upon neo-mercantilism, that is to say upon the
imperialist designs of the three arch-villains. In the interests of a
higher intellectual, moral and aesthetic civilisation and social
progress he demands a strong German navy and a European Customs Union.
Out of the economic tension of the world there arises the prime duty for
Germany to create for herself a strong navy, so as to be prepared for
battle in the case of need, and to be desirable as an ally to the World
Powers which latter, however, Professor Schmoller says elsewhere, he
does not wish to blame for again taking the path of large-scale colonial
expansion. She neither can nor ought to pursue a policy of conquest like
the Three World Powers, but she must be able, if necessary, to break a
foreign blockade of the North Sea in order to protect her own colonies
and her vast commerce, and she must be able to offer the same security
to the states with whom she forms an alliance It is the task of the
Three-Part Union (Germany, Austro-Hungary, and Italy) to co-operate with
France towards imposing some restraint, desirable for the preservation
of all other states, on the over-aggressive policy of the Three World
Powers which constitutes a threat to all smaller states, and to ensure
moderation in conquests, in colonial acquisitions, in the immoderate and
unilateral policy of protective tariffs, in the exploitation and
maltreatment of all weaker elements The objectives of all higher
intellectual, moral and aesthetic civilisation and of social progress
depend on the fact that the globe should not be divided up among Three
World Empires in the twentieth century, that these Three Empires should
not establish a brutal neo-mercantilism (_Die Wandlungen der
Europäischen Handelspolitik des 19. Jahrhunderts_ (_Changes in the
European Commercial Policy During the 19th Century_), in JAHRB. FÜR
GESETZGEBUNG, VERWALTUNG UND VOLKSWIRTSCHAFT, vol.xxiv, p.381).

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 12.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Two Historical Exposition of the Problem * Third Round Struve-Bulgakov-Tugan Baranovski v. Vorontsov-Nikolayon

 



CHAPTER 22 BULGAKOV AND HIS COMPLETION OF MARXS ANALYSIS


 

The second critic of populist scepticism, S. Bulgakov, is no respecter
of Struves third persons and at once denies that they form the
sheet-anchor for capitalist accumulation.

The majority of economists before Marx he declares, solved the problem
by saying that some sort of third person is needed, as a _deus ex
machina_, to cut the Gordian knot, i.e. to consume the surplus value.
This part is played by luxury-loving landowners (as with Malthus), or by
indulgent capitalists, or yet by-militarism and the like. There can be
no demand for the surplus value without some such extraordinary
mediators; a deadlock will be reached on the markets and the result will
be over-production and crises.⁽¹⁾

Struve thus assumes that capitalist production in its development, too,
may find its ultimate mainstay in the consumption of some fantastic sort
of third person. But if this great public is essentially characterised
as consuming the surplus value, whence does it obtain the means to
buy?⁽²⁾

For his part, Bulgakov centres the whole problem from the first in the
analysis of the social aggregate product and its reproduction as given
by Marx in the second volume of CAPITAL. He has a thorough grasp of the
fact that he must start with simple reproduction and must fully
understand its working in order to solve the question of accumulation.
In this context, he says, it is of particular importance to obtain a
clear picture of the consumption of surplus value and wages in such
branches of production as do not turn out goods for consumption, and
further, to understand fully the circulation of that portion of the
social aggregate product which represents used-up constant capital.
This, he argues, is a completely new problem of which economists had not
even been aware before Marx brought it up.

In order to solve this problem, Marx divides all capitalistically
produced commodities into two great and fundamentally different
categories: the production of producer and consumer goods. There is more
theoretical importance in this division than in all previous squabbles
on the theory of markets.⁽³⁾

Bulgakov, we see, is an outspoken and enthusiastic supporter of Marxs
theory. The object of his study, as he puts it, is thus a critique of
the doctrine that capitalism cannot exist without, external markets.

For this purpose, the author has made use of the most valuable analysis
of social reproduction given by Marx in volume ii of CAPITAL which for
reasons unknown has scarcely been utilised in economic theory. Though
this analysis cannot be taken as fully completed, we are yet of opinion
that even in its present fragmentary shape it offers an adequate
foundation for a solution of the market problem that differs from that
adopted by Messrs. Nikolayon, V.V. and others, and which they claim to
have found in Marx.⁽⁴⁾

Bulgakov gives the following formulation of his solution which he has
deduced from Marx himself:

In certain conditions, capitalism may exist solely by virtue of an
internal market. It is not an inherent necessity peculiar to the
capitalist mode of production that the outside market be able to absorb
the surplus of capitalist production. The author has arrived at this
conclusion in consequence of his study of the above-mentioned analysis
of social reproduction.

And now we are eager to hear the arguments Bulgakov has based on the
above thesis.

At first sight, they prove surprisingly simple: Bulgakov faithfully
reproduces Marxs well-known diagram of simple reproduction, adding
comments which do credit to his insight. He further cites Marxs equally
familiar diagram of enlarged reproduction and this indeed is the proof
we have been so anxious to find.

Consequent upon what we have said, it will not be difficult now to
determine the very essence of accumulation. The means-of-production
department I must produce additional means of production necessary for
enlarging both its own production and that of Department II. II, in its
turn, will have to supply additional consumption goods to enlarge the
variable capital in both departments. Disregarding the circulation of
money, the expansion of production is reduced to an exchange of
additional products of I needed by II against additional products of II
needed by I.

Loyally following Marxs deductions, Bulgakov does not notice that so far
his entire thesis is nothing but words. He believes that these
mathematical _formulae_ solve the problem of accumulation. No doubt we
can easily imagine proportions such as those he has copied from Marx,
and _if there is expanding production_, these _formulae_ will apply. Yet
Bulgakov overlooks the principal problem: who exactly is to profit by an
expansion such as that whose mechanism he examines? Is it explained just
because we can put the mathematical proportions of accumulation on
paper? Hardly, because just as soon as Bulgakov has declared the matter
settled and goes on to introduce the circulation of money into the
analysis, he right away comes up against the question: where are I and
II to get the money for the purchase of additional products? When we
dealt with Marx, time and again the weak point in his analysis, the
question really of consumers in enlarged reproduction, cropped up in a
perverted form as the question of additional money sources. Here
Bulgakov quite slavishly follows Marxs approach, accepting his
misleading formulation of the problem without noticing that it is not
straightforward, although he knows perfectly well that Marx himself did
not answer this question in the drafts which were used to compile the
second volume of CAPITAL. It should be all the more interesting to see
what answer Marxs Russian pupil attempted to work out on his own.

The following solution, Bulgakov says, seems to us to correspond best to
Marxs doctrine as a whole: The new variable capital in money-form
supplied by II for both departments has its commodity equivalent in
surplus value II. With reference to simple reproduction, we have already
seen that the capitalists themselves must throw money into circulation
to realise their surplus value, money which ultimately reverts to the
pocket of the very capitalist it came from. The quantity of money
required for the circulation of the surplus value is determined in
accordance with the general law of commodity circulation by the value of
the commodities that contained if divided by the average amount of money
turnover. This same law must apply here; the capitalists of Department
II must dispose of a certain amount of money for the circulation of
their surplus value, and must consequently possess certain money
reserves. These reserves must be ample enough for the circulation both
of that portion of the surplus value which represents the consumption
fund and of that which is to be accumulated as capital.

Bulgakov further argues that it is immaterial to the question how much
money is required to circulate a certain amount of commodities inside a
country, whether or not some of these commodities contain any surplus
value. In answer to the general question as to money sources inside the
country, however, our solution is that the money is supplied by the
producer of gold.⁽⁵⁾

If a country requires more money consequent upon an expansion of
production, the production of gold will have to be increased
accordingly. So here we are again: the producer of gold is again the
_deus ex machina_, just as he had been for Marx. In fact, Bulgakov has
sadly disappointed us in the high hopes we had of his new solution. His
solution of the problem does not go a step beyond Marxs own analysis. It
can be reduced to three extremely simple statements as follows:

1.  Question: How much money do we need for the realisation of
    capitalised surplus value? Answer: Just as much as is required in
    accordance with the general law of commodity circulation.
2.  Q.: Where do the capitalists get the money for the realisation of
    capitalised surplus value? A.: They are supposed to have it.
3.  Q.: How did the money come into the country in the first place? A.:
    It is provided by the producer of gold.

The extreme simplicity of this method of explanation is suspicious
rather than attractive.

We need not trouble, however, to refute this theory which makes the gold
producer the _deus ex machina_ of capitalist accumulation. Bulgakov has
done it himself quite adequately. Eighty pages on, he returns to the
gold producer in quite a different context, in the course of a lengthy
argument against the theory of the wages fund in which he got involved
for some mysterious reason. Here he suddenly displays a keen grasp of
the problem:

We know already that there is gold producer amongst other producers.
Even under conditions of simple reproduction, he increases, on the one
hand, the absolute quantity of money circulating inside the country, and
on the other, he buys producer and consumer goods without, in his turn,
selling commodities, paying with his own product, i.e. with the general
exchange equivalent, for the goods he buys. The gold producer now might
perhaps render the service of buying the whole accumulated surplus value
from II and pay for it in gold which II can then use to buy means of
production from I and to increase its variable capital needed to pay for
additional labour power so that the gold producer now appears as the
real external market.

This assumption, however, is quite absurd. To accept it would mean to
make the expansion of social production dependent upon the expansion of
gold production. (Hear, hear!) This in turn presupposes an increase in
gold production which is quite unreal. If the gold producer were obliged
to buy all the accumulated surplus value from II for his own workers,
his own variable capital would have to grow by the day and indeed by the
hour. Yet his constant capital as well as his surplus value should also
grow in proportion, and gold production as a whole would consequently
have to take on immense dimensions. (Hear, hear!) Instead of submitting
this sophistical presumption to statistical tests which in any case
would hardly be possible a single fact can be adduced which would alone
refute this presupposition: it is the development of the institution of
credit which accompanies the development of capitalist economy. (Hear,
hear!) Credit has the tendency to diminish the amount of money in
circulation (this decrease being, of course, only relative, not
absolute); it is the necessary complement of a developing economy of
exchange which would otherwise soon find itself hampered by a lack of
coined money. I think we need not give figures in this context to prove
that the role of money in exchange-transactions is now very small. The
hypothesis is thus proved in immediate and evident disagreement with the
facts arid must be confuted.⁽⁶⁾

Bravo! Bravissimo! This is really excellent! Bulgakov, however, thus
confutes also his former explanation of the question in what way and by
whom capitalised surplus value is realised. Moreover, in refuting his
own statements, Bulgakov has only explained in somewhat greater detail
what Marx expressed in a single word when he called the hypothesis of a
gold producer swallowing up the entire surplus value of society absurd.

Admittedly, Bulgakovs real solution and that of Russian Marxists in
general who deal extensively with the problem must be sought elsewhere.
Just like Tugan-Baranovski and Ilyin [Lenin], Bulgakov underlines the
fact that the opposing sceptics made a capital error with respect to the
possibility of accumulation in analysing the value of the aggregate
product. They, especially Vorontsov, assumed that the aggregate social
product consists in consumer goods, and they all started from the false
premise that consumption is indeed the object of capitalist production.
This, as the Marxists now explain, is the source of the entire
misunderstanding of all the imaginary difficulties connected with the
realisation of the surplus value, with which the sceptics racked their
brains.

This school created non-existent difficulties because of this mistaken
conception. Since the normal conditions of capitalist production
presuppose that the capitalists consumption fund is only a part of the
surplus value, and the smaller part at that, the larger being set aside
for the expansion of production, it is obvious that the difficulties
imagined by this (the _populist_) school do not really exist.⁽⁷⁾

The unconcern with which Bulgakov here ignores the real problem is
striking. Apparently it has not dawned on him that the question as to
the ultimate beneficiaries, quite irrelevant so long as personal
consumption of the entire surplus value is assumed, only becomes acute
on the assumption of enlarged reproduction.

All these imaginary difficulties vanish, thanks to two discoveries of
Marxs which his Russian pupils untiringly quote against their opponents.
The first is the fact that, in terms of value, the social product is
composed, not of _v_ + _s_, but of _c_ + _v_ + _s_. Secondly, the ratio
of _c_ to _v_ in this sum continually increases with the progress of
capitalist production, and at the same time, the capitalised part of the
surplus value as against that part of it that is consumed, is ever
growing. On this basis, Bulgakov establishes a complete theory of the
relations between production and consumption in a capitalist society. As
this theory plays such an important part for the Russian Marxists in
general, and Bulgakov in particular, it will be necessary to get better
acquainted with it.

Consumption, Bulgakov says, the satisfaction of social needs, is but an
incidental moment in the circulation of capital. The volume of
production is determined by the volume of capital, and not by the amount
of social requirements. Not alone that the development of, production is
unaccompanied by a growth in consumption the two are mutually
antagonistic. Capitalist production knows no other than effective
consumption, but only such persons who draw either surplus value or
labour wages can be effective consumers and their purchasing power
strictly corresponds to the amount of those revenues. Yet we have seen
that the fundamental evolutionary laws of capitalist production tend,
despite the absolute increase, to diminish the relative size of variable
capital as well as of the capitalists consumption fund. We can say,
then, _that the development of production diminishes consumption_.⁽⁸⁾
The conditions of production and of consumption are thus in conflict.
Production cannot and does not expand to further consumption. Expansion,
however, is an inherent fundamental law of capitalist production and
confronts every individual capitalist in the form of a stern command to
compete. This contradiction is negligible in view of the fact that
expanding production as such represents a market for additional
products. Inherent contradictions are resolved by an extension of the
outlying fields of production.⁽⁹⁾ (Bulgakov here quotes a saying of Marx
which he has thoroughly misunderstood; we shall later have occasion to
deal with it once more.) It has just been shown how this is possible. (A
reference to the analysis of the diagram of enlarged reproduction.)
Evidently, the greater share of the expansion is apportioned to
Department I, to the production, that is to say, of constant capital,
and only a (relatively) smaller part to Department II which produces
commodities for immediate consumption. This change in the relations of
the two departments shows well enough what part is played by consumption
in a capitalist society, and it indicates where we should expect to find
the most important demand for capitalist commodities.⁽¹⁰⁾

Even within the narrow limits of the profit motive and the crises, even
on this strait and narrow path, capitalist production is capable of
unlimited expansion, irrespective of, and even despite, a decrease in
consumption. The Russian literature frequently points out that in view
of diminishing consumption a considerable increase of capitalist
production is impossible without external markets, but this is due to a
wrong evaluation of the part played by consumption in a capitalist
society, the failure to appreciate that consumption is not the ultimate
end of capitalist production. Capitalist production does not exist by
the grace of an increase in consumption but because of an extension of
the outlying fields of production which in fact constitute the market
for capitalist products. A whole progression of Malthusian
investigators, discontented with the superficial harmony doctrine of the
school of Say and Ricardo, have slaved away at a solution of the
hopeless undertaking: to find means of increasing consumption which the
capitalist mode of production is bound to decrease. Marx was the only
one to analyse the real connections: he has shown that the growth of
consumption is fatally lagging behind that of production, and must do so
whatever third persons one might invent. Consumption and its volume then
should by no means be considered as establishing the immediate limits to
the expansion of production. Capitalist production atones by the crises
for deviating from the true purpose of production, but it is independent
of consumption. The expansion of production is alone limited by, and
dependent upon, the volume of capital.⁽¹¹⁾

The theory of Bulgakov and Tugan-Baranovski is here directly attributed
to Marx. In the eyes of the Russian Marxists, it is on the whole the
direct consequence of Marxs doctrine, of which it forms an organic part.
On another occasion Bulgakov says even more clearly that it is a
faithful interpretation of Marxs diagram of enlarged reproduction. Once
a country has embraced capitalist production, its internal movement
develops along the following lines:

The production of constant capital makes up the Department I of social
reproduction, thereby instituting an independent demand for consumption
goods to the extent of both its own variable capital and the consumption
fund of its capitalists. Department II in its turn starts the demand for
the products of Department I. _Thus, a closed circle is already formed
at the initial stage of capitalist production,, in which it depends on
no external market but is self-sufficient and can grow, of itself, as it
were, by means of accumulation._⁽¹²⁾

In the hands of the Russian Marxists this theory becomes the favourite
stick with which to beat their opponents, the populist sceptics, in the
question of markets. We can only appreciate its daring to the full when
we look at its amazing discrepancy with everyday practice, with all the
known facts of capitalist economy. A thesis pronounced so triumphantly
as the purest Marxist gospel is even more deserving of our admiration
when we consider that it is grounded in an extremely simple confusion.
We shall have further occasion to deal with this confusion when we come
to the doctrine of Tugan-Baranovski.

Bulgakov further develops a completely erroneous theory of foreign
commerce, based upon his misapprehension of the relations between
consumption and production in capitalist economy. A picture of
reproduction like the above in fact has no room for foreign commerce. If
capitalism forms a closed circle in every country from the very
beginning, if, chasing its tail like a puppy and in complete
self-sufficiency, it is able of itself to create an unlimited market for
its products and can spur itself on to ever greater expansion, then
every capitalist country as such must also be a closed and
self-sufficient economic whole. In but a single respect would foreign
commerce appear reasonable: to compensate, by imports from abroad, for
certain deficiencies due to the soil and the climate, i.e. the import of
raw materials or foodstuffs from sheer necessity. Completely upsetting
the thesis of the populists, Bulgakov in fact advances a theory of
international commerce among capitalist states which gives, pride of
place to the import of agricultural products, with industrial exports
merely providing the requisite funds.

International traffic in commodities does not here seem to flow from the
character of the mode of production but from the natural conditions of
the countries concerned. This theory at any rate has not been borrowed
from Marx but from: the economic experts of the German bourgeoisie. Just
as Struve took over from Wagner and Schaeffle his Three Empire Theory,
so Bulgakov adopts from the late List (_R.I.P._) the division of states
on the basis of agriculture and mixed agriculture and manufacture, or
rather adapts it, in deference to the times, to the categories of
manufacture and mixed manufacture and agriculture. Nature has afflicted
the first category with a deficiency in raw materials and foodstuffs,
making it thus dependent upon foreign commerce. The second category has
been liberally endowed with all it needs; here foreign trade is of no
account. The prototype of the first category is England, of the second
the USA. The stoppage of foreign commerce would mean the economic
death-blow to England, but only a temporary crisis in the USA with a
guarantee of full recovery.

Production there is capable of unlimited expansion on the basis of the
internal market.⁽¹³⁾

This theory, a hoary relic of German economics even now, has obviously
not the least grasp of the interrelations obtaining in an international
capitalist economy. It conceives of modern international trade in terms
that may have been appropriate to the times of the Phoenicians. Just
listen to the lecture of Professor Buecher:

Although the liberalist era has greatly facilitated international
traffic, it would be a mistake to infer from this that the period of a
national economy is nearing its end, to be replaced by a period of
international economy ... Granted that we see in Europe to-day a number
of small countries that are not independent nations in respect of their
commodity supply, being compelled to import substantial amounts of their
foodstuffs and luxuries, while their industrial productivity is in
excess of the national needs and creates a permanent surplus for which
employment must be found in alien spheres of consumption. Yet although
countries of industrial production and those producing raw materials
exist side by side and depend upon one another, such international
division of labour should not be regarded as a sign that mankind is
about to attain to a higher stage of development which it would be
proper to contrast, under the label of world economy, with the ...
previous stages. No stage of economic development has ever permanently
guaranteed full autonomy in the satisfaction of wants. Every one of them
has left certain gaps which had to be filled in by some means or, other.
So-called international economy, on the other hard, has not, at any rate
so far, engendered any phenomena which are essentially different from
those of national economy, and we very much doubt that such phenomena
will appear in the near future.⁽¹⁴⁾

As far as Bulgakov is concerned, his conception at any rate results in
an unexpected conclusion: his theory of the unlimited capacity for
development of capitalism is confined to certain countries with
favourable natural conditions. Capitalism in England is foredoomed
because the world market will be exhausted before long. In the USA,
India and Russia it can look forward to an unlimited development because
these countries are self-sufficient.

Apart from these obvious peculiarities, Bulgakovs arguments about
foreign commerce again imply a fundamental misconception. Against the
sceptics, from Sismondi to Nikolayon, who believed that they had to take
recourse to outside markets for the realisation of capitalist surplus
value, he chiefly argues as follows:

These experts obviously consider external commerce as a bottomless pit
to swallow up in all eternity the surplus value which cannot be got rid
of inside the country.

Bulgakov for his part triumphantly points out that foreign commerce is
indeed not a pit and certainly not a bottomless one, but rather appears
as a double-edged sword, that exports always belong with imports, and
that the two usually counterbalance one another. Thus, whatever is
pushed out over one border, will be brought back, in a changed use-form,
over another.

We must find room for the commodities that have been imported as an
equivalent of those exported, within the bounds of the given market, and
as this is impossible, _ex hypothesi_, it would only generate new
difficulties to have recourse to an external demand.⁽¹⁵⁾

On another occasion he says that the way to realise the surplus value
found by the Russian populists, viz. external markets, is much less
favourable than that discovered by Malthus, v. Kirchmann and Vorontsov
himself when he wrote the essay _On Militarism and Capitalism_.⁽¹⁶⁾

Although Bulgakov fervently copies Marxs diagram of reproduction, he
here exhibits no grasp whatever of the real problem towards which the
sceptics from Sismondi to Nikolayon were groping their way. He denies
that foreign commerce solves the difficulty as pretended, since it again
brings the surplus value that has been disposed of into the country,
although in a changed form. In conformity with the crude picture of v.
Kirchmann and Vorontsov, he thus believes the problem to be that of
destroying a certain quantity of the surplus value, of wiping it from
the face of the earth. It simply does not occur to him that the real
problem is the realisation of the surplus value, the metamorphosis of
commodities, in fact the changed form of the surplus value.

Bulgakov thus finally arrives at the same goal as Struve, though by a
different route. He preaches the self-sufficiency of capitalist
accumulation which swallows up its own product as Kronos swallows up his
children, and breeds ever more vigorously without help from outside. Now
only one further step is needed for Marxism to revert to bourgeois
economics, and this, as luck would have it, was taken by
Tugan-Baranovski.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾ S. Bulgakov, ON THE MARKETS OF CAPITALIST PRODUCTION. A STUDY IN
THEORY (Moscow 1897), p.15.

⁽²⁾IBID., p.32, footnote.

⁽³⁾IBID., p.27.

⁽⁴⁾IBID., pp.2-3.

⁽⁵⁾IBID., pp.50, 55.

⁽⁶⁾IBID., pp.132ff.

⁽⁷⁾IBID., p.20.

⁽⁸⁾ Bulgakovs italics.

⁽⁹⁾CAPITAL, vol.ii, p.387.

⁽¹⁰⁾ Bulgakov, OP. CIT., p.161.

⁽¹¹⁾IBID., p.167.

⁽¹²⁾IBID., p.210 (our italics).

⁽¹³⁾IBID., p.199.

⁽¹⁴⁾ K. Buecher, THE RISE OF NATIONAL ECONOMY (DIE ENTSTEHUNG DER
VOLKSWIRTSCHAFT), 5th edition, p.147. Professor Sombarts theory is the
most recent contribution in this field. He argues that we are not moving
towards an international economy but rather farther and farther away
from it. I maintain, on the contrary, that commercial relations to-day
do not form a stronger but rather a weaker link between the civilised
nations, in relation to their economy as a whole. Individual economy
takes not more but rather less account of the world market than it did a
hundred or fifty years ago. At least ... it would be wrong to assume
that the relative importance of international relations with regard to
modern political economy is increasing. The opposite is the case.
Sombart scornfully rejects the assumption of a progressive international
division of labour, of a growing need for outside markets owing to an
inelastic home demand. He in his turn is convinced that the individual
national economies will develop into ever more perfect microcosms and
that the importance of the home market will increasingly surpass that of
the world market for all branches of industry (DIE DEUTSCHE
VOLKSWIRTSCHAFT IM 19. JAHRHUNDERT, 2nd edition, 1909, pp.399-420). This
devastating discovery admittedly hinges on a full acceptance of the
Professors peculiar conception which, for some reasons, only considers
those as exporting countries who pay for their imports with a surplus of
agricultural products over and above their own needs, who pay with the
soil. In this scheme Russia, Rumania, the USA and the Argentine are, but
Germany, England and Belgium are not, exporting countries. Since
capitalist development will sooner or later also claim the surplus of
agricultural products for the home demand in Russia and the USA, it
evident that there will be fewer and fewer exporting countries in the
world international economy will vanish. Another of Sombarts discoveries
is that great capitalist non-exporting countries increasingly obtain
free imports in form of interest on exported capital but the capital
exports as well as exports of industrial commodities are of absolutely
no account to Professor Sombart. In the course of time we shall probably
get to a point where we import without exporting (p.422). Modern,
sensational, and precious!

⁽¹⁵⁾ Bulgakov, OP. CIT., p.132.

⁽¹⁶⁾IBID., p.236. A quite uncompromising version of the same view is
given by V. Ilyin [Lenin]; The romanticists (as he calls the sceptics)
argue as follows; the capitalists cannot consume the surplus value;
therefore they must dispose of it abroad. I ask: Do the capitalists
perhaps give away their products to foreigners for nothing, throw it
into the sea, maybe? If they sell it, it means that they obtain an
equivalent. If they export certain goods, it means that they import
others (ECONOMIC STUDIES AND ESSAYS, p.2). As a matter of fact, his
explanation of the part played by external commerce in capitalist
production is far more correct than that of Struve and Bulgakov.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 11.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Two Historical Exposition of the Problem * Third Round Struve-Bulgakov-Tugan Baranovski v. Vorontsov-Nikolayon

 



CHAPTER 23 TUGAN BARANOVSKI AND HIS LACK OF PROPORTION


 

We have left this theorist to the end, although he already developed his
views in Russian in 1894, i.e. before Struve and Bulgakov, partly
because he only gave his theories their mature form in German at a later
date,⁽¹⁾ and also because the conclusions he draws from the premises of
the Marxist critics are the most far-reaching in their implications.

Like Bulgakov, Tugan Baranovski starts from Marxs analysis of social
reproduction which gave him the clue to this bewildering maze of
problems. But while Bulgakov, the enthusiastic disciple of Marx, only
sought to follow him faithfully and simply attributed his own
conclusions to the master, Tugan Baranovski, on the other hand, lays
down the law to Marx who, in his opinion, did not know how to turn his
brilliant exposition of the reproductive process to good account. Tugan
Baranovskis most important general conclusion from Marxs principles, the
pivot of his whole theory, is that, contrary to the assumptions of the
sceptics, capitalist accumulation is not only possible under the
capitalist forms of revenue and consumption, but is, in fact, completely
independent of both. It is not consumption, he says, but production
itself which makes for the best market. Production and the market are
therefore the same, and since the expansion of production is unlimited
in itself, the market, the capacity to absorb its products, has no
limits either.

The diagram quoted, he says, was to prove conclusively a postulate
which, though simple enough, might easily give rise to objections,
unless the process be adequately understood the postulate, namely, that
capitalist production creates a market for itself. So long as it is
possible to expand social production, if the productive forces are
adequate for this purpose, the proportionate division of social
production must also bring about a corresponding expansion of the demand
inasmuch as under such conditions all newly produced goods represent a
newly created purchasing power for the acquisition of other goods.
Comparing simple reproduction of the social capital with its
reproduction on a rising scale, we arrive at the most important
conclusion that in capitalist economy the demand for commodities is in a
sense independent of the total volume of social consumption. Absurd as
it may seem to common-sense, it is yet possible that the volume of
social consumption as a whole goes down while at the same time the
aggregate social demand for commodities grows.⁽²⁾

And again further on:

Arising from abstract analysis of the reproductive process of social
capital we have formed the conclusion that nothing will be left over of
the social product in view of the proportionate division of the social
capital.⁽³⁾

Accordingly Tugan Baranovski subjects Marxs theory of crises to a
revision which he claims to have developed from Sismondis
over-consumption.

Marx is in substantial agreement with the general view that the poverty
of the workers, i.e. of the great majority of the population, makes it
impossible to realise the products of an ever expanding capitalist
production, since it causes a decline in demand. This opinion is
definitely mistaken. We have seen that capitalist production creates its
own market consumption being only one of the moments of capitalist
production. In a planned social production if the leaders of production
were equipped with all _information_ about the demand and with the
_power_ to transfer labour and capital freely from one branch of
production to another, then, however low the level of social
consumption, the supply of commodities would not exceed the demand.⁽⁴⁾

The only circumstance which periodically causes the market to be flooded
is a lack of proportion in the enlargement of production. On this
assumption, therefore, Tugan Baranovski describes the course of
capitalist accumulation as follows:

What would the workers ... produce if production were organised on
proportionate lines? Obviously their own means of subsistence and
production. With what object? To expand production in the second year.
The production of what products? Again of means of production and
subsistence for the workers and so on _ad infinitum_.⁽⁵⁾

This game of question and answer, mind you, is not a form of
self-mockery, it is meant in all seriousness.

If the expansion of production has no practical limits, then we must
assume that the expansion of markets is equally unlimited, for _if
social production is proportionately organised, there is no limit to the
expansion of the market other than the productive forces available_.⁽⁸⁾

Since production thus creates its own demand, foreign commerce of
capitalist states is also assigned that peculiar mechanistic function we
have already met in Bulgakov. A foreign market, for instance, is an
absolute necessity for England.

Does not this prove that capitalist production creates a surplus product
for which there is no room on the internal market? Why, come to that,
does England require an external market? The answer is not difficult:
because a considerable part of Englands purchasing power is expended on
obtaining foreign commodities. The import of foreign commodities for the
English home market also makes it essential to export English
commodities abroad. Since England cannot manage without importing from
abroad, exports are a vital condition for that country, since without
them she would not be able to pay for her imports.⁽⁷⁾

Here again agricultural imports are described as a stimulating and
decisive factor, quite in accordance with the scheme of the German
professors.

What, then, is the general line of reasoning on which Tugan Baranovski
supports his daring solution of the problem of accumulation, the new
revelation on the problem of crises and a whole lot of others? Hard to
believe, but quite incontrovertible for all that, Tugan Baranovskis
proof consists exclusively and entirely in Marxs diagram of enlarged
reproduction, no more no less. Although he repeatedly refers rather
pompously to his abstract analysis of the reproductive process of social
capital, to the conclusive logic of his analysis, this entire analysis
is nothing but a copy of Marxs diagram of enlarged reproduction, with a
different set of figures. Nowhere in the entire works of Tugan
Baranovski shall we find a trace of any other argument. In Marxs
diagram, admittedly, accumulation, production, realisation and exchange
run smoothly with clockwork precision, and no doubt this kind of
accumulation can continue _ad infinitum_, just as long, that is to say,
as ink and paper do not run out. And it is this harmless written
exercise with mathematical equations which Tugan Baranovski quite
seriously considers a _demonstration_ of such a course in real events.

The diagrams we have adduced are bound to prove conclusively that ...

On another occasion he counters Hobson, who is convinced that
accumulation is impossible, with the following words:

Diagram No.2 of the reproduction of social capital on a rising scale
corresponds to the case of capital accumulation Hobson has in mind. But
does this diagram show a surplus product to come into being? Far from
it.⁽⁸⁾

Hobson is refuted and the matter settled because in the Diagram no
surplus product comes into being.

Admittedly, Tugan Baranovski knows quite well that in hard fact things
do not work out so smoothly. There are continual fluctuations in the
exchange relations and periodical crises. But these crises happen only
because in the expansion of production the proper proportions are not
maintained, because, that is to say, the proportions, of diagram No.2
are not observed in the first place. If they were, there would be no
crisis, and capitalist production could get along as nicely as it does
on paper, in every detail. Tugan Baranovski is committed to the view
that we can ignore the crises if we consider the reproductive process as
a continuous process. Although the proportion may be upset at any
moment, yet on average it will always be re-established by different
deviations, by price-fluctuations from day to day, and in the long run
by periodical crises. That on the whole this proportion is more or less
maintained is proved by the fact that capitalist economy is still going
strong otherwise it would long ago have ended in chaos and collapse. In
the long run, then, Tugan Baranovskis proportion is observed by and
large, and we must conclude that reality obeys diagram No.2. And since
this diagram can be indefinitely extended, it follows that capitalist
accumulation can also proceed _ad infinitum_.

What is striking in all this is not Tugan Baranovskis conclusion that
the diagram corresponds to the actual course of events as we have seen,
Bulgakov also shared this belief; the really startling fact is that
Tugan Baranovski sees no necessity for as much as _inquiring_ whether
the diagram is correct, that, instead of proving the diagram, he
considers this, the arithmetical exercise on paper, as proof of the
actual state of affairs. Bulgakov honestly tried to project Marxs
diagram on the real concrete relations of capitalist economy and of
capitalist exchange; he endeavoured to overcome the difficulties
resulting from it, though without success, it is true, remaining to the
last involved with Marxs analysis, which he himself recognised to be
incomplete and fragmentary. But Tugan Baranovski does not need any
proof, he does not greatly exercise his brains: since the arithmetical
sums come out satisfactorily, and may be continued _ad lib._, this is to
him proof that capitalist accumulation can also proceed without let or
hindrance provided the said proportion obtains, which it will have to do
by hook or by crook, as he himself would not dream of denying.

Tugan Baranovski, however, has one indirect proof that the diagram with
its strange results corresponds to, and truly reflects, reality. This is
the fact that capitalist production, quite in accordance with Marxs
diagram, puts human consumption second to production, that it conceives
of the former as a means and of the latter as an end in itself; just as
it puts human labour, the worker, on a par with the machine.

Technical progress is expressed by the fact that the means of labour,
the machine, increases more and more in importance as compared to living
labour, to the worker himself. Means of production play an ever growing
part in the productive process and on the commodity market. Compared to
the machine, the worker recedes further into the background and the
demand resulting from the consumption of the workers is also put into
the shade by that which results from productive consumption by the means
of production. The entire workings of capitalist economy take on the
character of a mechanism existing on its own, as it were, in which human
consumption appears as a simple moment of the reproductive process and
the circulation of capitals.⁽⁹⁾

Tugan Baranovski considers this discovery as a fundamental law of the
capitalist mode of production, which is confirmed by a quite tangible
phenomenon: with the progress of capitalist development Department I
goes on growing relatively to, and at the expense of, Department II. It
was Marx himself who, as we all know, set up this law in which he
grounded the schematic exposition of reproduction, though in the further
development of his diagram he ignored subsequent alterations for
simplicitys sake. This, the automatic growth of the producer goods as
compared with the consumer goods department affords Tugan Baranovski the
only objective proof of his theory: that in capitalist society human
consumption becomes increasingly unimportant; and production more and
more an end in itself. This thesis forms the corner-stone of his entire
theoretical edifice.

In all the industrial countries, he proclaims, we are confronted with
the same type of development the development of national economy
everywhere follows the same fundamental law. The mining industry which
creates the means of production for modern industry comes more and more
to the fore. The relative decrease in the export of immediately
consumable manufactured goods from Britain is thus also an expression of
the fundamental law governing capitalist development. The further
technical progress advances, the more do consumer goods recede as
compared with producer goods. Human consumption plays an ever decreasing
part as against the productive consumption of the means of
production.⁽¹⁰⁾

Although this fundamental law like all his other fundamental laws, in so
far as they mean anything at all, is borrowed ready-made from Marx,
Baranovski does not rest content with this and immediately proceeds to
preach the Marxist gospel to Marx himself. Scrabbling about like a blind
hen, Marx has turned up another pearl Tugan will give him that only he
does not know what to do with it. It needed a Tugan Baranovski to know
how to make it useful to science, and in his hand the newly discovered
law suddenly throws a new light on the whole workings of capitalist
economy. This law of the expansion in the department of producer goods
at the cost of that of consumer goods reveals clearly, concisely,
exactly, and in measurable terms, that capitalist society attaches
progressively less importance to human consumption, putting man on the
same level as the means of production, and that Marx was therefore
completely wrong both in assuming that man alone, not the machine, too,
can be the creator of surplus value, and in saying, further, that human
consumption represents a limit for capitalist production which is bound
to cause periodical crises in the present, and the collapse and terrible
end of capitalist economy in the near future. In short, the fundamental
law governing the increase of producer as compared to consumer goods
reflects the singular nature of capitalist society as a whole which Marx
had not understood and which to interpret happily fell to the lot of
Tugan Baranovski.

We have seen above the decisive part played by the fundamental law of
capital in the controversy between the Russian Marxists and the
sceptics. Bulgakovs remarks we already know; another Marxist already
referred to, Vladimir Ilyin, expresses himself in similar terms in his
polemics against the populists:

It is well known that the law of capitalist production consists in the
fact that the constant capital grows more rapidly than the variable
capital, that is to say an ever increasing part of the newly formed
capital falls to the department of social production which creates
producer goods. In consequence, this department is absolutely bound to
grow more rapidly than the department creating consumer goods, that is
to say, the very thing happens which Sismondi declared to be impossible,
dangerous, etc. In consequence, consumer goods make up a smaller and
smaller share of the total bulk of capitalist production, and this is
entirely in accordance with the historical mission of capitalism and its
specific social structure: the former in fact consists in the
development of the productive forces of society (production as an end in
itself), and the latter prevents that the mass of the population should
turn them to use. ⁽¹¹⁾

In this respect, of course, Tugan Baranovski goes even farther. With his
love of paradox he actually permits himself the joke of submitting a
mathematical proof that accumulation of capital and expansion of
production are possible even if the absolute volume of production
decreases. In this connection, Karl Kautsky has pointed out, he had
recourse to a somewhat dubious scientific subterfuge, namely that he
shaped his daring deductions exclusively for a specific moment: the
transition from simple to enlarged reproduction a moment which is
exceptional even in theory, but certainly of no practical significance
whatever.⁽¹²⁾

As to Tugan Baranovskis fundamental law, Kautsky declares it to be a
mere illusion due to the fact that Tugan Baranovski considered the
organisation of production only in the old countries of capitalist big
industry.

It is correct, Kautsky says, that with a progressive division of labour,
there will be comparatively fewer and fewer factories etc. for the
production of goods direct for personal consumption, together with a
relative increase in the number of those which supply both the former
and one another with tools, machines, raw materials, transport
facilities and so on. While in original peasant economy an enterprise
that cultivated the flax also made the linen with its own tools and got
it ready for human consumption, nowadays hundreds of enterprises may
share in the manufacture of a single shirt, by producing raw cotton,
iron rails, steam engines and railway trucks that bring it to port, and
so on. With international division of labour it will happen that some
countries the old industrial countries can only slowly expand their
production for personal consumption; while making large strides in their
production of producer goods which is much more decisive for the
heartbeat of economic life than the production of consumer goods. From
the point of view of the nation concerned, we might easily form the
opinion that producer goods can be turned out on a constantly rising
scale with a more rapid rate of increase than in the production of
consumer goods, and that their production is not bound up with that of
the latter.

The opinion, that producer goods can be produced independent of
consumption, is of course a mirage of Tugan Baranovskis, typical of
vulgar economics. Not so the fact cited in support of this fallacy: the
quicker growth of Department I as compared with Department II is beyond
dispute, not only in old industrial countries but wherever technical
progress plays a decisive part in production. It is the foundation also
of Marxs fundamental law that the rate of profit tends to fall. Yet in
spite of it all, or rather precisely for this reason, it is a howler if
Bulgakov, Ilyin and Tugan Baranovski imagine to have discovered in this
law the essential nature of capitalist economy as an economic system in
which production is an end in itself and human consumption merely
incidental.

The growth of the constant at the expense of the variable capital is
only the capitalist expression of the general effects of increasing
labour productivity. The formula _c_ greater than _v_ (_c_ > _v_),
translated from the language of capitalism into that of the social
labour process, means only that the higher the productivity of human
labour, the shorter the time needed to change a given quantity of means
of production into finished products.⁽¹³⁾

This is a universal law of human labour. It has been valid in all
pre-capitalist forms of production and will also be valid in the future
in a socialist order of society. In terms of the material use-form of
societys aggregate product, this law must manifest itself by more and
more social labour time being employed in the manufacture of producer
than of consumer goods. In a planned and controlled social economy,
organised on socialist lines, this transformation would in fact be more
rapid even than it is in contemporary capitalist economy. In the first
place, rational scientific techniques can only be applied on the largest
scale when the barriers of private ownership in land are abolished. This
will result in an immense revolution in vast provinces of production
which will ultimately amount to a replacement of living labour by
machine labour, and which will enable us to tackle technical jobs on a
scale quite impossible under present day conditions. Secondly, the
general use of machinery in the productive process will be put on a new
economic basis. At present the machine does not compete with living
labour but only with that part of it that is paid. The cost of the
labour power which is replaced by the machine represents the lowest
limit of the applicability of the machine. Which means that the
capitalist becomes interested in a machine only when the costs of its
production assuming the same level of performance amount to less than
the wages of the workers it replaces. From the point of view of the
social labour process which is the only one to matter in a socialist
society, the machine competes not with the labour that is necessary to
maintain the worker but with the labour he actually performs. In other
words, in a society that is not governed by the profit motive but aims
at saving human labour, the use of machinery is economic-aims indicated
just as soon as it can save more human labour than is necessary for
making it, not to mention the many cases where the use of machinery is
desirable even if it does not answer this economic minimum for reasons
of health and similar considerations, in the interest of the workers
themselves. However that may be, the tension between the respective
economic usefulness of the machine in _(a)_ a capitalist, and _(b)_ a
socialist society is at least equal to the difference between labour and
that part of it that is paid; it is, in other words, the precise
equivalent of the whole capitalist surplus value. Consequently, if the
capitalist profit motive is abolished and a social organisation of
labour introduced, the marginal use of the machine will suddenly be
increased by the whole extent of the capitalist surplus value, so that
an enormous field, not to be gauged as yet, will be open to the
triumphal march of the machine. This would be tangible proof that the
capitalist mode of production, alleged to spur on to the optimum
technical development, in fact sets large social limits to technical
progress, in form of the profit motive on which it is based. It would
show that as soon as these limits are abolished, technical progress will
develop such a powerful drive that the technical marvels of capitalist
production will be childs play in comparison.

In terms of the composition of the social product, this technical
transformation can only mean that, compared to the production of
consumer goods, the production of producer goods measured in units of
labour time must increase more rapidly in a socialist society than it
does even to-day. Thus the relation between the two departments of
social production which the Russian Marxists took to reveal typical
capitalist baseness, the neglect of mans need to consume, rather proves
to be the precise manifestation of the progressive subjection of nature
to social labour, which will become even more striking when production
is organised solely with a view to human needs. The only objective proof
for Tugan Baranovskis fundamental law thus collapses as a fundamental
confusion. His whole construction, including his new theory of crises,
together with the lack of proportion, is reduced to its foundations on
paper: a slavish copy of Marxs diagram of enlarged reproduction.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾STUDIES ON THE THEORY AND HISTORY OF COMMERCIAL CRISES IN ENGLAND
(Jena 1901) and THEORETICAL FOUNDATIONS OF MARXISM (1905).

⁽²⁾STUDIES ON THE THEORY AND HISTORY ..., p.23.

⁽³⁾IBID., p.34.

⁽⁴⁾IBID., p.333.

⁽⁵⁾IBID., p.191.

⁽⁶⁾IBID., p.231, italics in original.

⁽⁷⁾IBID., p.305.

⁽⁸⁾IBID., p.191.

⁽⁹⁾IBID., p.27.

⁽¹⁰⁾IBID., p.58.

⁽¹¹⁾ V. Ilyin [Lenin], STUDIES AND ESSAYS IN ECONOMICS (ÖKONOMISCHE
STUDIEN UND ARTIKEL. ZUR CHARAKTERISIERUNG DES ÖKONOMISCHEN
ROMANTIZISMUS, St. Petersburg 1899), p.20. Incidentally, the same author
is responsible for the statement that enlarged reproduction begins only
with capitalism. It quite escapes him that under conditions of simple
reproduction, which he takes to be the rule for all pre-capitalist modes
of production, we should probably never have advanced beyond the stage
of the paleolithic scraper. [The tool that some humans used, perhaps to
skin a deer or a wild horse, around 250,000 years ago _B.B._]

⁽¹²⁾DIE NEUE ZEIT, vol.xx, part 2, _Krisentheorien_, p.116. Kautskys
mathematical demonstration to Tugan Baranovski that consumption is bound
to grow, and in the precise ratio as the bulk of producer goods in terms
of value, calls for two comments: first, like Marx, Kautsky paid no
attention to the progress in the productivity of labour so that
consumption appears to have a relatively larger volume than it would in
fact have. Secondly, the increase in consumption to which Kautsky here
refers, is only a consequence, a result of enlarged reproduction, it is
neither its basis nor its aim; it is mainly due to the growth of the
variable capital, the continual employment of additional workers. The
upkeep of these workers, however, neither is nor ought to be the object
of the expansion of reproduction no more, for that matter, than the
increasing personal consumption of the capitalist class. Kautskys
argument no doubt refutes Tugan Baranovskis pet notion: the whimsy to
construe enlarged reproduction with an absolute decrease in consumption.
But for all that, he does not get anywhere near the fundamental problem,
the relations between production and consumption under the aspect of the
reproductive process; though we are told in another passage of the same
work:

With the capitalists growing richer, and the workers they exploit
increasing in numbers, they constitute between them a market for the
consumer goods produced by capitalist big industry which expands
continually, yet it does not grow as rapidly as the accumulation of
capital and the productivity of labour, and must therefore remain
inadequate. An additional market is required for these consumer goods, a
market outside their own province, among those occupational groups and
nations whose mode of production is not yet capitalistic. This market is
found and also widens increasingly, but the expansion is again too slow,
since the additional market is not nearly so elastic and capable of
expansion as the capitalist productive process. As soon as capitalist
production has developed to the big industry stage, as in England
already in the first quarter of the nineteenth century, it is capable of
expanding by leaps and bounds so as soon to out-distance all expansions
of the market. Every period of prosperity subsequent to a considerable
extension of the market is thus from the outset doomed to an early end
the inevitable crisis. This, in brief, is the theory of crises
established by Marx, and, as far as we can see, generally accepted by
the orthodox Marxists. (IBID., p.80).

Kautsky, however, is not interested in harmonising this conception of
the realisation of the aggregate product with Marxs diagram of enlarged
reproduction, perhaps because, as our quotation also shows, he deals
with the problem solely from the aspect of crises, regarding, in other
words, the social product as a more or less homogeneous bulk of goods
and ignoring the fact that it is differentiated in the reproductive
process.

L. Boudin seems to come closer to the crucial point. In his brilliant
review on Tugan Baranovski he gives the following formulation:

With a single exception to be considered below, the existence of surplus
product in capitalist countries does not put a spoke in the wheel of
production, not because production will be distributed more efficiently
among the various spheres, or because the manufacture of machinery will
replace that of cotton goods. The reason is rather that, capitalist
development having begun sooner in some countries than in others, and
because even to-day there are still some countries that have no
developed capitalism, the capitalist countries in truth have at their
disposal an outside market in which they can get rid of their products
which they cannot consume themselves, no matter whether these are cotton
or iron goods. We would by no means deny that it is significant if iron
goods replace cotton goods as the main products of the principal
capitalist countries. On the contrary, this change is of paramount
importance, but its implications are rather different from those
ascribed to it by Tugan Baranovski. It indicates the beginning of the
end of capitalism. So long as the capitalist countries exported
commodities for the purpose of consumption, there was still a hope for
capitalism in these countries, and the question did not arise how much
and how long the non-capitalist outside world would be able to absorb
capitalist commodities. The growing share of machinery at the cost of
consumer goods in what is exported from the main capitalist countries
shows that areas which were formerly free of capitalism, and therefore
served as a dumping-ground for its surplus products, are now drawn into
the whirlpool of capitalism. It shows that, since they are developing a
capitalism of their own, they can by themselves produce the consumer
goods they need. At present they still require machinery produced by
capitalist methods since they are only in the initial stages of
capitalist development. But all too soon they will need them no longer.
Just as they now make their own cotton and other consumer goods they
will in future produce their own iron ware. Then they will not only
cease to absorb the surplus produce of the essentially capitalist
countries, but they will themselves produce surplus products which they
can place only with difficulty (DIE NEUE ZEIT, vol.xxv, part 1,
_Mathematische Formeln gegen Karl Marx_, p.604).

Boudin here broaches an important aspect of the general relations
pertaining to the development of international capitalism. Further, as a
logical consequence, he comes to the question of imperialism but
unfortunately he finally puts the wrong kind of edge on his acute
analysis by considering the whole of militarist production together with
the system of exporting international capital to non-capitalist
countries under the heading of reckless expenditure We must say in
parenthesis that Bouding, just like Kautsky, holds that the law of a
quicker growth in the means-of-production department relative to the
means-of-subsistence department is a delusion of Tugan Baranovskis.

⁽¹³⁾ Apart from natural conditions, such as fertility of the soil, etc.,
and from the skill of independent and isolated producers (shown rather
qualitatively in the genus than quantitatively in the mass of their
products), the degree of productivity of labour, in a capitalist
society, is expressed in the relative extent of the means of production
that one labourer, during a given time, with the same tension of
labour-power, turns into products. The mass of means of production which
he thus transforms, increases with the productiveness of his labour. But
those means of production play a double part. The increase of some is a
consequence, that of the others a condition of the increasing
productivity of labour. E.g., with the division of labour in
manufacture, and with the use of machinery, more raw material is worked
up in the same time and, therefore, a greater mass of raw material and
auxiliary substances enter into the labour-process. That is the
consequence of the increasing productivity of labour. On the other hand,
the mass of machinery, beasts of burden, mineral manures, drainpipes,
etc., is a condition of the increasing productivity of labour. So also
is it with the means of production concentrated in buildings, furnaces,
means of transport, etc. But whether condition or consequence, the
growing extent of the means of production, as compared with the
labour-power incorporated with them, is an expression of the growing
productiveness of labour. The increase of the latter appears, therefore,
in the diminution of the mass of labour in proportion to the mass of
means of production moved by it, or in the diminution of the subjective
factor of the labour-process as compared with the objective factor
(CAPITAL, vol.i, pp.635-6). And yet another passage: We have seen
previously, that with the development of the productivity of labour and
therefore with the development of the capitalist mode of production,
which develops the socially productive power of labour more than all
previous modes of production, there is a steady increase of the mass of
means of production, which are permanently embodied in the productive
process as instruments of labour and perform their function in it for a
longer or shorter time at repeated intervals (buildings, machinery,
etc.); also, that this increase is at the same time the premise and
result of the development of the productivity of social labour. It is
especially capitalist production, which is characterised by relative as
well as absolute growth of this sort of wealth (CAPITAL, vol.i,
chap.xxiii, 2). The material forms of existence of constant capital, the
means of production, do not consist merely of such instruments of
labour, but also of raw material in various stages of finished and of
auxiliary substances. With the enlargement of the scale of production
and the increase in the productivity of labour by co-operation, division
of labour, machinery, etc., the mass of raw materials and auxiliary
substances used in the daily process of reproduction, grows likewise
(CAPITAL, vol.ii, p.160).

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 12.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Two Historical Exposition of the Problem * Third Round Struve-Bulgakov-Tugan Baranovski v. Vorontsov-Nikolayon

 



CHAPTER 24 THE END OF RUSSIAN LEGALIST MARXISM


 

THE Russian legalist Marxists, and Tugan Baranovski above all, can claim
the credit, in their struggle against the doubters of capitalist
accumulation, of having enriched economic theory by an application of
Marxs analysis of the social reproductive process and it schematic
representation in the second volume of CAPITAL. But in view of the fact
that this same Tugan Baranovski quite wrongly regarded said diagram as
the solution to the problem instead of its formulation, his conclusions
were bound to reverse the basic order of Marxs doctrine.

Tugan Baranovskis approach, according to which capitalist production can
create unlimited markets and is independent of consumption, leads him
straight on to the thesis of Say-Ricardo, i.e. a natural balance between
production and consumption, between supply and demand. The difference is
simply that those two only thought in terms of simple commodity
circulation, whilst Tugan Baranovski applies the same doctrine to the
circulation of capital. His theory of crises being caused by a lack of
proportion is in effect just a paraphrase of Says old trite absurdity:
the over-production of any one commodity only goes to show
under-production of another; and Tugan Baranovski simply translates this
nonsense into the terminology used in Marxs analysis of the reproductive
process. Even though he declares that, Say notwithstanding, general
over-production is quite possible in the light of the circulation of
money which the former had entirely neglected, yet it is in fact this
very same neglect, the besetting sin of Say and Ricardo in their
dealings with the problem of crises which is the condition for his
delightful manipulations with Marxs diagram. As soon as it is applied to
the circulation of money, diagram No.2 begins to bristle with spikes and
barbs. Bulgakov was caught in these spikes when he attempted to follow
up Marxs interrupted analysis to a logical conclusion. This compound of
forms of thought borrowed from Marx with contents derived from Say and
Ricardo is what Tugan Baranovski modestly calls his attempt at a
synthesis between Marxs theory and classical economics.

After almost a century, the theory of optimism which holds, in the face
of petty-bourgeois doubts, that capitalist production is capable of
development, returns, by way of Marxs doctrine and its legalist
champions, to its point of departure, to Say and Ricardo. The three
Marxists join forces with the bourgeois harmonists of the Golden Age
shortly before the Fall when bourgeois economics was expelled from the
Garden of Innocence the circle is closed.

There can be no doubt that the legalist Russian Marxists achieved a
victory over their opponents, the populists, but that victory was rather
too thorough. In the heat of battle, all three Struve, Bulgakov and
Tugan Baranovski overstated their case. The question was whether
capitalism in general, and Russian capitalism in particular, is capable
of development; these Marxists, however, proved this capacity to the
extent of even offering theoretical proof that capitalism can go on for
ever. Assuming the accumulation of capital to be without limits, one has
obviously proved the unlimited capacity of capitalism to survive!
Accumulation is the specifically capitalist method of expanding
production, of furthering labour productivity, of developing the
productive forces, of economic progress. If the capitalist mode of
production can ensure boundless expansion of the productive forces, of
economic progress, it is invincible indeed. The most important objective
argument in support of socialist theory breaks down; socialist political
action and the ideological import of the proletarian class struggle
cease to reflect economic events, and socialism no longer appears an
historical necessity. Setting out to show that capitalism is possible,
this trend of reasoning ends up by showing that socialism is impossible.

The three Russian Marxists were fully aware that in the course of the
dispute they had made an about-turn, though Struve, in his enthusiasm
for the cultural mission of capitalism, does not worry about giving up a
useful warrant.⁽¹⁾ Bulgakov tried to stop the gaps now made in socialist
theory with another fragment of the same theory as best he could: he
hoped that capitalist society might yet perish, in spite of the immanent
balance between production and consumption, because of the declining
profit rate. But it was he himself who finally cut away the ground from
under this somewhat precarious comfort. Forgetting the straw he had
offered for the salvation of socialism, he turned on Tugan Baranovski
with the teaching that, in the case of large capitals, the relative
decline in the profit rate is compensated by the absolute growth of
capital.⁽²⁾ More consistent than the others, Tugan Baranovski finally
with the crude joy of a barbarian destroys all objective economic
arguments in support of socialism, thus building in his own spirit a
more beautiful world on an ethical foundation. The individual protests
against an economic order which transforms the end (man) into a means
(production) and the means (production) into an end.⁽³⁾

Our three Marxists demonstrated in person that the new foundations of
socialism had been frail and jerry-built. They had hardly laid down the
new basis for socialism before they turned their backs on it. When the
masses of Russia were staking their lives in the fight for the ideals of
a social order to come, which would put the end (man) before the means
(production), the individual went into retreat, to find philosophical
and ethical solace with Kant. In actual fact, the legalist bourgeois
Marxists ended up just where we should expect them to from their
theoretical position in the camp of bourgeois harmonies.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾ Struve says in the preface to the collection of his Russian essays
(published in 1905): In 1894, when the author published his CRITICAL
COMMENTS ON THE PROBLEM OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT IN RUSSIA, he inclined
in philosophy towards positivism, in sociology and economics towards
outspoken, though by no means orthodox, Marxism. Since then, the author
no longer sees the whole truth in positivism and Marxism which is
grounded in it (!), they no longer fully determine his view of the
world. Malignant dogmatism which not only browbeats those who think
differently, but spies upon their morals and psychology, regards such
work as a mere Epicurean instability of mind. It cannot understand that
criticism in its own right is to the living and thinking individual one
of the most valuable rights. The author does not intend to renounce this
right, though he might constantly be in danger of being indicted for
instability (MISCELLANY, St. Petersburg 1901).

⁽²⁾ Bulgakov, OP. CIT., p.252.

⁽³⁾ Tugan Baranovski, STUDIES ON THE THEORY AND HISTORY ..., p.229.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 11.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Three The Historical Conditions of Accumulation

 



CHAPTER 25 CONTRADICTIONS WITHIN THE DIAGRAM OF ENLARGED REPRODUCTION


 

In the first section, we ascertained that Marxs diagram of accumulation
does not solve the question of who is to benefit in the end by enlarged
reproduction. If we take the diagram literally as it is set out at the
end of volume ii, it appears that capitalist production would itself
realise its entire surplus value, and that it would use the capitalised
surplus value exclusively for its own needs. This impression is
confirmed by Marxs analysis of the diagram where he attempts to reduce
the circulation within the diagram altogether to terms of money, that is
to say to the effective demand of capitalists and workers an attempt
which in the end leads him to introduce the producer of money as a _deus
ex machina_. In addition, there is that most important passage in
CAPITAL, volume i, which must be interpreted to mean the same.

The annual production must in the first place furnish all those objects
(use-values) from which the material components of capital, used up in
the course of the year, have to be replaced. Deducting these there
remains the net or surplus-product, in which the surplus-value lies. And
of what does this surplus value consist? Only of things destined to
satisfy the wants and desires of the capitalist class, things which,
consequently, enter into the consumption fund of the capitalists? Were
that the case, the cup of surplus-value would be drained to the very
dregs, and nothing but simple reproduction would ever take place.

To accumulate it is necessary to convert a portion of the
surplus-product into capital. But we cannot, except by a miracle,
convert into capital anything but such articles as can be employed in
the labour-process (i.e. means of production), and such further articles
as are suitable for the sustenance of the labourer (i.e. means of
subsistence). Consequently, a part of the annual surplus-labour must
have been applied to the production of additional means of production
and subsistence, over and above the quantity of these things required to
replace the capital advanced. In one word, surplus-value is convertible
into capital solely because the surplus-product, whose value it is,
already comprises the material elements of new capital.⁽¹⁾

The following conditions of accumulation are here laid down:

1.  The surplus value to be capitalised first comes into being in the
    natural form of capital (as additional means of production and
    additional means of subsistence for the workers).
2.  The expansion of capitalist production is achieved exclusively by
    means of capitalist products, i.e. its own means of production and
    subsistence.
3.  The limits of this expansion are each time determined in advance by
    the amount of surplus value which is to be capitalised in any given
    case; they cannot be extended, since they depend on the amount of
    the means of production and subsistence which make up the surplus
    product; neither can they be reduced, since a part of the surplus
    value could not then be employed in its natural form. Deviations in
    either direction (above and below) may give rise to periodical
    fluctuations and crises in this context, however, these may be
    ignored, because in general the surplus product to be capitalised
    must be equal to actual accumulation;
4.  Since capitalist production buys up its entire surplus product,
    there is no limit to the accumulation of capital.

Marxs diagram of enlarged reproduction adheres to these conditions.
Accumulation here takes its course, but it is not in the least indicated
who is to benefit by it, who are the new consumers for whose sake
production is ever more enlarged. The diagram assumes, say, the
following course of events: the coal industry is expanded in order to
expand the iron industry in order to expand the machine industry in
order to expand the production of consumer goods. This last, in turn, is
expanded to maintain both its own workers and the growing army of coal,
iron and machine operatives. And so on _ad infinitum_. We are running in
circles, quite in accordance with the theory of Tugan Baranovski.
Considered in isolation, Marxs diagram does indeed permit of such an
interpretation since he himself explicitly states time and again that he
aims at presenting the process of accumulation of the aggregate capital
in a society consisting solely of capitalists and workers. Passages to
this effect can be found in every volume of CAPITAL.

In volume i, in the very chapter on _The Conversion of Surplus-Value
into Capital_, he says:

In order to examine the object of our investigation in its integrity,
free from all disturbing subsidiary circumstances, we must treat the
whole world as one nation, and assume that capitalist production is
everywhere established and has possessed itself of every branch of
industry.⁽²⁾

In volume ii, the assumption repeatedly returns; thus in chapter 17 on
_The Circulation of Surplus-Value_:

Now, there are only two points of departure: The capitalist and the
labourer. All third classes of persons must either receive money for
their services from these two classes, or, to the extent that they
receive it without any equivalent services, they are joint owners of the
surplus-value in the form of rent, interest, etc. ... The capitalist
class, then, remains the sole point of departure of the circulation of
money.⁽³⁾

Further, in the same chapter _On the Circulation of Money in Particular
under Assumption of Accumulation_:

But the difficulty arises when we assume, not a partial, but a general
accumulation of money-capital on the part of the capitalist class. Apart
from this class, there is, according to our assumption the general and
exclusive domination of capitalist production no other class but the
working class.⁽⁴⁾

And again in chapter 20:

... there are only two classes in this case, the working class disposing
of their labour-power, and the capitalist class owning the social means
of production and the money.⁽⁵⁾

In volume iii, Marx says quite explicitly, when demonstrating the
process of capitalist production as a whole:

Let us suppose that the whole society is composed only of industrial
capitalists and wage workers. Let us furthermore make exceptions of
fluctuations of prices which prevent large portions of the total capital
from reproducing themselves under average conditions and which, owing to
the general interrelations of the entire process of reproduction, such
as are developed particularly by credit, must always call forth general
stoppages of a transient nature. Let us also make abstraction of the
bogus transactions and speculations, which the credit system favours. In
that case, a crisis could be explained only by a disproportion of
production in various branches, and by a disproportion of the
consumption of the capitalists and the accumulation of their capitals.
But as matters stand, the reproduction of the capitals invested in
production depends largely upon the consuming power of the non-producing
classes; while the consuming power of the labourers is handicapped
partly by the laws of wages, partly by the fact that it can be exerted
only so long as the labourers can be employed at a profit for the
capitalist class.⁽⁶⁾

This last quotation refers to the question of crises with which we are
not here concerned. It can leave no doubt, however, that the movement of
the total capital, as matters stand, depends in Marxs view on three
categories of consumers only the capitalists, the workers and the
non-productive classes, i.e. the hangers-on of the capitalist class
(king, parson, professor, prostitute, mercenary), of whom he quite
rightly disposes in volume ii as the mere representatives of a
derivative purchasing power, and thus the parasitic joint consumers of
the surplus value or of the wage of labour.

Finally, in THEORIES OF SURPLUS VALUE,⁽⁷⁾ Marx formulates his general
presuppositions with regard to accumulation as follows:

Here we have only to consider the forms through which capital passes
during the various stages of its development. Thus we do not set out the
actual conditions of the real process of production, but always assume
that the commodity is sold for what it is worth. We ignore the
competition of capitalists and the credit system; we also leave out of
account the actual constitution of society which never consists
exclusively of the classes of workers and industrial capitalists, and
where there is accordingly no strict division between producers and
consumers. The first category (of consumers, whose revenues are partly
of a secondary, not a primitive nature, derived from profits and the
wage of labour) is much wider than the second category (of producers).
Therefore the manner in which it spends its income, and the extent of
such income, effects very large modifications in the economic household,
and especially so in the process of circulation and reproduction of
capital.

Speaking of the actual constitution of society, Marx here also considers
merely the parasitic joint consumers of surplus value and of the wage of
labour, i.e. only the hangers-on of the principal categories of
capitalist production.

There can be no doubt, therefore, that Marx wanted to demonstrate the
process of accumulation in a society consisting exclusively of workers
and capitalists, under the universal and exclusive domination of the
capitalist mode of production. On this assumption, however, his diagram
does not permit of any other interpretation than that of production for
productions sake.

Let us recall the second example of Marxs diagram of enlarged
reproduction:

  --
  --

Here accumulation continues year after year without interruption, the
capitalists in each case consuming half of the surplus value they have
gained and capitalising the other half. In the process of
capitalisation, the same technical foundation, that is to say the same
organic composition or division into constant and variable capital and
also the same rate of exploitation (always amounting to 100 per cent) is
consecutively maintained for the additional capital as it was for the
original capital. In accordance with Marxs assumption in volume i of
CAPITAL, the capitalised part of the surplus value first comes into
being as additional means of production and as means of subsistence for
the workers, both serving the purpose of an ever expanding production in
the two departments. It cannot be discovered from the assumptions of
Marxs diagram for whose sake production is progressively expanded.
Admittedly, production and consumption increase simultaneously in a
society. The consumption of the capitalists increases (in terms of
value, in the first year it amounts to 500 + 112, in the second year to
542 + 158, in the third year to 586 + 171, and in the fourth year to
635 + 185); the consumption of the workers increases as well; the
variable capital increasing year after year in both departments
precisely indicates this growth in terms of value. And yet, the growing
consumption of the capitalists can certainly not be regarded as the
ultimate purpose of accumulation; on the contrary, there is no
accumulation inasmuch as this consumption takes place and increases;
personal consumption of the capitalists must be regarded as simple
reproduction. Rather, the question is: if, and in so far as, the
capitalists do not themselves consume their products but practise
abstinence, i.e. accumulate, for whose sake do they produce? Even less
can the maintenance of an ever larger army of workers be the ultimate
purpose of continuous accumulation of capital. From the capitalists
point of view, the consumption of the workers is a consequence of
accumulation, it is never its object or its condition, unless the
principles (foundations) of capitalist production are to be turned
upside down. And in any case, the workers can only consume that part of
the product which corresponds to the variable capital, not a jot more.
Who, then, realises the permanently increasing surplus value? The
diagram answers: the capitalists themselves and they alone. And what do
they do with this increasing surplus value? The diagram replies: They
use it for an ever greater expansion of their production. These
capitalists are thus fanatical supporters of an expansion of production
for productions sake. They see to it that ever more machines are built
for the sake of building with their help ever more new machines. Yet the
upshot of all this is not accumulation of capital but an increasing
production of producer goods to no purpose whatever. Indeed, one must be
as reckless as Tugan Baranovski, and rejoice as much in paradoxical
statements, to assume that this untiring merry-go-round in thin air
could be a faithful reflection in theory of capitalist reality, a true
deduction from Marxs doctrine.⁽⁸⁾

Besides the analysis of enlarged reproduction roughed out in CAPITAL,
volume ii, the whole of Marxs work, volume ii in particular, contains a
most elaborate and lucid exposition of his general views regarding the
typical course of capitalist accumulation. If we once fully understand
this interpretation, the deficiencies of the diagram at the end of
volume ii are immediately evident.

If we examine critically the diagram of enlarged reproduction in the
light of Marxs theory, we find various contradictions between the two.

To begin with, the diagram completely disregards the increasing
productivity of labour. For it assumes that the composition of capital
is the same in every year, that is to say, the technical basis of the
productive process is not affected by accumulation. This procedure would
be quite permissible in itself in order to simplify the analysis, but
when we come to examine the concrete conditions for the realisation of
the aggregate product, and for reproduction, then at least we must take
into account, and make allowance for, changes in technique which are
bound up with the process of capital accumulation. Yet if we allow for
improved productivity of labour, the material aggregate of the social
product both producer and consumer goods will in consequence show a much
more rapid increase in volume than is set forth in the diagram. This
increase in the aggregate of use-values, moreover, indicates also a
change in the value relationships. As Marx argues so convincingly,
basing his whole theory on this axiom, the progressive development of
labour productivity reacts on both the composition of accumulating
capital and the rate of surplus value so that they cannot remain
constant under conditions of increasing accumulation of capital, as was
assumed by the diagram. Rather, if accumulation continues, _c_, the
constant capital of both departments, must increase not only absolutely
but also relatively to _v_+_c_ or the total new value (the social aspect
of labour productivity); at the same times constant capital and
similarly the surplus value must increase relatively to the variable
capital in short, the rate of surplus value, i.e. the ratio between
surplus value and variable capital, must similarly increase (the
capitalist aspect of labour productivity). These changes need not, of
course, occur annually, just as the terms of first, second and third
year in Marxs diagram do not necessarily refer to calendar years but may
stand for any given period. Finally, we may choose to assume that these
alterations, both in the composition of capital and in the rate of
surplus value, take place either in the first, third, fifth, seventh
year, etc., or in the second, sixth and ninth year, etc. The important
thing is only that they are allowed for somewhere and taken into account
as periodical phenomena. If the diagram is amended accordingly, the
result of this method of accumulation will be an increasing annual
surplus in the consumer at the expense of producer goods. It is true
that Tugan Baranovski conquers all difficulties on paper: he simply
constructs a diagram with different proportions where year by year the
variable capital decreases by 25 per cent. And since this arithmetical
exercise is successful enough on paper, Tugan triumphantly claims to
have proved that accumulation runs smoothly like clockwork, even if the
absolute volume of consumption decreases. Even he must admit in the end,
however, that his assumption of such an absolute decrease of the
variable capital is in striking contrast to reality. Variable capital is
in point of fact a growing quantity in all capitalist countries; only in
relation to the even more rapid growth of constant capital can it be
said to decrease. On the basis of what is actually happening, namely a
greater yearly increase of constant capital as against that of variable
capital, as well as a growing rate of surplus value, discrepancies must
arise between the material composition of the social product and the
composition of capital in terms of value. If, instead of the unchanging
proportion of 5 to 1 between constant and variable capital, proposed by
Marxs diagram, we assume for instance that this increase of capital is
accompanied by a progressive readjustment of its composition, the
proportion between constant and variable in the second year being 6 to
1, in the third year 7 to 1, and in the fourth year 8 to 1 if we further
assume that the rate of surplus value also increases progressively in
accordance with the higher productivity of labour so that, in each case,
we have the same amounts as those of the diagram, although, because of
the relatively decreasing variable capital, the rate of surplus value
does not remain constant at the original 100 per cent and if finally we
assume that one-half of the appropriated surplus value is capitalised in
each case (excepting Department II where capitalisation exceeds 50 per
cent, 184 out of 285 being capitalised during the first year), the
result will be as follows:

  --
  --

If this were a true picture of the accumulative process, the means of
production (constant capital) would show a deficit of 16 in the second
year, of 45 in the third year and of 88 in the fourth year; similarly,
the means of subsistence would show a surplus of 16 in the second year,
of 45 in the third year and of 88 in the fourth year.

This negative balance for the means of production may be only imaginary
in part. The increasing productivity of labour ensures that the means of
production grow faster in bulk than in value, in other words: means of
production become cheaper. As it is use value, i.e. the material
elements of capital, which is relevant for technical improvements of
production, we may assume that the quantity of means of production, in
spite of their lower value, will suffice for progressive accumulation up
to a certain point. This phenomenon amongst others also checks the
actual decline of the rate of profit and modifies it to a mere tendency,
though our example shows that the decline of the profit rate would not
only be retarded but rather completely arrested. On the other hand, the
same fact indicates a much larger surplus of unsaleable means of
subsistence than is suggested by the amount of this surplus in terms of
value. In that case, we should have to compel the capitalists of
Department II to consume this surplus themselves, which Marx makes them
do on other occasions; in which case, and in so far as those capitalists
are concerned, there would again be no accumulation but rather simple
reproduction. Alternatively, we should have to pronounce this whole
surplus unsaleable.

Yet would it not be very easy to make good this loss in means of
production which results from our example? We need only assume that the
capitalists of Department I capitalise their surplus value to a greater
extent. Indeed, there is no valid reason to suppose, as Marx did, that
the capitalists in each case add only half their surplus value to their
capital. Advances in labour productivity may well lead to progressively
increasing capitalisation of surplus value. This assumption is the more
permissible in that the cheapening of consumer goods for the capitalist
class, too, is one of the consequences of technological progress. The
relative decrease in the value of consumable income (as compared with
the capitalised part) may then permit of the same or even a higher
standard of living for this class. We might for instance make goad the
deficit in producer goods by transferring a corresponding part of
surplus value I to the constant capital of this department, a part which
would otherwise be consumed, since this surplus value, like all other
products of the department, originally takes the form of producer goods;
11⁴/7 would then be transferred in the second year, 34 in the third year
and 66 in the fourth year.⁽⁹⁾ The solution of one difficulty, however,
only adds to another. It goes without saying that if the capitalists of
Department I relatively restrict their consumption for purposes of
accumulation, there will be a proportionately greater unsaleable residue
of consumer goods in Department II; and thus it becomes more and more
impossible to enlarge the constant capital even on its previous
technological basis. If the capitalists in Department I relatively
restrict their consumption, the capitalists of Department II must
relatively expand their personal consumption in proportion. The
assumption of accelerated accumulation in Department I would then have
to be supplemented by that of retarded accumulation in Department II,
technical progress in one department by regression in the other.

These results are not due to mere chance. The adjustments we have tried
out on Marxs diagram are merely meant to illustrate that technical
progress, as he himself admits, must be accompanied by a relative growth
of constant as against variable capital. Hence the necessity for a
continuous revision of the ratio in which capitalised surplus value
should be allotted to _c_ and _v_ respectively. In Marxs diagram,
however, the capitalists are in no position to make these allocations at
will, since the material form of their surplus value predetermines the
forms of capitalisation. Since, according to Marxs assumption, all
expansion of production proceeds exclusively by means of its own,
capitalistically produced means of production and subsistence, since
there are here no other places and forms of production and equally no
other consumers than the two departments with their capitalists and
workers, and since, on the other hand, the smooth working of the
accumulative process depends on that circulation should wholly absorb
the aggregate product of both departments, the technological shape of
enlarged reproduction is in consequence strictly prescribed by the
material form of the surplus product. In other words: according to Marxs
diagram, the technical organisation of expanded production can and must
be such as to make use of the aggregate surplus value produced in
Departments I and II. In this connection we must bear in mind also that
both departments can obtain their respective elements of production only
by means of mutual exchange. Thus the allocation to constant or variable
capital of the surplus value earmarked for capitalisation, as well as
the allotment of the additional means of production and subsistence (for
the workers) to Departments I and II is given in advance and determined
by the relations between the two departments of the diagram both in
material and in terms of value. These relations themselves, however,
reflect a quite determinate technical organisation of production. This
implies that, on the assumptions of Marxs diagram, the techniques of
production given in each case predetermine the techniques of the
subsequent periods of enlarged reproduction, if accumulation continues.
Assuming, that is to say, in accordance with Marxs diagram, that the
expansion of capitalist production is always performed by means of the
surplus value originally produced in form of capital, and further or
rather, conversely that accumulation in one department is strictly
dependent on accumulation in the other, then no change in the technical
organisation of production can be possible in so far as the relation of
_c_ to _v_ is concerned.

We may put our point in yet another way: it is clear that a quicker
growth of constant as compared with variable capital, i.e. the
progressive metamorphosis of the organic composition of capital, must
take the material form of faster expansion of production in Department I
as against production in Department II. Yet Marxs diagram, where strict
conformity of the two departments is axiomatic, precludes any such
fluctuations in the rate of accumulation in either department. It is
quite legitimate to suppose that under the technical conditions of
progressive accumulation, society would invest ever increasing portions
of the surplus value earmarked for accumulation in Department I rather
than in Department II. Both departments being only branches of the same
social production supplementary enterprises, if you like, of the
aggregate capitalist such a progressive transfer, for technical reasons,
from one department to the other of a part of the accumulated surplus
value would be wholly feasible, especially as it corresponds to the
actual practice of capital. Yet this assumption is possible only so long
as we envisage the surplus value earmarked for capitalisation purely in
terms of value. The diagram, however, implies that this part of the
surplus value appears in a definite material form which prescribes its
capitalisation. Thus the surplus value of Department II exists as means
of subsistence, and since it is as such to be only realised by
Department I, this intended, transfer of part of the capitalised surplus
value from Department II to Department I is ruled out, first because the
material form of this surplus value is obviously useless to Department
I, and secondly because of the relations of exchange between the two
departments which would in turn necessitate an equivalent transfer of
the products of Department I into Department II. It is therefore
downright impossible to achieve a faster expansion of Department I as
against Department II within the limits of Marxs diagram.

However we may regard the technological alterations of the mode of
production in the course of accumulation, they cannot be accomplished
without upsetting the fundamental relations of Marxs diagram.

And further: according to Marxs diagram, the capitalised surplus value
is in each case immediately and completely absorbed by the productive
process of the following period, for, apart from the portion earmarked
for consumption, it has a natural form which allows of only one
particular kind of employment. The diagram precludes the cashing and
hoarding of surplus value in monetary form, as capital waiting to be
invested. The free monetary forms of private capital, in Marxs view, are
first the money deposited gradually against the wear and tear of the
fixed capital, for its eventual renewal; and secondly those amounts of
money which represent realised surplus value but are still too small for
investment. From the point of view of the aggregate capital, both these
sources of free money capital are negligible. For if we assume that even
a portion of the social surplus value is realised in monetary form for
purposes of future investment, then at once the question arises: who has
bought the material items of this surplus value, and who has provided
the money? If the answer is: other capitalists, of course, then, seeing
that the capitalist class is represented in the diagram by the two
departments, this portion of the surplus value must also be regarded as
invested _de facto_, as employed in the productive process. And so we
are back at immediate and complete investment of the surplus value.

Or does the freezing of one part of the surplus value in monetary form
in the hands of certain capitalists mean that other capitalists will be
left with a corresponding part of that surplus product in its material
form? does the hoarding of realised surplus value by some imply that
others are no longer able to realise their surplus value, since the
capitalists are the only buyers of surplus value? This would mean,
however, that the smooth course of reproduction and similarly of
accumulation as described in the diagram would be interrupted. The
result would be a crisis, due not to over-production but to a mere
intention to accumulate, the kind of crisis envisaged by Sismondi.

In one passage of his _Theories_,⁽¹⁰⁾ Marx explains in so many words
that he is not at all concerned in this connection with an accumulation
of capital greater than can be used in the productive process and might
lie idle in the banks in monetary form, with the consequence of lending
abroad. Marx refers these phenomena to the section on competition. Yet
it is important to establish that his diagram veritably precludes the
formation of such additional capital. Competition, however wide we may
make the concept, obviously cannot create values, nor can it create
capitals which are not themselves the result of the reproductive
process.

The diagram thus precludes the expansion of production by leaps and
bounds. It only allows of a gradual expansion which keeps strictly in
step with the formation of the surplus value and is based upon the
identity between realisation and capitalisation of the surplus value.

For the same reason, the diagram presumes an accumulation which affects
both departments equally and therefore all branches of capitalist
production. It precludes expansion of the demand by leaps and bounds
just as much as it prevents a one sided or precocious development of
individual branches of capitalist production.

Thus the diagram assumes a movement of the aggregate capital which flies
in the face of the actual course of capitalist development. At first
sight, two facts are typical for the history of the capitalist mode of
production: on the one hand the periodical expansion of the whole field
of production by leaps and bounds, and on the other an extremely unequal
development of the different branches of production. The history of the
English cotton industry from the first quarter of the eighteenth to the
seventies of the nineteenth century, the most characteristic chapter in
the history of the capitalist mode of production appears quite
inexplicable from the point of view of Marxs diagram.

Finally, the diagram contradicts the conception of the capitalist total
process and its course as laid down by Marx in CAPITAL, volume iii. This
conception is based on the inherent contradiction between the unlimited
expansive capacity of the productive forces and the limited expansive
capacity of social consumption under conditions of capitalist
distribution. Let us see how Marx describes this contradiction in detail
in chapter 15 on _Unravelling the Internal Contradictions of the Law_
(of the declining profit rate):

The creation of surplus-value, assuming the necessary means of
production, or sufficient accumulation of capital, to be existing, finds
no other limit but the labouring population, when the rate of
surplus-value, that is, the intensity of exploitation, is given; and no
other limit but the intensity of exploitation, when the labouring
population is given. And the capitalist process of production consists
essentially of the production of surplus-value, materialised in the
surplus-product, which is that aliquot portion of the produced
commodities, in which unpaid labour is materialised. It must never be
forgotten, that the production of this surplus-value and the
re-conversion of a portion of it into capital, or accumulation, forms an
indispensable part of this production of surplus-value is the immediate
purpose and the compelling motive of capitalist production. It will not
do to represent capitalist production as something which it is not, that
is to say, as a production having for its immediate purpose the
consumption of goods, or the production of means of enjoyment for the
capitalists. (And, of course, even less for the worker. _R.L._) This
would be overlooking the specific character of capitalist production,
which reveals itself in its innermost essence. The creation of this
surplus-value is the object of the direct process of production, and
this process has no other limits than those mentioned above. As soon as
the available quantity of surplus-value has been materialised in
commodities, surplus value has been produced. But this production of
surplus-value is but the first act of the capitalist process of
production, it merely terminates the act of direct production. Capital
has absorbed so much unpaid labour. With the development of the process,
which expresses itself through a falling tendency of the rate of profit,
the mass of surplus-value thus produced is swelled to immense
dimensions. Now comes the second act of the process. The entire mass of
commodities, the total product, which contains a portion which is to
reproduce the constant and variable capital as well as a portion
representing surplus-value, must be sold. If this is not done, or only
partly accomplished, or only at prices which are below the prices of
production, the labourer has been none the less exploited, but his
exploitation does not realise as much for the capitalist. It may yield
no surplus-value at all for him, or only realise a portion of the
produced surplus-value, or it may even mean a partial or complete loss
of his capital. The conditions of direct exploitation and those of the
realisation of surplus-value are not identical. They are separated
logically as well as by time and space. The first are only limited by
the productive power of society, the last by the proportional relations
of the various lines of production and by the consuming power of
society. This last-named power is not determined either by the absolute
productive power or by the absolute consuming power, but by the
consuming power based on antagonistic conditions of distribution, which
reduces the consumption of the great mass of the population to a
variable minimum within more or less narrow limits. The consuming power
is furthermore restricted by the tendency to accumulate, the greed for
an expansion of capital and a production of surplus value on an enlarged
scale. This is a law of capitalist production imposed by incessant
revolutions in the methods of production themselves, the resulting
depreciation of existing capital, the general competitive struggle and
the necessity of improving the product and expanding the scale of
production, for the sake of self-preservation and on penalty of failure.
The market must, therefore, be continually extended, so that its
interrelations and the conditions regulating them assume more and more
the form of a natural law independent of the producers and become ever
more uncontrollable. This eternal contradiction seeks to balance itself
by an expansion of the outlying fields of production. But to the extent
that the productive power develops, it finds itself at variance with the
narrow basis on which the conditions of consumption rest. On this
self-contradictory basis it is no contradiction at all that there should
be an excess of capital simultaneously with an excess of population. For
while a combination of these two would indeed increase the mass of the
produced surplus-value, it would at the same time intensify the
contradiction between the conditions under which this surplus-value is
produced and those under which it is realised.⁽¹¹⁾

If we compare this description with the diagram of enlarged
reproduction, the two are by no means in conformity. According to the
diagram, there is no inherent contradiction between the production of
the surplus value and its realisation, rather, the two are identical.
The surplus value here from the very beginning comes into being in a
natural form exclusively designed for the requirements of accumulation.
In fact it leaves the place of production in the very form of additional
capital, that is to say it is capable of realisation in the capitalist
process of accumulation. The capitalists, as a class, see to it in
advance that the surplus value they appropriate is produced entirely in
that material form which will permit and ensure its employment for
purposes of further accumulation. Realisation and accumulation of the
surplus value here are both aspects of the same process, they are
logically identical. Therefore according to the presentation of the
reproductive process in the diagram, societys capacity to consume does
not put a limit to production. Here production automatically expands
year by year, although the capacity of society for consumption has not
gone beyond its antagonistic conditions of distribution. This automatic
continuation of expansion, of accumulation, truly is the law of
capitalist production ... on penalty of failure. Yet according to the
analysis in volume iii, the market must, therefore, be continually
extended, the market obviously transcending the consumption of
capitalists and workers. And if Tugan Baranovski interprets the
following passage this eternal contradiction seeks to balance itself by
an expansion of the outlying fields of production as if Marx had meant
production itself by outlying fields of production, he violates not only
the spirit of the language but also Marxs clear train of thought. The
outlying fields of production are clearly and unequivocally not
production itself but consumption which must be continually extended.
The following passage in THEORIEN ÜBER DEN MEHRWERT, amongst others,
sufficiently shows that Marx had this in mind and nothing else:

Ricardo therefore consistently denies the necessity for an _expansion of
the market_ to accompany the expansion of production and the growth of
capital. The entire capital existing within a country can also be
profitably used in that country. He therefore argues against Adam Smith
who had set up his (Ricardos) opinion on the one hand but also
contradicted it with his usual sure instinct.⁽¹²⁾

In yet another passage, Marx clearly shows that Tugan Baranovskis notion
of production for productions sake is wholly alien to him:

Besides, we have seen in volume ii part iii that a continuous
circulation takes place between constant capital and constant capital
(even without considering any accelerated accumulation), which is in so
far independent of individual consumption, as it never enters into such
consumption, but which is nevertheless definitely limited by it because
the production of constant capital never takes place for its own sake,
but solely because more of this capital is needed in those spheres of
production whose products pass into individual consumption.⁽¹³⁾

Admittedly, in the diagram in volume ii, Tugan Baranovskis sole support,
market and production coincide they are one and the same. Expansion of
the market here means extended production, since production is said to
be its own exclusive market the consumption of the workers being an
element of production, i.e. the reproduction of variable capital.
Therefore the limit for both the expansion of production and the
extension of the market is one and the same: it is given by the volume
of the social capital, or the stage of accumulation already attained.
The greater the quantity of surplus value that has been extracted in the
natural form of capital, the more can be accumulated; and the greater
the volume of accumulation, the more surplus value can be invested in
its material form of capital, i.e. the more can be realised. Thus the
diagram does not admit the contradiction outlined in the analysis of
volume iii. In the process described by the diagram there is no need for
a continual extension of the market beyond the consumption of
capitalists and workers, nor is the limited social capacity for
consumption an obstacle to the smooth course of production and its
unlimited capacity for expansion. The diagram does indeed permit of
crises but only because of a lack of proportion within production,
because of a defective social control over the productive process. It
precludes, however, the deep and fundamental antagonism between the
capacity to consume and the capacity to produce in a capitalist society,
a conflict resulting from the very accumulation of capital which
periodically bursts out in crises and spurs capital on to a continual
extension of the market.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾CAPITAL, vol.i, pp.593-4.

⁽²⁾IBID., p.594, note 1.

⁽³⁾OP. CIT., vol.ii, p.384.

⁽⁴⁾IBID., pp.400-1.

⁽⁵⁾IBID., p.488.

⁽⁶⁾OP. CIT., vol.iii, p.568.

⁽⁷⁾THEORIEN ..., vol.ii, part 2, _The Accumulation of Capital and
Crises_, p.263.

⁽⁸⁾ It is never the original thinkers who draw the absurd conclusions.
They leave that to the Says and MacCullochs (CAPITAL, vol.ii, p.451).
And we might add to the Tugan Baranovskis.

⁽⁹⁾ The figures result from the difference between the amounts of
constant capital in Department I under conditions of technical progress,
and under Marxs stable conditions.

⁽¹⁰⁾THEORIEN ÜBER DEN MEHRWERT, vol.ii, part 2, p.252.

⁽¹¹⁾CAPITAL, vol.iii, pp.285ff.

⁽¹²⁾THEORIEN ..., vol.ii, part 2, p.305.

⁽¹³⁾CAPITAL, vol.iii, p.395.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 11.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Three The Historical Conditions of Accumulation

 



CHAPTER 26 THE REPRODUCTION OF CAPITAL AND ITS SOCIAL SETTING


 

MARXS diagram of enlarged reproduction cannot explain the actual and
historical process of accumulation. And why? Because of the very
premises of the diagram. The diagram sets out to describe the
accumulative process on the assumption that the capitalists and workers
are the sole agents of capitalist consumption. We have seen that Marx
consistently and deliberately assumes the universal and exclusive
domination of the capitalist mode of production as a theoretical premise
of his analysis in all three volumes of CAPITAL. Under these conditions,
there can admittedly be no other classes of society than capitalists and
workers; as the diagram has it, all third persons of capitalist society
civil servants, the liberal professions, the clergy, etc. must, as
consumers, be counted in with these two classes, and preferably with the
capitalist class. This axiom, however, is a theoretical contrivance real
life has never known a self-sufficient capitalist society under the
exclusive domination of the capitalist mode of production. This
theoretical device is perfectly admissible so long as it merely helps to
demonstrate the problem in its integrity and does not interfere with its
very conditions. A case in point is the analysis of simple reproduction
of the aggregate social capital, where the problem itself rests upon a
fiction: in a society producing by capitalist methods, i.e. a society
which creates surplus value, the whole of the latter is taken to be
consumed by the capitalists who appropriate it. The object is to present
the forms of social production and reproduction under these given
conditions. Here the very formulation of the problem implies that
production knows no other consumers than capitalists and workers and
thus strictly conforms to Marxs premise: universal and exclusive
domination of the capitalist mode of production. The implications of
both fictions are the same. Similarly, it is quite legitimate to
postulate absolute dominance of capital in an analysis of the
accumulation of individual capitals, such as is given in CAPITAL, volume
i. The reproduction of individual capitals is an element in total social
reproduction but one which follows an independent course, contrary to
the movements of the other elements. In consequence it will not do
simply to take together the individual movements of the respective
capitals in order to arrive at the total movement of social capital,
since the latter is essentially different. The natural conditions of
reproducing individual capitals therefore neither conform with one
another, nor do they conform to the relations of the total capital.
Under normal conditions of circulation, every individual capital engages
in the process of circulation and of accumulation entirely on its own
account, depending upon others only in so far, of course, as it is
compelled to find a market for its product and must find available the
means of production it requires for its specific activities. Whether the
strata who afford this market and provide the necessary means of
production are themselves capitalist producers or not is completely
immaterial for the individual capital, although, in theory, the most
favourable premise for analysing the accumulation of individual capital
is the assumption that capitalist production has attained universal and
exclusive domination and is the sole setting of this process.⁽¹⁾

Now, however, the question arises whether the assumptions which were
decisive in the case of individual capital, are also legitimate for the
consideration of aggregate capital.

We must now put the problem in this form: _given universal
accumulation_, that is to say provided that in all branches of
production there is greater or less accumulation of capital which in
fact is a condition of capitalist production, and which is just as
natural to the capitalist qua capitalist as it is natural to the miser
to amass money (but which is also necessary for the perpetuation of
capitalist production) what are the _conditions_ of this universal
accumulation, to what elements can it be reduced?

And the answer:

_The conditions for the accumulation of capital are precisely those
which rule its original production and reproduction in general:_ these
conditions being that one part of the money buys labour and the other
commodities (raw materials, machinery, etc.) ... Accumulation of new
capital can only proceed therefore under the same conditions under which
already existing capital is reproduced.⁽²⁾

In real life the actual conditions for the accumulation of the aggregate
capital are quite different from those prevailing for individual
capitals and for simple reproduction. The problem amounts to this: If an
increasing part of the surplus value is not consumed by the capitalists
but employed in the expansion of production, what, then, are the forms
of social reproduction? What is left of the social product after
deductions for the replacement of the constant capital cannot, _ex
hypothesi_, be absorbed by the consumption of the workers and
capitalists this being the main aspect of the problem nor can the
workers and capitalists themselves realise the aggregate product. They
can always only realise the variable capital, that part of the constant
capital which will be used up, and the part of the surplus value which
will be consumed, but in this way they merely ensure that production can
be renewed on its previous scale. The workers and capitalists themselves
cannot possibly realise that part of the surplus value which is to be
capitalised. Therefore, the realisation of the surplus value for the
purposes of accumulation is an impossible task for a society which
consists solely of workers and capitalists. Strangely enough, all
theorists who analysed the problem of accumulation, from Ricardo and
Sismondi to Marx, started with the very assumption which makes their
problem insoluble. A sure instinct that realisation of the surplus value
requires third persons, that is to say consumers other than the
immediate agents of capitalist production (i.e. workers and capitalists)
led to all kinds of subterfuges: unproductive consumption as presented
by Malthus in the person of the feudal landowner, by Vorontsov in
militarism, by Struve in the liberal professions and other hangers-on of
the capitalist class; or else foreign trade is brought into play which
proved a useful safety valve to all those who regarded accumulation with
scepticism, from Sismondi to Nikolayon. Because of these insoluble
difficulties, others like v. Kirchmann and Rodbertus tried to do without
accumulation altogether, or, like Sismondi and his Russian populist
followers, stressed the need for at least putting the dampers on
accumulation as much as possible.

The salient feature of the problem of accumulation, and the vulnerable
point of earlier attempts to solve it, has only been shown up by Marxs
more profound analysis, his precise diagrammatic demonstration of the
total reproductive process, and especially his inspired exposition of
the problem of simple reproduction. Yet he could not supply immediately
a finished solution either, partly because he broke off his analysis
almost as soon as he had begun it, and partly because he was then
preoccupied, as we have shown, with denouncing the analysis of Adam
Smith and thus rather lost sight of the main problem. In fact, he made
the solution even more difficult by assuming the capitalist mode of
production to prevail universally. Nevertheless, a solution of the
problem of accumulation, in harmony both with other parts of Marxs
doctrine and with the historical experience and daily practice of
capitalism, is implied in Marxs complete analysis of simple reproduction
and his characterisation of the capitalist process as a whole which
shows up its immanent contradictions and their development (in CAPITAL,
vol.iii). In the light of this, the deficiencies of the diagram can be
corrected. All the relations being, as it were, incomplete, a closer
study of the diagram of enlarged reproduction will reveal that it points
to some sort of organisation more advanced than purely capitalist
production and accumulation.

Up to now we have only considered one aspect of enlarged reproduction,
the problem of realising the surplus value, whose difficulties hitherto
had claimed the sceptics whole attention. Realisation of the surplus
value is doubtless a vital question of capitalist accumulation. It
requires as its prime condition ignoring, for simplicitys sake, the
capitalists fund of consumption altogether that there should be strata
of buyers outside capitalist society. Buyers, it should be noted, not
consumers, since the material form of the surplus value is quite
irrelevant to its realisation. The decisive fact is that the surplus
value cannot be realised by sale either to workers or to capitalists,
but only if it is sold to such social organisations or strata whose own
mode of production is not capitalistic. Here we can conceive of two
different cases:

1.  Capitalist production supplies consumer goods over and above its own
    requirements, the demand of its workers and capitalists, which are
    bought by non-capitalist strata and countries. The English cotton
    industry, for instance, during the first two-thirds of the
    nineteenth century, and to some extent even now, has been supplying
    cotton textiles to the peasants and petty-bourgeois townspeople of
    the European continent, and to the peasants of India, America,
    Africa and so on. The enormous expansion of the English cotton
    industry was thus founded on consumption by non-capitalist strata
    and countries.⁽³⁾ In England herself; this flourishing cotton
    industry called forth large-scale development in the production of
    industrial machinery (bobbins and weaving-looms), and further in the
    metal and coal industries and so on. In this instance, Department II
    realised its products to an increasing extent by sale to
    non-capitalist social strata, and by its own accumulation it created
    on its part an increasing demand for the home produce of Department
    I, thus helping the latter to realise its surplus value and to
    increase its own accumulation.
2.  Conversely, capitalist production supplies means of production in
    excess of its own demand and finds buyers in non-capitalist
    countries. English industry, for instance, in the first half of the
    nineteenth century supplied materials for the construction of
    railroads in the American and Australian states. (The building of
    railways cannot in itself be taken as evidence for the domination of
    capitalist production in a country. As a matter of fact, the
    railways in this case provided only one of the first conditions for
    the inauguration of capitalist production.) Another example would be
    the German chemical industry which supplies means of production such
    as dyes in great quantities to Asiatic, African and other countries
    whose own production is not capitalistic.⁽⁴⁾ Here Department I
    realises its products in extra-capitalist circles. The resulting
    progressive expansion of Department I gives rise to a corresponding
    expansion of Department II in the same (capitalistically producing)
    country in order to supply the means of subsistence for the growing
    army of workers in Department I.

Each of these cases differs from Marxs diagram. In one case, the product
of Department II exceeds the needs of both departments, measured by the
variable capital and the consumed part of the surplus value. In the
second case, the product of Department I exceeds the volume of constant
capital in both departments, enlarged though it is for the purpose of
expanding production. In both cases, the surplus value does not come
into being in that natural form which would make its capitalisation in
either department possible and necessary. These two prototypes
continually overlap in real life, supplement each other and merge.

In this contest, one point seems still obscure. The surplus of consumer
goods, say cotton fabrics, which is sold to non-capitalist countries,
does not exclusively represent surplus value, but, as a capitalist
commodity, it embodies also constant and variable capital. It seems
quite arbitrary to assume that just those commodities which are sold
outside the capitalist strata of society should represent nothing but
surplus value. On the other hand, Department I clearly can in this case
not only realise its surplus value but also accumulate, and that without
requiring another market for its product than the two departments of
capitalist production. Yet both these objections are only apparent. All
we need remember is that each component of the aggregate product
represents a proportion of the total value, that under conditions of
capitalist production not only the aggregate product but every single
commodity contains surplus value; which consideration does not prevent
the individual capitalist, however, from computing that the sale of his
specific commodities must first reimburse him for his outlay on constant
capital and secondly replace his variable capital (or, rather loosely,
but in accordance with actual practice: it must first replace his fixed,
and then his circulating capital); what then remains will go down as
profit. Similarly, we can divide the aggregate social product into three
proportionate parts which, in terms of value, correspond to (1) the
constant capital that has been used up in society, (2) the variable
capital, and (3) the extracted surplus value. In the case of simple
reproduction these proportions are also reflected in the material shape
of the aggregate product: the constant capital materialises as means of
production, the variable capital as means of subsistence for the
workers, and the surplus value as means of subsistence for the
capitalist. Yet as we know, the concept of simple reproduction with
consumption of the entire surplus value by the capitalists is a mere
fiction. As for enlarged reproduction or accumulation, in Marxs diagram
the composition of the social product in terms of value is also strictly
in proportion to its material form the surplus value, or rather that
part of it which is earmarked for capitalisation, has from the very
beginning the form of material means of production and means of
subsistence for the workers in a ratio appropriate to the expansion of
production on a given technical basis. As we have seen, this conception,
which is based upon the self-sufficiency and isolation of capitalist
production, falls down as soon as we consider the realisation of the
surplus value. If we assume, however, that the surplus value is realised
outside the sphere of capitalist production, then its material form is
independent of the requirements of capitalist production itself. Its
material form conforms to the requirements of those non-capitalist
circles who help to realise it, that is to say, capitalist surplus value
can take the form of consumer goods, e.g. cotton fabrics, or of means of
production, e.g. materials for railway construction, as the case may be.
If one department realises its surplus value by exporting its products,
and with the ensuing expansion of production helps the other department
to realise its surplus value on the home market, then the fact still
remains that the _social_ surplus value must yet be taken as realised
outside the two departments, either mediately or immediately. Similar
considerations enable the individual capitalist to realise his surplus
value, even if the whole of his commodities can only replace either the
variable or the constant capital of another capitalist.

Nor is the realisation of the surplus value the only vital aspect of
reproduction. Given that Department I has disposed of its surplus value
outside, thereby starting the process of accumulation, and further, that
it can expect a new increase in the demand in non-capitalist circles,
these two conditions add up to only half of what is required for
accumulation. There is many a slip twixt the cup and the lip. The second
requirement of accumulation is access to material elements necessary for
expanding reproduction. Seeing that we have just turned the surplus
product of Department I into money by getting rid of the surplus means
of production to non-capitalist circles, from where are these material
elements then to come? The transaction which is the portal for realising
the surplus value is also, as it were, a backdoor out of which flies all
possibility of converting this realised surplus value into productive
capital one leads to the nether regions and the other to the deep sea.
Let us take a closer look.

Here we use _c_ in both Departments I and II as if it were the entire
constant capital in production. Yet this we know is wrong. Only for the
sake of simplifying the diagram have we disregarded that the _c_ which
figures in Departments I and II of the diagram is only part of the
aggregate constant capital of society, that is to say that part which,
circulating during one year, is used up and embodied in the products of
one period of production. Yet it would be perfectly absurd if capitalist
production or any other would use up its entire constant capital and
create it anew in every period of production. On the contrary, we assume
that the whole mass of means of production, for the periodical total
renewal of which the diagram provides in annual installments renewal of
the used-up part lies at the back of production as presented in the
diagram. With progressing labour productivity and an expanding volume of
production, this mass increases not only absolutely but also relatively
to the part which is consumed in production in every case, together with
a corresponding increase in the efficiency of the constant capital. It
is the more intensive exploitation of this part of the constant capital,
irrespective of its increase in value, which is of paramount importance
for the expansion of production.

In the extractive industries, mines, etc., the raw materials form no
part of the capital advanced. The subject of labour is in this case not
a product of previous labour, but is furnished by Nature gratis, as in
the case of metals, minerals; coal, stone, etc. In these cases the
constant capital consists almost exclusively of instruments of labour,
which can very well absorb an increased quantity of labour (day and
night shifts of labourers, e.g.). All other things being equal, the mass
and value of the product will rise in direct proportion to the labour
expended. As on the first day of production, the original
produce-formers, now turned into the creators of the material elements
of capital man and Nature still work together. Thanks to the elasticity
of labour-power, the domain of accumulation has extended without any
previous enlargement of constant capital. In agriculture the land under
cultivation cannot be increased without the advance of more seed and
manure. But this advance once made, the purely mechanical working of the
soil itself produces a marvellous effect on the amount of the product. A
greater quantity of labour, done by the same number of labourers as
before, thus increases the fertility, without requiring any new advance
in the instruments of labour. It is once again the direct action of man
on Nature which becomes an immediate source of greater accumulation,
without the intervention of any new capital. Finally, in what is called
manufacturing industry, every additional expenditure of labour
presupposes a corresponding additional expenditure of raw materials, but
not necessarily of instruments of labour. And as extractive industry and
agriculture supply manufacturing industry with its raw materials and
those of its instruments of labour, the additional product the former
have created without additional advance of capital, tells also in favour
of the latter. General result: by incorporating with itself the two
primary creators of wealth, labour-power and the land, capital acquires
a power of expansion that permits it to augment the elements of its
accumulation beyond the limits apparently fixed by its own magnitude, or
by the value and the mass of the means of production, already produced,
in which it has its being.⁽⁵⁾

In addition, there is no obvious reason why means of production and
consumer goods should be produced by capitalist methods alone. This
assumption, for all Marx used it as the corner-stone of his thesis, is
in conformity neither with the daily practice, and the history, of
capital, nor with the specific character of this mode of production. In
the first half of the nineteenth century, a great part of the surplus
value in England was produced in form of cotton fabrics. Yet the
material elements for the capitalisation of this surplus value, although
they certainly represented a surplus product, still were by no means all
capitalist surplus value, to mention only raw cotton from the slave
states of the American Union, or grain (a means of subsistence for the
English workers) from the fields of serf-owning Russia. How much
capitalist accumulation depends upon means of production which are not
produced by capitalist methods is shown for example by the cotton crisis
in England during the American War of Secession, when the cultivation of
the plantations came to a standstill, or by the crisis of European linen
weaving during the war in the East, when flax could not be imported from
serf-owning Russia. We need only recall that imports of corn raised by
peasants i.e. not produced by capitalist methods played a vital part in
the feeding of industrial labour, as an element, that is to say, of
variable capital, for a further illustration of the close ties between
non-capitalist strata and the material elements necessary to the
accumulation of capital.

Moreover, capitalist production, by its very nature, cannot be
restricted to such means of production as are produced by capitalist
methods. Cheap elements of constant capital are essential to the
individual capitalist who strives to increase his rate of profit. In
addition, the very condition of continuous improvements in labour
productivity as the most important method of increasing the rate of
surplus value, is unrestricted utilisation of all substances and
facilities afforded by nature and soil. To tolerate any restriction in
this respect would be contrary to the very essence of capital, its whole
mode of existence. After many centuries of development, the capitalist
mode of production still constitutes only a fragment of total world
production. Even in the small Continent of Europe, where it now chiefly
prevails, it has not yet succeeded in dominating entire branches of
production, such as peasant agriculture and the independent handicrafts;
the same holds true, further, for large parts of North America and for a
number of regions in the other continents. In general, capitalist
production has hitherto been confined mainly to the countries in the
temperate zone, whilst it made comparatively little progress in the
East, for instance, and the South. Thus, if it were dependent
exclusively, on elements of production obtainable within such narrow
limits, its present level and indeed, its development in general would
have been impossible. From the very beginning, the forms and laws of
capitalist production aim to comprise the entire globe as a store of
productive forces. Capital, impelled to appropriate productive forces
for purposes of exploitation, ransacks the whole world, it procures its
means of production from all corners of the earth, seizing them, if
necessary by force, from all levels of civilisation and from all forms
of society. The problem of the material elements of capitalist
accumulation, far from being solved by the material form of the surplus
value that has been produced, takes on quite a different aspect. It
becomes necessary for capital progressively to dispose ever more fully
of the whole globe, to acquire an unlimited choice of means of
production, with regard to both quality and quantity, so as to find
productive employment for the surplus value it has realised.

The process of accumulation, elastic and spasmodic as it is, requires
inevitably free access to ever new areas of raw materials in case of
need, both when imports from old sources fall or when social demand
suddenly increases. When the War of Secession interfered with the import
of American cotton, causing the notorious cotton famine in the
Lancashire district, new and immense cotton plantations sprang up in
Egypt almost at once, as if by magic. Here it was Oriental despotism,
combined with an ancient system of bondage, which had created a sphere
of activity for European capital. Only capital with its technical
resources can effect such a miraculous change in so short a time but
only on the pre-capitalist soil of more primitive social conditions can
it develop the ascendancy necessary to achieve such miracles. Another
example of the same kind is the enormous increase in the world
consumption of rubber which at present (1912) necessitates a supply of
latex to the value of £50,000,000 per annum. The economic basis for the
production of raw materials is a primitive system of exploitation
practised by European capital in the African colonies and in America;
where the institutions of slavery and bondage are combined in various
forms.⁽⁶⁾

Between the production of surplus value, then, and the subsequent period
of accumulation, two separate transactions take place that of realising
the surplus value, i.e. of converting it into pure value, and that of
transforming this pure value into productive capital. They are both
dealings between capitalist production and the surrounding
non-capitalist world. From the aspect both of realising the surplus
value and of procuring the material elements of constant capital,
international trade is a prime necessity for the historical existence of
capitalism an international trade which under actual conditions is
essentially an exchange between capitalistic and non-capitalistic modes
of production.

Hitherto we have considered accumulation solely with regard to surplus
value and constant capital. The third element of accumulation is
variable capital winch increases with progressive accumulation. In Marxs
diagram, the social product contains ever more means of subsistence for
the workers as the material form proper to this variable capital. The
variable capital, however, is not really the means of subsistence for
the worker but is in fact living labour for whose reproduction these
means of subsistence are necessary. One of the fundamental conditions of
accumulation is therefore a supply of living labour which can be
mobilised by capital to meet its demands. This supply can be increased
under favourable conditions but only up to a certain point by longer
hours and more intensive work. Both these methods of increasing the
supply, however, do not enlarge the variable capital, or do so only to a
small extent (e.g. payment for overtime). Moreover, they are confined to
definite and rather narrow limits which they cannot exceed owing to both
natural and social causes. The increasing growth of variable capital
which accompanies accumulation must therefore become manifest in ever
greater numbers of employed labour. Where can this additional labour be
found?

In his analysis of the accumulation of individual capital, Marx gives
the following answer:

Now in order to allow of these elements actually functioning as capital,
the capitalist class requires additional labour. If the exploitation of
the labourers already employed does not increase, either extensively or
intensively, then additional labour-power must be found. For this the
mechanism of capitalist production provides beforehand, by converting
the working class into a class dependent on wages, a class whose
ordinary wages suffice, not only for its maintenance, but for its
increase. It is only necessary for capital to incorporate this
additional labour-power, annually supplied by the working class in the
shape of labourers of all ages, with the surplus means of production
comprised in the annual produce, and the conversion of surplus-value
into capital is complete.⁽⁷⁾

Thus the increase in the variable capital is directly and exclusively
attributed to the natural physical increase of a working class already
dominated by capital. This is in strict conformity with the diagram of
enlarged reproduction which recognises only the social classes of
capitalists and workers, and regards the capitalist mode of production
as exclusive and absolute. On these assumptions, the natural increase of
the working class is the only source of extending the labour supply
commanded by capital. This view, however, is contrary to the laws
governing the process of accumulation. The natural propagation of the
workers and the requirements of accumulating capital are not correlative
in respect of time or quantity. Marx himself has most brilliantly shown
that natural propagation cannot keep up with the sudden expansive needs
of capital. If natural propagation were the only foundation for the
development of capital, accumulation, in its periodical swings from
overstrain to exhaustion, could not continue, nor could the productive
sphere expand by leaps and bounds, and accumulation itself would become
impossible. The latter requires an unlimited freedom of movement in
respect of the growth of variable capital equal to that which it enjoys
with regard to the elements of constant capital that is to say it must
needs dispose over the supply of labour power without restriction. Marx
considers that this can be achieved by an industrial reserve army of
workers. His diagram of simple reproduction admittedly does not
recognise such an army, nor could it have room for it, since the natural
propagation of the capitalist wage proletariat cannot provide an
industrial reserve army. Labour for this army is recruited from social
reservoirs outside the dominion of capital it is drawn into the wage
proletariat only if need arises. Only the existence of non-capitalist
groups and countries can guarantee such a supply of additional labour
power for capitalist production.⁽⁸⁾ Yet in his analysis of the
industrial reserve Marx only allows for _(a)_ the displacement of older
workers by machinery, _(b)_ an influx of rural workers into the towns in
consequence of the ascendancy of capitalist production in agriculture,
_(c)_ occasional labour that has dropped out of industry, and _(d)_
finally the lowest residue of relative over-population, the paupers. All
these categories are cast off by the capitalist system of production in
some form or other, they constitute a wage proletariat that is worn out
and made redundant one way or another. Marx, obviously influenced by
English conditions involving a high level of capitalist development,
held that the rural workers who continually migrate to the towns belong
to the wage proletariat, since they were formerly dominated by
agricultural capital and now become subject to industrial capital. He
ignores, however, the problem which is of paramount importance for
conditions on the continent of Europe, namely the sources from which
this urban and rural proletariat is recruited: the continual process by
which the rural and urban middle strata become proletarian with the
decay of peasant economy and of small artisan enterprises, the very
process, that is to say, of incessant transition from non-capitalist to
capitalist conditions of a labour power that is cast off by
pre-capitalist, not capitalist, modes of production in their progressive
breakdown and disintegration. Besides the decay of European peasants and
artisans we must here also mention the disintegration of the most varied
primitive forms of production and of social organisation in non-European
countries.

Since capitalist production can develop fully only with complete access
to all territories and climes, it can no more confine itself to the
natural resources and productive forces of the temperate zone than it
can manage with white labour alone. Capital needs other races to exploit
territories where the white man cannot work. It must be able to mobilise
world labour power without restriction in order to utilise all
productive forces of the globe up to the limits imposed by a system of
producing surplus value. This labour power, however, is in most cases
rigidly bound by the traditional pre-capitalist organisation of
production. It must first be set free in order to be enrolled in the
active army of capital. The emancipation of labour power from primitive
social conditions and its absorption by the capitalist wage system is
one of the indispensable historical bases of capitalism. For the first
genuinely capitalist branch of production, the English cotton industry,
not only the cotton of the Southern states of the American Union was
essential, but also the millions of African Negroes who were shipped to
America to provide the labour power for the plantations, and who late;
as a free proletariat, were incorporated in the class of wage labourers
in a capitalist system.⁽⁹⁾ Obtaining the necessary labour power from
non-capitalist societies, the so-called labour-problem, is ever more
important for capital in the colonies. All possible methods of gentle
compulsion are applied to solving this problem, to transfer labour from
former social systems to the command of capital. This endeavour leads to
the most peculiar combinations between the modern wage system and
primitive authority in the colonial countries.⁽¹⁰⁾ This is a concrete
example of the fact that capitalist production cannot manage without
labour power from other social organisations.

Admittedly, Marx dealt in detail with the process of appropriating
non-capitalist means of production as well as with the transformation of
the peasants into a capitalist proletariat. Chapter xxiv of CAPITAL,
vol.i, is devoted to describing the origin of the English proletariat,
of the capitalistic agricultural tenant class and of industrial capital,
with particular emphasis on the looting of colonial countries by
European capital. Yet we must bear in mind that all this is treated
solely with a view to so-called primitive accumulation. For Marx, these
processes are incidental, illustrating merely the genesis of capital,
its first appearance in the world; they are, as it were, travails by
which the capitalist mode of production emerges from a feudal society.
As soon as he comes to analyse the capitalist process of production and
circulation, he reaffirms the universal and exclusive domination of
capitalist production.

Yet, as we have seen, capitalism in its frill maturity also depends in
all respects on non-capitalist strata and social organizations existing
side by side with it. It is not merely a question of a market for the
additional product, as Sismondi and the later critics and doubters of
capitalist accumulation would have it. The interrelations of
accumulating capital and non-capitalist forms of production extend over
values as well as over material conditions, for constant capital,
variable capital and surplus value alike. The non-capitalist mode of
production is the given historical setting for this process. Since the
accumulation of capital becomes impossible in all points without
non-capitalist surroundings, we cannot gain a true picture of it by
assuming the exclusive and absolute domination of the capitalist mode of
production. Sismondi and his school, when they attributed their
difficulties entirely to the problem of realising the surplus value,
indeed revealed a proper sense for the conditions vital to accumulation.
Yet the conditions for augmenting the material elements of constant and
variable capital are quite a different matter from those which govern
the realisation of surplus value. Capital needs the means of production
and the labour power of the whole globe for untrammelled accumulation;
it cannot manage without the natural resources and the labour power of
all territories. Seeing that the overwhelming majority of resources and
labour power is in fact still in the orbit of pre-capitalist production
this being the historical _milieu_ of accumulation capital must go all
out to obtain ascendancy over these territories and social
organizations. There is no _a priori_ reason why rubber plantations,
say, run on capitalist lines, such as have been laid out in India, might
not serve the ends of capitalist production just as well. Yet if the
countries of those branches of production are predominantly
non-capitalist, capital will endeavour to establish domination over
these countries and societies. And in fact, primitive conditions allow
of a greater drive and of far more ruthless measures than could be
tolerated under purely capitalist social conditions.

It is quite different with the realisation of the surplus value. Here
outside consumers _qua_ other-than-capitalist are really essential. Thus
the immediate and vital conditions for capital and its accumulation is
the existence of non-capitalist buyers of the surplus value, which is
decisive to this extent for the problem of capitalist accumulation.

Whatever the theoretical aspects, the accumulation of capital as an
historical process, depends in every respect upon non-capitalist social
strata and forms of social organisation.

The solution to this problem which for almost a century has been the
bone of contention in economic theory thus lies between the two extremes
of the petty-bourgeois scepticism preached by Sismondi, v. Kirchmann,
Vorontsov and Nikolayon, who flatly denied accumulation, and the crude
optimism advocated by Ricardo, Say and Tugan Baranovski who believed in
capitals unlimited capacity for parthenogenesis, with the logical
corollary of capitalism-in-perpetuity. The solution envisaged by Marx
lies in the dialectical conflict that capitalism needs non-capitalist
social organisations as the setting for its development, that it
proceeds by assimilating the very conditions which alone can ensure its
own existence.

At this point we should revise the conceptions of internal and external
markets which were so important in the controversy about accumulation.
They are both vital to capitalist development and yet fundamentally
different, though they must be conceived in terms of social economy
rather than of political geography. In this light, the internal market
is the capitalist market, production itself buying its own products and
supplying its own elements of production. The external market is the
non-capitalist social environment which absorbs the products of
capitalism and supplies producer goods and labour power for capitalist
production. Thus, from the point of view of economics, Germany and
England traffic in commodities chiefly on an internal, capitalist
market, whilst the give and take between German industry and German
peasants is transacted on an external market as far as German capital is
concerned. These concepts are strict and precise, as can be seen from
the diagram of reproduction. Internal capitalist trade can at best
realise only certain quantities, of value contained in the social
product: the constant capital that has been used up, the variable
capital, and the consumed part of the surplus value. That part of the
surplus value, however, which is earmarked for capitalisation, must be
realised elsewhere. If capitalization of surplus value is the real
motive force and aim of production, it must yet proceed within the
limits given by the renewal of constant and variable capital (and also
of the consumed part of the surplus value). Further, with the
international development of capitalism the capitalisation of surplus
value becomes ever more urgent and precarious, and the substratum of
constant and variable capital becomes an ever-growing mass both
absolutely and in relation to the surplus value. Hence the contradictory
phenomena that the old capitalist countries provide ever larger markets
for, and become increasingly dependent upon, one another, yet on the
other hand compete ever more ruthlessly for trade relations with
non-capitalist countries.⁽¹¹⁾ The conditions for the capitalisation of
surplus value clash increasingly with the conditions for the renewal of
the aggregate capital a conflict which, incidentally, is merely a
counterpart of the contradictions implied in the law of a declining
profit rate.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾ If capital and the productivity of labour advance and the standard
of capitalist production in general is on a higher level of development,
then there is a correspondingly greater mass of commodities passing
through the market from production to individual and industrial
consumption, greater certainty that each particular capital will find
the conditions for its reproduction available in the market (THEORIEN
..., vol.ii, part 2, p.251).

⁽²⁾IBID., p.250: _Akkumulation von Kapital und Krisen_ (_The
Accumulation of Capital and the Crises_). Marxs italics.

⁽³⁾ The following figures plainly show the importance of the cotton
industry for English exports:

-   In 1893, cotton exports to the amount of £64,000,000 made up 23 per
    cent, and iron and other metal exports not quite 17 per cent of the
    total export of manufactured goods, amounting to £277,000,000 in
    all.
-   In 1898, cotton exports to the amount of £J65,000,000 made up 28 per
    cent, and metal exports 22 per cent, of the total export of
    manufactured goods, amounting to £233,400,000 in all.

In comparison, the figures for the German Empire show the following
result: In 1898, cotton exports to the amount of £1,595,000 made up 575
per cent of the total exports, amounting to £200,500,000. 5,250,000,000
yards of cotton bales were exported in 1898, 2,250,000,000 of them to
India (E. Jaffe: _Die englische Baumwollindustrie und die Organisation
des Exporthandels_. SCHMOLLERS JAHRBÜCHER, vol.xxiv, p.1033).

In 1908, British exports of cotton yarn alone amounted to £13,100,000
(STATIST. JAHRB. FÜR DAS DEUTSCHE REICH, 1910).

⁽⁴⁾ One-fifth of German aniline dyes, and one-half of her indigo, goes
to countries such as China, Japan, British India, Egypt, Asiatic Turkey,
Brazil, and Mexico

⁽⁵⁾CAPITAL, vol.i, pp.615-16.

⁽⁶⁾ The English _Blue Book_ on the practices of the Peruvian Amazon
Company, Ltd., in Putumayo, has recently revealed that in the free
republic of Peru and without the political form of colonial supremacy,
international capital can, to all intents and purposes, enslave the
natives, so that it may appropriate the means of production of the
primitive countries by exploitation on the greatest scale. Since 1900,
this company, financed by English and foreign capitalists, has thrown
upon the London market approximately 4,000 tons of Putumayo rubber.
During this time, 30,000 natives were killed and most of the 10,000
survivors were crippled by beatings.

⁽⁷⁾CAPITAL, vol.i, p.594. Similarly in another passage:

One part of the surplus value, of the surplus means of subsistence
produced, must then be converted into variable capital for the purpose
of purchasing new labour. This can only be done if the number of workers
grows or if their working time is prolonged ... This, however, cannot be
considered a ready measure for accumulation. The working population can
increase if formerly unproductive workers are transformed into
productive ones, or if parts of the population who previously performed
no work, such as women, children and paupers, are drawn into the process
of production. Here, however, we shall ignore this aspect. Lastly, the
working population can increase through an absolute increase in
population. If accumulation is to proceed steadily and continuously, it
must be grounded in an absolute growth of the population, though this
may decline in comparison with the capital employed. An expanding
population appears as the basis of accumulation conceived as a steady
process. An indispensable condition for this is an average wage which is
adequate not only to the reproduction of the working population but
permits its continual increase (THEORIEN ÜBER DEN MEHRWERT, vol.ii, part
2, in the chapter on _Transformation of Revenue Into Capital_
(_Verwandlung von Revenue in Kapital_), p.243).

⁽⁸⁾CAPITAL, vol.i, pp.642ff.

⁽⁹⁾ A table published in the United States shortly before the War of
Secession contained the following data about the value of the annual
production of the Slave States and the number of slaves employed for the
greatest part on cotton plantations:

  --
  --

(Simons, _Class Struggles in American History_, Supplement to NEUE ZEIT
(_Klassenkämpfe in der Geschichte Amerikas_, ERGÄNZUNGSHEFT DER _NEUEN
ZEIT_), Nr.7, p.39.)

⁽¹⁰⁾ Bryce, a former English Minister, describes a model pattern of such
hybrid forms in the South African diamond mines:

The most striking sight at Kimberley, and one unique in the world, is
furnished by the two so-called compounds in which the natives who work
in the mines are housed and confined. They are huge inclosures,
unroofed, but covered with a wire netting to prevent anything from being
thrown out of them over the walls, and with a subterranean entrance to
the adjoining mine. The mine is worked on the system of three eight-hour
shifts, so that the workman is never more than eight hours together
underground. Round the interior of the wall are built sheds or huts in
which the natives live and sleep when not working. A hospital is also
provided within the inclosure, as well as a school where the work-people
can spend their leisure in learning to read and write. No spirits are
sold ... Every entrance is strictly guarded, and no visitors, white or
native, are permitted, all supplies being obtained from the store
within, kept by the company. The De Beers mine compound contained at the
time of my visit 2,600 natives, belonging to a great variety of tribes,
so that here one could see specimens of the different native types from
Natal and Pondoland, in the south, to the shores of Lake Tanganyika in
the far north. They come from every quarter, attracted by the high
wages, usually eighteen to thirty shillings a week, and remain for three
months or more, and occasionally even for longer periods ... In the vast
oblong compound one sees Zulus from Natal, Fingos, Pondos, Tembus,
Basutos, Bechuanas, Gungunhanas subjects from the Portuguese
territories, some few Matabili and Makalaka; and plenty of Zambesi boys
from the tribes on both sides of that great river, a living ethnological
collection such as can be examined nowhere else in South Africa. Even
Bushmen, or at least natives with some Bushman blood in them, are not
wanting. They live peaceably together, and amuse themselves in their
several ways during their leisure hours. Besides games of chance, we saw
a game resembling fox and geese played with pebbles on a board; and
music was being discoursed on two rude native instruments, the so-called
Kaffir piano made of pieces of iron of unequal length fastened side-by
side in a frame and a still ruder contrivance of hard bits of wood, also
of unequal size, which when struck by a stick emit different notes, the
first beginning of a tune. A very few were reading or writing letters,
the rest busy with their cooking or talking to one another. Some tribes
are incessant talkers, and in this strange mixing-pot of black men one
may hear a dozen languages spoken as one passes from group to group
(James Bryce, IMPRESSIONS OF SOUTH AFRICA, London 1897, pp.242ff.).

After several months of work, the negro as a rule leaves the mine with
the wages he has saved up. He returns to his tribe, buying a wife with
his money, and lives again his traditional life. Cf. also in the same
book the most lively description of the methods used in South Africa to
solve the labour problem. Here we are told that the negroes are
compelled to work in the mines and plantations of Kimberley,
Witwatersrand, Natal, Matabeleland, by stripping them of all land and
cattle, i.e. depriving them of their means of existence, by making them
into proletarians and also demoralising them with alcohol. (Later, when
they are already within the enclosure of capital, spirits, to which they
have just been accustomed, are strictly prohibited the object of
exploitation must be kept fit for use.) Finally, they are simply pressed
into the wage system of capital by force, by imprisonment, and flogging.

⁽¹¹⁾ The relations between Germany and England provide a typical
example.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 12.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Three The Historical Conditions of Accumulation

 



CHAPTER 27 THE STRUGGLE AGAINST NATURAL ECONOMY


 

CAPITALISM arises and develops historically amidst a non-capitalist
society. In Western Europe it is found at first in a feudal environment
from which it in fact sprang the system of bondage in rural areas and
the guild system in the towns and later, after having swallowed up the
feudal system, it exists mainly in an environment of peasants and
artisans, that is to say in a system of simple commodity production both
in agriculture and trade. European capitalism is further surrounded by
vast territories of non-European civilisation ranging over all levels of
development, from the primitive communist hordes of nomad herdsmen,
hunters and gatherers to commodity production by peasants and artisans.
This is the setting for the accumulation of capital.

We must distinguish three phases: the struggle of capital against
natural economy, the struggle against commodity economy, and the
competitive struggle of capital on the international stage for the
remaining conditions of accumulation.

The existence and development of capitalism requires an environment of
non-capitalist forms of production, but not every one of these forms
will serve its ends. Capitalism needs non-capitalist social strata as a
market for its surplus value, as a source of supply for its means of
production and as a reservoir of labour power for its wage system. For
all these purposes, forms of production based upon a natural economy are
of no use to capital. In all social organisations where natural economy
prevails, where there are primitive peasant communities with common
ownership of the land, a feudal system of bondage or anything of this
nature, economic organisation is essentially in response to the internal
demand; and therefore there is no demand, or very little, for foreign
goods, and also, as a rule, no surplus production, or at least no urgent
need to dispose of surplus products. What is most important, however, is
that, in any natural economy, production only goes on because both means
of production and labour power are bound in one form or another. The
communist peasant community no less than the feudal _corvée_ farm and
similar institutions maintain their economic organisation by subjecting
the labour power, and the most important means of production, the land,
to the rule of law and custom. A natural economy thus confronts the
requirements of capitalism at every turn with rigid barriers. Capitalism
must therefore always and everywhere fight a battle of annihilation
against every historical form of natural economy that it encounters,
whether this is slave economy, feudalism, primitive communism, or
patriarchal peasant economy. The principal methods in this struggle are
political force (revolution, war), oppressive taxation by the state, and
cheap goods; they are partly applied simultaneously, and partly they
succeed and complement one another. In Europe, force assumed
revolutionary forms in the fight against feudalism (this is the ultimate
explanation of the bourgeois revolutions in the seventeenth, eighteenth
and nineteenth centuries); in the non-European countries, where it
fights more primitive social organisations, it assumes the forms of
colonial policy. These methods, together with the systems of taxation
applied in such cases, and commercial relations also, particularly with
primitive communities, form an affiance in which political power and
economic factors go hand in hand.

In detail, capital in its struggle against societies with a natural
economy pursues the following ends:

1.  To gain immediate possession of important sources of productive
    forces such as land, game in primeval forests, minerals, precious
    stones and ores, products of exotic flora such as rubber, etc.
2.  To liberate labour power and to coerce it into service.
3.  To introduce a commodity economy.
4.  To separate trade and agriculture.

At the time of primitive accumulation, i.e. at the end of the Middle
Ages, when the history of capitalism in Europe began, and right into the
nineteenth century, dispossessing the peasants in England and on the
Continent was the most striking weapon in the large-scale transformation
of means of production and labour power into capital. Yet capital in
power performs the same task even to-day, and on an even more important
scale by modern colonial policy. It is an illusion to hope that
capitalism will ever be content with the means of production which it
can acquire by way of commodity exchange. In this respect already,
capital is faced with difficulties because vast tracts of the globes
surface are in the possession of social organisations that have no
desire for commodity exchange or cannot, because of the entire social
structure and the forms of ownership, offer for sale the productive
forces in which capital is primarily interested. The most important of
these productive forces is of course the land, its hidden mineral
treasure, and its meadows, woods and water, and further the flocks of
the primitive shepherd tribes. If capital were here to rely on the
process of slow internal disintegration, it might take centuries. To
wait patiently until the most important means of production could be
alienated by trading in consequence of this process were tantamount to
renouncing the productive forces of those territories altogether. Hence
derives the vital necessity for capitalism in its relations with
colonial countries to appropriate the most important means of
production. Since the primitive associations of the natives are the
strongest protection for their social organisations and for their
material bases of existence, capital must begin by planning for the
systematic destruction and annihilation of all the non-capitalist social
units which obstruct its development. With that we have passed beyond
the stage of primitive accumulation; this process is still going on.
Each new colonial expansion is accompanied, as a matter of course, by a
relentless battle of capital against the social and economic ties of the
natives, who are also forcibly robbed of their means of production and
labour power. Any hope to restrict the accumulation of capital
exclusively to peaceful competition, i.e. to regular commodity exchange
such as takes place between capitalist producer-countries, rests on the
pious belief that capital can accumulate without mediation of the
productive forces and without the demand of more primitive
organisations, and that it can rely upon the slow internal process of a
disintegrating natural economy. Accumulation, with its spasmodic
expansion, can no more wait for, and be content with, a natural internal
disintegration of non-capitalist formations and their transition to
commodity economy, than it can wait for, and be content with, the
natural increase of the working population. Force is the only solution
open to capital; the accumulation of capital, seen as an historical
process, employs force as a permanent weapon, not only at its genesis,
but further on down to the present day. From the point of view of the
primitive societies involved, it is a matter of life or death; for them
there can be no other attitude than opposition and fight to the finish
complete exhaustion and extinction. Hence permanent occupation of the
colonies by the military, native risings and punitive expeditions are
the order of the day for any colonial regime. The method of violence,
then, is the immediate consequence of the clash between capitalism and
the organisations of a natural economy which would restrict
accumulation. Their means of production and their labour power no less
than their demand for surplus products is necessary to capitalism. Yet
the latter is fully determined to undermine their independence as social
units, in order to gain possession of their means of production and
labour power and to convert them into commodity buyers. This method is
the most profitable and gets the quickest results, and so it is also the
most expedient for capital. In fact, it is invariably accompanied by a
growing militarism whose importance for accumulation will be
demonstrated below in another connection. British policy in India and
French policy in Algeria are the classical examples of the application
of these methods by capitalism.

The ancient economic organisations of the Indians the communist village
community had been preserved in their various forms throughout thousands
of years, in spite of all the political disturbances during their long
history. In the sixth century B.C. the Persians invaded the Indus basin
and subjected part of the country. Two centuries later the Greeks
entered and left behind them colonies, founded by Alexander on the
pattern of a completely alien civilisation. Then the savage Scythians
invaded the country, and for centuries India remained under Arab rule.
Later, the Afghans swooped down from the Iran mountains, until they,
too, were expelled by the ruthless onslaught of Tartar hordes. The
Mongols path was marked by terror and destruction, by the massacre of
entire villages the peaceful countryside with the tender shoots of rice
made crimson with blood. And still the Indian village community
survived. For none of the successive Mahometan conquerors had ultimately
violated the internal social life of the peasant masses and its
traditional structure. They only set up their own governors in the
provinces to supervise military organisation and to collect taxes from
the population. All conquerors pursued the aim of dominating and
exploiting the country, but none was interested in robbing the people of
their productive forces and in destroying their social organisation. In
the Moghul Empire, the peasant had to pay his annual tribute in kind to
the foreign ruler, but he could live undisturbed in his village and
could cultivate his rice on his _sholgura_ as his father had done before
him. Then came the British and the blight of capitalist civilisation
succeeded in disrupting the entire social organisation of the people; it
achieved in a short time what thousands of years, what the sword of the
Nogaians, had failed to accomplish. The ultimate purpose of British
capital was to possess itself of the very basis of existence of the
Indian community: the land.

This end was served above all by the fiction, always popular with
European colonisers, that all the land of a colony belongs to the
political ruler. In retrospect, the British endowed the Moghul and his
governors with private ownership of the whole of India, in order to
legalise their succession. Economic experts of the highest repute, such
as James Mill, duly supported this fiction with scientific arguments, so
in particular with the famous conclusion given below.⁽¹⁾

As early as 1793, the British in Bengal gave landed property to all the
_zemindars_ (Mahometan tax collectors) or hereditary market
superintendents they had found in their district so as to win native
support for the campaign against the peasant masses. Later they adopted
the same policy for their new conquests in the Agram province, in Oudh,
and in the Central Provinces. Turbulent peasant risings followed in
their wake, in the course of which tax collectors were frequently driven
out. In the resulting confusion and anarchy British capitalists
successfully appropriated a considerable portion of the land.

The burden of taxation, moreover, was so ruthlessly increased that it
swallowed up nearly all the fruits of the peoples labour. This went to
such an extreme in the Delhi and Allahabad districts that, according to
the official evidence of the British tax authorities in 1854, the
peasants found it convenient to lease or pledge their shares in land for
the bare amount of the tax levied. Under the auspices of this taxation,
usury came to the Indian village, to stay and eat up the social
organisation from within like a canker.⁽²⁾ In order to accelerate this
process, the British passed a law that flew in the face of every
tradition and justice known to the village community: compulsory
alienation of village land for tax arrears. In vain did the old family
associations try to protect themselves by options on their hereditary
land and that of their kindred. There was no stopping the rot. Every day
another plot of land fell under the hammer; individual members withdrew
from the family unit, and the peasants got into debt and lost their
land.

The British, with their wonted colonial stratagems, tried to make it
appear as if their power policy, which had in fact undermined the
traditional forms of landownership and brought about the collapse of the
Hindu peasant economy, had been dictated by the need to protect the
peasants against native oppression and exploitation and served to
safeguard their own interests.⁽³⁾ Britain artificially created a landed
aristocracy at the expense of the ancient property-rights of the peasant
communities, and then proceeded to protect the peasants against these
alleged oppressors, and to bring this illegally usurped land into the
possession of British capitalists.

Thus large estates developed in India in a short time, while over large
areas the peasants in their masses were turned into impoverished small
tenants with a short-term lease.

Lastly, one more striking fact shows the typically capitalist method of
colonisation. The British were the first conquerors of India who showed
gross indifference to public utilities. Arabs, Afghans and Mongols had
organised and maintained magnificent works of canalisation in India,
they had given the country a network of roads, spanned the rivers with
bridges and seen to the sinking of wells. Timur or Tamerlane, the
founder of the Mongol dynasty in India, had a care for the cultivation
of the soil, for irrigation, for the safety of the roads and the
provision of food for travellers.⁽⁴⁾ The primitive Indian Rajahs, the
Afghan or Mongol conquerors, at any rate, in spite of occasional cruelty
against individuals, made their mark with the marvellous constructions
we can find to-day at every step and which seem to be the work of a
giant race. The (East India) Company which ruled India until 1858 did
not make one spring accessible, did not sink a single well, nor build a
bridge for the benefit of the Indians.⁽⁵⁾

Another witness, the Englishman James Wilson, says:

In the Madras Province, no-one can help being impressed by the
magnificent ancient irrigation systems, traces of which have been
preserved until our time. Locks and weirs dam the rivers into great
lakes, from which canals distribute the water for an area of 60 or 70
miles around. On the large rivers, there are 30 to 40 of such weirs ...
The rain water from the mountains was collected in artificial ponds,
many of which still remain and boast circumferences of between 15 and 25
miles. Nearly all these gigantic constructions were completed before the
year 1750. During the war between the Company and the Mongol rulers and,
be it said, _during the entire period of our rule in India_ they have
sadly decayed.⁽⁶⁾

No wonder! British capital had no object in giving the Indian
communities economic support or helping them to survive. Quite the
reverse, it aimed to destroy them and to deprive them of their
productive forces. The unbridled greed, the acquisitive instinct of
accumulation must by its very nature take every advantage of the
conditions of the market and can have no thought for the morrow. It is
incapable of seeing far enough to recognise the value of the economic
monuments of an older civilisation. (Recently British engineers in Egypt
feverishly tried to discover traces of an ancient irrigation system
rather like the one a stupid lack of Vision had allowed to decay in
India when they were charged with damming the Nile on a grand scale in
furtherance of capitalist enterprise.) Not until 1867 was England able
to appreciate the results of her noble efforts in this respect. In the
terrible famine of that year a million people were killed in the Orissa
district alone; and Parliament was shocked into investigating the causes
of the emergency. The British government has now introduced
administrative measures in an attempt to save the peasant from usury.
The Punjab Alienation Act of 1900 made it illegal to sell or mortgage
peasant lands to persons other than of the peasant caste, though
exceptions can be made in individual cases, subject to the tax
collectors approval.⁽⁷⁾ Having deliberately disrupted the protecting
ties of the ancient Hindu social associations, after having nurtured a
system of usury where nothing is thought of a 15 per cent charge of
interest, the British now entrust the ruined Indian peasant to the
tender care of the Exchequer and its officials, under the protection,
that is to say, of those draining him of his livelihood.

Next to tormented British India, Algeria under French rule claims pride
of place in the annals of capitalist colonisation. When the French
conquered Algeria, ancient social and economic institutions prevailed
among the Arab-Kabyle population. These had been preserved until the
nineteenth century, and in spite of the long and turbulent history of
the country they survive in part even to the present day.

Private property may have existed no doubt in the towns, among the Moors
and Jews, among merchants, artisans and usurers. Large rural areas may
have been seized by the State under Turkish suzerainty yet nearly half
of the productive land is jointly held by Arab and Kabyle tribes who
still keep up the ancient patriarchal customs. Many Arab families led
the same kind of nomad life in the nineteenth century as they had done
since time immemorial, an existence that appears restless and irregular
only to the superficial observer, but one that is in fact strictly
regulated and extremely monotonous. In summer they were wont, man, woman
and child, to take their herds and tents and migrate to the sea-swept
shores of the Tell district; and in the winter they would move back
again to the protective warmth of the desert. They travelled along
definite routes, and the summer and winter stations were fixed for every
tribe and family. The fields of those Arabs who had settled on the land
were in most cases the joint property of the clans, and the great Kabyle
family associations also lived according to old traditional rules under
the patriarchal guidance of their elected heads.

The women would take turns for household duties; a matriarch, again
elected by the family, being in complete charge of the clans domestic
affairs, or else the women taking turns of duty. This organisation of
the Kabyle clans on the fringe of the African desert bears a startling
resemblance to that of the famous Southern Slavonic _Zadruga_ not only
the fields but all the tools, weapons and monies, all that the members
acquire or need for their work, are communal property of the clan.
Personal property is confined to one suit of clothing, and in the case
of a woman to the dresses and ornaments of her dowry. More valuable
attire and jewels, however, are considered common property, and
individuals were allowed to use them only if the whole family approved.
If the clan was not too numerous, meals were taken at a common table;
the women took it in turns to cook, but the eldest were entrusted with
the dishing out. If a family circle was too large, the head of the
family would each month ration out strictly proportionate quantities of
uncooked food to the individual families who then prepared them. These
communities were bound together by close ties of kinship, mutual
assistance and equality, and a patriarch would implore his sons on his
deathbed to remain faithful to the family.⁽⁸⁾

These social relations were already seriously impaired by the rule of
the Turks, established in Algeria in the sixteenth century. Yet the
Turkish exchequer had by no means confiscated all the land. That is a
legend invented by the French at a much later date. Indeed, only a
European mind is capable of such a flight of fancy which is contrary to
the entire economic foundation of Islam both in theory and practice. In
truth, the facts were quite different. The Turks did not touch the
communal fields of the village communities. They merely confiscated a
great part of uncultivated land from the clans and converted it into
crown land under Turkish local administrators (_Beyliks_). The state
worked these lands in part with native labour, and in part they were
leased out on rent or against payment in kind. Further the Turks took
advantage of every revolt of the subjected families and of every
disturbance in the country to add to their possessions by large-scale
confiscation of land, either for military establishments or for public
auction, when most of it went to Turkish or other usurers. To escape
from the burden of taxation and confiscation, many peasants placed
themselves under the protection of the Church, just as they had done in
medieval Germany. Hence considerable areas became Church property. All
these changes finally resulted in the following distribution of Algerian
land at the time of the French conquest: crown lands occupied nearly
3,750,000 acres, and a further 7,500,000 acres of uncultivated land as
common property of All the Faithful (_Bled-el-Islam_). 7,500,000 acres
had been privately owned by the Berbers since Roman times, and under
Turkish rule a further 3,750,000 acres had come into private ownership,
a mere 12,500,000 acres remaining communal property of individual Arab
clans. In the Sahara, some of the 7,500,000 acres fertile land near the
Sahara Oases was communally owned by the clans and some belonged to
private owners. The remaining 57,500,000,000 acres were mainly waste
land.

With their conquest of Algeria, the French made a great ado about their
work of civilisation, since the country, having shaken off the Turkish
yoke at the beginning of the eighteenth century, was harbouring the
pirates who infested the Mediterranean and trafficked in Christian
slaves. Spain and the North American Union in particular, themselves at
that time slave traders on no mean scale, declared relentless war on
this Moslem iniquity. France, in the very throes of the Great
Revolution, proclaimed a crusade against Algerian anarchy. Her
subjection of that country was carried through under the slogans of
combating slavery and instituting orderly and civilised conditions. Yet
practice was soon to show what was at the bottom of it all. It is common
knowledge that in the forty years following the subjection of Algeria,
no European state suffered so many changes in its political system as
France: the restoration of the monarchy was followed by the July
Revolution and the reign of the Citizen King, and this was succeeded by
the February Revolution, the Second Republic, the Second Empire, and
finally, after the disaster of 1870, by the Third Republic. In turn, the
aristocracy, high finance, petty bourgeoisie and the large middle
classes in general gained political ascendancy. Yet French policy in
Algeria remained undeflected by this succession of events; it pursued a
single aim from beginning to end; at the fringe of the African desert,
it demonstrated plainly that all the political revolutions in
nineteenth-century France centred in a single basic interest: the rule
of a capitalist bourgeoisie and its institutions of ownership.

The bill submitted for your consideration, said Deputy Humbert on June
30, 1873, in the Session of the National Assembly as spokesman for the
Commission for Regulating Agrarian Conditions in Algeria, is but the
crowning touch to an edifice well-founded on a whole series of
ordinances, edicts, laws and decrees of the Senate which together and
severally have as the same object: the establishment of private property
among the Arabs.

In spite of the ups and downs of internal French Politics, French
colonial policy persevered for fifty years in its systematic and
deliberate efforts to destroy and disrupt communal property. It served
two distinct purposes: The break-up of communal property was primarily
intended to smash the social power of the Arab family associations and
to quell their stubborn resistance against the French yoke, in the
course of which there were innumerable risings so that, in spite of
Frances military superiority, the country was in a continual state of
war.⁽⁹⁾ Secondly, communal property had to be disrupted in order to gain
the economic assets of the conquered country; the Arabs, that is to say,
had to be deprived of the land they had owned for a thousand years, so
that French capitalists could get it. Once again the fiction we know so
well, that under Moslem law all land belongs to the ruler, was brought
into play. Just as the English had done in British India, so Louis
Philippes governors in Algeria declared the existence of communal
property owned by the clan to be impossible. This fiction served as an
excuse to claim for the state most of the uncultivated areas, and
especially the commons, woods and meadows, and to use them for purposes
of colonisation. A complete system of settlement developed, the
so-called _cantonments_ which settled French colonists on the clan land
and herded the tribes into a small area. Under the decrees of 1830,
1831, 1840, 1844, 1845 and 1846 these thefts of Arab family land were
legalised. Yet this system of settlement did not actually further
colonisation; it only bred wild speculation and usury. In most instances
the Arabs managed to buy back the land that had been taken from them,
although they were thus incurring heavy debts. French methods of
oppressive taxation had the same tendency, in particular the law of June
16, 1851, proclaiming all forests to be state property, which robbed the
natives of 6,000,000 acres of pasture and brushwood, and took away the
prime essential for animal husbandry. This spate of laws, ordinances and
regulations wrought havoc with the ownership of land in the country.
Under the prevailing condition of feverish speculation in land, many
natives sold their estates to the French in the hope of ultimately
recovering them. Quite often they sold the same plot to two or three
buyers at a time, and what is more, it was quite often inalienable
family land and did not even belong to them. A company of speculators
from Rouen, e.g., believed that they had bought 50,000 acres, but in
fact they had only acquired a disputed title to 3,425 acres. There
followed an infinite number of lawsuits in which the French courts
supported on principle all partitions and claims of the buyers. In these
uncertain conditions, speculation, usury and anarchy were rife. But
although the introduction of French colonists in large numbers among the
Arab population had aimed at securing support for the French government,
this scheme failed miserably. Thus, under the Second Empire, French
policy tried another tack. The government, with its European lack of
vision, had stubbornly denied the existence of communal property for
thirty years, but it had learned better at last. By a single stroke of
the pen, joint family property was officially recognised and condemned
to be broken up. This is the double significance of the decree of the
Senate dated April 22, 1864. General Allard declared in the Senate:

The government does not lose sight of the fact that the general aim of
its policy is to weaken the influence of the tribal chieftains and to
dissolve the family associations. By this means, it will sweep away the
last remnants of feudalism [_sic!_] defended by the opponents of the
government bill ... The surest method of accelerating the process of
dissolving the family associations will be to institute private property
and to settle European colonists among the Arab families.⁽¹⁰⁾

The law of 1863 created special Commissions, for cutting up the landed
estates, consisting of the Chairman, either a Brigadier-General or
Colonel, one _sous-préfet_, one representative of the Arab military
authorities and an official bailiff. These natural experts on African
economics and social conditions were faced with the threefold task,
first of determining the precise boundaries of the great family estates,
secondly to distribute, the estates of each clan among its various
branches, and finally to break up this family land into separate private
allotments. This expedition of the Brigadiers into the interior of
Africa duly took place. The Commissions proceeded to their destinations.
They were to combine the office of judge in all land disputes with that
of surveyor and land distributor, the final decision resting with the
Governor-General of Algeria. Ten years valiant efforts by the
Commissions yielded the following result: between 1863 and 1873, of 700
hereditary estates, 400 were shared out among the branches of each clan,
and the foundations for future inequalities, between great landed
estates and small allotments were thus laid. One family, in fact, might
receive between 25 and 10 acres, while another might get as much as 250
or even 450 acres, depending on the size of the estate and the number of
collaterals, within the clan. Partition, however, stopped at that point.
Arab customs presented unsurmountable difficulties to a further division
of family land. In spite of Colonels and Brigadiers, French policy had
again failed in its object to create private property for transfer to
the French.

But the Third Republic, an undisguised regime of the bourgeoisie, had
the courage and the cynicism to go straight for its goal and to attack
the problem from the other end, disdaining the preliminaries of the
Second Empire. In 1873, the National Assembly worked out a law with the
avowed intention immediately to split up the entire estates of all the
700 Arab clans, and forcibly to institute private property in the
shortest possible time. Desperate conditions in the colony were the
pretext for this measure. It had taken the great Indian famine of 1866
to awaken the British public to the marvellous exploits of British
colonial policy and to call for a parliamentary investigation; and
similarly, Europe was alarmed at the end of the sixties by the crying
needs of Algeria where more than forty years of French rule culminated
in wide-spread famine and a disastrous mortality rate among the Arabs. A
commission of inquiry was set up to recommend new legislation with which
to bless the Arabs: it was unanimously resolved that there was only one
lifebuoy for them the institution of private property; that alone could
save the Arab from destitution, since he would then always be able to
sell or mortgage his land. It was decided therefore, that the only means
of alleviating the distress of the Arabs, deeply involved in debts as
they were because of the French land robberies and oppressive taxation,
was to deliver them completely into the hands of the usurers. This farce
was expounded in all seriousness before the National Assembly and was
accepted with equal gravity by that worthy body. The victors of the
Paris Commune flaunted their brazenness.

In the National Assembly, two arguments in particular served to support
the new law: those in favour of the bill emphasised over and over again
that the Arabs themselves urgently desired the introduction of private
property. And so they did, or rather the Algerian land speculators and
usurers did, since they were vitally interested in liberating their
victims from the protection of the family ties. As long as Moslem law
prevailed in Algeria, hereditary clan and family lands were inalienable,
which laid insuperable difficulties in the way of anyone who wished to
mortgage his land. The law of 1863 had merely made a breach in these
obstacles, and the issue now at stake was their complete abolition so as
to give a free hand to the usurers. The second argument was scientific,
part of the same intellectual equipment from which that worthy, James
Mill, had drawn for his abstruse conclusions regarding Indian relations
of ownership: English classical economics. Thoroughly versed in their
masters teachings, the disciples of Smith and Ricardo impressively
declaimed that private property is indispensable for the prevention of
famines in Algeria, for more intensive and better cultivation of the
land, since obviously no one would be prepared to invest capital or
intensive labour in a piece of land which does not belong to him and
whose produce is not his own to enjoy. But the facts spoke a different
language. They proved that the French speculators employed the private
property they had created in Algeria for anything but the more intensive
and improved cultivation of the soil. In 1873, 1,000,000 acres were
French property. But the capitalist companies, the Algerian and Setif
Company which owned 300,000 acres, did not cultivate the land at all but
leased it to the natives who tilled it in the traditional manner, nor
were 25 per cent of the other French owners engaged in agriculture. It
was simply impossible to conjure up capitalist investments and intensive
agriculture overnight, just as capitalist conditions in general could
not be created out of nothing. They existed only in the imagination of
profit-seeking French speculators, and in the benighted doctrinaire
visions of their scientific economists. The essential point, shorn of
all pretexts and flourishes which seem to justify the law of 1873, was
simply the desire to deprive the Arabs of their land, their livelihood.
And although these arguments had worn threadbare and were evidently
insincere, this law which was to put paid to the Algerian population and
their material prosperity, was passed unanimously on July 26, 1873.

But even this master-stroke soon proved a failure. The policy of the
Third Republic miscarried because of the difficulties in substituting at
one stroke bourgeois private property for the ancient clan communism,
just as the policy of the Second Empire had come to grief over the same
issue. In 1890, when the law of July 26, 1873, supplemented by a second
law on April 28, 1887, had been in force for seventeen years, 14,000,000
francs had been spent on dealing with 40,000,000 acres. It was estimated
that the process would not be completed before 1950 and would require a
further 60,000,000 francs. And still abolition of clan communism, the
ultimate purpose, had not been accomplished. What had really been
attained was all too evident: reckless speculation in land, thriving
usury and the economic ruin of the natives.

Since it had been impossible to institute private property by force, a
new experiment was undertaken. The laws of 1873 and 1887 had been
condemned by a commission appointed for their revision by the Algerian
government in 1890. It was another seven years before the legislators on
the Seine made the effort to consider reforms for the ruined country.
The new decree of the Senate refrained in principle from instituting
private property by compulsion or administrative measures. The laws of
February 2, 1897, and the edict of the Governor-General of Algeria
(March 3, 1898) both provided chiefly for the introduction of private
property following a voluntary application by the prospective purchaser
or owner.⁽¹¹⁾ But there were clauses to permit a single owner, without
the consent of the others, to claim private property; further, such a
voluntary application can be extorted at any convenient moment if the
owner is in debt and the usurer exerts pressure. And so the new law left
the doors wide open for French and native capitalists further to disrupt
and exploit the hereditary and clan lands.

Of recent years, this mutilation of Algeria which had been going on for
eight decades meets with even less opposition, since the Arabs,
surrounded as they are by French capital following the subjection of
Tunisia (1881) and the recent conquest of Morocco, have been rendered
more and more helpless. The latest result of the French regime in
Algeria is an Arab exodus into Turkey.⁽¹²⁾

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾ Mill, in his HISTORY OF BRITISH INDIA, substantiates the thesis that
under primitive conditions the land belongs always and everywhere to the
sovereign, on evidence collected at random and quite indiscriminately
from the most varied sources (Mungo Park, Herodotus, Volney, Acosta,
Gardilasso de in Vega, Abbé Grosier, Barrow, Diodorus, Strabo and
others). Applying this thesis to India, he goes on to say: From these
facts only one conclusion can be drawn, that the property of the soil
resided in the sovereign; or if it did not reside in him, it will be
impossible to show to whom it belonged (James Mill, HISTORY OF BRITISH
INDIA (4th edition, 1840), vol.i, p.311). Mills editor, H.H. Wilson who,
as Professor of Sanskrit at Oxford University, was thoroughly versed in
the legal relations of Ancient India, gives an interesting commentary to
this classical deduction. Already in his preface he characterises the
author as a partisan who has juggled with the whole history of British
India in order to justify the theories of Mr. Bentham and who, with this
end, has used the most dubious means for his portrait of the Hindus
which in no way resembles the original and almost outrages humanity. He
appends the following footnote to our quotation: The greater part of the
text and of the notes here is wholly irrelevant. The illustrations drawn
from the Mahometan practice, supposing them to be correct, have nothing
to do with the laws and rights of the Hindus. They are not, however,
even accurate and Mr. Mills guides have misled him. Wilson then contests
outright the theory of the sovereigns right of ownership in land,
especially with reference to India. (IBID., p.305, footnote.) Henry
Maine, too, is of the opinion that the British attempted to derive their
claim to Indian land from the Mahometans in the first place, and he
recognises this claim to be completely unjustified. The assumption which
the English first made was one which they inherited from their Mahometan
predecessors. It was that all the soil belonged in absolute property to
the sovereign, and that all private property in land existed by his
sufferance. The Mahometan theory and the corresponding Mahometan
practice had put out of sight the ancient view of the sovereigns rights
which, though it assigned to him a far larger share of the produce of
the land than any Western ruler has ever claimed, yet in nowise denied
the existence of private property in land (VILLAGE COMMUNITIES IN THE
EAST AND WEST, 5th edition, vol.ii, 1890, p.104). Maxim Kovalevski, on
the other hand, has proved thoroughly that this alleged Mahometan theory
and practice is an exclusively British legend. (Cf. his excellent study,
written in Russian, ON THE CAUSES, THE DEVELOPMENT AND THE CONSEQUENCES
OF THE DISINTEGRATION OF COMMUNAL OWNERSHIP OF LAND, Moscow 1879, part
i.) Incidentally, British experts and their French colleagues at the
time of writing maintain an analogous legend about China, for example,
asserting that all the land there had been the Emperors property. (Cf.
the refutation of this legend by Dr. O. Franke, DIE RECHTSVERHÄLTNISSE
AM GRUNDEIGENTUM IN CHINA, 1903.)

⁽²⁾ The partitions of inheritances and execution for debt levied on land
are destroying the communities this is the formula heard nowadays
everywhere in India (Henry Maine, OP. CIT., p.113).

⁽³⁾ This view of British colonial policy, expounded e.g. by Lord Roberts
of Kandahar (for many years a representative of British power in India)
is typical. He can give no other explanation for the Sepoy Mutiny than
mere misunderstandings of the paternal intentions of the British rulers.

... the alleged unfairness of what was known in India as the land
settlement, under which system the right and title of each landholder to
his property was examined, and the amount of revenue to be paid by him
to the paramount Power, as owner of the soil, was regulated ... as peace
and order were established, the system of land revenue, which had been
enforced in an extremely oppressive and corrupt manner under successive
Native Rulers and dynasties, had to be investigated and revised. With
this object in view, surveys were made, and inquiries instituted into
the rights of ownership and occupancy, the result being that in many
cases it was found that families of position and influence had either
appropriated the property of their humbler neighbours, or evaded an
assessment proportionate to the value of their estates. Although these
inquiries were carried out: with the best intentions, they were
extremely distasteful to the higher classes, while they failed to
conciliate the masses. The ruling families deeply resented our
endeavours to introduce an equitable determination of rights and
assessment of land revenue ... On the other hand, although the
agricultural population greatly benefited by our rule, they could not
realise the benevolent intentions of a Government which tried to elevate
their position and improve their prospects (FORTY ONE YEARS IN INDIA,
London 1905, p.233).

⁽⁴⁾ In his MAXIMS ON GOVERNMENT (translated from the Persian into
English in 1783), Timur says:

And I commanded that they should build places of worship, and
monasteries in every city; and that they should erect structures for the
reception of travellers on the high roads, and that they should make
bridges across the rivers.

And I commanded that the ruined bridges should be repaired; and that
bridges should be constructed over the rivulets, and over the rivers;
and that on the roads, at the distance of one stage from each other,
Kauruwansarai should be erected; and that guards and watchmen should be
stationed on the road, and that in every Kauruwansarai people should be
appointed to reside ...

And I ordained, whoever undertook the cultivation of waste lands, or
built an aqueduct, or made a canal, or planted a grove, or restored to
culture a deserted district, that in the first year nothing should be
taken from him, and that in the second year, whatever the subject
voluntarily offered should be received, and that in the third year,
duties should be collected according to the regulation (James Mill, OP.
CIT., vol.ii, pp.498).

⁽⁵⁾ Count Warren, _De lÉtat moral de la population indigène_. Quoted by
Kovalevski, OP. CIT., p.164.

⁽⁶⁾HISTORICAL AND DESCRIPTIVE ACCOUNT OF BRITISH INDIA FROM THE MOST
REMOTE PERIOD TO THE CONCLUSION OF THE AFGHAN WAR by Hugh Murray, James
Wilson, Greville, Professor Jameson, William Wallace and Captain
Dalrymple (Edinburgh, 4th edition, 1843), vol.ii, p.427. Quoted by
Kovalevski, OP. CIT.

⁽⁷⁾ Victor v. Leyden, _Agrarverfassung und Grundsteuer in Britisch
Ostindien_, JAHRB F. GES., VERW. U. VOLKSW., vol.xxxvi, no.4, p.1855.

⁽⁸⁾ When dying, the father of the family nearly always advises his
children to live in unity, according to the example of their elders.
This is his last exhortation, his dearest wish (A. Hanotaux et A.
Letournaux, LA KABYLIE ET LES COÛTUMES KABYLES, vol.ii, 1873, _Droit
Civil_, pp.468-73). The authors, by the way, appraised this impressive
description of communism in the clan with this peculiar sentence:

Within the industrious fold of the family association, all are united in
a common purpose, all work for the general interest but no one gives up
his freedom or renounces his hereditary rights. In no other nation does
the organisation approach so closely to equality, being yet so far
removed from communism.

⁽⁹⁾ We must lose no time in dissolving the family associations, since
they are the lever of all opposition against our rule (Deputy Didier in
the National Assembly of 1851).

⁽¹⁰⁾ Quoted by Kovalevski, OP. CIT., p.217. Since the Great Revolution,
of course, it had become the fashion in France to dub all opposition to
the government an open or covert defence of feudalism.

⁽¹¹⁾ G. Anton, _Neuere Agrarpolitik in Algerien und Tunesien_, JAHRB F.
GESETZGEBUNG, VERWALTUNG UND VOLKSWIRTSCHAFT (1900), pp.1341ff.

⁽¹²⁾ On June 20, 1912, M. Albin Rozet, on behalf of the Commission for
the Reform of the Indigenat (Administrative Justice) in Algeria, stated
in his speech to the French Chamber of Deputies that thousands of
Algerians were migrating from the Setif district, and that 1,200 natives
had emigrated from Tlemcen during the last year, their destination being
Syria. One immigrant wrote from his new home: I have now settled in
Damascus and am perfectly happy. There are many Algerians here in Syria
who, like me, have emigrated. The government has given us land and
facilities to cultivate it. The Algerian government combats this exodus
by denying passports to prospective emigrants. (Cf. JOURNAL OFFICIEL,
June 21, 1912, pp.1594ff.)

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 12.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Three The Historical Conditions of Accumulation

 



CHAPTER 28 THE INTRODUCTION OF COMMODITY ECONOMY


 

The second condition of importance for acquiring means of production and
realising the surplus value is the commodity exchange and commodity
economy should be introduced in societies based on natural economy as
soon as their independence has been abrogated, or rather in the course
of this disruptive process. Capital requires to buy the products of, and
sell its commodities to, all non-capitalist strata and societies. Here
at last we seem to find the beginnings of that peace and equality, the
_do ut des_, mutual interest, peaceful competition and the influences of
civilisation. For capital can indeed deprive alien social associations
of their means of production by force, it can compel the workers to
submit to capitalist exploitation, but it cannot force them to buy its
commodities or to realise its surplus value. In districts where natural
economy formerly prevailed, the introduction of means of transport
railways, navigation, canals is vital for the spreading of commodity
economy, a further hopeful sign. The triumphant march of commodity
economy thus begins in most cases with magnificent constructions of
modern transport, such as railway lines which cross primeval forests and
tunnel through the mountains, telegraph wires which bridge the deserts,
and ocean liners which call at the most outlying ports. But it is a mere
illusion that these are peaceful changes. Under the standard of
commerce, the relations between the East India Company and the
spice-producing countries were quite as piratical, extortionate and
blatantly fraudulent as present-day relations between American
capitalists and the Red Indians of Canada whose furs they buy, or
between German merchants and the Negroes of Africa. Modern China
presents a classical example of the gentle, peace-loving practices of
commodity exchange with backward countries. Throughout the nineteenth
century, beginning with the early forties, her history has been
punctuated by wars with the object of opening her up to trade by brute
force. Missionaries provoked persecutions of Christians, Europeans
instigated risings, and in periodical massacres a completely helpless
and peaceful agrarian population was forced to match arms with the most
modern capitalist military technique of all the Great Powers of Europe.
Heavy war contributions necessitated a public debt, China taking up
European loans, resulting in European control over her finances and
occupation of her fortifications; the opening of free ports was
enforced, railway concessions to European capitalists extorted. By all
these measures commodity exchange was fostered in China, from the early
thirties of the last century until the beginning of the Chinese
revolution.

European civilisation, that is to say commodity exchange with European
capital, made its first impact on China with the Opium Wars when she was
compelled to buy the drug from Indian plantations in order to make money
for British capitalists. In the seventeenth century, the East India
Company had introduced the cultivation of poppies in Bengal; the use of
the drug was disseminated in China by its Canton branch. At the
beginning of the nineteenth century, opium fell so considerably in price
that it rapidly became the luxury of the people. In 1821, 4,628 chests
of opium were imported to China at an average price of £265; then the
price fell by 50 per cent; and Chinese imports rose to 9,621 chests in
1825, and to 26,670 chests in 1830.⁽¹⁾ The deadly effects of the drug,
especially of the cheaper kinds used by the poorer population, became a
public calamity and made it necessary for China to lay an embargo on
imports, as an emergency measure. Already in 1828, the viceroy of Canton
had prohibited imports of opium, only to deflect the trade to other
ports. One of the Peking censors commanded to investigate the question
gave the following report:

I have learnt that people who smoke opium have developed such a craving
for this noxious drug that they make every effort to obtain this
gratification. If they do not get their opium at the usual hour, their
limbs begin to tremble, they break out in sweat, and they cannot perform
the slightest tasks. But as soon as they are given the pipe, they inhale
a few puffs and are cured immediately.

Opium has therefore become a necessity for all who smoke it and it is
not surprising that under cross-examination by the local authorities
they will submit to every punishment rather than reveal the names of
their suppliers. Local authorities are also in some cases given presents
to tolerate the evil or to delay any investigation already under way.
Most merchants who bring goods for sale into Canton also deal in
smuggled opium.

I am of the opinion that opium is by far a greater evil than gambling,
and that opium smokers should therefore be punished no less than
gamblers.

The censor suggested that every convicted opium smoker should be
sentenced to eighty strokes of the bamboo, and anybody refusing to give
the name of his supplier to a hundred strokes and three years of exile.
The pig tailed Cato of Peking concludes his report with a frankness
staggering to any European official:

Apparently opium is mostly introduced from abroad by dishonest officials
in connivance with profit-seeking merchants who transport it into the
interior of the country. Then the first to indulge are people of good
family, wealthy private persons and merchants, but ultimately the drug
habit spreads among the common people. I have learnt that in all
provinces opium is smoked not only in the civil service but also in the
army. The officials of the various districts indeed enjoin the legal
prohibition of sale by special edicts. But at the same time, their
parents, families, dependants and servants simply go on smoking opium,
and the merchants profit from the ban by increased prices. Even the
police have been won over; they buy the stuff instead of helping to
suppress it, and this is an additional reason for the disregard in which
all prohibitions and ordinances are held.⁽²⁾

Consequently, a stricter law was passed in 1833 which made every opium
smoker liable to a hundred strokes and two months in the stocks, and
provincial governors were ordered to report annually on their progress
in the battle against opium. But there were two sequels to this
campaign: on the one hand large-scale poppy plantations sprang up in the
interior, particularly in the Honan, Setchuan, and Kueitchan provinces,
and on the other, England declared war on China to get her to lift the
embargo. These were the splendid beginnings of opening China to European
civilisation by the opium pipe.

Canton was the first objective. The fortifications of the town at the
main arm of the Perl estuary could not have been more primitive. Every
day at sunset a barrier of iron chains was attached to wooden rafts
anchored at various distances, and this was the main defence. Moreover,
the Chinese guns could only fire at a certain angle and were therefore
completely ineffectual. With such primitive defences, just adequate to
prevent a few merchant ships from landing, did the Chinese meet the
British attack. A couple of British cruisers, then, sufficed to effect
an entry on September 7, 1839. The sixteen battle-junks and thirteen
fire-ships which the Chinese put up for resistance were shot up or
dispersed in a matter of forty-five minutes. After this initial victory,
the British renewed the attack in the beginning of 1841 with a
considerably reinforced fleet. This time the fleet, consisting in a
number of battle-junks, and the forts were attacked simultaneously. The
first incendiary rocket that was fired penetrated through the armour
casing of a junk into the powder chamber and blew the ship with the
entire crew sky high. In a short time eleven junks, including the
flag-ship, were destroyed, and the remainder precipitately made for
safety. The action on land took a little longer. Since the Chinese guns
were quite useless, the British walked right through the fortifications,
climbed to a strategic position which was not even guarded and proceeded
to slaughter the helpless Chinese from above. The casualty list of the
battle was: for the Chinese 600 dead, and for the British, 1 dead and 30
wounded, more than half of the latter having been injured by the
accidental explosion of a powder magazine. A few weeks later, there
followed another British exploit. The forts of Anung-Hoy and North
Wantong were to be taken. No less than twelve fully equipped cruisers
were available for this task. What is more, the Chinese, once again
forgetful of the most important thing, had omitted to fortify the island
of South Wantong. Thus the British calmly landed a battery of howitzers
to bombard the fort from one side, the cruisers shelling it from the
other. After that, the Chinese were driven from the forts in a matter of
minutes, and the landing met with no resistance. The ensuing display of
inhumanity an English report says will be for ever deeply deplored by
the British staff. The Chinese, trying to escape from the barricades,
had fallen into a moat which was soon literally filled to the brim with
helpless soldiers begging for mercy. Into this mass of prostrate human
bodies, the sepoys acting against orders, it is claimed fired again and
again. This is the way in which Canton was made receptive to commodity
exchange.

Nor did the other ports fare better. On July 4, 1841, three British
cruisers with 120 cannon appeared off the island in the entrance to the
town of Ningpo. More cruisers arrived the following day. In the evening
the British admiral sent a message to the Chinese governor, demanding
the capitulation of the island. The governor explained that he had no
power to resist but could not surrender without orders from Peking. He
therefore asked for a delay. This was refused, and at half-past two in
the morning the British stormed the defenceless island. Within eight
minutes, the fort and the houses on the shore were reduced to
smouldering rubble. Having landed on the deserted coast littered with
broken spears, sabres, shields, rifles and a few dead bodies, the troops
advanced on the walls of the island town of Tinghai. With daybreak,
reinforced by the crews of other ships which had meanwhile arrived, they
proceeded to put scaling ladders to the scarcely defended ramparts. A
few more minutes gave them mastery of the town. This splendid victory
was announced with becoming modesty in an Order of the Day: Fate has
decreed that the morning of July 5, 1841, should be the historic date on
which Her Majestys flag was first raised over the most beautiful island
of the Celestial Empire, the first European flag to fly triumphantly
above this lovely countryside.⁽³⁾

On August 25, 1841, the British approached the town of Amoy, whose forts
were armed with a hundred of the heaviest Chinese guns. These guns being
almost useless, and the commanders lacking in resource, the capture of
the harbour was childs play. Under cover of a heavy barrage, British
ships drew near the walls of Kulangau, landed their marines, and after a
short stand the Chinese troops were driven out. The twenty-six
battle-junks with 128 guns in the harbour were also captured, their
crews having fled. One battery, manned by Tartars, heroically held out
against the combined fire of three British ships, but a British landing
was effected in their rear and the post wiped out.

This was the finale of the notorious Opium War. By the peace treaty of
August 27, 1842, the island of Hongkong was ceded to Britain. In
addition, the towns of Canton, Amoy, Futchou, Ningpo and Shanghai were
to open their ports to foreign commerce. But within fifteen years, there
was a further war against China. This time, Britain had joined forces
with the French. In 1857, the allied navies captured Canton with a
heroism equal to that of the first war. By the peace of Tientsin (1858),
the opium traffic, European commerce and Christian missions were
admitted into the interior. Already in 1859, however, the British
resumed hostilities and attempted to destroy the Chinese fortifications
on the Peiho river, but were driven off after a fierce battle in which
464 people were wounded or killed.⁽⁴⁾

After that, Britain and France again joined forces. At the end of August
1860, 12,600 English and 7,500 French troops under General
Cousin-Montauban first captured the Taku forts without a single shot
having been fired. Then they proceeded towards Tientsin and on towards
Peking. A bloody battle was joined at Palikao, and Peking fell to the
European Powers. Entering the almost depopulated and completely
undefended city, the victors began by pillaging the Imperial Palade,
manfully helped by General Cousin himself, who was later to become field
marshal and Count of Palikao. Then the Palace went up in flames, fired
on Lord Elgins order as an imposed penance.⁽⁵⁾

The European Powers now obtained concessions to set up embassies in
Peking, and to start trading with Tientsin and other towns. The Tchi-fu
Convention of 1876 guaranteed full facilities for importing opium into
China at a time when the Anti-Opium League in England agitated against
the spreading of the drug habit in London, Manchester and other
industrial districts, when a parliamentary commission declared the
consumption of opium to be harmful in the extreme. By all treaties made
at that time between China and the Great Powers any European, whether
merchant or missionary, was guaranteed the right to acquire land, to
which end the legitimate arguments were ably supported by deliberate
frauds

First and foremost the ambiguity of the treaty texts made a convenient
excuse for European capital to encroach beyond the Treaty Ports. It used
every loophole in the wording of the treaties to begin with, and
subsequently blackmailed the Chinese government into permitting the
missions to acquire land not alone in the Treaty Ports but in all the
provinces of the realm. Their claim was based upon the notorious
bare-faced distortion of the Chinese original in Abbé Delamarres
official translation of the supplementary convention with France French
diplomacy, and the Protestant missions in particular, unanimously
condemned the crafty swindle of the Catholic padre, but nevertheless
they were firm that the rights of French missions obtained by this fraud
should be explicitly extended to the Protestant missions as well.⁽⁶⁾

Chinas entry into commodity exchange, having begun with the Opium Wars,
was finally accomplished with a series of leases and the China campaign
of 1900, when the commercial interests of European capital sank to a
brazen international dogfight over Chinese land. The description of the
Dowager Empress, who wrote to Queen Victoria after the capture of the
Taku forts, subtly underlines this contrast between the initial theory
and the ultimate practice of the agents of European civilisation:

To your Majesty, greeting! In all the dealings of England with the
Empire of China, since first relations were established between us,
there has never been any idea of territorial aggrandisement on the part
of Great Britain, but only a keen desire to promote the interests of her
trade. Reflecting upon the fact that our country is now plunged into a
dreadful condition of warfare, we bear in mind that a large proportion
of Chinas trade, seventy or eighty per cent, is done with England;
moreover, your Customs duties are the lightest in the world, and few
restrictions are made at your sea-ports in the matter of foreign
importations; for these reasons our amiable relations with British
merchants at our Treaty Ports have continued unbroken for the last half
century, to our mutual benefit. But a sudden change has now occurred and
general suspicion has been created against us. We would therefore ask
you now to consider that if, by any conceivable combination of
circumstances, the independence of our Empire should be lost, and the
Powers unite to carry out their long-plotted schemes to possess
themselves of our territory (in a simultaneous message to the Emperor of
Japan, the impulsive Tzu Hsi openly refers to The earth-hungry Powers of
the West, whose tigerish eyes of greed are fixed in our direction⁽⁷⁾)
the results to your countrys interests would be disastrous and fatal to
your trade. At this moment our Empire is striving to the utmost to raise
an army and funds sufficient for its protection; in the meanwhile we
rely on your good services to act as mediator, and now anxiously await
your decision.⁽⁸⁾

Both during the wars and in the interim periods, European civilisation
was busy looting and thieving on a grand scale in the Chinese Imperial
Palaces, in the public buildings and in the monuments of ancient
civilisation, not only in 1860, when the French pillaged the Emperors
Palace with its legendary treasures, or in 1900, when all the nations
vied with each other to steal public and private property. Every
European advance was marked not only with the progress of commodity
exchange, but by the smouldering ruins of the largest and most venerable
towns, by the decay of agriculture over large rural areas, and by
intolerably oppressive taxation for war contributions. There are more
than 40 Chinese Treaty Ports and every one of them has been paid for
with streams of blood, with massacre and ruin.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾ 77,379 chests were imported in 1854. Later, the imports somewhat
declined, owing to increased home production. Nevertheless, China
remained the chief buyer. India produced just under 6,400,000 tons of
opium in 1873/4, of which 6,100,000 tons were sold to the Chinese.
To-day [1912] India still exports 4,800,000 tons, value £7,500,000,000,
almost exclusively to China and the Malay Archipelago.

⁽²⁾ Quoted by J. Scheibert, DER KRIEG IN CHINA (1903), vol.ii, 179

⁽³⁾IBID., p.207.

⁽⁴⁾ An Imperial Edict issued on the third day of the eighth moon in the
tenth year of Hsien-Feng (6/9/1860) said amongst other things:

We have never forbidden England and France to trade with China, and for
long years there has been peace between them and us. But three years ago
the English, for no good cause, invaded our city of Canton, and carried
off our officials into captivity. We refrained at that time from taking
any retaliatory measures, because we were compelled to recognise that
the obstinacy of the Viceroy Yeh had been in some measure a cause of the
hostilities. Two years ago, the barbarian Commander Elgin came north and
we then commanded the Viceroy of Chihli, Tan Ting-hsiang, to look into
matters preparatory to negotiations. But the barbarian took advantage of
our unreadiness, attacking the Taku forts and pressing on to Tientsin.
Being anxious to spare our people the horrors of war, we again refrained
from retaliation and ordered Kuei Liang to discuss terms of peace.
Notwithstanding the outrageous nature of the barbarians demands we
subsequently ordered Kuei Liang to proceed to Shanghai in connection
with the proposed Treaty of Commerce and even permitted its ratification
as earnest of our good faith.

In spite of all this, the barbarian leader Bruce again displayed
intractability of the most unreasonable kind, and once more appeared off
Taku with a squadron of warships in the eighth Moon. Seng Ko Lin Chin
thereupon attacked him fiercely and compelled him to make a rapid
retreat From all these facts it is clear that China has committed no
breach of faith and that the barbarians have been in the wrong. During
the present year the barbarian leaders Elgin and Grog have again
appeared off out coasts, but China, unwilling to resort to extreme
measures, agreed to their landing and permitted them to come to Peking
for the ratification of the Treaty.

Who could have believed that all this time the barbarians have been
darkly plotting; and that they had brought with them an army of soldiers
and artillery with which they attacked the Taku forts from the rear,
and, having driven out our forces, advanced upon Tientsin! (I.O. Bland
and E.T. Blackhouse, CHINA UNDER THE EMPRESS DOWAGER, London 1910,
pp.24-5. Cf. also in this work the entire chapter, _The Flight to
Yehol_.)

⁽⁵⁾ These European exploits to make China receptive to commodity
exchange, provide the setting for a charming episode of Chinas internal
history: Straight from looting the Manchu Emperors Summer Palace, the
Gordon of China went on a campaign against the rebels of Taiping. In
fact, the suppression of the revolt was the work of the British army.
But while a considerable number of Europeans, among them a French
admiral, gave their lives to preserve China for the Manchu dynasty, the
representatives of European commerce were eagerly grasping this
opportunity to make capital out of these fights, supplying arms both to
their own champions and to the rebels who went to war against them.
Moreover, the worthy merchant was tempted, by the opportunity for making
some money, to supply both armies with arms and munitions, and since the
rebels had greater difficulties in obtaining supplies than the Emperors
men and were therefore compelled and prepared to pay higher prices, they
were given priority and could thus resist not only the troops of their
own government but also those of England and France (M. v. Brandt, 3
JAHRE IN OSTASIEN, 1911, vol.iii, _China_, p.11).

⁽⁶⁾ Dr. O. Frank; DIE RECHTSVERHÄLTNISSE AM GRUNDEIGENTUM IN CHINA
(Leipzig 1903), p. 82.

⁽⁷⁾ Bland and Blackhouse, OP. CIT., p. 338

⁽⁸⁾IBID., p.337.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 12.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Three The Historical Conditions of Accumulation

 



CHAPTER 29 THE STRUGGLE AGAINST PEASANT ECONOMY


 

An important final phase in the campaign against natural economy is to
separate industry from agriculture, to eradicate rural industries
altogether from peasant economy. Handicraft in its historical beginnings
was a subsidiary occupation, a mere appendage to agriculture in
civilised and settled societies. In medieval Europe it became gradually
independent of the _corvée_ farm and agriculture, it developed into
specialised occupations, i.e. production of commodities by urban guilds.
In industrial districts, production had progressed from home craft by
way of primitive manufacture to the capitalist factory of the staple
industries, but in the rural areas, under peasant economy, home crafts
persisted as an intrinsic part of agriculture. Every hour that could be
spared from cultivating the soil was devoted to handicrafts which, as an
auxiliary domestic industry, played an important part in providing for
personal needs.⁽¹⁾

It is a recurrent phenomenon in the development of capitalist production
that one branch of industry after the other is singled out, isolated
from agriculture and concentrated in factories for mass production. The
textile industry provides the textbook example, but the same thing has
happened, though less obviously, in the case of other rural industries.
Capital must get the peasants to buy its commodities and will therefore
begin by restricting peasant economy to a single sphere that of
agriculture which will not immediately and, under European conditions of
ownership, only with great, difficulty submit to capitalist
domination.⁽²⁾ To all outward appearance, this process is quite
peaceful. It is scarcely noticeable and seemingly caused by purely
economic factors. There can be no doubt that mass production in the
factories is technically superior to primitive peasant industry, owing
to a higher degree of specialisation, scientific analysis and management
of the productive process, improved machinery, and access to
international resources of raw materials. In reality, however, the
process of separating agriculture and industry is determined by factors
such as oppressive taxation, war, or squandering and monopolisation of
the nations land, and thus belongs to the spheres of political power and
criminal law no, less than with economics.

Nowhere has this process been brought to such perfection as n the United
States. In the wake of the railways, financed by European and in
particular British capital, the American farmer crossed the Union from
East to West and in his progress over vast areas killed off the Red
Indians with fire-arms and bloodhounds, liquor and venereal disease,
pushing the survivors to the West, in order to appropriate the land they
had vacated, to clear it and bring it under the plough. The American
farmer, the backwoodsman of the good old times before the War of
Secession, was very different indeed from his modern counterpart. There
was hardly anything he could not do, and he led a practically
self-sufficient life on his isolated farm.

In the beginning of the nineties, one of the leaders of the Farmers
Alliance, Senator Peffer, wrote as follows:

The American farmer of to-day is altogether a different sort of man from
his ancestor of fifty or a hundred years ago. A great many men and women
now living remember when farmers were largely manufacturers; that is to
say, they made a great many implements for their own use. Every farmer
had an assortment of tools with which he made wooden implements, as,
forks and rakes, handles for his hoes and ploughs, spokes for his wagon,
and various other implements made wholly out of wood. Then the farmer
produced flax and hemp and wool and cotton. These fibres were prepared
upon the farm; they were spun into yarn, woven into cloth, made into
garments, and worn at home. Every farm had upon it a little shop for
wood and iron work, and in the dwelling were cards and looms; carpets
were woven, bed-clothing of different sorts was prepared; upon every
farm geese were kept, their feathers used for supplying the home demand
with beds and pillows, the surplus being disposed of at the nearest
market town. During the winter season wheat and flour and corn meal were
carried in large wagons drawn by teams of six to eight horses a hundred
or two hundred miles to market, and traded for farm supplies for the
next year groceries and dry goods. Besides this, mechanics were
scattered among the farmers. The farm wagon was in process of building a
year or two; the material was found near the shop; the character of the
timber to be used was stated in the contract; it had to be procured in a
certain season and kept in the drying process a length of time
specified, so that when the material was brought together in proper form
and the wagon made, both parties to the contract knew where every stick
of it came from, and how long it had been in seasoning. During winter
time the neighbourhood carpenter prepared sashes and blinds and doors
and moulding and cornices for the next seasons building. When the frosts
of autumn came the shoemaker repaired to the dwellings of the farmers
and there, in a corner set apart to him, he made up shoes for the family
during the winter. All these things were done among the farmers, and a
large part of the expense was paid with products of the farm. When
winter approached, the butchering season was at hand; meat for family
use during the next year was prepared and preserved in the smoke house.
The orchards supplied fruit for cider, for apple butter, and for
preserves of different kinds, amply sufficient to supply the wants of
the family during the year, with some to spare. Wheat was threshed, a
little at a time, just enough to supply the needs of the family for
ready money, and not enough to make it necessary to waste one stalk of
straw. Everything was saved and put to use. One of the results of that
sort of economy was that comparatively a very small amount of money was
required to conduct the business of farming. A hundred dollars average
probably was as much as the largest farmers of that day needed in the
way of cash to meet the demands of their farm work, paying for hired
help, repairs of tools, and all other incidental expenses.⁽³⁾

This Arcadian life was to come to a sudden end after the War of
Secession. The war had burdened the Union with an enormous National
Debt, amounting to £1,200,000, and in consequence the taxes were
considerably increased. On the other hand, a feverish development of
modern traffic and industry, machine-building in particular, was
encouraged by the imposition of higher protective tariffs. The railway
companies were endowed with public lands on an imposing scale, in order
to promote railroad construction and farm-settlements: in 1867 alone,
they were given more than 192,500,000 acres, and so the permanent way
grew at an unprecedented rate: In 1860 it amounted to less than 31,000
miles, in 1870 it had grown to more than 53,000 miles and in 1880 to
more than 93,000 miles. (During the same period 18701880 the permanent
way in Europe had grown from 80,000 miles to 100,000 miles.) The
railways and speculations in land made for mass emigration from Europe
to the United States, and more than 4½ million people immigrated in the
twenty-three years from 1869 to 1892. In this way, the Union gradually
became emancipated from European, and in particular from British
industry; factories we set up in the States and home industries
developed for the production of textiles, iron, steel and machinery. The
process of revolutionary transformation was most rapid in agriculture.
The emancipation of the slaves had compelled the Southern planters to
introduce the steam plough shortly after the Civil War, and new farms
had sprung up in the West in the wake of the railways, which from the
very beginning employed the most modern machinery and technique.

The improvements are rapidly revolutionising the agriculture of the
West, and reducing to the lowest minimum ever attained, the proportion
of manual labour employed in its operations ... Coincident with this
application of mechanics to agriculture, systematic and enlarged
business aptitudes have also sought alliance with this noble art. Farms
of thousands of acres have been managed with greater skill, a more
economical adaptation of means to ends, and with a larger margin of real
profit than many others of 80 acres.⁽⁴⁾

During this time, direct and indirect taxation had increased enormously.
On June 30, 1864, during the Civil War, a new finance bill was passed
which is the basis of the present system of taxation, and which raised
taxes on consumption and income to a staggering degree. This heavy war
levy served as a pretext for a real orgy of protective tariffs in order
to offset the tax on home production by customs duties.⁽⁵⁾ Messrs.
Morrill, Stevens and the other gentlemen who advanced the war as a lever
for enforcing their protectionist programme, initiated the practice of
wielding the implement of a customs policy quite openly and cynically to
further private profiteering interests of all descriptions. Any home
producer who appeared before the legislative assembly with a request for
any kind of special tariff to fill his own pocket saw his demands
readily granted, and the tariff rates were made as high as any
interested party might wish.

The war, writes the American Taussig, had in many ways a bracing and
ennobling influence on our national life; but its immediate effect on
business affairs, and on all legislation affecting moneyed interests,
was demoralising. The line between public duty and private interests was
often lost sight of by legislators. Great fortunes were made by changes
in legislation urged and brought about by those who were benefited by
them, and the country has seen with sorrow that the honour and honesty
of public men did not remain undefiled.⁽⁶⁾

This customs bill which completely revolutionised the countrys economic
life, and remained in force unchanged for twenty years, was literally
pushed through Congress in three days, and through the Senate in two,
without criticism, without debate, without any opposition whatever.⁽⁷⁾
Down to the present day it forms the basis of US customs legislation.

This shift in US fiscal policy ushered in an era of the most brazen
parliamentary log-rolling and of undisguised and unrestrained corruption
of elections, of the legislature and the press to satisfy the greed of
Big Business. _Enrichissez-vous_ became the catchword of public life
after the noble war to liberate mankind from the blot of slavery. On the
stock exchange, the Yankee negro-liberator sought his fortunes in orgies
of speculation; in Congress, he endowed himself with public lands,
enriched himself by customs and taxes, by monopolies, fraudulent share
and theft of public funds. Industry prospered. Gone were the times when
the small or medium farmer required hardly any money, when he could
thresh and turn into cash his wheat reserves as the need arose. Now he
was chronically in need of money, a lot of money, to pay his taxes. Soon
he was forced to sell all his produce and to buy his requirements from
the manufacturers in the form of ready-made goods. As Peffer puts it:

Coming from that time to the present, we find that everything nearly has
been changed. All over the West particularly the farmer threshes his
wheat all at one time, he disposes of it all at one time, and in a great
many instances the straw is wasted. He sells his hogs, and buys bacon
and pork; he sells his cattle, and buys fresh beef and canned beef or,
domed beef; as the case may be; he sells his fruit, and buys it back in
cans. If he raises flax at all, instead of putting it into yarn and
making gowns for his children, as he did fifty years or more ago, he
threshes his flax, sells the seed, and burns the straw. Not more than
one farmer in fifty now keeps sheep at all; he relies upon the large
sheep farmer for the wool, which is put into cloth or clothing ready for
his use. Instead of hating clothing made up on the farm in his own house
or by a neighbour woman or country tailor a mile away, he either
purchases his clothing ready made at the nearest town, or he buys the
cloth and has a city tailor make it up for him. Instead of making
implements which he uses about the farm forks, rakes, etc. he goes to
town to purchase even a handle for his axe or his mallet; he purchases
twine and rope and all sorts of needed material made of fibres; he buys
his cloth and his clothing; he buys his canned fruit and preserved
fruit; he buys hams and shoulders and mess pork and mess beef; indeed,
he buys nearly everything now that he produced at one time himself, and
these things all cost money. Besides all this, and what seems stranger
than anything else, whereas in the earlier time the American home was a
free home, unencumbered, not one case in a thousand where a home was
mortgaged to secure the payment of borrowed money, and whereas but a
small amount of money was then needed for actual use in conducting the
business of farming, there was always enough of it among the farmers to
supply the demand. Now, when at least ten times as much is needed, there
is little or none to be obtained, nearly half the farms are mortgaged
for as much as they are worth, and interest rates are exorbitant. As to
the cause of such wonderful changes ... the manufacturer came with his
woollen mill, his carding mill, his broom factory, his rope factory, his
wooden-ware factory, his cotton factory, his pork-packing establishment,
his canning factory and fruit preserving houses; the little shop on the
farm has given place to the large shop in town; the wagon-makers shop in
the neighbourhood has given way to the large establishment in the city
where ... a hundred or two hundred wagons are made in a week; the
shoemakers shop has given way to large establishments in the cities
where most of the work is done by machines.⁽⁸⁾

Finally, the agricultural labour of the farmer himself has become
machine work:

He ploughs and sows and reaps with machines. A machine cuts his wheat
and puts it in a sheaf; and steam drives his threshers. He may read the
morning paper while he ploughs and sit under an awning while he
reaps.⁽⁹⁾

Sering estimated in the middle eighties that the necessary cash for a
very modest beginning of the smallest farm in the North West is £240 to
£280.⁽¹⁰⁾

This revolution of American agriculture after the Great War was not the
end. It was only the beginning of the whirlpool in which the farmer was
caught. His history brings us automatically to the second phase of the
development of capitalist accumulation of which it is an excellent
illustration. Natural economy, the production for personal needs and the
close connection between industry and agriculture must be ousted and a
simple commodity economy substituted for them. Capitalism needs the
medium of commodity production for its development, as a market for its
surplus value. But as soon as simple commodity production has superseded
natural economy, capital must turn against it. No sooner has capital
called it to life, than the two must compete for means of production,
labour power, and markets. The first aim of capitalism is to isolate the
producer, to sever the community ties which protect him, and the next
task is to take the means of production away from the small
manufacturer.

In the American Union, as we have seen, the Great War inaugurated an era
of large-scale seizure of public lands by monopolist capitalist
companies and individual speculators. Feverish railroad building and
ever more speculation in railway shares led to a mad gamble in land,
where individual soldiers of fortune and companies netted immense
fortunes and even entire counties. In addition a veritable swarm of
agents lured the vast flow of emigrants from Europe to the USA by
blatant and unscrupulous advertising, deceptions and pretences of every
description. These immigrants first settled in the Eastern States along
the Atlantic seaboard, and, with the growth of industry in these states,
agriculture was driven westward. The wheat centre which had been near
Columbus, Ohio, in 1850, in the course of the subsequent fifty years
shifted to a position 99 miles further North and 680 miles further West.
Whereas in 1850 51.4 per cent of the total wheat crop had been supplied
by the Eastern States, in 1880 they produced only 13.6 per cent, 71.7
per cent being supplied by the Northern Central and 9 per cent by the
Western States.

In 1825, the Congress of the Union under Monroe had decided to
transplant the Red Indians from the East to the West of the Mississippi.
The redskins put up a desperate resistance; but all who survived the
slaughter of forty Red Indian campaigns were swept away like so much
rubbish and driven like cattle to the West to be folded in reservations
like so many sheep. The Red Indian had been forced to make room for the
farmer and now the farmer in his turn was driven beyond the Mississippi
to make way for capital.

Following the railway tracks, the American farmer moved West and
North-West into the land of promise which the great land speculators
agents had painted for him in glowing colours. Yet the most fertile and
most favourably situated lands were retained by the companies who farmed
them extensively on completely capitalistic lines. All around the farmer
who had been exiled into the wilderness, a dangerous competitor and
deadly enemy sprang up the bonanza farms, the great capitalist
agricultural concerns which neither the Old World nor the New had known
before. Here surplus value was produced with the application of all the
resources known to modern science and technology.

As the foremost representative of financial agriculture we may consider
Oliver Dalrymple, whose name is to-day known on both sides of the
Atlantic. Since 1874 he has simultaneously managed a line of steamers on
the Red River and six farms owned by a company of financiers and
comprising some 75,000 acres. Each one is divided into departments of
2,000 acres, and every department is again subdivided into three
sections of 667 acres which are run by foremen and gang leaders.
Barracks to shelter 50 men and stable as many horses and mules, are
built on each section, and similarly kitchens, machine sheds and
workshops for blacksmiths and locksmiths. Each section is completely
equipped with 20 pairs of horses, 8 double ploughs, 12 horse-drawn
drill-ploughs, 12 steel-toothed harrows, 12 cutters and binders, 2
threshers and 16 wagons. Everything is done to ensure that the machines
and the living labour (men, horses and mules) are in good condition and
able to do the greatest possible amount of work. There is a telephone
line connecting all sections and the central management.

The six farms of 75,000 acres are cultivated by an army of 600 workers,
organised on military lines. During the harvest, the management hires
another 500 to 600 auxiliary workers, assigning them to the various
sections. After the work is completed in the fall, the workers are
dismissed with the exception of the foreman and 10 men per section. In
some farms in Dakota and Minnesota, horses and mules do not spend the
winter at the place of work. As soon as the stubble has been ploughed
in, they are driven in teams of a hundred or two hundred pairs 900 miles
to the South, to return only the following spring.

Mechanics on horseback follow the ploughing, sowing and harvesting
machines when they are at work. If anything goes wrong, they gallop to
the machine in question, repair it and get it moving again without
delay. The harvested corn is carried to the threshing machines which
work day and night without interruption. They are stoked with bundles of
straw fed into the stoke hold through pipes of sheet-iron. The corn is
threshed, winnowed, weighed and filled into sacks by machinery, then it
is put into railway trucks which run alongside the farm, and goes to
Duluth or Buffalo. Every year, Dalrymple increases his land under seed
by 5,800 acres. In 1880 it amounted to 25,000 acres.⁽¹¹⁾

In the late seventies, there were already individual capitalists and
companies who owned 35,00045,000 acres of wheat land. Since the time of
Lafargues writing, extensive capitalist agriculture in America has made
great strides in technique and the employment of machinery.⁽⁹⁾

The American farmer could not successfully compete with such capitalist
enterprises. At a time when the general revolution in the conditions of
finance, production and transport compelled him to give up production
for personal needs and to produce exclusively for the market, the great
spreading of agriculture caused a heavy fall in the prices of
agricultural products. And at the precise moment when farming became
dependent on the market, the agricultural market of the Union was
suddenly turned from a local one into a world market, and became a prey
to the wild speculations of a few capitalist mammoth concerns.

In 1879, a notable year for the history of agricultural conditions in
Europe as well as in America, there began the mass export of wheat from
the USA to Europe.⁽¹³⁾

Big Business was of course the only one to profit from this expanding
market. The small farmer was crushed by the competition of an increasing
number of extensive farms and became the prey of speculators who bought
up his corn to exert pressure on the world market. Helpless in the face
of the immense capitalist powers, the farmer got into debt a phenomenon
typical for a declining peasant economy. In 1890, Secretary Rusk of the
US Department of Agriculture sent out a circular letter with reference
to the desperate position of the farmers, saying:

The burden of mortgages upon farms, homes, and land, is unquestionably
discouraging in the extreme, and while in some cases no doubt this load
may have been too readily assumed, still in the majority of cases the
mortgage has been the result of necessity ... These mortgages ...
drawing high rates of interest ... have to-day, in the face of continued
depression of the prices of staple products, become very irksome, and in
many cases threaten the farmer with loss of home and land. It is a
question of grave difficulty to all those who seek to remedy the ills
from which our farmers are suffering. At present prices the farmer finds
that it takes more of his products to get a dollar wherewith to buy back
the dollar which he borrowed than it did when he borrowed it. The
interest accumulates, while the payment of the principal seems utterly
hopeless, and the very depression which we are discussing makes the
renewal of the mortgage most difficult.⁽¹⁴⁾

According to the census of May 29, 1891, 25 million farms were deep in
debt; two-thirds of them were managed by the owners whose obligations
amounted to nearly £440,000.

The situation is this: farmers are passing through the valley and shadow
of death; farming as a business is profitless; values of farm products
have fallen 50 per cent since the great war, and farm values have
depreciated 25 to 50 per cent during the last ten years; farmers are
overwhelmed with debts secured by mortgages on their homes, unable in
many instances to pay even the interest as it falls due, and unable to
renew the loans because securities are weakening by reason of the
general depression; many farmers are losing their homes under this
dreadful blight, and the mortgage mill still grinds. We are in the hands
of a merciless power; the peoples homes are at stake.⁽¹⁵⁾

Encumbered with debts and close to ruin, the farmer had no option but to
supplement his earnings by working for a wage, or else to abandon his
farm altogether. Provided it had not yet fallen into the clutches of his
creditors like so many thousands of farms, he could shake from off his
feet the dust of the land of promise that had become an inferno for him.
In the middle eighties, abandoned and decaying farms could be seen
everywhere. In 1887, Sering wrote:

If the farmer cannot pay his debts to date, the interest he has to pay
is increased to 12, 15 or even 20 per cent. He is pressed by the banker,
the machine salesman and the grocer who rob him of the fruits of his
hard work ... He can either remain on the farm as a tenant or move
further West, to try his fortunes elsewhere. Nowhere in North America
have I found so many indebted, disappointed and depressed farmers as in
the wheat regions of the North Western prairies. I have not spoken to a
single farmer in Dakota who would not have been prepared to sell his
farm.⁽¹⁶⁾

The Commissioner of Agriculture of Vermont in 1889 reported a
wide-spread desertion of farm-lands of that state. He wrote: ... there
appears to be no doubt about there being in this state large tracts of
tillable unoccupied lands, which can be bought at a price approximating
the price of Western lands, situated near school and church, and not far
from railroad facilities. The Commissioner has not visited all of the
counties in the State where these lands are reported, but he has visited
enough to satisfy him that, while much of the unoccupied and formerly
cultivated land is now practically worthless for cultivation, yet very
much of it can be made to yield a liberal reward to intelligent
labour.⁽¹⁷⁾

The Commissioner of the State of New Hampshire issued a pamphlet in
1890, devoting 67 pages to the description of farms for sale at the
lowest figures. He describes 1442 farms with tenantable buildings,
abandoned only recently. The same has happened in other districts.
Thousands of acres once raising corn and wheat are left unfilled and run
to brush and wood.

In order to resettle the deserted land, speculators engaged in
advertising campaigns and attracted crowds of new immigrants new victims
who were to suffer their predecessors fate even more speedily.

A private letter says:

In the neighbourhood of railroads and markets, there remains no common
land. It is all in the hands of the speculators. A settler takes over
vacant land and counts for a farmer; but the management of his farm
hardly assures his livelihood, and he cannot possibly compete with the
big farmer. He tills as much of his land as the law compels him to do,
but to make a comfortable living, he must look for additional, sources
of income outside agriculture. In Oregon, for instance, I have met a
settler who owned 160 acres for five years, but every summer, until the
end of July, he worked twelve hours a day for a dollar a day at
road-making. This man, of course, also counts as one of the five million
farmers in the 1890 census. Again, in the County of Eldorado, I saw many
farmers who cultivated their land only to feed their cattle and
themselves. There would have been no profit in producing for the market,
and their chief income derives from gold-digging, the felling and
selling of timber, etc. These people are prosperous, but it is not
agriculture which makes them so. Two years ago, we worked in Long Cañon,
Eldorado County, living in a cabin on an allotment. The owner of this
allotment came home only once a year for a couple of days, and worked
the rest of the time on the railway in Sacramento. Some years ago, a
small part of the allotment was cultivated, to comply with the law, but
now it is left completely untilled. A few acres are fenced off with
wire, and there is a log cabin and a shed. But during the last years all
this stands empty; a neighbour has the key and he made us free of the
hut. In the course of our journey, we saw many deserted allotments,
where attempts at farming had been made. Three years ago I was offered a
farm with dwelling house for a hundred dollars, but in a short time the
unoccupied house collapsed under the snow. In Oregon, we saw many
derelict farms with small dwelling houses and vegetable gardens. One we
visited was beautifully made: a sturdy block house, fashioned by a
master-builder, and some equipment; but the farmer had abandoned it all.
You were welcome to take it all without charge.⁽¹⁸⁾

Where could the ruined American farmer turn? He set out on a pilgrimage
to follow the wheat centre and the railways. The former had shifted in
the main to Canada, the Saskatchewan and the Mackenzie River where wheat
can still thrive on the 62nd parallel. A number of American farmers
followed and after some time in Canada, they suffered the old fate.⁽¹⁹⁾
During recent years, Canada has entered the world market as a
wheat-exporting country, but her agriculture is dominated to an even
greater extent by big capital than elsewhere.⁽²⁰⁾

In Canada, public lands were lavished upon private capitalist companies
on an even more monstrous scale than in the United States. Under the
Charter of the Canadian Pacific Railway Company with its grant of land,
private capital perpetrated an unprecedented act of robbing the public.
Not only that the company was guaranteed a twenty years monopoly of
railway building, not only that it got a building site of about 713
miles free of charge, not only that it got a 100 years state guarantee
of the 3 per cent interest on the share capital of £m. 20 to crown it
all, the company was given the choice of 25 million acres out of the
most fertile and favourably situated lands, not necessarily in the
immediate vicinity of the permanent way, as a free gift. All future
settlers on this vast area were thus at the mercy of railway capital
from the very outset. The railway company, in its turn, immediately
proceeded to sell off 5 million acres for ready cash to the North-West
Land Company, an association of British capitalists under the
chairmanship of the Duke of Manchester. The second group of capitalists
which was liberally endowed with public lands was the Hudson Bay
Company, which was given a title to no less than one-twentieth of all
the lands between Lake Winnipeg, the US. border, the Rocky Mountains,
and Northern Saskatchewan, for renouncing their privileges in the
North-West. Between them, these two capitalist groups had gained
possession of five-ninths of all the land that could be settled. A
considerable part of the other lands was assigned by the State to 26
capitalist colonising companies.⁽²¹⁾ Thus the Canadian farmer was
practically everywhere ensnared by capital and capitalist speculation.
And still mass immigration continued not only from Europe, but also from
the United States!

These are the characteristics of capitalist domination on an
international scale. Having evicted the peasant from his soil, it drives
him from England to the East of the United States, and from there to the
West, and on the ruins of the Red Indians economy it transforms him back
into a small commodity producer. Then, when he is ruined once more, he
is driven from the West to the North. With the railways in the van, and
ruin in the rear capital leads the way, its passage is marked with
universal destruction. The great fall of prices in the nineties is again
succeeded by higher prices for agricultural products, but this is of no
more avail to the small American farmer than to the European peasant.

Yet the numbers of farmers are constantly swelling. In the last decade
of the nineteenth century they had grown from 4,600,000 to 5,700,000,
and the following ten years still saw an absolute increase. The
aggregate value of farms had during the same period risen from
£150,240,000 to £330,360,000.⁽²²⁾ We might have expected the general
increase in the price of farm produce to have helped the farmer to come
into his own. But that is not so; we see that the growing numbers of
tenant farmers outstrip the increase in the farming population as a
whole. In 1880, the proportion of tenant farmers amounted to 25.5 per
cent of the total number of farmers in the Union, in 1890 it was 28.4
per cent, in 1900 35.3 per cent, and in 1910 37.2 per cent.

Though prices for farm produce were rising, the tenant farmer was more
and more rapidly stepping into the shoes of the independent farmer. And
although much more than one-third of all farmers in the Union are now
tenant farmers, their social status in the United States is that of the
agricultural labourer in Europe. Constantly fluctuating, they are indeed
wage-slaves of capital; they work very hard to create wealth for
capital, getting nothing in return but a miserable and precarious
existence.

In quite a different historical setting, in South Africa, the same
process shows up even more clearly the peaceful methods by which capital
competes with the small commodity producer.

In the Cape Colony and the Boer Republics, pure peasant economy
prevailed until the sixties of the last century. For a long time the
Boers had led the life of animal-tending nomads; they had killed off or
driven out the Hottentots and Kaffirs with a will in order to deprive
them of their most valuable pastures. In the eighteenth century they
were given invaluable assistance by the plague, imported by ships of the
East India Company, which frequently did away with entire Hottentot
tribes whose lands then fell to the Dutch immigrants. When the Boers
spread further East, they came in conflict with the Bantu tribes and
initiated the long period of the terrible Kaffir wars. These god fearing
Dutchmen regarded themselves as the Chosen People and took no small
pride in their old-fashioned Puritan morals and their intimate knowledge
of the Old Testament; yet, not content with robbing the natives of their
land, they built their peasant economy like parasites on the backs of
the Negroes, compelling them to do slave-labour for them and corrupting
and enervating them deliberately and systematically. Liquor played such
an important part in this process, that the prohibition of spirits in
the Cape Colony could not be carried through by the English government
because of Puritan opposition. There were no railways until 1859, and
Boer economy in general and on the whole remained patriarchal and based
on natural economy until the sixties. But their patriarchal attitude did
not deter the Boers from extreme brutality and harshness. It is well
known that Livingstone complained much more about the Boers than about
the Kaffirs. The Boers considered the Negroes an object, destined by God
and Nature to slave for them, and as such an indispensable foundation of
their peasant economy. So much so that their answer to the abolition of
slavery in the English colonies in 1836 was the Great Trek, although
there the owners had been compensated with £3,000,000. By way of the
Orange River and Vaal, the Boers emigrated from the Cape Colony, and in
the process they drove the Matabele to the North, across the Limpopo,
setting them against the Makalakas just as the American farmer had
driven the Red Indian West before him under the impact of capitalist
economy, so the Boer drove the Negro to the North. The Free Republics
between the Orange River and the Limpopo thus were created as a protest
against the designs of the English bourgeoisie on the sacred right of
slavery. The tiny peasant republics were in constant guerilla warfare
against the Bantu Negroes And it was on the backs of the Negroes that
the battle between the Boers and the English government, which went on
for decades, was fought. The Negro question, i.e. the emancipation of
the Negroes, ostensibly aimed at by the English bourgeoisie, served as a
pretext for the conflict between England and the republics. In fact,
peasant economy and great capitalist colonial policy were here competing
for the Hottentots and Kaffirs, that is to say for their land and their
labour power. Both competitors had precisely the same aim: to subject,
expel or destroy the coloured peoples, to appropriate their land and
press them into service by the abolition of their social organisations.
Only their methods of exploitation were fundamentally different. While
the Boers stood for out-dated slavery on a petty scale, on which their
patriarchal peasant economy was founded, the British bourgeoisie
represented modern large-scale capitalist exploitation of the land and
the natives. The Constitution of the Transvaal (South African) Republic
declared with crude prejudice: The People shall not permit any equality
of coloured persons with white inhabitants, neither in the Church nor in
the State. ⁽²³⁾

In the Orange Free State and in the Transvaal no Negro was allowed to
own land, to travel without papers or to walk abroad after sunset. Bryce
tells us of a case where a farmer, an Englishman as it happened in the
Eastern Cape Colony had flogged his Kaffir slave to death. When he was
acquitted in open court, his neighbours escorted him home to the strains
of music. The white man frequently maltreated his free native labourers
after they had done their work to such an extent that they would take to
flight, thus saving the master their wages.

The British government employed precisely the opposite tactics. For a
long time it appeared as protector of the natives; flattering the
chieftains in particular, it supported their authority and tried to make
them claim a right of disposal over their land. Wherever it was
possible, it gave them ownership of tribal land, according to well-tried
methods, although this flew in the face of tradition and of the actual
social organisation of the Negroes. All tribes in fact held their land
communally, and even the most cruel and despotic rulers such as the
Matabele Chieftain Lobengula merely had the right as well as the duty to
allot every family a piece of land which they could only retain so long
as they cultivated it. The ultimate purpose of the British government
was clear: long in advance it was preparing for land robbery on a grand
scale, using the native chieftains themselves as tools. But in the
beginning it was content with the pacification of the Negroes by
extensive military actions. Up to 1879 were fought 9 bloody Kaffir wars
to break the resistance of the Bantus.

British capital revealed its real intentions only after two important
events had taken place: the discovery of the Kimberley diamond fields in
186970, and the discovery of the gold mines in the Transvaal in 18825,
which initiated a new epoch in the history of South Africa. Then the
British South Africa Company, that is to say Cecil Rhodes, went into
action. Public opinion in England rapidly swung over, and the greed for
the treasures of South Africa urged the British government on to drastic
measures. South Africa was suddenly flooded with immigrants who had
hitherto only appeared in small numbers immigration having been
deflected to the United States. But with the discovery of the diamond
and gold fields, the numbers of white people in the South African
colonies grew by leaps and bounds: between 1885 and 1895, 100,000
British had immigrated into Witwatersrand alone. The modest peasant
economy was forthwith pushed into the background the mines, and thus the
mining capital, coming to the fore. The policy of the British government
veered round abruptly. Great Britain had recognised the Boer Republics
by the Sand River Agreement and the Treaty of Bloemfontein in the
fifties. Now her political might advanced upon the tiny republic from
every side, occupying all neighbouring districts and cutting off all
possibility of expansion. At the same time the Negroes, no longer
protected favourites, were sacrificed. British capital was steadily
forging ahead. In 1868, Britain took over the rule of Basutoland only,
of course, because the natives had repeatedly implored her to do so.⁽²⁴⁾
In 1871, the Witwatersrand diamond fields, or West Griqualand, were
seized from the Orange Free State and turned into a Crown Colony. In
1879, Zululand was subjected, later to become part of the Natal Colony;
in 1885 followed the subjection of Bechuanaland, to be joined to the
Cape Colony. In 1888 Britain took over Matabele and Mashonaland, and in
1889 the British South Africa Company was given a Charter for both these
districts, again, of course, only to oblige the natives and at their
request.⁽²⁵⁾ Between 1884 and 1887, Britain annexed St. Lucia Bay and
the entire East Coast as far as the Portuguese possessions. In 1894, she
subjected Tongaland. With their last strength, the Matabele and Mashona
fought one more desperate battle, but the Company, with Rhodes at the
head, first liquidated the rising in blood and at once proceeded to the
well tried measure for civilising and pacifying the natives: two large
railways were built in the rebellious district.

The Boer Republics were feeling increasingly uncomfortable in this
sudden stranglehold, and their internal affairs as well were becoming
completely disorganised. The overwhelming influx of immigrants and the
rising tides of the frenzied new capitalist economy now threatened to
burst the barriers of the small peasant states. There was indeed a
blatant conflict between agricultural and political peasant economy on
the one hand, and the demands and requirements of the accumulation of
capital on the other. In all respects, the republics were quite unable
to cope with these new problems. The constant danger from the Kaffirs,
no doubt regarded favourably by the British, the unwieldy, primitive
administration, the gradual corruption of the _volksraad_ in which the
great capitalists got their way by bribery, lack of a police force to
keep the undisciplined crowds of adventurers in some semblance of order,
the absence of labour legislation for regulating and securing the
exploitation of the Negroes in the mines, lack of water supplies and
transport to provide for the colony of 100,000 immigrants that had
suddenly sprung up, high protective tariffs which increased the cost of
labour for the capitalists, and high freights for coal all these factors
combined towards the sudden and stunning bankruptcy of the peasant
republics.

They tried, obstinately and unimaginatively, to defend themselves
against the sudden eruption of capitalism which engulfed them, with an
incredibly crude measure, such as only a stubborn and hide-bound peasant
brain could have devised: they denied all civic rights to the
_uitlanders_ who outnumbered them by far and who stood for capital,
power, and the trend of the time. In those critical times it was an
ill-omened trick. The mismanagement of the peasant republics caused a
considerable reduction of dividends, on no account to be put up with.
Mining capital had come to the end of its tether. The British South
Africa Company built railroads, put down the Kaffirs, organised revolts
of the _uitlanders_ and finally provoked the Boer War. The bell had
tolled for peasant economy. In the United States, the economic
revolution had begun with a war, in South Africa war put the period to
this chapter. Yet in both instances, the outcome was the same: capital
triumphed over the small peasant economy which had in its turn come into
being on the ruins of natural economy, represented by the natives
primitive organisations. The domination of capital was a foregone
conclusion, and it was just as hopeless for the Boer Republics to resist
as it had been for the American farmer. Capital officially took over the
reins in the new South African Union which replaced the small peasant
republics by a great modern state, as envisaged by Cecil Rhodes
imperialist programme. The new conflict between capital and labour had
superseded the old one between British and Dutch. One million white
exploiters of both nations sealed their touching fraternal alliance
within the Union with the civil and political disfranchisement of five
million coloured workers. Not only the Negroes of the Boer Republics
came away empty handed, but the natives of the Cape Colony, whom the
British government had at one time granted political equality, were also
deprived of some of their rights. And this noble work, culminating under
the imperialist policy of the Conservatives in open oppression, was
actually to be finished by the Liberal Party itself, amid frenzied
applause from the liberal cretins of Europe who with sentimental pride
took as proof of the still continuing creative vigour and greatness of
English liberalism the fact that Britain had granted complete
self-government and freedom to a handful of whites in South Africa.

The ruin of independent craftsmanship by capitalist competition, no less
painful for being soft-pedalled, deserves by rights a chapter to itself.
The most sinister part of such a chapter would be out-work under
capitalism; but we need not dwell on these phenomena here.

The general result of the struggle between capitalism and simple
commodity production is this: after substituting commodity economy for
natural economy, capital takes the place of simple commodity economy.
Non-capitalist organisations provide a fertile soil for capitalism; more
strictly: capital feeds on the ruins of such organisations, and,
although this non-capitalist milieu is indispensable for accumulation,
the latter proceeds, at the cost of this medium nevertheless, by eating
it up. Historically, the accumulation of capital is a kind of metabolism
between capitalist economy and those pre-capitalist methods of
production without which it cannot go on and which, in this light, it
corrodes and assimilates. Thus capital cannot accumulate without the aid
of non-capitalist organisations, nor, on the other hand, can it tolerate
their continued existence side by side with itself. Only the continuous
and progressive disintegration of non-capitalist organisations makes
accumulation of capital possible.

The premises which are postulated in Marxs diagram of accumulation
accordingly represent no more than the historical tendency of the
movement of accumulation and its logical conclusion. The accumulative
process endeavours everywhere to substitute simple commodity economy for
natural economy. Its ultimate aim, that is to say, is to establish the
exclusive and universal domination of capitalist production in all
countries and for all branches of industry.

Yet this argument does not lead anywhere. As soon as this final result
is achieved in theory, of course, because it can never actually happen
accumulation must come to a stop. The realisation and capitalisation of
surplus value become impossible to accomplish. Just as soon as reality
begins to correspond to Marxs diagram of enlarged reproduction, the end
of accumulation is in sight, it has reached its limits, and capitalist
production is _in extremis_. For capital, the standstill of accumulation
means that the development of the productive forces is arrested, and the
collapse of capitalism follows inevitably, as an objective historical
necessity. This is the reason for the contradictory behaviour of
capitalism in the final stage of its historical career: imperialism.

Marxs diagram of enlarged reproduction thus does not conform to the
conditions of an accumulation in actual progress. Progressive
accumulation cannot be reduced to static interrelations and
interdependence between the two great departments of social production
(the departments of producer and consumer goods), as the diagram would
have it. Accumulation is more than an internal relationship between the
branches of capitalist economy; it is primarily a relationship between
capital and a non-capitalist environment, where the two great
departments of production sometimes perform the accumulative process on
their own, independently of each other, but even then at every step the
movements overlap and intersect. From this we get most complicated
relations, divergences in the speed and direction of accumulation for
the two departments, different relations with non-capitalist modes of
production as regards both material elements and elements of value,
which we cannot possibly lay down in rigid formula. Marxs diagram of
accumulation is only the theoretical reflection of the precise moment
when the domination of capital has reached its limits, and thus it is no
less a fiction than his diagram of simple reproduction, which gives the
theoretical formulation for the point of departure of capitalist
accumulation. The precise definition of capitalist accumulation and its
laws lies somewhere in between these two fictions.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾ Until recently, in China the domestic industries were widely
practised even by the bourgeoisie and in such large and ancient towns as
Ningpo with its 300,000 inhabitants.

Only a generation ago, the familys shoes, hats, shirts, etc., were made
by the women themselves. At that time, it was practically unheard-of for
a young woman to buy from a merchant what she could have made with the
labour of her own hands (Dr. Nyok-Ching Tsur, FORMS OF INDUSTRY IN THE
TOWN OF NINGPO (DIE GEWERBLICHEN BETRIEBSFORMEN DER STADT NINGPO),
Tübingen 1909, p.51).

⁽²⁾ Admittedly, this relation is reversed in the last stages of the
history of peasant economy when capitalist production has made its full
impact. Once the small peasants are ruined, the entire work of farming
frequently devolves on the women, old people and children, while the men
are made to work for their living for capitalist entrepreneurs in the
domestic industries or at wage-slaves in the factories. A typical
instance is the small peasant in Württemberg.

⁽³⁾ W.A. Peffer, THE FARMERS SIDE. HIS TROUBLES AND THEIR REMEDY (New
York 1891), Part ii, _How We Got Here_, chap.i, _Changed Conditions of
the Farmer_, pp.56-7. Cf. also A.M. Simmons, THE AMERICAN FARMER (2nd
edition, Chicago 1906), pp.74ff.

⁽⁴⁾REPORT OF THE USA COMMISSIONER OF AGRICULTURE FOR THE YEAR 1867
(Washington 1868). Quoted by Lafargue: _Getreidebau und Getreidehandel
in den Vereinigten Staaten_ in DIE NEUE ZEIT (1885), p.344. This essay
on grain cultivation and the grain trade in the USA was first published
in a Russian periodical in 1883.

⁽⁵⁾ The three Revenue Acts of June 30, 1864, practically formed one
measure, and that probably the greatest measure of taxation which the
world has seen ... The Internal Revenue Act was arranged, as Mr. David
A. Wells has said, on the principle of the Irishman at Donnybrook Fair:
whenever you see a head, hit it, whenever you see a commodity, tax it
(F.W. Taussig, THE TARIFF HISTORY OF THE UNITED STATES, New York-London
1888, pp.163-4).

⁽⁶⁾IBID., pp.166-7.

⁽⁷⁾ The necessity of the situation, the critical state of the country,
the urgent need of revenue, may have justified this haste, which, it is
safe to say, is unexampled in the history of civilised countries
(Taussig, OP. CIT., p.168).

⁽⁸⁾ Pevfer, OP. CIT., pp.58ff.

⁽⁹⁾IBID., p.6.

⁽¹⁰⁾AGRICULTURAL COMPETITION IN NORTH AMERICA (DIE LANDWIRTSCHAFTLICHE
KONKURRENZ NORDAMERIKAS), Leipzig 1887, p.431.

⁽¹¹⁾ Lafargue, OP. CIT., p.345.

⁽¹²⁾THE THIRTEENTH ANNUAL REPORT OF THE COMMISSIONER OF LABOUR
(Washington 1899) tables the advantages of machinery methods over hand
methods so far achieved as follows:

  --
  --

⁽¹³⁾ Wheat exports from the Union to Europe:

  --
  --

⁽¹⁴⁾ Peffer, OP. CIT., part i, _Where We Are_, chap.ii, _Progress of
Agriculture_, pp.30-1.

⁽¹⁵⁾IBID., p.4.

⁽¹⁶⁾ Sering, OP. CIT., p.433.

⁽¹⁷⁾ Peffer, OP. CIT., p.34f.

⁽¹⁸⁾ Quoted by Nikolayon, OP. CIT., p.224.

⁽¹⁹⁾ 49,199 people immigrated to Canada in 1902. In 1912, the number of
immigrants was more than 400,000 138,000 of them British, and 134,000
American. According to a report from Montreal, the influx of American
farmers continued into the spring of the present year [1912].

⁽²⁰⁾ Travelling in the West of Canada, I have visited only one farm of
less than a thousand acres. According to the census of the Dominion of
Canada, in 1881, when the census was taken, no more than 9,077 farmers
occupied 2,384,337 acres of land between them; accordingly, the share of
an individual (farmer) amounted to no less than 2,047 acres in no state
of the Union is the average anywhere near that (Sering, OP. CIT.,
p.376). In the early eighties, farming on a large scale was admittedly
not very widely spread in Canada. But already in 1887, Sering describes
the Bell Farm, owned by a limited company, which comprised no fewer than
56,700 acres, and was obviously modelled on the pattern of the Dalrymple
farm. In the eighties, Sering, who regarded the prospects of Canadian
competition with some scepticism, put the fertile belt of Western Canada
at three-fifths of the entire acreage of Germany, and estimated that
actually only 38,400,000 acres of this were arable land, and no more
than 55,000,000 acres at best were prospective wheat land (Sering, OP.
CIT., pp.337-8). The MANITOBA FREE PRESS in June 1912, worked out that
in summer, 1912, 11,200,000 acres were sown with spring wheat in Canada,
as against 19,200,000 acres under spring wheat in the United States.
(Cf. BERLINER TAGEBLATT, HANDELSZEITUNG, No.305, June 18, 1912.)

⁽²¹⁾ Sering, OP. CIT., pp.361ff.

⁽²²⁾ Ernst Schultze, _Das Wirtschaftsleben der Vereinigten Staaten_,
JAHRB F. GESETZG., VERW. U. VOLKSWIRTSCHAFT 1912, no.27, p.1724.

⁽²³⁾ Article 9.

⁽²⁴⁾ Moshesh, the great Basuto leader, to whose courage and
statesmanship the Basutos owed their very existence as a people, was
still alive at the time, but constant war with the Boers of the Orange
Free State had brought him and his followers to the last stage of
distress. Two thousand Basuto warriors had been killed, cattle had been
carried off, native homes had been broken up and crops destroyed. The
tribe was reduced to the position of starving refugees, and nothing
could save them but the protection of the British government which they
had repeatedly implored (C.P. Lucas, A HISTORICAL GEOGRAPHY OF THE
BRITISH COLONIES, part ii, vol.iv (_Geography of South and East
Africa_), Oxford 1904, p.39).

⁽²⁵⁾ The Eastern section of the territory is Mashonaland where, with the
permission of King Lobengula, who claimed it, the British South Africa
Company first established themselves (IBID., p.72).

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 12.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Three The Historical Conditions of Accumulation

 



CHAPTER 30 INTERNATIONAL LOANS


 

THE imperialist phase of capitalist accumulation which implies universal
competition comprises the industrialisation and capitalist emancipation
of the _hinterland_ where capital formerly realised its surplus value.
Characteristic of this phase are: lending abroad, railroad
constructions, revolutions, and wars. The last decade, from 1900 to
1910, shows in particular the world-wide movement of capital, especially
in Asia and neighbouring Europe: in Russia, Turkey, Persia, India,
Japan, China, and also in North Africa. Just as the substitution of
commodity economy for a natural economy and that of capitalist
production for a simple commodity production was achieved by wars,
social crises and the destruction of entire social systems, so at
present the achievement of capitalist autonomy in the _hinterland_ and
backward colonies is attained amidst wars and revolutions. Revolution is
an essential for the process of capitalist emancipation. The backward
communities must shed their obsolete political organisations, relics of
natural and simple commodity economy, and create a modern state
machinery adapted to the purposes of capitalist production. The
revolutions in Turkey, Russia, and China fall under this heading. The
last two, in particular, do not exclusively serve the immediate
political requirements of capitalism; to some extent they carry over
outmoded pre-capitalist claims while on the other hand they already
embody new conflicts which run counter to the domination of capital.
These factors account for their immense drive, but at the same time
impede and delay the ultimate victory of the revolutionary forces. A
young state will usually sever the leading strings of older capitalist
states by wars, which temper and test the modern states capitalist
independence in a baptism by fire. That is why military together with
financial reforms invariably herald the bid for economic independence.

The forward-thrusts of capital are approximately reflected in the
development of the railway network. The permanent way grew most quickly
in Europe during the forties, in America in the fifties, in Asia in the
sixties, in Australia during the seventies and eighties, and during the
nineties in Africa.⁽¹⁾

Public loans for railroad building and armaments accompany all stages of
the accumulation of capital: the introduction of commodity economy,
industrialisation of countries, capitalist revolutionisation of
agriculture as well as the emancipation of young capitalist states. For
the accumulation of capital, the loan has various functions: _(a)_ it
serves to convert the money of non-capitalist groups into capital, i.e.
money both as a commodity equivalent (lower middle-class savings) and as
fund of consumption for the hangers-on of the capitalist class; _(b)_ it
serves to transform money capital into productive capital by means of
state enterprise-railroad building and military supplies; _(c)_ it
serves to divert accumulated capital from the old capitalist countries
to young ones. In the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, the loan
transferred capital from the Italian cities to England, in the
eighteenth century from Holland to England, in the nineteenth century
from England to the American Republics and Australia, from France,
Germany and Belgium to Russia, and at the present time [1912] from
Germany to Turkey, from England, Germany and France to China, and, via
Russia, to Persia.

In the Imperialist Era, the foreign loan played an outstanding part as a
means for young capitalist states to acquire independence. The
contradictions inherent in the modern system of foreign loans are the
concrete expression of those which characterise the imperialist phase.
Though foreign loans are indispensable for the emancipation of the
rising capitalist states, they are yet the surest ties by which the old
capitalist states maintain their influence, exercise financial control
and exert pressure on the customs, foreign and commercial policy of the
young capitalist states. Pre-eminently channels for the investment in
new spheres of capital accumulated in the old countries, such loans
widen the scope for the accumulation of capital; but at the same time
they restrict it by creating new competition for the investing
countries.

These inherent conflicts of the international loan system are a classic
example of spatio-temporal divergencies between the conditions for the
realisation of surplus value and the capitalisation thereof. While
realisation of the surplus value requires only the general spreading of
commodity production, its capitalisation demands the progressive
supercession of simple commodity production by capitalist economy, with
the corollary that the limits to both the realisation and the
capitalisation of surplus value keep contracting ever more. Employment
of international capital in the construction of the international
railway network reflects this disparity. Between the thirties and the
sixties of the nineteenth century, railway is building and the loans
necessary for it mainly served to oust natural economy, and to spread
commodity economy as in the case of the Russian railway loans in the
sixties, or in that of the American railways which were built with
European capital. Railway construction in Africa and Asia during the
last twenty years, on the other hand, almost exclusively served the
purposes of an imperialist policy, of economic monopolisation and
economic subjugation of the backward communities. As regards Russias
railroad construction in Eastern Asia, for instance, it is common
knowledge that Russia had paved the way for the military occupation of
Manchuria by sending troops to protect her engineers working on the
Manchurian railway. With the same object in view, Russia obtained
railway concessions in Persia, Germany in Asia Minor and Mesopotamia,
and Britain and Germany in Africa.

In this connection, we must deal with a misunderstanding concerning the
capital investments in foreign countries and the demand of these
countries for capital imports. Already in the early twenties of the last
century, the export of British capital to America played an important
part, being largely responsible for the first genuine industrial and
commercial crises in England in 1825. Since 1824, the London stock
exchange had been flooded with South American stocks and shares. During
the following year, the newly defeated states of South and Central
America raised loans in London alone for more than £20,000,000, and in
addition, enormous quantities of South American industrial shares and
similar bonds were sold. This sudden prosperity and the opening up of
the South American markets in their turn called forth greatly increased
exports of British commodities to the Latin Americas. British commodity
exports to these countries amounted to £2,900,000 in 1821 which had
risen to £6,400,000 by 1825.

Cotton textiles formed the most important item of these exports; this
powerful demand was the impetus for a rapid expansion of British cotton
production, and many new factories were opened. In 1821, raw cotton to
the value of £m. 129 was made up in England and risen to £m. 167.

The situation was thus fraught with the elements of a crisis. Tugan
Baranovski raises the question:

But from where did the South American countries take the means to buy
twice as many commodities in 1825 as in 1821? The British themselves
supplied these means. The loans floated on the London stock exchange
served as payment for imported goods. Deceived by the demand they had
themselves created, the British factory-owners were soon brought to
realise by their own experience that their high expectations had been
unfounded.⁽²⁾

He thus characterises as deceptive, as an unhealthy, abnormal economic
phenomenon the fact that the South American demand for English goods had
been brought about by British capital. Thus uncritically he took over
the doctrine of an expert with whose other theories he wished to have
nothing in common. The opinion had been advanced already during the
English crisis of 1825 that it could be explained by the singular
development of the relations between British capital and South American
demand. None other than Sismondi had raised the same question as Tugan
Baranovski and given a most accurate description of events in the second
edition of his NOUVEAUX PRINCIPES:

The opening up of the immense market afforded by Spanish America to
industrial producers seemed to offer a good opportunity to relieve
British manufacture. The British government were of that opinion, and in
the seven years following the crisis of 1818, displayed unheard-of
activity to carry English commerce to penetrate the remotest districts
of Mexico, Columbia, Brazil, Rio de la Plata, Chile and Peru. Before the
government decided to recognise these new states, it had to protect
English commerce by frequent calls of battleships whose captains had a
diplomatic rather than a military mission. In consequence, it had defied
the clamours of the Holy Alliance and recognised the new republics at a
moment when the whole of Europe, on the contrary, was plotting their
ruin. But however big the demand afforded by free America, yet it would
not have been enough to absorb all the goods England had produced over
and above the needs of consumption, had not their means for buying
English merchandise been suddenly increased beyond all bounds by the
loans to the new republics. Every American state borrowed from England
an amount sufficient to consolidate its government. Although they were
capital loans, they were immediately spent in the course of the year
like income, that is to say they were used up entirely to buy English
goods on behalf of the treasury, or to pay for those which had been
dispatched on private orders. At the same time, numerous companies with
immense capitals were formed to exploit all the American mines, but all
the money they spent found its way back to England, either to pay for
the machinery which they immediately used, or else for the goods sent to
the localities where they were to work. As long as this singular
commerce lasted, in which the English only asked the Americans to be
kind enough to buy English merchandise with English capital, and to
consume them for their sake, the prosperity of English manufacture
appeared dazzling. It was no more income but rather English capital
which was used to push on consumption: the English themselves bought and
paid for their own goods which they sell to America, and thereby merely
forwent the pleasure of using these goods.⁽³⁾

From this Sismondi drew the characteristic conclusion that the real
limits to the capitalist market are set by income, i.e. by personal
consumption alone, and he used this example as one more warning against
accumulation.

Down to the present day, the events which preceded the crisis of 1825
have remained typical for a period of boom and expansion of capital, and
such singular commerce is in fact one of the most important foundations
of the accumulation of capital. Particularly in the history of British
capital, it occurs regularly before every crisis, as Tugan Baranovski
himself showed by the following facts and figures: the immediate cause
of the 1836 crisis was the flooding of the American market with British
goods, again financed by British money. In 1834, US commodity imports
exceeded exports by £m. 12 but at the same time their imports of
precious metal exceeded exports by nearly £m. 3.2. Even in 1836, the
year of the crisis itself, their surplus of imported commodities
amounted to £m. 10.4, and still the excess of bullion imported was £m 1.
This influx of money, no less than the stream of goods, came chiefly
from England, where US railway shares were bought in bulk. 1835/6 saw
opening in the United States of sixty-one new banks with a capital of
£m. 10.4, predominantly British. Again, the English paid for their
exports themselves. The unprecedented industrial boom in the Northern
States of the Union, eventually leading to the Civil War, was likewise
financed by British capital, which again created an expanding market for
British industry in the United States.

And not only British capital other European capitals, also made every
possible effort to take part in this singular commerce. To quote
Schaeffle, in the five years between 1849 and 1854, at least £m. 100
were invested in American shares on the various stock exchanges of
Europe. The simultaneous revival of world industry attained such
dimensions that it culminated in the world crash of 1857. In the
sixties, British capital lost no time in creating similar conditions in
Asia as well as the United States. An unending stream was diverted to
Asia Minor and East India, where it financed the most magnificent
railroad projects. The permanent way of British India amounted in 1860
to 844 miles, in 1870 to 4,802 miles, in 1880 to 9,361 miles and in 1890
to 16,875 miles. This at once increased the demand for British
commodities. No sooner had the War of Secession come to a close, than
British capital again flowed into the United States. It again paid for
the greater part of the enormous railroad constructions in the Union
during the sixties and seventies, the permanent way amounting in 1850 to
8,844 miles, in 1860 to 30,807 miles, in 1870 to 53,212 miles, in 1880
to 94,198 miles, and in 1890 to 179,005 miles. Materials for these
railways were also being supplied by England one of the main causes for
the rapid development of the British coal and iron industries and the
reasons why these industries were so seriously affected by the American
crises of 1866, 1873 and 1884. What Sismondi considered sheer lunacy was
in this instance literally true: the British with their own materials,
their own iron etc., had built railroads in the United States, they had
paid for the railways with their own capital and only forwent their use.
In spite of all periodical crises, however, European capital had
acquired such a taste for this madness, that the London stock exchange
was seized by a veritable epidemic of foreign loans in the middle of the
seventies. Between 1870 and 1875, loans of this kind, amounting to £m.
260, were raised in London. The immediate consequence was a rapid
increase in the overseas export of British merchandise. Although the
foreign countries concerned went periodically bankrupt, masses of
capital continued to flow in. Turkey, Egypt, Greece, Bolivia, Costa
Rica, Ecuador, Honduras, Mexico, Paraguay, Peru, St. Domingo, Uruguay,
and Venezuela completely or partially suspended their payments of
interest in the late seventies. Yet undeterred by this, the fever for
exotic state loans burst out again at the end of the eighties the South
American states and South African colonies were lent immense quantities
of European capital. In 1874, for instance, the Argentine Republic
borrowed as much as £m. 10 and the loan had risen to £m. 59 by 1890.

England built railways with her own iron and coal in all these countries
as well, paying for them with her own capital. In 1885, the Argentine
permanent way had been 1,952 miles, in 1893 it was 8,557 miles. Exports
from England were rising accordingly:

  --
  --

British total exports (mainly to the Argentine) amounted to £m. 47 in
1885 and to £m. 10.7 a mere four years later.

At the same time, British capital flowed into Australia in the form of
state loans. At the end of the eighties the loans to the three colonies
Victoria, New South Wales and Tasmania amounted to £m.112, £m. 81 of
which were invested in railway construction. The permanent way of
Australia extended over 4,900 miles in 1880, and over 15,600 miles in
1895.

Britain, supplying capital and materials for these railways, was also
embroiled in the crises of 1890 in the Argentine, Transvaal, Mexico,
Uruguay, and in that of 1893 in Australia.

The following two decades made a difference only in so far as German,
French and Belgian capital largely participated with British capital in
foreign investments, while railway construction in Asia Minor had been
financed entirely by British capital from the fifties to the late
eighties. From then on, German capital took over and put into execution
the tremendous project of the Anatolian railway. German capital
investments in Turkey gave rise to an increased export of German goods
to that country.

In 1896, German exports to Turkey amounted to £m. 14, in 1911 to
£m. 5.65. To Asiatic Turkey, in particular, goods were exported in 1901
to the value of £m. 0.6 and in 1911 to the value of £m. 1.85. In this
case, German capital was used to a considerable extent to pay for German
goods, the Germans forgoing, to use Sismondis term, only the pleasure of
using their own products.

Let us examine the position more closely:

Realised surplus value, which cannot be capitalised and lies idle in
England or Germany, is invested in railway construction, water works,
Etc. in the Argentine, Australia, the Cape Colony or Mesopotamia.
Machinery, materials and the like are supplied by the country where the
capital has originated, and the same capital pays for them. Actually,
this process characterises capitalist conditions everywhere, even at
home. Capital must purchase the elements of production and thus become
productive capital before it can operate. Admittedly, the products are
then used within the country, while in the former case they are used by
foreigners. But then capitalist production does not aim at its products
being enjoyed, but at the accumulation of surplus value. There had been
no demand for the surplus product within the country, so capital had
lain idle without the possibility of accumulating. But abroad, where
capitalist production has not yet developed, there has come about,
voluntarily or by force, a new demand of the non-capitalist strata. The
consumption of the capitalist and working classes at home is irrelevant
for the purposes of accumulation, and what matters to capital is the
very fact that its products are used by _others_. The new consumers must
indeed realise the products, pay for their use, and for this they need
money. They can obtain some of it by the exchange of commodities which
begins at this point, a brisk traffic in goods following hard on the
heels of railway construction and mining (gold mines, etc.). Thus the
capital advanced for railroad building and mining, together with an
additional surplus value, is gradually realised. It is immaterial to the
situation as a whole whether this exported capital becomes share capital
in new independent enterprises, or whether, as a government loan, it
uses the mediation of a foreign state to find new scope for operation in
industry and traffic, nor does it matter if in the first case some of
the companies are fraudulent and fail in due course, or if in the second
case the borrowing state finally goes bankrupt, i.e. if the owners
sometimes lose part of their capital in one way or another. Even the
country of origin is not immune, and individual capitals frequently get
lost in crises. The important point is that capital accumulated in the
old country should find elsewhere new opportunities to beget and realise
surplus value, so that accumulation can proceed. In the new countries,
large regions of natural economy are open to conversion into commodity
economy, or existing commodity economy can be ousted by capital.
Railroad construction and mining, gold mining in particular, are typical
for the investment of capitals from old capitalist countries in new
ones. They are pre-eminently qualified to stimulate a brisk traffic in
goods under conditions hitherto determined by natural economy and both
are significant in economic history as mile-stones along the route of
rapid dissolution of old economic organisations, of social crises and of
the development of modern conditions, that is to say of the development
of commodity economy to begin with, and further of the production of
capital.

For this reason, the part played by lending abroad as well as by capital
investments in foreign railway and mining shares is a fine sample of the
deficiencies in Marxs diagram of accumulation. In these instances,
enlarged reproduction of capital capitalises a surplus value That has
already been realised (in so far as the loans or foreign investments are
not financed by the savings of the petty bourgeoisie or the
semi-proletariat). It is quite irrelevant to the present field of
accumulation, when, where and how the capital of the old countries has
been realised so that it may flow into the new country. British capital
which finds an outlet in Argentine railway construction might well in
the past have been realised in China in the form of Indian opium.
Further, the British capital which builds railways in the Argentine, is
of English origin not only in its pure value-form, as money capital, but
also in its material form, as iron, coal and machinery; the use-form of
the surplus value, that is to say, has also come into being from the
very beginning in the use-form suitable for the purposes of
accumulation. The actual use-form of the variable capital, however,
labour power, is mainly foreign: it is the native labour of the new
countries which is made a new object of exploitation by the capital of
the old countries. If we want to keep our investigation all on one
plane, we may even assume that the labour power, too, has the same
country of origin as the capital. In point of fact new discoveries, of
gold mines for instance, tend to call forth mass emigration from the old
countries, especially in the first stages, and are largely worked by
labour from those countries. It might well be, then, that in a new
country capital, labour power and means of production all come from the
same capitalist country, say England. So it is really in England that
all the material conditions for accumulation exist a realised surplus
value as money capital, a surplus product in productive form, and lastly
labour reserves. Yet accumulation cannot proceed here: England and her
old buyers require neither railways nor an expanded industry. Enlarged
reproduction, i.e. accumulation, is possible only if new districts with
a non-capitalist civilisation, extending over large areas, appear on the
scene and augment the number of consumers.

But then, who are these new consumers actually; who is it that realises
the surplus value of capitalist enterprises which are started with
foreign loans; and who, in the final analysis, pays for these loans? The
international loans in Egypt provide a classical answer.

The internal history of Egypt in the second half of the nineteenth
century is characterised by the interplay of three phenomena:
large-scale capitalist enterprise, a rapidly growing public debt, and
the collapse of peasant economy. Until quite recently, _corvée_
prevailed in Egypt, and the Wali and later the Khedive freely pursued
their own power policy with regard to the condition of landownership.
These primitive conditions precisely offered an incomparably fertile
soil for the operations of European capital. Economically speaking, the
conditions for a monetary economy had to be established to begin with,
and the state created them by direct compulsion. Until the thirties,
Mehemet Ali, the founder of Modern Egypt, here applied a method of
patriarchal simplicity: every year, he bought up the fellaheens entire
harvest for the public exchequer, and allowed them to buy back, at a
higher price, a minimum for subsistence and seed. In addition he
imported cotton from East India, sugar cane from America, indigo and
pepper, and issued the fellaheen with official directions what to plant
and how much of it. The government again claimed the monopoly for cotton
and indigo, reserving to itself the exclusive right of buying and
selling these goods. By such methods was commodity exchange introduced
in Egypt. Admittedly, Mehemet Ali also did something towards raising
labour productivity. He arranged for dredging of the ancient
canalisation, and above all he started the work of the great Kaliub Nile
dams which initiated the series of great capitalist enterprises in
Egypt. These were to comprise four great fields:

1.  irrigation systems, in which the Kaliub works built between 1845 and
    1853 take first place quite apart from unpaid forced labour, they
    swallowed up £m. 2.5 and incidentally proved quite useless at first;
2.  routes for traffic the most important construction which proved
    ultimately detrimental to Egypt being the Suez Canal;
3.  the cultivation of cotton, and
4.  the production of sugar cane.

With the building of the Suez Canal, Egypt became caught up in the web
of European capitalism, never again to get free of it. French capital
led the way with British capital hard on its heels. In the twenty years
that followed, the internal disturbances in Egypt were coloured by the
competitive struggle between these two capitals. French capital was
perhaps the most peculiar exponent of the European methods of capital
accumulation at the expense of primitive conditions. Its operations were
responsible for the useless Nile dams as well as for the Suez Canal.
Egypt first contracted to supply the labour of 20,000 serfs free of
charge for a number of years, and secondly to take up shares in the Suez
Company to the tune of £m. 3.5, i.e. 40 per cent of the company's total
capital. All this for the sake of breaking through a canal which would
deflect the entire trade between Europe and Asia from Egypt and would
painfully affect her part in this trade. These £m. 3.5 formed the
nucleus for Egypts immense national debt which was to bring about her
military occupation by Britain twenty years later. In the irrigation
system, sudden transformations were initiated: the ancient _sakias_,
i.e. bullock-driven water-wheels, of which 50,000 had been busy for 7
months in the year in the Nile delta alone, were partially replaced by
steam pumps. Modern steamers now plied on the Nile between Cairo and
Assuan. But the most profound change in the economic conditions of Egypt
was brought about by the cultivation of cotton. This became almost
epidemic in Egypt when, owing to the American War of Secession and the
English cotton famine, the price per short ton rose from something
between £30 and £40 to £200£250. Everybody was planting cotton, and
foremost among all, the Viceroy and his family. His estates grew fat,
what with large-scale land robbery, confiscations, forced sale or plain
theft. He suddenly appropriated villages by the score though without any
legal excuse. Within an incredibly short time, this vast demesne was
brought under cotton, with the result that the entire technique of
Egyptian traditional agriculture was revolutionised. Dams were thrown up
everywhere to protect the cotton fields from the seasonal flooding of
the Nile, and a comprehensive system of artificial irrigation was
introduced. These waterworks together with continuous deep ploughing a
novel departure for the fellah who had until then merely scratched his
soil with a plough dating back to the Pharaohs and finally the intensive
labours of the harvest made between them enormous demands on Egypts
labour power. This was throughout the same forced peasant labour over
which the state claimed to have an unrestricted right of disposal; and
thousands had already been employed on the Kaliub dams and the Suez
Canal and now the irrigation and plantation work to be done on the
viceregal estates clamoured for this forced labour. The 20,000 serfs who
had been put at the disposal of the Suez Canal Company were now required
by the Khedive himself; and this brought about the first clash with
French capital. The company was adjudged a compensation of £m. 3.35 by
the arbitration of Napoleon III, a settlement to which the Khedive could
all the more readily agree, since the very fellaheen whose labour power
was the bone of contention were ultimately to be mulcted of this sum.
The work of irrigation was immediately put in hand. Centrifugal
machines, steam and traction engines were therefore ordered from England
and France. In their hundreds, they were carried by steamers from
England to Alexandria and then further. Steam ploughs were needed for
cultivating the soil, especially since the rinderpest of 1864 had killed
off all the cattle, England again being the chief supplier of these
machines. The Fowler works were expanded enormously of a sudden to meet
the requirements of the Viceroy for which Egypt had to pay.⁽⁴⁾

But now Egypt required yet a third type of machine, cotton gins and
presses for packing. Dozens of these gins were set up in the Delta
towns. Like English industrial towns, Sagasis, Tanta, Samanud and other
towns were covered by pails of smoke and great fortunes circulated in
the banks of Alexandria and Cairo.

But already in the year that followed this cotton speculation collapsed
with the cotton prices which fell in a couple of days from 27_d._ per
pound to 15_d._, 12_d._, and finally 6_d._ after the cessation of
hostilities in the American Union. The following year, Ismail Pasha
ventured on a new speculation, the production of cane sugar. The forced
labour of the fellaheen was to compete with the Southern States of the
Union where slavery had been abolished. For the second time, Egyptian
agriculture was turned upside down. French and British capitalists found
a new field for rapid accumulation. 18 giant sugar factories were put on
order in 18689 with an estimated daily output of 200 short tons of
sugar, that is to say four times as much as that of the greatest then
existing plant. Six of them were ordered from England, and twelve from
France, but England eventually delivered the lions share, because of the
Franco-German war. These factories were to be built along the Nile at
intervals of 6.2 miles (10 _km._), as centres of cane plantations of an
area comprising 10 sq. _km._ Working to full capacity, each factory
required a daily supply of 2,000 tons of sugar cane. Fellaheen were
driven to forced labour on the sugar plantations in their thousands,
while further thousands of their number built the Ibrahimya Canal. The
stick and _kourbash_ were unstintingly applied. Transport soon became a
problem. A railway network had to be built round every factory to haul
the masses of cane inside, rolling stock, funiculars, etc., had to be
obtained as quickly as possible. Again these enormous orders were placed
with English capital. The first giant factory was opened in 1872, 4,000
camels providing makeshift transport. But it proved to be simply
impossible to supply cane in the quantities required by the undertaking.
The working staff was completely inadequate, since the fellah,
accustomed to forced labour on the land, could not be transformed
overnight into a modern industrial worker by the lash of the whip. The
venture collapsed, even before many of the imported machines had been
installed. This sugar speculation concluded the period of gigantic
capitalist enterprise in Egypt in 1873.

What had provided the capital for these enterprises? International
loans. One year before his death in 1863, Said Pasha had raised the
first loan at a nominal value of £m. 3.3 which came to £m. 2.5 in cash
after deduction of commissions, discounts, etc. He left to Ismail Pasha
the legacy of this debt and the contract with the Suez Canal Company,
which was to burden Egypt with a debt of £m. 17. Ismail Pasha in turn
raised his first loan in 1864 with a nominal value of £m. 5.7 at 7 per
cent and a cash value of £m. 485 at 8¼ per cent. What remained of it,
after £m. 3.35 had been paid to the Suez Canal Company as compensation,
was spent within the year, swallowed up for the greater part by the
cotton gamble. In 1865, the first so-called Daira-loan was floated by
the Anglo-Egyptian Bank, on the security of the Khedives private
estates. The nominal value of this loan was £m. 3.4 at 9 per cent, and
its real value £m. 2.5 at 12 per cent. In 1866, _Fruehling & Goschen_
floated a new loan at a nominal value of £m. 3 and a cash value of
£m. 2. The Ottoman Bank floated another in 1867 of nominally £m. 2,
really £m. 1.7. The floating debt at that time amounted to £m. 30. The
Banking House _Oppenheim & Neffen_ floated a great loan in 1868 to
consolidate part of this debt. Its nominal value was £m. 11.9 at 7 per
cent, though Ismail could actually lay hands only on £m. 7.1 at 13½
percent. This money made it possible, however, to pay for the pompous
celebrations on the opening of the Suez Canal, in presence of the
leading figures in the Courts of Europe, in finance and in the
_demi-monde_, for a madly lavish display, and further, to grease the
palm of the Turkish Overlord, the Sultan, with a new baksheesh of £m. 1.
The sugar gamble necessitated another loan in 1870. Floated by the firm
of _Bischoffsheim & Goldschmidt_, it had a nominal value of £m. 7.1 at 7
per cent, and its cash value was £m. 5. In 1872/3 Oppenheims floated two
further loans, a modest one amounting to £m. 4 at 14 per cent and a
large one of £m. 32 at 8 per cent which reduced the floating debt by one
half, but which actually came only to £m 11 in cash, since the European
banking houses paid it in part by bills of exchange they had discounted.

In 1874, a further attempt was made to raise a national loan of £m. 50
at an annual charge of 9 per cent., but it yielded no more than £m. 3.4.
Egyptian securities were quoted at 54 per cent of their face value.
Within the thirteen years after Said Pashas death, Egypts total public
debt had grown from £m. 3.293 to £m. 94.110,⁽⁵⁾ and collapse was
imminent.

These operations of capital, at first sight, seem to reach the height of
madness. One loan followed hard on the other, the interest on old loans
was defrayed by new loans, and capital borrowed from the British and
French paid for the large orders placed with British and French
industrial capital.

While the whole of Europe sighed and shrugged its shoulders at Ismails
crazy economy, European capital was in fact doing business in Egypt on a
unique and fantastic scale an incredible modern version of the biblical
legend about the fat kine which remains unparalleled in capitalist
history.

In the first place, there was an element of usury in every loan,
anything between one-fifth and one-third of the money ostensibly lent
sticking to the fingers of the European bankers. Ultimately, the
exorbitant interest had to be paid somehow, but how where were the means
to come from? Egypt herself was to supply them; their source was the
Egyptian fellahpeasant economy providing in the final analysis all the
most important elements for large-scale capitalist enterprise. He
provided the land since the so-called private estates of the Khedive
were quickly growing to vast dimensions by robbery and blackmail of
innumerable villages; and these estates were the foundations of the
irrigation projects and the speculation in cotton and sugar cane. As
forced labour, the fellah also provided the labour power and, what is
more, he was exploited without payment and even had to provide his own
means of subsistence while he was at work. The marvels of technique
which European engineers and European machines performed in the sphere
of Egyptian irrigation, transport, agriculture and industry were due to
this peasant economy with its fellaheen serfs. On the Kaliub Nile dams
and on the Suez Canal, in the cotton plantations and in the sugar
plants, untold masses of peasants were put to work; they were switched
over from one job to the next as the need arose, and they were exploited
to the limit of endurance and beyond. Although it became evident at
every step that there were technical limits to the employment of forced
labour for the purposes of modern capital, yet this was amply
compensated by capitals unrestricted power of command over the pool of
labour power, how long and under what conditions men were to work, live
and be exploited.

But not alone that it supplied land and labour power, peasant economy
also provided the money. Under the influence of capitalist economy, the
screws were put on the fellaheen by taxation. The tax on peasant
holdings was persistently increased. In the late sixties, it amounted to
£2 5_s._ per _hectare_, but not a farthing was levied on the enormous
private estates of the royal family. In addition, ever more special
rates were devised. Contributions of 2_s._ 6_d._ per _hectare_ had to be
paid for the maintenance of the irrigation system which almost
exclusively benefited the royal estates, and the fellah had to pay
1_s._ 4_d._ for every date tree felled, 9_d._ for every clay hovel in
which he lived. In addition, every male over 10 years of age was liable
to a head tax of 6_s._ 6_d._ The total paid by the fellaheen was £m. 2.5
under Mehemet Ali, £m. 5 under Said Pasha, and £m. 8.15 under Ismail
Pasha.

The greater the debt to European capital became, the more had to be
extorted from the peasants.⁽⁶⁾ In 1869 all taxes were put up by 10 per
cent and the taxes for the coming year collected in advance. In 1870, a
supplementary land tax of 8_s._ per _hectare_ was levied. All over Upper
Egypt people were leaving the villages, demolished their dwellings and
no longer tilled their land only to avoid payment of taxes. In 1876, the
tax on date palms was increased by 6_d._ Whole villages went out to fell
their date palms and had to be prevented by rifle volleys. North of
Siut, 10,000 fellaheen are said to have starved in 1879 because they
could no longer raise the irrigation tax for their fields and had killed
their cattle to avoid paying tax on it.⁽⁷⁾

Now the fellah had been drained of his last drop of blood. Used as a
leech by European capital, the Egyptian state had accomplished its
function and was no longer needed. Ismail, the Khedive, was given his
_congé_; capital could begin winding up operations.

Egypt had still to pay 394,000 Egyptian pounds as interest on the Suez
Canal shares for £m. 4 which England had bought in 1875. Now British
commissions to regulate the finances of Egypt went into action.
Strangely enough, European capital was not at all deterred by the
desperate state of the insolvent country and offered again and again to
grant immense loans for the salvation of Egypt. Cowe and Stokes proposed
a loan of £m. 76 at 9 per cent for the conversion of the total debt,
Rivers Wilson thought no less than £m. 503 would be necessary. The
_Crédit Foncier_ bought up floating bills of exchange by the million,
attempting, though without success, to consolidate the total debt by a
loan of £m. 91. With the financial position growing hopelessly
desperate, the time drew near when the country and all her productive
forces was to become the prey of European capital. October 1878 saw the
representatives of the European creditors landing in Alexandria. British
and French capital established dual control of finances and devised new
taxes; the peasants were beaten and oppressed, so that payment of
interest, temporarily suspended in 1876, could be resumed in 1877.⁽⁸⁾

Now the claims of European capital became the pivot of economic life and
the sole consideration of the financial system. In 1878, a new
commission and ministry were set up, both with a staff in which
Europeans made up one half. In 1879, the finances of Egypt were brought
under permanent control of European capital, exercised by the
_Commission de la Dette Publique Égyptienne_ in Cairo. In 1878, the
Tshiffiks, estates of the viceregal family, which comprised 431,100
acres, were converted into crown land and pledged to the European
capitalists as collateral for the public debt, and the same happened to
the Daira lands, the private estates of the Khedive, comprising 485,131
acres, mainly in Upper Egypt; this was, at a later date, sold to a
syndicate. The other estates for the greatest part fell to capitalist
companies, the Suez Canal Company in particular. To cover the cost of
occupation, England requisitioned ecclesiastical lands of the mosques
and schools. An opportune pretext for the final blow was provided by a
mutiny in the Egyptian army, starved under European financial control
while European officials were drawing excellent salaries, and by a
revolt engineered among the Alexandrian masses who had been bled white.
The British military occupied Egypt in 1882, as a result of twenty years
operations of Big Business, never to leave again. This was the ultimate
and final step in the process of liquidating peasant economy in Egypt by
and for European capital.⁽⁹⁾

It should now be clear that the transactions between European loan
capital and European industrial capital are based upon relations which
are extremely rational and sound for the accumulation of capital,
although they appear absurd to the casual observer because this loan
capital pays for the orders from Egypt and the interest on one loan is
paid out of a new loan. Stripped of all obscuring connecting links,
these relations consist in the simple fact that European capital has
largely swallowed up the Egyptian peasant economy. Enormous tracts of
land, labour, and labour products without number, accruing to the state
as taxes, have ultimately been converted into European capital and have
been accumulated. Evidently, only by use of the _kourbash_ could the
historical development which would normally take centuries be compressed
into two or three decades, and it was just the primitive nature of
Egyptian conditions which proved such fertile soil for the accumulation
of capital.

As against the fantastic increase of capital on the one hand, the other
economic result is the ruin of peasant economy together with the growth
of commodity exchange which is rooted in the supreme exertion of the
countrys productive forces. Under Ismails rule, the arable and reclaimed
land of Egypt grew from 5 to 6.75 million acres, the canal system from
45,625 to 54,375 miles and the permanent way from 256.25 to 1,638 miles.
Docks were built in Siut and Alexandria, magnificent dockyards in
Alexandria, a steamer-service for pilgrims to Mecca was introduced on
the Red Sea and along the coast of Syria and Asia Minor. Egypts exports
which in 1861 had amounted to 4,450,000 rose to £m. 14.4 in 1864; her
imports which under Said Pasha amounted to £m. 1.2 rose under Ismail to
between £m. 5 and £m. 5.5. Trade which recovered only in the eighties
from the opening up of the Suez Canal amounted to £m. 8.15 worth of
imports and £m. 12.45 worth of exports in 1890, but in 1900 the figures
were £m. 144 for imports and £m. 12.25 for exports, and in 1911
£m. 27.85 for imports and £m. 26.85 for exports. Thanks to this
development of commodity economy which expanded by leaps and bounds with
the assistance of European capital, Egypt herself had fallen a prey to
the latter. The case of Egypt, just as that of China and, more recently,
Morocco, shows militarism as the executor of the accumulation of
capital, lurking behind international loans, railroad building,
irrigation systems, and similar works of civilisation. The Oriental
states cannot develop from natural to commodity economy and further to
capitalist economy fast enough and are swallowed up by international
capital, since they cannot perform these transformations without selling
their souls to capital. Their feverish metamorphoses are tantamount to
their absorption by international capital.

Another good recent example is the deal made by German capital in
Asiatic Turkey. European capital, British capital in particular, had
already at an early date attempted to gain possession of this area which
marches with the ancient trade route between Europe and Asia.⁽¹⁰⁾

In the fifties and sixties, British capital built the railway lines
SmyrnaAydinDiner and SmyrnaKassab-Alasehir, obtained the concession to
extend the line to Afyon Karahisar and also leased the first tract for
the Anatolian railway AdaBazarIzmid. French capital gradually came to
acquire influence over part of the railway building during this time. In
1888, German capital appeared on the scene. It took up 60 per cent of
the shares in the new merger of international interests, negotiated
principally with the French capitalist group represented by the _Banque
Ottomane_. International capital took up the remaining 40 per cent.⁽¹¹⁾
The Anatolian Railway Company, a Turkish company, was founded on the
14th Redsheb of the year 1306 (March 4, 1889) with the _Deutsche Bank_
for principal backer, to take over the railway lines: between Ada-Bazar
and Izmid, running since the early seventies, as also the concession for
the IzmidEskisehirAngora line (25 miles). It was further entitled to
complete the AdaBazarScutari line and branch lines to Brussa, in
addition to building the supplementary network EskisehirKonya (278
miles) on the basis of the 1893 concession, and finally to run a service
from Angora to Kaisari (264 miles). The Turkish government gave the
company a state guarantee of annual gross earnings amounting to £412 per
_km._ on the Ada-Bazar line and of £600 per _km._ on the IzmidAngora
lines. For this purpose it wrote over to the _Administration de la Dette
Publique Ottomane_ the revenue from tithes in the _sandshaks_ of Izmid,
Ertoghrul, Kutalia and Angora, with which to make up the gross earnings
guaranteed by the government. For the Angora-Kaisari line the government
guaranteed annual gross earnings of 775 Turkish pounds, i.e. £712 per
_km._, and 604 Turkish pounds, i.e. approximately £550, provided, in the
latter case, that the supplementary grant per _km._ did not exceed 219
Turkish pounds (£200 a year). The government was to receive a quarter of
the eventual surplus of gross earnings over the guaranteed amount. The
_Administration de la Dette Publique Ottomane_ as executor of the
government guarantee collected the tithes of the _sandshaks_ Trebizonde
and Gumuchhane direct and aid the railway company out of a common fund
which was formed of all the tithes set aside for this purpose. In 1898,
the EskisehirKonya maximum grant was raised from 218 to 296 Turkish
pounds.

In 1899, the company obtained concessions to build and run a dockyard at
Ada-Bazar, to issue writs, to build corn-elevators and storerooms for
goods of every description, further the right to employ its own staff
for loading and unloading and, finally, in the sphere of customs policy,
the creation of a kind of free port.

In 1901, the company acquired a concession for the Baghdad railway
KonyaBaghdadBazraGulf of Persia (1,500 miles) which connects with the
Anatolian line by the KonyaAregliBulgurlu line. For taking up this
concession, a new limited company was founded which placed the order of
constructing the line, at first to Bulgurlu, with a Building Company
registered in Frankfort-on-the-Main.

Between 1893 and 1910, the Turkish government gave additional grants
£1,948,000 for the Ada-BazarAngora line and 1,800,000 Turkish pounds for
the EskisehirKonya line a total of £3,632,000.⁽¹²⁾ Finally, by the
concession of 1907, the company was empowered to drain the Karavirar
Lake and to irrigate the Konya plain, these works to be executed within
six years at government expense. In this instance, the company advanced
the government the necessary capital up to £780,000 at per cent
interest, repayable within thirty-six years. In return the Turkish
government pledged as securities:

1.  an annual sum of 25,000 Turkish pounds, payable from the surplus of
    the tithes fund assigned to the _Administration de la Dette Publique
    Ottomane_ to cover the railway grants and other obligations;
2.  the residual tithes over the last years in the newly irrigated
    regions;
3.  the net proceeds from the working of the irrigation systems, and
4.  the price of all reclaimed or irrigated land that was sold.

For the execution of this work, the Frankfort company had formed a
subsidiary company for the irrigation of the Konya plain with a capital
of £m. 5.4 to take this work in hand.

In 1908 the company obtained the concession for extending the Konya
railway as far as Baghdad and the Gulf of Persia, again with inclusion
of a guaranteed revenue.

To pay for this railway grant, a German Baghdad railway loan was taken
up in three instalments of £m. 216, £m. 432 and £m. 476 respectively, on
the security of the aggregate tithes for the _vilayets_ Aydin, Baghdad,
Mossul, Diarbekir, Ursa and Alleppo, and the sheep-tax in the _vilayets_
Konya, Adana, Aleppo, etc.⁽¹³⁾

The foundation of accumulation here becomes quite clear. German capital
builds railways, ports and irrigation works in Asiatic Turkey; in all
these enterprises it extorts new surplus value from the Asiatics whom it
employs as labour power. But this surplus value must be realised
together with the means of production from Germany, (railway materials;
machinery, etc.) How is it done? In part by commodity exchange which is
brought about by the railways, the dockyards, etc., and nurtured in Asia
Minor under conditions of natural economy. In part, i.e. in so far as
commodity exchange does not grow quickly enough for the needs of
capital, by using force, the machinery of the state, to convert the
national real income into commodities; these are turned into cash in
order to realise capital plus surplus value. That is the true object of
the revenue grants for independent enterprises run by foreign capital,
and of the collateral in the case of loans. In both instances so-called
tithes (_ueshur_), pledged in different ways, are paid in kind by the
Turkish peasant and these were gradually increased from about 12 to 12.5
per cent. The peasant in the Asiatic _vilayet_ must pay up or else his
tithe would simply be confiscated by the police and the central and
local authorities. These tithes, themselves a manifestation of ancient
Asiatic despotism based on natural economy, are not collected by the
Turkish government direct; but by tax-farmers not unlike the
tax-collectors of the _ancien régime_; that is to say the expected
returns from the levy in each _vilayet_ are separately auctioned by the
state to tax-farmers. They are bought by individual speculators or
syndicates who sell the tithes of each _sandshak_ (district) to other
speculators and these resell their shares to a whole number of smaller
agents. All these middlemen want to cover their expenses and make the
greatest possible profit, and thus, by the time they are actually
collected, the peasants contributions have swollen to enormous
dimensions. The tax-farmer will try to recoup himself for any mistake in
his calculations at the expense of the peasant, and the latter, nearly
always in debt, is impatient for the moment when he can sell his
harvest. But often, after cutting his corn, he cannot start threshing
for weeks, until indeed the tax-farmer deigns to take his due. His
entire harvest is about to rot in the fields, and the tax-farmer,
usually a grain merchant himself, takes advantage of this fact and
compels him to sell at a low price. These tax collectors know how to
enlist the support of the officials, especially the Muktars, the local
headmen, against complaining malcontents.⁽¹⁴⁾

Along with the taxes on salt, tobacco, spirits, the excise on silk, the
fishing dues, etc., the tithes are pledged with the _Conseil de
lAdministration de la Dette Publique Ottomane_ to serve as security for
the railway grant and the loans. In every case the _Conseil_ reserves to
itself the right to vet the tax-farmers contracts and stipulates for the
proceeds of the tithe to be paid directly into the coffers of its
regional offices. If no tax-farmer can be found, the tithes are stored
in kind by the Turkish government; the warehouse keys are deposited with
the _Conseil_ which then can sell the tithes on its own account.

Thus the economic metabolism between the peasants of Asia Minor, Syria
and Mesopotamia on the one hand and German capital on the other proceeds
in the following way: in the _vilayets_ Konya, Baghdad, Bazra, etc., the
grain comes into being as a simple use-product of primitive peasant
economy. It immediately falls to the tithe-farmer as a state levy. Only
then, in the hands of this latter, does it become a commodity, and, as
such, money which falls to the state. This money is nothing but
converted peasant grain; it was not even produced as a commodity. But
now, as a state guarantee, it serves towards paying for the construction
and operation of railways, i.e. to realise both the value of the means
of production and the surplus value extorted from the Asiatic peasants
and proletariat in the building and running of the railway. In this
process further means of production of German origin are used, and so
the peasant grain of Asia, converted into money, also serves to turn
into cash the surplus value that has been extorted from the German
workers. In the performance of these functions, the money rolls from the
hands of the Turkish government into the coffers of the _Deutsche Bank_,
and here it accumulates, as capitalist surplus value, in the form of
promoters profits, royalties, dividends and interests in the accounts of
Messrs. Gwinner, Siemens, Stinnes and their fellow directors, of the
shareholders and clients of the _Deutsche Bank_ and the whole intricate
system of its subsidiary companies. If there is no tax-farmer, as
provided in the concessions, then the complicated metamorphoses are
reduced to their most simple and obvious terms: the peasant grain passes
immediately to the _Administration de la Dette Publique Ottomane_, i.e.
to the representatives of European capital, and becomes already in its
natural form a revenue for German and other foreign capital: it realises
capitalist surplus value even before it has shed its use-form for the
Asiatic peasant, even before it has become a commodity and its own value
has been realised. This is a coarse and straightforward metabolism
between European capital and Asiatic peasant economy, with the Turkish
state reduced to its real role, that of a political machinery for
exploiting peasant economy for capitalist purposes, the real function,
this, of all Oriental states in the period of capitalist imperialism.
This business of paying for German goods with German capital in Asia is
not the absurd circle it seems at first, with the kind Germans allowing
the shrewd Turks merely the use of their great works of civilisation it
is at bottom an exchange between German capital and Asiatic peasant
economy, an exchange performed under state compulsion. On the one hand
it makes for progressive accumulation and expanding spheres of interest
as a pretext for further political and economic expansion of German
capital in Turkey. Railroad building and commodity exchange, on the
other hand, are fostered by the state on the basis of a rapid
disintegration, ruin and exploitation of Asiatic peasant economy in the
course of which the Turkish state becomes more and more dependent on
European capital, politically as well as financially.⁽¹⁵⁾

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾

  --
  --

⁽²⁾ Tugan Baranovski, STUDIES ON THE THEORY AND HISTORY OF COMMERCIAL
CRISES IN ENGLAND, p.74.

⁽³⁾ Sismondi, NOUVEAUX PRINCIPES ..., vol.i, book iv, chap.iv:
_Commercial Wealth Follows the Growth of Income_, pp.368-70.

⁽⁴⁾ Engineer Eyth, a representative of Fowlers, tells us: Now there was
a feverish exchange of telegrams between Cairo, London and Leeds. When
can Fowlers deliver 150 steam ploughs? _Answer:_ Working to capacity,
within one year. Not good enough. Expect unloading Alexandria by spring
150 steam ploughs. _A._: Impossible. The works at that time were barely
big enough to turn out 3 steam ploughs per week. N.B. a machine of this
type costs £2,500 so that the order involved £m. 3.75. Ismail Pashas
next wire: Quote cost immediate factory expansion. Viceroy willing foot
bill. You can imagine that Leeds made hay while the sun shone. And in
addition, other factories in England and France as well were made to
supply steam ploughs. The Alexandria warehouses, where goods destined
for the vice-regal estates were unloaded, were crammed to the roof with
boilers, wheels, drums wire-rope and all sorts of chests and boxes. The
second-rate hostelries of Cairo swarmed with newly qualified steam
ploughmen, promoted in a hurry from anvil or share-plough, young
hopefuls, fit for anything and nothing, since every steam plough must be
manned by at least an expert pioneer of civilization. Wagon loads of
this assorted cargo were sent into the interior, just so that the next
ship could unload. You cannot imagine in what condition they arrived at
their destination, or rather anywhere but their destination. Ten boilers
were lying on the banks of the Nile, and the machine to which they
belonged was ten miles thither. Here was a little heap of wire-rope, but
you had to travel another 20 hours to find the appropriate pulleys. In
one place an Englishman who was to set up the machines squatted desolate
and hungry, on a pile of French crates, and in another place the mate
had taken to native liquor in his despair. Effendis and Katibs, invoking
the help of Allah, rushed to and fro between Siut and Alexandria and
compiled endless lists of items the names of which they did not even
know. And yet, in the end, some of this apparatus was set in motion in
Upper Egypt, the ploughs belched steam civilisation and progress had
made another step forward (LEBENDIGE KRÄFTE, 7 VORTRÄGE AUS DEM GEBIETE
DER TECHNIK, Berlin 1908, p.21)

⁽⁵⁾ Cf. Evelyn Baring, Earl of Cromer, _Egypt Today_ (London 1908),
vol.i, p.11.

⁽⁶⁾ Incidentally, the money wrested from the Egyptian fellah further
fell, by way of Turkey, to European capital. The Turkish loans of 1854,
1855, 1871, 1877 and 1886 were based on the contributions from Egypt
which were increased several times and paid direct into the Bank of
England.

⁽⁷⁾ It is stated by residents in the Delta, reports THE TIMES of March
31, 1879, that the third quarter of the years taxation is now collected,
and the old methods of collection applied. This sounds strangely by the
side of the news that people are starving by the roadside, that great
tracts of country are uncultivated, because of the physical burdens, and
that the farmers have sold their cattle, the women their finery, and
that the usurers are filling the mortgage offices with their bonds, and
the courts with their suits of foreclosure (quoted by Th. Rothstein,
EGYPTS RUIN, 1910, pp.69-70).

⁽⁸⁾ This produce, wrote the correspondent of THE TIMES from Alexandria,
consists wholly of taxes paid by the peasants in kind, and when one
thinks of the poverty-stricken, overdriven, under-paid fellaheen in
their miserable hovels, working late and early to fill the pockets of
the creditors, the punctual payment of the coupon ceases to be wholly a
subject of gratification (quoted by Rothstein, OP. CIT., p.49).

⁽⁹⁾ Eyth, an outstanding exponent of capitalist civilisation in the
primitive countries, characteristically concludes his masterly sketch on
Egypt, from which we have taken the main data, with the following
imperialist articles of faith: What we have learnt from the past also
holds true for the future. Europe must and will lay firm hands upon
those countries which can no longer keep up with modern conditions on
their own, though this will not be possible without all kinds of
struggle, when the difference between right and wrong will become
blurred, then political and historical justice will often enough mean
disaster for millions and their salvation depend upon what is
politically wrong. All the world over, the strongest hand will make an
end to confusion, and so it will even on the banks of the Nile (OP.
CIT., p.247). Rothstein has made it clear enough what kind of order the
British created on the banks of the Nile.

⁽¹⁰⁾ Already in the early twenties of the last century, the Anglo-Indian
government commissioned Colonel Chesney to investigate the navigability
of the River Euphrates in order to establish the shortest possible
connection between the Mediterranean and the Persian Gulf, resp. India.
After detailed preparations and a preliminary reconnaissance in winter
1831, the expedition proper set out in 1835/7. In due course, British
staff and officials investigated and surveyed a wider area in Eastern
Mesopotamia. These efforts dragged on until 1866 without any useful
results for the British government. But at a later date Great Britain
returned to the plan of connecting the Mediterranean with India by way
of the Gulf of Persia, though in a different form, i.e. the Tigris
railway project. In 1879, Cameron travelled through Mesopotamia for the
British government to study the lay of the land for the projected
railway (Max Freiherr v. Oppenheim, VOM MITTELMEER ZUM PERSISCHEN GOLF
DURCH DEN HAURAN, DIE SYRISCHE WÜSTE UND MESOPOTAMIEN, vol.ii, pp.5 and
36)

⁽¹¹⁾ S. Schneider, DIE DEUTSCHE BAGDADBAHN (1900), p.3.

⁽¹²⁾ Saling, BÖRSENJAHRBUCH 1911/12, p.2211.

⁽¹³⁾ Saling, OP. CIT., pp.360-1. Engineer Pressel of Württemberg, who as
assistant to Baron v. Hirsch was actively engaged in these transactions
in European Turkey, neatly accounts for the total grants towards railway
building in Turkey which European capital wrested from the Turkish
government:

  --
  --

All this refers only to the period before 1899; not until that date were
the revenue grants paid in part. The tithes of no less than 28 out of
the 74 _sandshaks_ in Asiatic Turkey had been pledged for the revenue
grants, and with these grants; between 1856 and 1900, a grand total of
1,516 miles of rails had been laid down in Asiatic Turkey. Pressel, the
expert, by the way gives an instance of the underhand methods employed
by the railway company at Turkish expense; he states that under the 1893
agreement the Anatolian company promised to run the railway, to Baghdad
via Angora, but later decided that this plan of theirs would not work
and, having qualified for the guarantee, left the line to its fate and
got busy with another route via Konya.

No sooner have the companies succeeded in acquiring the SmyrnaAydinDiner
line, than they will demand the extension of this line to Konya, and the
moment these branch lines are completed, the companies will move heaven
and earth to force the goods traffic to use these new routes for which
there are no guarantees, and which, more important still, need never
share their takings, whereas the other lines must pay part of their
surplus to the government, once their gross revenue exceeds a certain
amount. In consequence, the government will gain nothing by the Aydin
fine, and the companies will make millions. The government will foot the
bill for practically the entire revenue guarantee for the KassabaAngora
line, and can never hope to profit by its contracted, 25 per cent share
in the surplus above £600 gross takings (W.V. Pressel, LES CHEMINS DE
FER EN TURQUIE DASIE (Zurich 1900), p.7).

⁽¹⁴⁾ Charles Moravitz, DIE TÜRKEI IM SPIEGEL IHRER FINANZEN (1903),
p.84.

⁽¹⁵⁾ Incidentally, in this country everything is difficult and
complicated. If the government wishes to create a monopoly in cigarette
paper or playing cards, France and Austro-Hungary immediately are on the
spot to veto the project in the interest of their trade. If the issue is
oil, Russia will raise objections, and even the Powers who are least
concerned will make their agreement dependent on some other agreement.
Turkeys fate is that of Sancho Panza and his dinner: as soon as the
minister of finance wishes to do anything, some diplomat gets up,
interrupts him and throws a veto in his teeth (Moravitz, OP. CIT.,
p.70).

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 12.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Three The Historical Conditions of Accumulation

 



CHAPTER 31 PROTECTIVE TARIFFS AND ACCUMULATION


 

IMPERIALISM is the political expression of the accumulation of capital
in its competitive struggle for what remains still open of the
non-capitalist environment. Still the largest part of the world in terms
of geography, this remaining field for the expansion of capital is yet
insignificant as against the high level of development already attained
by the productive forces of capital; witness the immense masses of
capital accumulated in the old countries which seek an outlet for their
surplus product and strive to capitalise their surplus value, and the
rapid change-over to capitalism of the pre-capitalist civilisations. On
the international stage, then, capital must take appropriate measures.
With the high development of the capitalist countries and their
increasingly severe competition in acquiring non-capitalist areas,
imperialism grows in lawlessness and violence, both in aggression
against the non-capitalist world and in ever more serious conflicts
among the competing capitalist countries. But the more violently,
ruthlessly and thoroughly imperialism brings about the decline of
non-capitalist civilisations, the more rapidly it cuts the very ground
from under the feet of capitalist accumulation. Though imperialism is
the historical method for prolonging the career of capitalism, it is
also a sure means of bringing it to a swift conclusion. This is not to
say that capitalist development must be actually driven to this extreme:
the mere tendency towards imperialism of itself takes forms which make
the final phase of capitalism a period of catastrophe.

Classical economics, in its period of storm and stress, had had high
hopes of a peaceful development of the accumulation of capital and of a
trade and industry which can only prosper in times of peace, evolving
the orthodox Manchester ideology of the harmony of interests among the
worlds commercial nations on the one hand, and between capital and
labour on the other. These hopes were apparently justified in Europe by
the short period of Free Trade in the sixties and seventies, which was
based upon the mistaken doctrine of the English Free Traders that the
only theoretical and practical condition for the accumulation of capital
is commodity exchange, that the two are identical. As we have seen,
Ricardo and his whole school identified accumulation and its
reproductive conditions with simple commodity production and the
conditions of simple commodity circulation. This was soon to become even
more obvious in the practices of the common Free Trader. The special
interests of the exporting Lancashire cotton manufacturers in Manchester
determined the entire line of argument of the Cobden League. Their
principal object was to get markets, and it became an article of faith:
Buy from foreign countries and thus in turn sell our industrial product,
our cotton goods, on the new markets. Cobden and Bright demanded Free
Trade and cheaper foodstuffs in particular in the interest of
consumption; but the consumer was not the worker who eats the bread, but
the capitalist who consumes labour power.

This teaching never expressed the interests of capitalist accumulation
as a whole. In England herself it was given the lie already in the
forties, when the harmony of interests of the commercial nations in the
East were proclaimed to the sound of gunfire in the Opium Wars which
ultimately, by the annexation of Hongkong, brought about the very
opposite of such harmony, a system of spheres of interest.⁽¹⁾ On the
European Continent, Free Trade in the sixties did not represent the
interests of industrial capital, because the foremost Free Trade
countries of the Continent were still predominantly agrarian with a
comparatively feeble development of industry. Rather, the policy of Free
Trade was implemented as a means for the political reconstruction of the
Central European states. In Germany, under Bismarck and Manteuffel, it
was a peculiarly Prussian lever for ousting Austria from the _Bund_ and
the _Zollverein_ and to set up the new German Empire under Prussian
leadership. Economically speaking, the mainstays of Free Trade were in
this case the interests both of commercial capital, especially in the
Hansa towns to whom international trade was vital, and of agrarian
consumers; among industry proper, it was otherwise. The iron industry
was won over only with difficulty and in exchange for the abolition of
the Rhine tolls. But the cotton industry in Southern Germany remained
irreconcilable and clung to protective tariffs. In France, most favoured
nations clause agreements, the basis of the Free Trade system all over
Europe, were concluded by Napoleon III without the consent, and even
against the will, of parliament, industrialists and agrarians, who
constituted an absolute majority, being in favour of protective tariffs.
The government of the Second Empire only took the course of commercial
treaties as an emergency measure Britain accepted it as such in order to
get round political opposition in France and to establish Free Trade
behind the back of the legislature by international action. The first
principal treaty between England and France simply rode rough-shod over
public opinion in France.⁽²⁾ Two imperial decrees abolished the old
system of French protective tariffs which had been in force from 1853 to
1862. With scant observance of the formalities they were ratified in
1863. In Italy, Free Trade was a prop of Cavours policy, depending as it
did on French support. Under pressure of public opinion, an inquiry was
made in 1870 which revealed that those most intimately concerned were
hostile to the policy of Free Trade. In Russia, finally, the tendency
towards Free Trade in the sixties was but the first step towards
creating a broad basis for commodity economy and industry on a large
scale, coming at the same time as the abolition of serfdom and the
construction of a railway network. ⁽³⁾

Thus the very inception of an international system of Free Trade shows
it to be just a passing phase in the history of capitalist accumulation,
and it shows up the fallacy of attributing the general reversion to
protective tariffs after the seventies simply to a defensive reaction
against English Free Trade.⁽⁴⁾

Such an explanation is vitiated by the fact that both in Germany and
France the leaders in the reversion to protective tariffs were the
agrarian interests, that the measures were directed not against British
but against American competition, and that not England but Germany
constituted the chief danger to the rising home industry in Russia, and
France to that in Italy. Nor was Britains monopoly the cause for the
world-wide depression which prevailed since the seventies and induced
the desire for protective tariffs. We must look deeper for the reasons
responsible for the change of front on the question of protective
tariffs. The doctrine of Free Trade with its delusion about the harmony
of interests on the world market corresponded with an outlook which
conceived of everything in terms of commodity exchange. It was abandoned
just as soon as big industrial capital had become sufficiently
established in the principal countries of the European Continent to look
to the conditions for its accumulation. As against the mutual interests
of capitalist countries, these latter bring to the fore the antagonism
engendered by the competitive struggle for the non-capitalist
environment.

When the Free Trade era opened, Eastern Asia was only just being made
accessible by the Chinese wars, and European capital had but begun to
make headway in Egypt. In the eighties the policy of expansion became
ever stronger, together with a policy of protective tariffs. There was
an uninterrupted succession of events during the eighties: the British
occupation of Egypt, Germanys colonial conquests in Africa, the French
occupation of Tunisia together with the Tonkin expedition, Italys
advances in Assab and Massawa, the Abyssinian war and the creation of a
separate Eritrea, and the English conquests in South Africa. The clash
between Italy and France over the Tunisian sphere of interest was the
characteristic prelude to the Franco-Italian tariff war seven years
later, by which drastic epilogue an end was made to the Free Trade
harmony of interests on the European Continent. To monopolise the
non-capitalist areas at home and abroad became the war-cry of capital,
while the free-trade policy of the open door specifically represented
the peculiar helplessness of non-capitalist countries in the face of
international capital and the natural equilibrium which was aimed at by
its competition in the preliminary stage of the partial or total
occupation of these areas as colonies or spheres of interest. As the
oldest capitalist Empire, England alone could so far remain loyal to
Free Trade, primarily because she had long had immense possessions of
non-capitalist areas as a basis for operations which afforded her almost
unlimited opportunities for capitalist accumulation. Until recently, she
had thus in fact been beyond the competition of other capitalist
countries. These, in turn, universally strove to become self sufficient
behind a barrier of protective tariffs; yet they buy one anothers
commodities and come to depend ever more one upon another for
replenishing their material conditions of reproduction. Indeed,
protective tariffs have by now completely lost their use for technical
development of the productive forces, all too often being the instrument
for the artificial conservation of obsolete productive methods. The
inherent contradictions of an international policy of protective
tariffs, exactly like the dual character of the international loan
system, are just a reflection of the historical antagonism which has
developed between the dual interests of accumulation: expansion, the
realisation and capitalisation of surplus value on the one hand, and, on
the other, an outlook which conceives of everything purely in terms of
commodity exchange.

This fact is evidenced particularly in that the modern system of high
protective tariffs, required by colonial expansion and the increasing
inner tension of the capitalist medium, was also instituted with a view
to increasing armaments. The reversion to protective tariffs was carried
through in Germany as well as in France, Italy, and Russia, together
with, and in the interests of, an expansion of the armed services, as
the basis for the European competition in armaments which was developing
at that time, first on land, and then also at sea. European Free Trade,
with its attendant continental system of infantry, had been superseded
by protective tariffs as the foundation and supplement of an imperialist
system with a strong bias towards naval power.

Thus capitalist accumulation as a whole, as an actual historical
process, has two different aspects. One concerns the commodity market
and the place where surplus value is produced the factory, the mine, the
agricultural estate. Regarded in this light, accumulation is a purely
economic process, with its most important phase a transaction between
the capitalist and wage labourer. In both its phases, however, it is
confined to the exchange of equivalents and remains within the limits of
commodity exchange. Here, in form at any rate, peace, property and
equality prevail, and the keen dialectics of scientific analysis were
required to reveal how the right of ownership changes in the course of
accumulation into appropriation of other peoples property, how commodity
exchange turns into exploitation and equality becomes class-rule.

The other aspect of the accumulation of capital concerns the relations
between capitalism and the non-capitalist modes of production which
start making their appearance on the international stage. Its
predominant methods are colonial policy, an international loan system a
policy of spheres of interest and war. Force, fraud, oppression, looting
are openly displayed without any attempt at concealment, and it requires
an effort to discover within this tangle of political violence and
contests of power the stern laws of the economic process.

Bourgeois liberal theory takes into account only the former aspect: the
realm of peaceful competition, the marvels of technology and pure
commodity exchange; it separates it strictly from the other aspect: the
realm of capitals blustering violence which is regarded as more or less
incidental to foreign policy and quite independent of the economic
sphere of capital.

In reality, political power is nothing but a vehicle for the economic
process. The conditions for the reproduction of capital provide the
organic link between these two aspects of the accumulation of capital.
The historical career of capitalism can only be appreciated by taking
them together. Sweating blood and filth with every pore from head to toe
characterises not only the birth of capital but also its progress in the
world at every step, and thus capitalism prepares its own downfall under
ever more violent contortions and convulsions.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾ And not only in England. Even in 1859, a pamphlet, ascribed to
Diergardt of Viersen, a factory owner, was disseminated all over
Germany, urging that country to make sure of the East-Asiatic markets in
good time. It advocated the display of military force as the only means
for getting commercial advantages from the Japanese and the Eastern
Asiatic nations in general. A German fleet, built with the peoples small
savings, had been a youthful dream, long since brought under the hammer
by Hannibal Fischer. Though Prussia had a few ships, her naval power was
not impressive. But in order to enter into commercial negotiations with
Eastern Asia, it was decided to equip a ship. Graf zu Eulenburg, one of
the ablest and most prudent Prussian statesmen, was appointed chief of
this mission which also had scientific objects. Under most difficult
conditions he carried out his commission with great skill, and though
the plan for simultaneous negotiations with the Hawaiian islands had to
be given up, the mission was otherwise successful. Though the Berlin
press of that time knew better, declaring whenever a new difficulty was
reported, that it was only to be expected, and denouncing all
expenditure on naval demonstrations as a waste of the taxpayers money,
the ministry of the new era remained steadfast, and the harvest of
success was reaped by the ministry that followed (W. Lotz, DIE IDEEN DER
DEUTSCHEN HANDELSPOLITIK, p.80).

⁽²⁾ Following on the preliminary discussion between Michel Chevalier
and. Richard Cobden on behalf of the French and English governments,
official negotiations were shortly entered upon and were conducted with
the greatest secrecy. On January 1, 1860, Napoleon III announced his
intentions in a memorandum addressed to M. Fould, the Minister of State.
This declaration came like a bolt from the blue. After the events of the
past year, the general belief was that no attempt would be made to
modify the tariff system before 1861. Feelings ran high, but all the
same the treaty was signed on January 23 (Auguste Devers, _La politique
commerciale de la France Depuis 1860_, SCHRIFTEN DES VEREINS FÜR
SOZIALPOLITIK, vol.51, p.136).

⁽³⁾ Between 1857 and 1868, the revision along liberal lines of the
Russian tariffs and the ultimate writing-off of the insane system of
_kantrin_ with regard to protective tariffs were a manifestation and
corollary of the progressive reforms which the disastrous Crimean wars
had made inevitable. But the reduction of customs duties reflected the
concern of the landowning gentry who, both as consumers of foreign goods
and as producers of grain for export, were interested in unrestricted
commerce between Russia and Western Europe. The champion of agrarian
interests, the Free Economic Association stated:

During the last sixty years, between 1822 and 1882, agriculture, Russias
largest producer, was brought to a precarious position owing to four
great setbacks. These could in every case be directly attributed to
excessive tariffs. On the other hand, the thirty-two years between 1845
and 1877 when tariffs were moderate went by without any such emergency,
in spite of three foreign wars and one civil war [meaning the Polish
insurrection of 1863 _R.L._], every one of which proved a greater or
less strain on the financial resources of the state (MEMORANDUM OF THE
IMPERIAL FREE ECONOMIC ASSOCIATION ON REVISING RUSSIAN TARIFFS, St.
Petersburg 1890, p.148).

As late as the nineties, then, the scientific spokesman of the Free
Trade Movement, the said Free Economic Association, had to agitate
against protective tariffs as a contrivance to transplant capitalist
industry to Russia. In a reactionary populist spirit, it denounced
capitalism as a breeding ground for the modern proletariat, those masses
of shiftless people without home or property who have nothing to lose
and have long been in ill repute (p.191). This is proof enough that
until most recent times the Russian champions of Free Trade, or at least
of moderate tariffs, did not to any appreciable extent represent the
interests of industrial capital. Cf. also K. Lodyshenski: THE HISTORY OF
THE RUSSIAN TARIFFS, St. Petersburg 1886, pp.239-58.

⁽⁴⁾ This is also the opinion of F. Engels. In one of his letters to
Nikolayon, on June 18, 1892, he writes:

English authors, blinded by their patriotic interests, completely fail
to grasp why the whole world so stubbornly rejects Englands example of
free trade and adopts in its place the principle of protective tariffs.
Of course, they simply dare not admit even to themselves that the system
of protective tariffs, by now almost universal, is merely a defensive
measure against English free trade which was instrumental in perfecting
Englands industrial monopoly. Such a defence policy may be more or less
reasonable in some cases it is downright stupid, as for instance in
Germany who under the system of free trade had become a great industrial
power and now imposes protective tariffs on agricultural products and
raw materials, thus increasing the cost of her industrial production. In
my view this universal reversion to protective tariffs is not a mere
accident but the reaction against Englands intolerable industrial
monopoly. The form which this reaction takes, as I said before, may be
wrong, inadequate and even worse, but its historical necessity seems to
me quite clear and obvious (LETTERS OF KARL MARX AND FREDERICK ENGELS TO
NIKOLAYON, St. Petersburg 1908, p.71).

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 12.12.2008

Rosa Luxemburg The Accumulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Section Three The Historical Conditions of Accumulation

 



CHAPTER 32 MILITARISM AS A PROVINCE OF ACCUMULATION


 

MILITARISM fulfils a quite definite function in the history of capital,
accompanying as it does every historical phase of accumulation. It plays
a decisive part in the first stages of European capitalism, in the
period of the so-called primitive accumulation, as a means of conquering
the New World and the spice-producing countries of India. Later, it is
employed to subject the modern colonies, to destroy the social
organisations of primitive societies so that their means of production
may be appropriated, forcibly to introduce commodity trade in countries
where the social structure had been unfavourable to it, and to turn the
natives into a proletariat by compelling them to work for wages in the
colonies. It is responsible for the creation and expansion of spheres of
interest for European capital in non-European regions, for extorting
railway concessions in backward countries, and for enforcing the claims
of European capital as international lender. Finally, militarism is a
weapon in the competitive struggle between capitalist countries for
areas of non-capitalist civilisation.

In addition, militarism has yet another important function. From the
purely economic point of view, it is a pre-eminent means for the
realisation of surplus value; it is in itself a province of
accumulation. In examining the question who should count as a buyer for
the mass of products containing the capitalised surplus value, we have
again and again refused to consider the state and its organs as
consumers. Since their income is derivative, they were all taken to
belong to the special category of those who live on the surplus value
(or partly on the wage of labour), together with the liberal professions
and the various parasites of present-day society (king, professor,
prostitute, mercenary). But this interpretation will only do on two
assumptions: first, if we take it, in accordance with Marxs diagram,
that the state has no other sources of taxation than capitalist surplus
value and wages,⁽¹⁾ and secondly, if we regard the state and its organs
as consumers pure and simple. If the issue turns on the personal
consumption of the state organs (as also of the mercenary) the point is
that consumption is partly transferred from the working class to the
hangers-on of the capitalist class, in so far as the workers foot the
bill.

Let us assume for a moment that the indirect taxes extorted from the
workers, which mean a curtailment of their consumption, are used
entirely to pay the salaries of the state officials and to provision the
regular army. There will then be no change in the reproduction of social
capital as a whole. Both Departments II and I remain constant because
society as a whole still demands the same kind of products and in the
same quantities. Only _v_ as the commodity of labour power has changed
in value in relation to the products of Department II, i.e. in relation
to the means of subsistence. This _v_, the same amount of money
representing labour power, is now exchanged for a smaller amount of
means of subsistence. What happens to the products of Department II
which are then left over? Instead of the workers, the state officials
and the regular army now receive them. The organs of the capitalist
state take over the workers consumption on the same scale exactly.
Although the conditions of reproduction have remained stable, there has
been a redistribution of the total product. Part of the products of
Department II, originally intended entirely for the consumption of the
workers as equivalent for _v_, is now allocated to the hangers-on of the
capitalist class for consumption. From the point of view of social
reproduction, it is as if the relative surplus value had in the first
place been larger by a certain amount which is added on to the
consumption of the capitalist class and its hangers-on.

So far the crude exploitation, by the mechanism of indirect taxation, of
the working class for the support of the capitalist states officials
amounts merely to an increase of the surplus value, of that part of it,
that is to say, which is consumed. The difference is that this further
splitting off of surplus value from variable capital only comes later,
after the exchange between capital and labour has been accomplished. But
the consumption by the organs of the capitalist state has no bearing on
the realisation of _capitalised_ surplus value, because the additional
surplus value for this consumption even though it comes about at the
workers expense is created afterwards. On the other hand, if the workers
did not pay for the greater part of the state officials upkeep the
capitalists themselves would have to bear the entire cost of it. A
corresponding portion of their surplus value would have to be assigned
directly to keeping the organs of their class-rule, either at the
expense of production which would have to be curtailed accordingly, or,
which is more probable, it would come from the surplus value intended
for their consumption. The capitalists would have to capitalise on a
smaller scale because of having to contribute more towards the immediate
preservation of their own class. In so far as they shift onto the
working class (and also the representatives of simple commodity
production, such as peasants and artisans) the principal charge of their
hangers-on, the capitalists have a larger portion of surplus value
available for capitalisation. But as yet _no opportunities for such
capitalisation_ have come into being, no new market, that is to say, for
the surplus value that has become available, in which it could produce,
and realise new commodities. But when the monies concentrated in the
exchequer by taxation are used for the production of armaments, the
picture is changed.

With indirect taxation and high protective tariffs the bill of
militarism is footed mainly by the working class and the peasants. The
two kinds of taxation must be considered separately. From an economic
point of view, it amounts to the following, as far as the working class
is concerned: provided that wages are not raised to make up for the
higher price of foodstuffs which is at present the fate of the greatest
part of the working class, including even the minority that is organised
in trade unions, owing to the pressure of cartels and employers
organisations⁽²⁾ indirect taxation means that part of the purchasing
power of the working class is transferred to the state. Now as before
the variable capital, as a fixed amount of money, will put in motion an
appropriate quantity of living labour, that is to say it serves to
employ the appropriate quantity of constant capital in production and to
produce the corresponding amount of surplus value. As soon as capital
has completed this cycle, it is divided between the working class and
the state: the workers surrender the state part of the money they
received as wages. Capital has wholly appropriated the former variable
capital in its material form, as labour power, but the working class
retains only part of the variable capital in the form of money, the
state claiming the rest. And this invariably happens after capital has
run its cycle between capitalist and worker; it takes place, as it were,
behind the back of capital, at no point impinging direct on the vital
stages of the circulation of capital and the production of surplus
value, so that it is no immediate concern of the latter. But all the
same it does affect the conditions for the reproduction of capital as a
whole. The transfer of some of the purchasing power from the working
class to the state entails a proportionate decrease in the consumption
of means of subsistence by the working class. For capital as a whole, it
means producing a smaller quantity of consumer goods for the working
class, provided that both variable capital (in the form of money and as
labour power) and the mass of appropriated surplus value remain
constant, so that the workers get a smaller share of the aggregate
product. In the process of reproduction of the entire capital, then,
means of subsistence will be produced in amounts smaller than the value
of the variable capital, because of the shift in the ratio between the
value of the variable capital and the quantity of means of subsistence
in which it is realised, with the money wages of labour remaining
constant, according to our premise, or at any rate not rising
sufficiently to offset the increase in the price of foodstuffs. This
increase represents the level of indirect taxation.

How will the material relations of reproduction be adjusted? When fewer
means of subsistence are needed for the renewal of labour power, a
corresponding amount of constant capital and living labour becomes
available which can now be used for producing other commodities in
response to a new effective demand arising within society. It arises
from the side of the state which has appropriated, by way of tax
legislation, the part wanting of the workers purchasing power. This
time, however, the state does not demand means of subsistence (after all
that has already been said under the heading of third persons, we shall
here ignore the demand for means of subsistence for state officials
which is also satisfied out of taxes) but it requires a special kind of
product, namely the militarist weapons of war on land and at sea.

Again we take Marxs second diagram of accumulation as the basis for
investigating the ensuing changes in social reproduction:

  -------------------------------------------------------------------
   I. 5,000_c_ + 1,000_v_ + 1,000_s_ = 7,000 means of production
  II. 1,430_c_ +    285_v_ +    285_s_ = 2,000 means of subsistence

  -------------------------------------------------------------------

Now let us suppose that, owing to indirect taxation and the consequent
increase in the price of means of subsistence, the working class as a
whole reduces consumption by, say, a 100 value units of the real wages.
As before, the workers receive 1,000_v_ + 285_v_ = 1,285_v_ in money,
but for this money they only get means of subsistence to the value of
1185. The 100 units which represent the tax increase in the price of
foodstuffs go to the state which receives in addition military taxes
from the peasants, etc., to the value of 150 units, bringing the total
up to 250. This total constitutes a new demand the demand for armaments.
At present, however, we are only interested in the 100 units taken from
the workers wages. This demand for armaments to the value of 100 must be
satisfied by the creation of an appropriate branch of production which
requires a constant capital of 71.5 and a variable capital of 14.25,
assuming the average organic composition outlined in Marxs diagram.

  ----------------------------------------------------
  71.5_c_ + 14.25_v_ + 14.25_s_ = 100 weapons of war
  ----------------------------------------------------

This new branch of production further requires that 71.5 means of
production be produced and about 13 means of subsistence, because, of
course, the real wages of the workers are also less by about
one-thirteenth.

You could counter by saying that the profit accruing to capital from
this new expansion of demand is merely on paper, because the cut in the
actual consumption of the working class will inevitably result in a
corresponding curtailment of the means of subsistence produced. It will
take the following form for Department II:

  -------------------------------------
  71.5_c_ + 14.25_v_ + 14.25_s_ = 100
  -------------------------------------

In addition, Department I will also have to contract accordingly, so
that, owing to the decreasing consumption of the working class, the
equations for both departments will be:

  ---------------------------------------------------
   I. 4,949_c_    + 989.75_v_ + 989.75_s_ = 6,928.5
  II. 1,358.5_c_ + 270.75_v_ + 270.75_s_ = 1,900

  ---------------------------------------------------

If, by the mediation of the state, the same 100 units now call forth
armament production of an equal volume with a corresponding fillip to
the production of producer goods, this is at first sight only an
extraneous change in the material forms of social production: instead of
a quantity of means of subsistence a quantity of armaments is now being
produced. Capital has won with the left hand only what it has lost with
the right. Or we might say that the large number of capitalists
producing means of subsistence have lost the effective demand in favour
of a small group of big armament manufacturers.

But this picture is only valid for individual capital. Here it makes no
difference indeed whether production engages in one sphere of activity
or another. As far as the individual capitalist is concerned, there are
no departments of total production such as the diagram distinguishes.
There are only commodities and buyers, and it is completely immaterial
to him whether he produces instruments of life or instruments of death,
corned beef or armour plating.

Opponents of militarism frequently appeal to this point of view to show
that military supplies as an economic investment for capital merely put
profit taken from one capitalist into the pocket of another.⁽³⁾ On the
other hand, capital and its advocates try to overpersuade the working
class to this point of view by talking them into the belief that
indirect taxes and the demand of the state would only bring about a
change in the material form of reproduction; instead of other
commodities cruisers and guns would be produced which would give the
workers as good a living, if not a better one.

One glance at the diagram shows how little truth there is in this
argument as far as the workers are concerned. To make comparison easier,
we will suppose the armament factories to employ just as many workers as
were employed before in the production of means of subsistence for the
working class. 1,285 units will then be paid out a wages, but now they
will only buy 1,185s worth of means of subsistence.

All this looks different from the perspective of capital as a whole. For
this the 100 at the disposal of the state, which represent the demand
for armaments, constitute a new market. Originally this money was
variable capital and as such it has done its job, it has been exchanged
for living labour which produced the surplus value. But then the
circulation of the variable capital was stopped short, this money was
split off, and it now appears as a new purchasing power in the
possession of the state. It has been created by sleight of hand, as it
were, but still it has the same effects as a newly opened market. Of
course for the time being capital is debarred from selling 100 units of
consumer goods for the working class, and the individual capitalist
considers the worker just as good a consumer and buyer of commodities as
anyone else, another capitalist, the state, the peasant, foreign
countries, etc. But let us not forget that for capital as a whole the
upkeep of the working class is only a necessary evil, only a means
towards the real end of production: the creation and realisation of
surplus value. If it were possible to extort surplus value without
giving labour an equal measure of means of subsistence, it would be all
the better for business. To begin with indirect taxation has the same
effects as if the price of foodstuffs remaining constant the capitalists
had succeeded in depressing wages by a hundred units without detracting
from the work performed, seeing that a lower output of consumer goods is
equally the inevitable result of continuous wage cuts. If wages are cut
heavily, capital does not worry about having to produce fewer means of
subsistence for the workers, in fact it delights in this practice at
every opportunity; similarly, capital as a whole does not mind if the
effective demand of the working class for means of subsistence is
curtailed because of indirect taxation which is not compensated by a
rise in wages. This may seem strange because in the latter case the
balance of the variable capital goes to the exchequer, while with a
direct wage cut it remains in the capitalists pockets and commodity
prices remaining equal increases the relative surplus value. But a
continuous and universal reduction of money wages can only be carried
through on rare occasions, especially if trade union organisation is
highly developed. There are strong social and political barriers to this
fond aspiration of capital. Depression of the real wage by means of
indirect taxation, on the other hand, can be carried through promptly,
smoothly and universally, and it usually takes time for protests to be
heard; and besides, the opposition is confined to the political field
and has no immediate economic repercussions. The subsequent restriction
in the production of means of subsistence does not represent a loss of
markets for capital as a whole but rather a saving in the costs of
producing surplus value. Surplus value is never realised by producing
means of subsistence for the workers however necessary this may be, as
the reproduction of living labour, for the production of surplus value.

But to come back to our example:

  -------------------------------------------------------------------
   I. 5,000_c_ + 1,000_v_ + 1,000_s_ = 7,000 means of production
  II. 1,430_c_ +    285_v_ +    285_s_ = 2,000 means of subsistence

  -------------------------------------------------------------------

At first it looks as if Department II were also creating and realising
surplus value in the process of producing means of subsistence for the
workers, and Department I by producing the requisite means of
production. But if we take the social product as a whole, the illusion
disappears. The equation is in that case:

  ----------------------------------------
  6,430_c_ + 1,285_v_ + 1,285_s_ = 9,000
  ----------------------------------------

Now, if the means of subsistence for the workers are cut by 100 units,
the corresponding contraction of both departments will give us the
following equations:

  ---------------------------------------------------
   I. 4,949_c_    + 989.75_v_ + 989.75_s_ = 6,928.5
  II. 1,358.5_c_ + 270.75_v_ + 270.75_s_ = 1,900

  ---------------------------------------------------

and for the social product as a whole:

  ------------------------------------------------
  6,307.5_c_ + 1,260.5_v_ + 1,260.5_s_ = 8,828.5
  ------------------------------------------------

This looks like a general decrease in both the total volume of
production and in the production of surplus value but only if we
contemplate just the abstract quantities of value in the composition of
the total product; it does not hold good for the material composition
thereof. Looking closer, we find that nothing but the upkeep of labour
is in effect decreased. Fewer means of subsistence and production are
now being made, no doubt, but then, they had had no other function save
to maintain workers. The social product is smaller and less capital is
now employed but then, the object of capitalist production is not simply
to employ as much capital as possible, but to produce as much surplus
value as possible. Capital has only decreased because a smaller amount
is sufficient for maintaining the workers. If the total cost of
maintaining the workers employed in the society came to 1,285 units in
the first instance, the present decrease of the social product by 171.5
the difference of (9,000  8,828.5) comes off this maintenance charge,
and there is a consequent change in the composition of the social
product:

  --------------------------------------------
  6,430_c_ + 1,113.5_v_ + 1,285_s_ = 8,828.5
  --------------------------------------------

Constant capital and surplus value remain unchanged, and only the
variable capital, paid labour, has diminished. Or in case there are
doubts about constant capital being unaffected we may further allow for
the event that, as would happen in actual practice, concomitant with the
decrease in means of subsistence for the workers there will be a
corresponding cut in the constant capital. The equation for the social
product as a whole would then be:

  --------------------------------------------
  6,307.5_c_ + 1,236_v_ + 1,285_s_ = 8,828.5
  --------------------------------------------

In spite of the smaller social product, there is no change in the
surplus value in either case, and it is only the cost of maintaining the
workers that has fallen.

Put it this way: the value of the aggregate social product may be
defined as consisting of three parts, the total constant capital of the
society, its total variable capital, and its total surplus value, of
which the first set of products contains no additional labour, and the
second and third no means of production. As regards their material form,
all these products come into being in the given period of production
though in point of value the constant capital had been produced in a
previous period and is merely being transferred to new products. On this
basis, we can also divide all the workers employed into three mutually
exclusive categories: those who produce the aggregate constant capital
of the society, those who provide the upkeep for all the workers, and
finally those who create the entire surplus value for the capitalist
class.

If, then, the workers consumption is curtailed, only workers in the
second category will lose their jobs. _Ex hypothesi_, these workers had
never created surplus value for capital, and in consequence their
dismissal is therefore no loss from the capitalists point of view but a
gain, since it decreases the cost of producing surplus value.

The demand of the state which arises at the same time has the lure of a
new and attractive sphere for realising the surplus value. Some of the
money circulating as variable capital breaks free of this cycle and in
the state treasury it represents a new demand. For the technique of
taxation, of course, the order of events is rather different, since the
amount of the indirect taxes is actually advanced to the state by
capital and is merely being refunded to the capitalists by the sale of
their commodities, as part of their price. But economically speaking, it
makes no difference. The crucial point is that the quantity of money
with the function of variable capital should first mediate the exchange
between capital and labour power. Later, when there is an exchange
between workers and capitalists as buyers and sellers of commodities
respectively, this money will change hands and accrue to the state as
taxes. This money, which capital has set circulating, first fulfils its
primary function in the exchange with labour power, but subsequently, by
mediation of the state, it begins an entirely new career. As a new
purchasing power, belonging with neither labour nor capital, it becomes
interested in new products, in a special branch of production which does
not cater for either the capitalists or the working class, and thus it
offers capital new opportunities for creating and realising surplus
value. When we were formerly taking it for granted that the indirect
taxes extorted from the workers are used for paying the officials and
for provisioning the army, we found the saving in the consumption of the
working class to mean that the workers rather than the capitalists were
made to pay for the personal consumption of the hangers-on of the
capitalist class and the tools of their class-rule. This charge devolved
from the surplus value to the variable capital, and a corresponding
amount of the surplus value became available for purposes of
capitalisation. Now we see how the taxes extorted from the workers
afford capital a new opportunity for accumulation when they are used for
armament manufacture.

On the basis of indirect taxation, militarism in practice works both
ways. By lowering the normal standard of living for the working class,
it ensures both that capital should be able to maintain a regular army,
the organ of capitalist rule, and that it may tap an impressive field
for further accumulation.⁽⁴⁾

We have still to examine the second source of the states purchasing
power referred to in our example, the 150 units out of the total 250
invested in armaments. They differ essentially from the hundred units
considered above in that they are not supplied by the workers but by the
petty bourgeoisie, i.e. the artisans and peasants. (In this connection,
we can ignore the comparatively small tax-contribution of the capitalist
class itself.)

The money accruing to the state as taxes from the peasant masses as our
generic term for all non-proletarian consumers was not originally
advanced by capital and has not split off from capital in circulation.
In the hand of the peasant it is the equivalent of goods that have been
realised, the exchange value of simple commodity production. The state
now gets part of the purchasing power of the non-capitalist consumers,
purchasing power, that is to say, which is already free to realise the
surplus value for capitalist accumulation. Now the question arises,
whether economic changes will result for capital, and if so, of what
nature, from diverting the purchasing power of such strata to the state
for militarist purposes. It almost looks as if we had come up against
yet another shift in the material form of reproduction. Capital will now
produce an equivalent of war materials for the state instead of
producing large quantities of means of production and subsistence for
peasant consumers. But in fact the changes go deeper. First and
foremost, the state can use the mechanism of taxation to mobilise much
larger amounts of purchasing power from the non-capitalist consumers
than they would ordinarily spend on their own consumption.

Indeed the modern system of taxation itself is largely responsible for
forcing commodity economy on the peasants. Under pressure of taxes, the
peasant must turn more and more of his produce into commodities, and at
the same time he must buy more and more. Taxation presses the produce of
peasant economy into circulation and compels the peasants to become
buyers of capitalist products. Finally, on a basis of commodity
production in the peasant style, the system of taxation lures more
purchasing power from peasant economy than would otherwise become
active.

What would normally have been hoarded by the peasants and the lower
middle classes until it has grown big enough to invest in savings banks
and other banks is now set free to constitute an effective demand and an
opportunity for investment. Further the multitude of individual and
insignificant demands for a whole range of commodities, which will
become effective at different times and which might often be met just as
well by simple commodity production, is now replaced by a comprehensive
and homogeneous demand of the state. And the satisfaction of this demand
presupposes a big industry of the highest order. It requires the most
favourable conditions for the production of surplus value and for
accumulation. In the form of government contracts for army supplies the
scattered purchasing power of the consumers is concentrated in large
quantities and, free of the vagaries and subjective fluctuations of
personal consumption, it achieves an almost automatic regularity and
rhythmic growth. Capital itself ultimately controls this automatic and
rhythmic movement of militarist production through the legislature and a
press whose function is to mould so-called public opinion. That is why
this particular province of capitalist accumulation at first seems
capable of infinite expansion. All other attempts to expand markets and
set up operational bases for capital largely depend on historical,
social and political factors beyond the control of capital, whereas
production for militarism represents a province whose regular and
progressive expansion seems primarily determined by capital itself.

In this way capital turns historical necessity into a virtue: the ever
fiercer competition in the capitalist world itself provides a field for
accumulation of the first magnitude. Capital increasingly employs
militarism for implementing a foreign and colonial policy to get hold of
the means of production and labour power of non-capitalist countries and
societies. This same militarism works in a like manner in the capitalist
countries to divert purchasing power away from the non-capitalist
strata. The representatives of simple commodity production and the
working class are affected alike in this way. At their expense, the
accumulation of capital is raised to the highest power, by robbing the
one of their productive forces and by depressing the others standard of
living. Needless to say, after a certain stage the conditions for the
accumulation of capital both at home and abroad turn into their very
opposite they become conditions for the decline of capitalism.

The more ruthlessly capital sets about the destruction of non-capitalist
strata, at home and in the outside world, the more it lowers the
standard of living for the workers as a whole, the greater also is the
change in the day-to-day history of capital. It becomes a string of
political and social disasters and convulsions, and under these
conditions, punctuated by periodical economic catastrophes or crises,
accumulation can go on no longer.

But even before this natural economic impasse of capitals own creating
is properly reached it becomes a necessity for the international working
class to revolt against the rule of capital.

Capitalism is the first mode of economy with the weapon of propaganda, a
mode which tends to engulf the entire globe and to stamp out all other
economies, tolerating no rival at its side. Yet at the same time it is
also the first mode of economy which is unable to exist by itself, which
needs other economic systems as a medium and soil. Although it strives
to become universal, and, indeed, on account of this its tendency, it
must break down because it is immanently incapable of becoming a
universal form of production. In its living history it is a
contradiction in itself, and its movement of accumulation provides a
solution to the conflict and aggravates it at the same time. At a
certain stage of development there will be no other way out than the
application of socialist principles. The aim of socialism is not
accumulation but the satisfaction of tolling humanitys wants by
developing the productive forces of the entire globe. And so we find
that socialism is by its very nature an harmonious and universal system
of economy.

 

 

Footnotes

⁽¹⁾ Dr. Renner indeed makes this assumption the basis of his treatise on
taxation. Every particle of value created in the course of one year is
made up of these four parts: profit, interest, rent, and wages; and
annual taxation, then, can only be levied upon these (DAS ARBEITENDE
VOLK UND DIE STEUERN, Vienna 1909). Though Renner immediately goes on to
mention peasants, he cursorily dismisses them in a single sentence: A
peasant e.g. is simultaneously entrepreneur, worker, and landowner, his
agricultural proceeds yield him wage, profit, and rent, _all in one_.
Obviously, it is an empty abstraction to apply simultaneously all the
categories of capitalist production to the peasantry, to conceive of the
peasant as entrepreneur, wage labourer and landlord all in one person.
If, like Renner, we want to put the peasant into a single category, his
peculiarity for economics lies in the very fact that he belongs neither
to the class of capitalist entrepreneurs nor to that of the wage
proletariat, that he is not a representative of capitalism at all but of
simple commodity production.

⁽²⁾ It would go beyond the scope of the present treatise to deal with
cartels and trusts as specific phenomena of the imperialist phase. They
are due to the internal competitive struggle between individual
capitalist groups for a monopoly of the existing spheres for
accumulation and for the distribution of profits.

⁽³⁾ In a reply to Vorontsov, Professor Manuilov, for example, wrote what
was then greatly praised by the Russian Marxists: In this context, we
must distinguish strictly between a group of entrepreneurs producing
weapons of war and the capitalist class as a whole. For the
manufacturers of guns, rifles and other war materials, the existence of
militarism is no doubt profitable and indispensable. It is indeed quite
possible that the abolition of the system of armed peace would spell
ruin for Krupp. The point at issue, however, is not a special group of
entrepreneurs but the capitalists as a class, capitalist production as a
whole. In this connection, however, it should be noted that if the
burden of taxation falls chiefly on the working population, every
increase of this burden diminishes the purchasing power of the
population and hence the demand for commodities. This fact is taken as
proof that militarism, under the aspect of armament production, does
indeed enrich one group of capitalists, but at the same time it injures
all others, spelling gain on the one hand but loss on the other (_Vesnik
Prava_, Journal of the Law Society, St. Petersburg 189), no.1,
_Militarism and Capitalism_).

⁽⁴⁾ Ultimately, the deterioration of the normal conditions under which
labour power is renewed will bring about a deterioration of labour
itself; it will diminish the average efficiency and productivity of
labour, and thus jeopardise the conditions for the production of surplus
value. But capital will not feel these results for a long time, and so
they do not immediately enter into its economic calculations, except in
so far as they bring about more drastic defensive measures of the wage
labourers in general.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Accumulation of Capital

Last updated on: 12.12.2008
